 judge for failing to show up in a lawsuit by an American distributor involving patent infringement, contract claims and a merger allegedly aimed at avoiding a $165 million judgment.
 The distributor, AngioDynamics Inc, claimed Biolitec diverted assets via the merger with an Austrian unit to avoid the judgment imposed by a New York federal court, according to court papers.
 because he feared a contempt citation for pushing through the merger over the judge’s ruling, Ponsor said.
 said it will buy the rights to add 12 round-trip flights at Washington’s Ronald Reagan National Airport being shed by American Airlines as a condition for its merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 merged with US Airways Group Inc.
 Justice Department, which required divestitures at Reagan and New York’s LaGuardia airports under a settlement of its antitrust lawsuit to block the merger.
 The Justice Department had argued that the merger would let Fort Worth, Texas-based American dominate the airport closest to downtown Washington.
 Magyar Nemzeti Bank President Gyorgy Matolcsy said that Hungary’s current-account surplus sets it apart from more vulnerable economies such as Turkey, which pushed through an emergency rate increase this week to halt a run on the lira.
 The flavors will emerge even more as the rocks glass warms in the hand, Manuele said.
 The government, which hasn’t commented on Sacyr’s threat, has backed companies’ efforts to move into new markets as Spain struggles to emerge from a five-year economic slump.
 The responsibility for those costs is made clear in the business strategy based on a plan from the Nuclear Emergency Response Headquarters, which makes the government responsible for decontamination costs, while the utility will handle compensation claims.
 More than two dozen lawsuits have been filed since the accident, which led President Barack Obama to declare a state of emergency for the affected counties.
 The closely held company completed a four-way merger nine days before the leak was discovered.
 The utility failed to deal promptly with the emergency and had no procedures in place to prevent chemicals from getting into the water system, according to a complaint filed Jan.
 “We believe we can grow our business organically, but if somebody stops by and asks for a cup of coffee, of course we are always willing to discuss” Denmark has emerged as Scandinavia’s weakest economy after a 2008 property crash left many households struggling to service their debts.
 Smaller banks in particular should consider mergers “to obtain synergy effects and provide a basis for a more profitable business,” the bank said.
 They expect Moody’s to put an upgrade of Ireland’s investment ranking on hold until more details emerge about the health of the financial industry.
 UniCredit, which also returned its banking licenses in the Baltics and merged its Czech and Slovak units last year, isn’t looking at further retrenchment in the region as its recovery is beginning to gain speed now, Papa said.
 The currency has swung between gains and losses since the central bank more than doubled its benchmark repurchase rate to 10 percent after an emergency meeting late on Jan.
 “With the clear commitment of the Chinese government to renewable energy -- solar energy in particular -- and a growing market, we believe now is an appropriate time to prudently explore strategic alternatives for this business” Solar stocks last year emerged from a three-year slump after a global capacity glut dragged down solar-panel prices and cut profits.
 “There isn’t an Olympics where stories and athletes don’t emerge,” said Gary Zankel, president of NBC Olympics.
 “Stars are made and born during the Olympic Games” Vonn’s absence could clear the way for the emergence of a young woman skier such as 18-year-old Mikaela Shiffrin of the US, the reigning world champion in the slalom.
 “Other compelling stories will emerge, and they will gain traction with fans and consumers” Lazarus said at yesterday’s news conference the network had not yet spoken with Vonn about doing television work in Sochi, adding that “if she wanted to have that discussion, we would welcome that discussion” Dorfman said “there’s a 99 percent chance” that Vonn will be working for NBC during the Olympics.
 won European Union approval to form the world’s largest advertising company, moving them nearer to closing a merger that will topple Martin Sorrell’s WPP Plc.
 The merger still needs approval in China as well as from shareholders, the companies said in a joint statement.
 The merger will give the owners more clout to negotiate for their clients better ad rates for media placements on television, the Internet and in print, as the global advertising industry has started to show signs of a recovery.
 Fees from the operations, which include managing stock and bond sales for clients and providing advice on mergers and acquisitions, totaled 158 billion yen last quarter, the lowest in a year.
 While Nomura was the top bond and stock underwriter in Japan last year, its ranking for mergers advisory slipped to fifth from fourth, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 distiller Beam Inc, the world’s biggest merger announced so far this year.
 Stopping Short? To be sure, combinations of mobile companies and broadband or TV providers are complicated and many operators stop short of full mergers.
 Foreign investors are seeking profits in Spain as it emerges from the economic slump prompted by the collapse of the property market in 2008.
 In addition to his private-equity role, Bellini also was a partner in Dorsey & Whitney’s corporate group and a member of the capital markets, mergers and acquisitions and venture capital and emerging companies practice groups.
 Bellini focuses his practice on mergers and acquisitions, helps clients with transactions involving public offerings and private placements, and works with private equity funds and start-up companies, the firm said.
 She said she would file a more detailed opinion on that issue and would grant Apple 48 hours from that filing to seek an emergency appeal.
 The airline, created in the December merger of American and US Airways Group Inc, will change aircraft size on some routes to better match demand as part of the hub revisions, President Scott Kirby said today.
 exited bankruptcy in the merger with US Airways, capping a transaction announced in February.
 “This is what United and Delta use, so prior to the merger, three of the big four were using the banked model.
 “Bazaarvoice and PowerReviews each asserted that the merged firm could increase prices post-merger,” US.
 While the government is entitled to an injunction requiring Bazaarvoice to divest PowerReviews, that isn’t “a simple proposition 18 months after the merger,” Orrick said.
 We believe that the merger with PowerReviews has been beneficial to customers, as did the more than 100 customers who testified that they did not believe that the acquisition affected them adversely in any way,” Gene Austin, the company’s president, said in the statement.
 Bazaarvoice’s lawyers said the merger represented no threat to competition because businesses are building their own ratings and reviews systems and can buy software from other competitors.
 While some Bazaarvoice executives predicted that the deal would lead to less price competition, “post merger market realities have shown that any hope for higher prices was just a pipe dream,” Boris Feldman, Bazaarvoice’s attorney, said in a post-trial court filing.
 Investment-banking fees including from mergers and initial public offerings rose 5 percent in North America in 2013 compared with 1 percent in western Europe, data compiled by New York-based consulting firm Freeman & Co.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo BTG Pactual, Brazil’s biggest merger adviser, said the 2014 presidential election will weigh on confidence and keep acquisitions from expanding beyond last year’s level of $788 billion.
 “Players are usually very cautious about doing investments during election years given the amount of uncertainty,” Marco Goncalves, head of mergers and acquisitions at the Sao Paulo-based bank, said in a phone interview.
 5, when President Dilma Rousseff is likely to face Aecio Neves and Eduardo Campos, will add to concerns curtailing merger volume, including speculation the country’s credit rating will be cut because of a growing budget deficit, Goncalves said.
 “Concerns over the economy in general and over regulated sectors are reducing activity in the merger-and-acquisition markets in Brazil,” said Paulo Aragao, a partner at Barbosa Mussnich & Aragao, the second-biggest 2013 M&A legal adviser by deal volume, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 27 to satisfy British stock-market regulations designed to limit merger speculation, the people, who asked not to be identified, said.
 upgraded the French chemicals maker to conviction buy from neutral, citing the possibility of merger and acquisition activity in the industry because of high levels of cash, and the company’s exposure to an economic recovery in Europe.
 Its merger of the Penguin book unit with Bertelsmann AG’s Random House division reduced operating profit by about 29 million pounds last year because of the accounting treatment for Penguin Random House.
 The group “is currently reviewing this merger in coordination with federal agencies,” Jenn Meale, a spokeswoman for Bondi, said in an e-mail.
 We “are working with other states as we examine the potential impact,” said Bryan Corbin, a spokesman for the Indiana Attorney General’s office, of the merger.
 Antitrust Problems The fact that the Justice Department and the FTC haven’t decided which of them will review the merger is a sign that each sees antitrust problems with the Sysco deal, said Bob Doyle, an antitrust lawyer at Doyle, Barlow & Mazard in Washington.
 “This is common practice in mergers involving companies that operate in several geographic areas” Sysco operates in a “highly competitive and fragmented space,” he said.
 However, attempting to merge with companies of that size -- all have a market value of more than $40 billion -- while keeping majority state ownership would be difficult, they said.
 “It’s completely unthinkable to imagine a merger that would allow us to lose national control, meaning majority ownership, a Norwegian CEO, and a Norwegian chairman of the board,” said Ole Borten Moe, a Center Party member who served as oil minister between 2011 and 2013.
 Signs of a longer-term tightening of standards emerged this month when Environment Minister Luz Sarmiento told newspaper El Tiempo she planned to bring forward legislation introducing environmental permits for mining exploration.
 The government imposed a state of emergency in Bangkok Jan.
 31, according to figures compiled by the Bangkok Emergency Medical Center.
 Bondholders may be able to negotiate better terms to win their approval given that there appear to be few other obstacles to the merger, Ngo said.
 Manager Setback The judge’s rejection of the deal was a setback for Kevyn Orr, Detroit’s emergency financial manager, who said Jan.
 To prevent the banks from seizing the money, Orr may need to file an emergency request with the court.
 Itau will inject $652 million of capital and merge its Chilean and Colombian units with Corpbanca, according to a statement today.
 Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP advised KKR and Affinity with a deal team that included partners Mark Pflug, Katie Sudol and Jin Park, mergers and acquisitions; Sinead O’Shea, financing; Katharine Moir, tax; David Vann, regulatory; and Andrea Wahlquist, executive compensation.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Airbus Group Chief Executive Officer Tom Enders said he’s open to merger talks on the company’s space unit and would contemplate taking control of the MBDA missile business as he revamps non-airliner activities.
 The London-based company said it does not comment on merger and disposal speculation.
 Enders became CEO of EADS in mid-2012 and almost immediately sought to merge it with BAE to create a balance between commercial aerospace and defense.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- David Jones Ltd, Australia’s second-largest listed department store company, rose the most in two months after it said it received a merger proposal in October from larger rival Myer Holdings Ltd.
 Myer, which confirmed the approach and said a merger would have led to annual cost savings of A$85 million ($75 million), slid 16 percent.
 The merged company would have operated Myer and David Jones as separate store brands and generated pro forma sales of A$5 billion in fiscal 2013, and earnings before interest and tax of A$364 million, Myer said in a statement today.
 The merger would have created “a sustainable, more competitive retailer, and provide growth opportunities for the combined business,” Myer said.
 The synergies of a merger would be “significant and obvious” Directors’ Shares Two David Jones directors bought shares in David Jones on Oct.
 “We are unlikely to see major buy or sell decision before clarity emerges on those issues” Rajan has made the battle against consumer-price increases a priority since taking over the RBI in September.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index rose 11 percent as better-than-forecast retail sales and corporate merger activity signaled confidence in the US.
 bank) exceeds 3x Ebitda or where total debt exceeds 4x Ebitda, and which says that "a leverage level after planned asset sales (that is, the amount of debt that must be serviced from operating cash flow) in excess of 6X Total Debt/EBITDA raises concerns for most industries" 2 What is going on here? First of all I assume that our buyout comes at an enterprise value to Ebitda ratio of about 102x, which I get from running Bloomberg MA on (1) all asset sales, company takeovers, going-privates, management buyouts, reverse mergers, tender offers and PE buyouts (the Bloomberg MA categories) (2) where target and acquirer are in the US.
 “We believe we have fully cooperated with Consob, and we will continue to do so” BlackRock, which emerged largely unscathed from scandals including one in 2003 when competitors were accused of market timing, has drawn regulatory scrutiny recently.
 CVS Caremark The government is preparing for newly insured people to begin seeking care at doctors’ offices, emergency rooms and pharmacies today, and is coordinating with hospitals and insurers to smooth the process, Sebelius said.
 While there are few opportunities for airline mergers in Brazil, Azul is prepared to consider options if the possibility arises, Neeleman said in an interview after the press conference.
 27 and will host a conference call then, one of the few it’s held since Lampert merged Kmart Holding Corp.
 Hymowitz, 48, worked as a merger and acquisitions attorney for law firm Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP and as a vice president in the private client group at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Kroton and Anhanguera announced a 5 billion reais ($2 billion) merger last year to create the biggest for-profit education company in the world by number of students.
 Ex-CEO Gary Newsome had “personal and direct involvement” in Naples, Florida-based HMA pressuring emergency room staff to increase hospital admissions, according to a complaint unsealed Jan.
 The government has intervened in at least eight whistle-blower cases filed in at least five states alleging HMA paid doctors in exchange for referrals to its hospitals and illegally sought to boost admissions from its emergency rooms, according to complaints unsealed since December.
 EmCare, a provider of emergency room physician services, is accused of being a “willing and equally corrupt partner” to the scheme.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Solvay SA, a Belgian chemicals maker, said a natural gas shortage has emerged in southern France as suppliers bypass the region in favor of faster growing markets in Asia.
 Long-term investors also are looking to a potential Dish merger with DirecTV, the largest US.
 A DirecTV merger is one of many options, Dish Chief Executive Officer Joseph Clayton said last week on Bloomberg Radio, though it’s not the company’s priority.
 “Increased public spending under the government’s emergency economic stimulus package also is strengthening the sales environment” Domestic construction orders rose 21 percent to 119 trillion yen in 2013, the highest in five years, according to a statement released Jan.
 Seven people were injured in a shooting incident near Bangkok’s Democracy Monument early this morning, the Bangkok Emergency Medical Service said.
 “It is also about paving the way for an imposed people’s council and ensuring that no government will emerge from the proposed elections” ‘Good People’ The protesters are led by Suthep Thaugsuban, a former power broker with the opposition Democrat Party, which is boycotting the vote.
 Weighing Terms Charter, which emerged from bankruptcy in 2009, has just $41 million of cash and a market value of $143 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Corning Inc, a 163-year-old company that once made cookware and railroad lanterns, has emerged as an improbable star of the $280 billion smartphone industry as it develops curved screens and glass that repels germs.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Jim Woolery, who left his position as co-head of JPMorgan Chase & Co’s North American mergers and acquisitions practice in February to join Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft LLP as deputy chairman, will become the law firm’s chairman on Jan.
 The Weil team was led by Michael Aiello on mergers and acquisitions matters and included partners Andrew Yoon, finance; Michael Epstein, technology and IP transactions; and Marc Silberberg, tax.
 Small-Firm Acquisitions Help Boost 2013 Record for Combinations There were 88 law firm mergers and acquisitions announced in the US.
 A list of 2013 law firm mergers and acquisitions and an archive are available at wwwaltmanweilcom/MergerLine.
 Revenue from investment banking, which includes managing bond and share sales for clients and providing advice on mergers and acquisitions, rose 3 percent to $104 billion, according to the bank.
 A presidential decree would be required authorizing the swap and approving any purchase by an international company, should such a buyer emerge.
 3, the day before the company, controlled by Chile’s billionaire Luksic family, confirmed it was in talks with Hapag-Lloyd about a merger to form the world’s fourth-largest container shipping company.
 In June, Kuehne demanded a debate about Hapag-Lloyd’s future after merger talks with German rival Hamburg Sued fell through in March.
 Marchionne, 61, will remain as CEO through at least 2016 to pursue the merger of Fiat and Chrysler as part of a strategy to maintain earnings growth, Chairman John Elkann told journalists in Detroit on Jan.
 ‘Easiest Step’ Setting terms for the merger will be “the easiest step,” Erik Gordon, a professor at the University of Michigan’s business and law schools, said in an e-mail.
 The company said that it will merge with the movie-theater business of Poland’s Cinema City International NV.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- President Barack Obama declared an emergency in West Virginia today after a chemical spill tainted drinking water, forcing officials to issue a ban on using the supplies as state and federal agencies began investigations.
 The water was shipped to the state from a Federal Emergency Management Agency facility in Maryland.
 2012, months after an attempted merger between Airbus and BAE Systems Plc fell through because of political opposition.
 Carr’s comments give the first hint at the direction he will take at London-based BAE Systems, which explored a merger with commercial-jet maker Airbus Group NV in 2012 that failed on German government opposition.
 1 by an Ecuadorian Navy helicopter because of a medical emergency caused by kidney stones, according to Drew Herdener, a spokesman for the Seattle-based company.
 This will be achieved by mergers and acquisitions” Solar-cell prices have fallen 70 percent since 2010 as the expansion in production capacity outpaced growth in demand.
 It’s about the same” While Trina isn’t considering selling itself, other solar manufacturers may favor a merger with a company such as Guodian Technology & Environment Group Corp, a supplier of renewable-energy equipment to power generators, Gao said.
 The Italian company will discuss merger terms later this month to seal the transformation of Fiat from a Europe-focused manufacturer into a viable competitor to General Motors Co, Toyota Motor Corp.
 Omnicom Inc, the New York advertising firm, estimates that a planned incorporation in the Netherlands this year, as part of a merger with a French rival, will save the combined company $80 million a year.
 None of those bills have attracted much Republican support or emerged from committee.
 Foreign Mergers One route that remains available involves a foreign merger, as long as the partner is at least one-fourth the size of the US.
 of Palo Alto, California, did the same for its executives when it shifted to Ireland through a 2012 merger.
 The Dodd-Frank Act of 2010 curtailed the Fed’s emergency-lending authority, and forced it to disclose details of bailout programs.
 judge for failing to show up in a lawsuit by an American distributor involving patent infringement, contract claims and a merger allegedly aimed at avoiding a $165 million judgment.
 The distributor, AngioDynamics Inc, claimed Biolitec diverted assets via the merger with an Austrian unit to avoid the judgment imposed by a New York federal court, according to court papers.
 District Judge Michael Ponsor in Boston yesterday -- who had explicitly barred the merger -- said satisfying the judgment was now “virtually impossible” Ponsor penalized the company and Chief Executive Officer Wolfgang Neuberger for refusing to travel to Boston to answer questions by AngioDynamics lawyers.
 because he feared a contempt citation for pushing through the merger over the judge’s ruling, Ponsor said.
 The CEO can’t use Biolitec’s failure to comply with the order barring the merger as an excuse to avoid the deposition, he said.
 Austrian Merger Biolitec merged with its Austrian unit on March 15, the company said in a statement last year.
 In April, the court found Biolitec in contempt for failing to comply with a directive not to merge and sought an arrest warrant for Neuberger.
 Biolitec has made it “crystal clear” that it doesn’t intend to comply with the court’s order blocking the merger, and repeated its refusal “to produce defendant Neuberger and confirmed their unwillingness to pay the assessed fines,” Ponsor wrote.
 AB InBev, created in the brewery world’s biggest merger, has grown to be the largest beermaker through a series of acquisitions, including taking control of Mexico’s Grupo Modelo for $201 billion, a deal completed last year.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- International Paper Co, the world’s largest maker of cardboard shipping containers, agreed to merge its Xpedx distribution business with closely held Unisource Worldwide Inc.
 Lanes were closed for four days, turning the typical 30-minute drive across the bridge into a trip of four hours or more, stranding commuters and emergency medical crews.
 “We would not be surprised if the re-emergence of major balance sheet problems leads many stakeholders to the conclusion that bankruptcy may now be needed to restructure the company’s finances,” Seidl said.
 3 spot among advisers of mergers and acquisitions, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “As we’ve seen the energy markets emerge, we’ve tried to be very nimble to move to address them,” he said.
 The figures don’t compare with the year-earlier period as the merger of copper producer Sterlite Industries (India) Ltd.
 While mergers and acquisitions still represent the highest proportion of transactions, with $63 billion recorded last year, companies opting for listings from London to New York are closing the gap.
 Within the mergers and acquisitions, there was decline in the number of transactions below $10 million, boosting the average deal by 181 percent to $87 million in 2013 compared with three years earlier, IVC figures show.
 A balance-sheet review by the ECB intended to clean up the financial sector before it becomes the euro-area bank supervisor may be prompting institutions to repay the emergency loans because they no longer need them.
 Third-quarter sales at Nippon Steel & Sumitomo, formed by the merger of Nippon Steel Corp.
 Job Cuts Monte Paschi needs financial partners to grow, more than a merger with another bank, Profumo told la Repubblica, reiterating comments he made last year when asked about potential new investors during the stock sale.
 Companies have sought to replace about 10 billion euros ($137 billion) of credit lines since Spain emerged from a two-year recession in October, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Suntory’s offer is a “fair price,” and it is hard to predict if any other bidders will emerge, said Jack Russo, a St.
 Suntory Holdings walked away from merger talks with Kirin Holdings Co.
 The carrier said today that delivery of four more 787s in 2014 will provide “more flexibility,” and that the meeting with Boeing should enhance the response to technical issues which in some cases have “taken too long to fix” It added that the Dreamliner operation has generally delivered “satisfying on-time performance” Kjos had said in September he planned to confront Boeing about glitches that emerged on the 787’s return to service after a global grounding earlier in 2013, and the CEO was in the US.
 The decision is a setback for Kevyn Orr, Detroit’s emergency financial manager, who is trying to adjust about $18 billion in municipal debt in a matter of months.
 To prevent the banks from seizing the money, Orr may need to file an emergency motion with the court.
 The government imposed a state of emergency in Bangkok Jan.
 “Our target is to reform the country and overthrow the Thaksin system” There have been no reports of major violence in Bangkok since Yingluck announced the state of emergency.
 An emergency decree was last used to combat protests in 2010, when the opposition Democrat party held power and oversaw a crackdown on protesters loyal to Thaksin.
 The utility failed to deal promptly with the emergency and had no procedures in place to prevent chemicals from getting into the water system, Miller said.
 The closely held company completed a four-way merger nine days before the leak was discovered.
 Under Gamal Abdel Nasser, Egypt was at the forefront of a wave of Arab nationalism, promoting plans that included a short-lived merger with Syria.
 University operator Estacio Participacoes SA slipped after denying a report that it’s merger talks with US-based Laureate Education Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Morgan Stanley Chief Executive Officer James Gorman emerged as this week’s winner among the six biggest US.
 When Wawrinka emerged from the baggage claims area of the Geneva International Airport at about 1:20 pm.
 Businesses could apply to resume operating, a process that included a health department review of the company’s emergency potable water plans and site visit.
 The spill is one of the largest detected in years, and prompted President Barack Obama to declare an emergency in the affected counties.
 Partner Moves Round-up K&L Gates, Weil, Quinn Emanuel: Lateral Partner Moves Siew Kam Boon joined K&L Gates LLP as a partner in its mergers and acquisitions and private equity practices.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA rose to a three-month high amid speculation that minority stockholders will get more favorable treatment when the company sells shares as part of its merger deal with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Oi’s minority owners have criticized the planned share sale, a capital increase needed to complete the merger, citing concern the value of their stock would be diluted while some of the controlling owners use the money to pay off debt.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the independent merger adviser that earns about half of its revenue from asset management, agreed to boost disclosures about that business after a request from regulators.
 companies to merge.
 economy gain momentum, while the euro area emerged from recession.
 The government imposed a state of emergency in Bangkok Jan.
 He also predicted that smaller banks may look to join together through mergers and acquisitions.
 Morgan Stanley was the second-ranked adviser on global announced mergers and acquisitions in 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “This case emerged out of nowhere; there are so many things that seem off about this, and this was the time to come out,” said Solveig Weiss, a retired Social Liberal voter who was among the protesters.
 Valeant and Actavis held talks about a merger last year, and the discussions eventually stalled because of a disagreement on price, Bloomberg News reported in April.
 generics business such as Actavis is a logical merger partner, it may take a series of transactions to get Valeant to its goal, said David Amsellem, a New York-based analyst at Piper Jaffray Cos.
 “Definitely a merger of equals is in the cards,” Amsellem said in a phone interview.
 We’re looking at potentially at least one merger-type transaction and then maybe more smaller-scale deals” On the other hand, Teva’s $20 billion of annual sales would easily get Valeant to the revenue level that Selvaraju estimates it needs.
 Teva also tops the list of merger candidates because it has a presence in areas where Valeant doesn’t, such as US.
 Act Fast Bonnie Jacobs, a spokeswoman for Allergan, declined to comment on whether the company is considering a merger with Valeant.
 A merger would need to be funded with both stock and debt, he said.
 “Valeant has shown extreme expertise in finding and executing these mergers,” he said.
 Legere responded by saying AT&T was “bribing customers” The growing bitterness between the two companies follows an attempt to merge in 2011.
 Discussions were adjourned so the two sides can consult on the issues of detainees, a state of emergency in the states of Jonglei and Unity and the presence of foreign troops, he said.
 The government also could have emergency authority to obtain the records and then seek a court warrant at a later time, Morell said.
 West Virginia doesn’t require inspection of storage tanks with chemicals such as the one that leaked, and there should be such regulations in place, said Larry Zuspan, who runs the local emergency planning committee in Charleston.
 “For that magnitude of product that’s stored there, and where it was, it’s on a waterway, yeah, I think that’s going to require some inspections,” Zuspan, administrator of the Kanawha Putnam Emergency Planning Committee, said by phone.
 “It gives you enough distance between the potential risk and the vulnerable asset to be able to go in and to respond with some kind of remediation or some kind of emergency response,” Huffman told reporters yesterday in Charleston.
 Once the water emergency ends, “we’re going to look into it to see what they’ve got there,” Elkins said in an interview.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- California Governor Jerry Brown declared a drought emergency in the most populous US.
 State emergency disaster planners are bracing for a record wildfire season as the lack of snow and rain has left most of the state with tinderbox conditions.
 In Sacramento, the state capital, local officials last week declared a water emergency that requires all residents and businesses to curb water use by as much as 30 percent.
 economy gain momentum and the euro area emerged from recession.
 The government aims to decide by the end of March on “temporary emergency measures related to the use of foreign talent,” Suga said.
 By investing in T-Mobile, Loeb now has a position on both sides of a potential merger.
 Regulators may be resistant to approve a merger if it eliminates a company that’s rattling competitors.
 Telefonica’s plan to purchase KPN’s E-Plus will merge the two companies’ German units, reducing the country’s mobile operators from four to three.
 Germany asked last year to take over the merger review because the transaction would only affect the German market.
 “The commission concluded that it was better placed to deal with the case because of its experience in assessing mergers in the mobile telecommunications sector and the need for a consistent application of the merger control rules in the EU,” the regulator said in the statement.
 European Case Joaquin Almunia, the EU’s antitrust chief, has repeatedly said the Brussels-based agency should keep the German deal, describing it is a “European case” He’s also examining Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s plan to buy Telefonica’s Irish unit, which will also merge two of the country’s operators.
 Almunia hasn’t been swayed by telecommunications firms’ calls to ease merger rules for them, saying national markets are “often highly concentrated with only a limited number of network operators” in each EU nation.
 Hutchison won EU approval to buy wireless carrier Orange Austria, and merge it with its local unit, more than a year ago after it agreed to divest radio spectrum and offer network access to new rivals.
 The bank kept smaller client-driven businesses in rates and credit and in November said it would merge the unit, run by Chris Murphy, with foreign exchange trading.
 That starts the countdown for a probable return to the $37 trillion municipal market to fund the city’s exit from Chapter 9 bankruptcy, which Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr has said he wants to arrange by September.
 Tap Test For Detroit, the test will be whether it can tap investors to turn the Barclays loan into long-term debt when it tries to emerge from Chapter 9, said Matt Fabian, an analyst with Municipal Market Advisors.
 market had performed better than the rest of the world in mergers and acquisitions.
 “We do not release customer information unless authorized by law, such as a valid law enforcement demand or an appropriate request in an emergency involving the danger of death or serious physical injury,” Verizon said.
 Phone companies also provide information to public-safety call centers when an emergency 911 call is placed.
 “So far we see there is no real synergy in telecommunications business between companies in various geographies” Sistema, which controls Russia’s largest wireless operator OAO Mobile TeleSystems, doesn’t see much risk to its business from a new nationwide mobile operator, which is being formed in a merger of state-run OAO Rostelecom’s wireless assets with Tele2 Russia, Shamolin said.
 25 TransCanada explosion forced emergency deliveries of compressed natural gas, the company said on Jan.
 senators, Joe Manchin and Jay Rockefeller, yesterday proposed legislation to boost inspections of above-ground chemical storage facilities and require companies to develop state-approved emergency-response plans.
 “Source water protection efforts should be directed toward the establishment of an effective and efficient emergency response plan if one does not currently exist,” according to the assessment.
 Identifying production in China as a prerequisite for growth, he presided over the company’s 2010 merger with China National Chemical Corp, allowing the producer of generic pesticides to grow in previously untapped markets.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- M&T Bank Corp, the lender struggling to complete its merger with Hudson City Bancorp Inc, shuffled its top managers after Vice Chairman Michael P.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Abril Educacao SA rose to a four-week high in Sao Paulo on speculation it may merge with the largest US.
 Abril is in “advanced” discussions for a 2 billion-real ($840 million) merger with Laureate Education Inc, O Estado de S.
 brought in to oversee emergency repairs.
 He’s also seeking a court order blocking the transaction unless the company adopts merger procedures that will elicit the best possible outcome for shareholders.
 With Riverbed, “there is an impetus for a strategic or a private-equity firm to take a close look at it” Riverbed’s management may have a higher price in mind than what suitors are willing to pay, and has protections including the poison pill and a staggered board, said Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried.
 “It’s going to be very nebulous and the market will take the ball and run with it whichever way they figure out it’s supposed to mean” Swap Rates Brazil’s Ibovespa gained as Oi led a rally in telecommunications companies after the nation’s antitrust regulator approved its planned merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 The utility failed to deal promptly with the emergency and had no procedures in place to prevent chemicals from getting into the water system, according to a complaint filed Jan.
 The closely held company completed a four-way merger nine days before the leak was discovered.
 “The European market cannot continue to rally if bank earnings drop further” Growth Anticipation Financial shares have climbed in anticipation of improving income growth after the euro area emerged from a two-year economic contraction in the second quarter and a manufacturing index indicated growth in July for the first time in two years.
 Odigeo, with more than 15 million annual customers according to its website, was formed in 2011 with the merger of eDreams and Go Voyages, backed by Permira and Ardian respectively, alongside the acquisition of Opodo from Madrid-based travel services group Amadeus IT Holding SA.
 Turkey’s central bank more than doubled its main interest rate at an emergency meeting, reversing years of policy after the lira slid to a record low.
 27 prompted the central bank to hold an emergency meeting, at which it more than doubled its main interest rate.
 If the growth was above trend everywhere, we’d be jumping into commodities” More Supply While the 18 euro-area nations emerged from the longest recession since they began using the currency 15 years ago, economic growth this year will be just 1 percent, below the annual average of 15 percent since 1997, according to 56 economists in a Bloomberg survey.
 30, said Cecily Fong, a spokeswoman for the state Emergency Services Department.
 He previously worked as a mergers banker at Merrill Lynch & Co.
 He represents middle market companies in public and private securities offerings, corporate governance, mergers and acquisitions and securities matters.
 He opened the office for what was then Ross, Dixon & Bell and continued to serve as managing partner after the firm merged with Troutman Sanders in 2009.
 cut the rate it is paying on a $900 million loan to support its emergence from bankruptcy, according to a person with knowledge of the transaction.
 FEMA Deliveries The Federal Emergency Management Agency sent 75 trucks with 18,500 liters of water in each one to Charleston, and those began arriving last night.
 The federal government will pay for 75 percent of the cost for equipment and resources to fight the spill, after President Barack Obama issued a state of emergency for eight counties: Boone, Clay, Jackson, Kanawha, Lincoln, Logan, Putnam, and Roane.
 At noon today, West Virginia Governor Earl Ray Tomblin extended indefinitely the state of emergency that he initially issued on Jan.
 It was formed through the 2011 merger of PartyGaming Plc and Bwin Interactive Entertainment AG.
 Today, the products most people call margarine are spreads, better-tasting variants made from oils and fats that emerged in the 1970s.
 needs to emerge from bankruptcy, as investor Philip Falcone’s fight to keep control of the wireless provider approaches a decisive moment.
 The train stopped unexpectedly yesterday near the town of Plaster Rock after “an undesired emergency brake application,” the Transportation Safety Board of Canada said.
 “We have the equipment, we have the people and we have all the procedures in place to deal with it in a safe manner” About 150 people were evacuated as a result of the derailment, Greg MacCallum, director of the New Brunswick Emergency Measures Organization, said at a televised press conference today.
 6, one of the first issues it will take up is whether to renew an emergency federal unemployment program that expired on Dec.
 Talks stalled on the law even as revelations emerged of widespread US.
 Lazard Ltd, the biggest independent merger adviser, this year named Jim Rossman to head its corporate preparedness team, which is helping defend Bob Evans Farms Inc.
 Hoshino advises on disputes including domestic and international labor law, commercial litigation, and judgments, as well as on corporate legal matters such as strategic restructurings, joint ventures, mergers and acquisitions, leasings, financings and other transactions.
 Tsumagari advises and represents Japanese and foreign corporations on real estate and structured financings and matters including cross-border antitrust cases and mergers and acquisitions, as well as international and domestic commercial trade.
 exited bankruptcy in December in a merger with US Airways Group Inc, capping a transaction announced in February.
 “Margins expanded, which is what you’ve seen across the board” Investors will focus on comments from American executives about progress in the merger integration, said Syth, who is based in St.
 Canada’s National Energy Board said in a separate statement that it sent an emergency response team to monitor and assess the response of the Calgary-based company.
 merger.
 The full picture of what happened at the IRS tax-exempt office hasn’t emerged yet.
 Dry Spell The dry weather in Queensland, Australia’s largest cattle producer, emerged in 2013 after two years of wetter-than-normal weather.
 A merger will enable the companies to pool funds and tighten cooperation between the Italian producer’s Alfa Romeo, Lancia and Maserati brands and the Chrysler, Dodge and Jeep nameplates.
 Small Scratches Kapoor called emergency services that day saying he’d found his 35-year-old wife unconscious on the bedroom floor and believed she’d fallen off a stool, police said.
 The emergence of a potential new service on the national pay-TV scene comes as the largest cable companies weigh a new round of consolidation to gain leverage in contract talks with the biggest film and TV studios.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Bank of Canada was the top investment-banking adviser on Canadian mergers and acquisitions for the third straight year as retail dominated the slowest period for dealmaking since 2009.
 “Energy and mining activity really fell off a cliff,” Peter Buzzi, head of mergers and acquisitions in Canada at RBC Capital Markets, a unit of the country’s second-largest bank by assets, said in a Dec.
 Canada Pension Plan and its peers participated in $184 billion of mergers and acquisitions in the first 10 months of 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, more than double the amount of the three biggest US.
 “Debt capital markets have never been deeper and you couldn’t have a deeper bank credit market in the world,” said Daniel Barclay, head of Canadian mergers and acquisitions at BMO Capital Markets.
 executive was barred from the brokerage industry for allegedly passing inside information on corporate mergers to a friend, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority said.
 Gutman tipped Tyndall, then a broker at New York-based Meyers Associates LP, to at least 15 pending corporate mergers and acquisitions, Finra said.
 Businesses could apply to resume operating, a process that included a Kanawha-Charleston Health Department review of the company’s emergency potable water plans and site visit.
 State of Emergency The spill is one of the largest detected in years, and prompted President Barack Obama to declare a state of emergency for the affected counties.
 West Virginia hospitals have admitted 10 patients with non-life threatening conditions linked to the leak and treated and released 169 patients from emergency rooms, state Department of Health and Human Resources Secretary Karen Bowling said at the press conference yesterday.
 Further evidence of the housing recovery emerged today as Persimmon Plc, the UK’s largest homebuilder by market value, said sales rose 25 percent in the second half.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Three of Britain’s biggest retailers emerged as casualties of the Christmas season as consumers pared spending on everything from food to clothing, while changing their shopping habits to seek convenience.
 She said she would file a more detailed opinion on that issue and would grant Apple 48 hours from that filing to seek an emergency appeal.
 The pickup in spending prompted the central bank to increase its economic growth forecast for this year, just as the government seeks to follow Ireland and leave the emergency bailout program it entered during the debt crisis.
 For investors, Sberbank is not just a stable company that gives access to Russian market, it’s also a company that has gone through reforms and emerges as a first-class bank” Qiwi Plc, the electronic-payment operator, plunged 22 percent last week in New York on concern a draft anti-terrorism bill will limit the amount that people can transfer via online payment accounts without providing personal information will be limited to 1,000 rubles a day.
 Bank Merger Hayashi, 56, became deputy president of the company’s corporate banking unit in April last year, three months before it merged with the retail lending arm to form Mizuho Bank.
 “There will be mergers and acquisitions in South Africa, I’m just not relying on it,” Coleman said, adding that Johannesburg will remain the entry point for investment elsewhere in the continent.
 ‘Risk Perception’ “In the last 24 months there has been a progressive reduction in the perception of risk among investors and we are gradually moving from fear to greed,” said Jacopo Ceccatelli, a London-based partner who manages 22 billion euros at financial advisory and asset management firm JCI Capital “The reduction in the risk perception, and this sort of market euphoria, is leading to a re-rating of sectors and countries most penalized during the sovereign debt crisis” The euro, now the currency for 18 nations, rose against all but one of its 16 major counterparts last year as the region’s economy emerged from its longest recession on record.
 “We need to master this together to reduce risks as we may not be able to emerge from the next bubble or crisis like 2007-2008 with as little damage” Deutsche Bank, Germany’s biggest bank, is among financial institutions paying to settle probes and lawsuits alleging that they sought to rig benchmark interest rates for their own profit or misled clients over the quality of products tied to US.
 “Retention of these individuals and succession are really key, especially as these banks start to emerge from these stormy times and get into more consistent performance,” Glassner said.
 Fees for debt and equity issuance, as well as advice for activities including mergers, rose 17 percent to $641 billion last year at Charlotte, North Carolina-based Bank of America.
 Thompson said he was optimistic that initial public offerings and rising merger and acquisitions would bolster both areas.
 bonds, second in global equity issues, and third in advising on mergers and acquisitions, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 As technology and medicine merge to give consumers more control over their health, innovators from mobile-health application developers to DNA analysis companies have struggled to meet the demands of federal oversight.
 I expect a flurry of money transmitters to emerge in the next one to three years, and they’ll be able to do this for everybody at a fraction of the cost of Western Union and others” Jason Gorss, a spokesman for GlobalFoundries, said the manufacturer is working with several companies that design chips for Bitcoin mining, such as Butterfly Labs Inc.
 carrier BMI in 2012 and the group’s formation via a merger of BA and Madrid-based Iberia in 2011.
 While IAG emerged strongest last year thanks to the Vueling deal and the resilience of BA’s North Atlantic routes, Air France-KLM’s past failures have led it to adopt the most sweeping measures for 2014 in terms of restructuring, capacity restraint and product improvement, said Damian Brewer, an analyst at RBC Capital in London.
 The merger will strengthen Dassault Systemes’ offering of scientific product-life cycle management in areas such as molecular chemistry, packaged consumer goods and energy, Chief Executive Officer Bernard Charles said in the statement.
 Japan removed certain rules that had restricted share buybacks by REITs and curbed their mergers and acquisitions after the 2008 global financial crisis, Yeung said.
 Emerging market currencies initially rose today, as the Turkish central bank raised rates after an emergency meeting.
 “It also makes it very difficult for an investor to place value in an industry when the government sees fit to step in the way it has” With Verizon out, Wind Mobile, the startup that began offering wireless service in Toronto in 2009 with backing from Sawiris, had been expected to emerge as the strongest challenger to the top three.
 It also vowed to encourage mergers and acquisitions among solar companies.
 The deadline for the parliament to receive new, non-emergency, proposals before the elections expired in July last year” Barnier’s initiative, which would ban the lenders from proprietary trading and hand regulators the power to split them up, are seen as a “cornerstone” of the EU’s fight against too-big-to-fail lenders that has dominated his five-year tenure.
 Tumbling metal prices also eroded revenue at mines and smelters last year during the first commodity slump since the recession of 2008, while the value of mergers and acquisitions slid 31 percent, data show.
 “There will be less opportunistic-driven refinancing in 2014, but hopefully that will be offset by a meaningful pickup in mergers and acquisitions” Expanded Lending RBC Capital Markets ranked fourth in lending to the commodity and energy industries last year, and Citigroup Inc.
 Fewer Acquisitions Commodities and energy companies announced 4,305 mergers and acquisitions valued at $4254 billion last year, the lowest since 2009, as they reigned in spending and curbed expansion plans, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “Snowden’s actions are likely to have lethal consequences for our troops in the field” The classified Pentagon report marked the first official assessment to emerge of how much data Snowden took and the risk to military and intelligence personnel.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- German government bonds slumped last year, with 10-year yields rising the most since 2006, as the euro area’s emergence from its longest recession on record damped demand for the region’s safest assets.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- David Jones Ltd, Australia’s second-largest listed department store company, said it rejected an offer to merge by larger rival Myer Holdings Ltd, which made the approach in October.
 The synergies of a merger would be “significant and obvious” at around A$90 million, Morgan Stanley analysts Thomas Kierath and Crystal Wang said in a research note today.
 and Solvay SA, Europe’s two biggest makers of polyvinyl chloride, received a complaint from European Union merger regulators over concerns about a 43 billion-euro ($58 billion) joint venture of their PVC units.
 Called seifu senyo ki, or Japanese Air Force One in English, the jets were introduced in 1991, and are also used for transporting Japanese nationals in the event of emergencies.
 The flow of gas, water and drilling fluids was diverted overboard, consistent with the emergency plan for the situation, Garrett said.
 Supply Glut A global seaborne surplus will emerge in the second quarter as supply outweighs demand, Goldman said Jan.
 The stress test “may trigger a comeback of some of the concerns about banks,” which could lead to a re-emergence of risks for countries that may have to provide fresh capital to the lenders, Weber said at a panel discussion at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland, today.
 “Portuguese banks, retailers and media companies should clearly benefit” Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter of 2013.
 Euro Crisis The 18-nation euro climbed 85 percent against nine developed-market peers in the past year, the biggest gain in Bloomberg Correlation-Weighted Currency Indexes, as the trading bloc emerged from its longest-ever recession.
 Cravath represented J&J with a deal team that included mergers and acquisitions partners Robert I.
 When Time Warner Cable responded to that with a request for a higher bid including a higher cash component, Charter determined it wasn’t interested in pursuing a merger agreement, according to the letter.
 13 settlement of the suit, filed almost 10 years ago, came four days after American’s parent, AMR Corp, completed a merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 The responsibility for those costs is made clear in the business strategy based on a plan from the Nuclear Emergency Response Headquarters, which makes the government responsible for decontamination costs, while Tepco will handle compensation claims.
 Sprint argued during a meeting this month with senior antitrust officials that a merger with T-Mobile would allow more aggressive competition with larger rivals AT&T Inc.
 T-Mobile Chief Executive Officer John Legere said in a Bloomberg TV interview that a merger with Sprint, based in Overland Park, Kansas, may help the company challenge the “duopoly” of Verizon Wireless and AT&T by providing more resources.
 Those successes have raised speculation that regulators would block a merger with Sprint, fearing that the industry would lose its most aggressive competitor.
 Antitrust officials weren’t convinced by Sprint’s argument that a T-Mobile merger would promote more aggressive competition with larger rivals AT&T and Verizon Wireless, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 ‘Tough Talk’ Even though the Justice Department sees T-Mobile as a maverick company and will scrutinize any merger with Sprint, Baer’s remarks shouldn’t be seen as a final decision that the department will seek to block a deal, said Andre Barlow, an antitrust lawyer at in Washington.
 When Baer sued in August to block the merger of American Airlines and US Airways Group Inc, he said the government wanted a “full-stop injunction” against the deal.
 “Experience, our past antitrust enforcement and our merger guidance should put companies on notice that this strategy is unlikely to succeed,” he said.
 The share sale would capitalize on New York-based Moelis’s rising stature among merger and restructuring advisers and allow partners and employees, who own about 85 percent of the firm, to sell some of their stakes, said the people, who asked for anonymity because the plans are preliminary and may change.
 The boutique finished 11th in the 2013 M&A league table, ranking among the year’s top 15 global financial advisers on mergers for the first time in its history, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 on its merger with Publicis Groupe SA that will create an advertising empire with a market value of more than $30 billion.
 “Now AT&T has made that offer essentially risk free” The move is the latest salvo between two one-time merger partners that have become fierce rivals.
 The drugmaker isn’t interested in a large merger or acquisition to build sales, Lechleiter said.
 The South African born 55-year-old is looking to repeat his success at Xstrata, where he led the management team that took the coal producer from a company with a $500 million market capitalization to one valued at $50 billion through a decade of mergers, acquisitions and expansion.
 Earnings Estimates Under the BlackRock survey, data sought included analyst views on the likelihood of a surprise to their forecasted earnings estimate and the possibility a company they cover would be acquired in a merger, according to the agreement.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Symantec Corp’s shares slid the most since October after the company forecast revenue that fell short of some analysts’ estimates, as declines in the personal-computer market and the emergence of advanced hacking threats hurt demand for traditional antivirus software.
 If Sprint agrees to host Dish’s wireless airwaves on its network, allowing the satellite company to enter the mobile-phone business, regulators may approve a Sprint takeover of T-Mobile because a new competitor would emerge, Chaplin said.
 Further evidence of the housing recovery emerged today as Bovis Homes Group Plc said sales climbed 19 percent last year as the UK.
 Nomura will also raise fees for advising companies on mergers and acquisitions and managing bond sales in accordance with the tax increase, Kenji Yamashita, a Tokyo-based spokesman, said by phone today.
 Siemens AG merged its small and large gas turbine operations and carved out a separate energy sales unit in October, saying utilities are no longer the only customers.
 Paulson Funds Paulson & Co, the $20 billion New York-based hedge-fund firm run by billionaire John Paulson, posted a 31 percent gain last year in its Paulson Partners Enhanced Fund, a merger strategy that uses leverage to amplify returns, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- A United Airlines computer system malfunction that stranded pilots and caused some flight cancellations shows the company is still struggling to integrate Continental Airlines more than three years after their merger.
 The technology snafu is the latest in a series of miscues that have dogged United’s parent, Chicago-based United Continental Holdings Inc, since the 2010 merger.
 At least 523 United flights were delayed, according to online data service FlightStatscom ‘Stable and Reliable’ United has worked to improve its on-time performance and make its operations more efficient as it moves past the merger struggle.
 “We are pretty optimistic about the prospects for theyear to come” The world’s 11th-largest economy has struggled to emergefrom a two-year slump that has been largely due to weaker-than-expected exports and investment.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- ALL - America Latina Logistica SA, Brazil’s largest railroad operator, rallied the most since 2009 after newspaper Valor Economico said the company may restart merger talks with Cosan SA Industria & Comercio.
 Cosan Chairman Rubens Ometto and ALL shareholders may resume talks on a merger that may help resolve a dispute over sugar transportation contracts, Valor reported today, without saying how it got the information.
 “If there’s a merger, the bad mood with ALL would be over.
 Expenses climbed 12 percent, with the bank citing merger-related regulatory costs such as upgrading its technology and hiring more people.
 in the last major asset sale demanded by regulators for the merger creating American Airlines Group Inc.
 The merger was completed last month.
 that the 2012 merger will reduce competition and raise prices in the market for product rating and review software.
 With Brazil’s emergence in the past decade, the economy is stronger than most developed countries, according to Jan Dehn, the head of research at Ashmore Group Plc, which oversees $785 billion in emerging-market assets.
 Assets of the fund, which invests in securities affected by corporate events such as mergers and acquisitions, rebounded from just above $280 million in August.
 While the agency provided no explanation, employees chalked it up to budget woes that forced the derivatives regulator last week to quietly obtain an emergency infusion of funds just to keep its doors open, according to four people familiar with the situation.
 (JBLU) in the last major asset sale demanded byregulators for the merger creating American Airlines Group Inc.
 The merger was completed last month.
 Academy Merger Putin’s overhaul merges the academy of sciences with the medical and agricultural academies.
 The government imposed a state of emergency in Bangkok Jan.
 31, according to figures compiled by the Bangkok Emergency Medical Center.
 The deal is the latest merger within the cybersecurity industry.
 “But what is particularly relevant here is my experience in mergers, financial management, risk management and active ownership” Novo A/S was established in 1999 by the foundation, which has as its primary mandate to ensure stable ownership of Novo Nordisk, according to drugmaker’s website.
 The foundation may waive its controlling interest in the drugmaker in the event of a merger or capital increase.
 Raaflaub, born in 1965, has been the head of Finma since 2009 and supervised the merger of three predecessor watchdogs, responsible for banking, insurance and anti-money laundering control, to form the new regulator.
 Governor Jerry Brown, declaring a state of emergency yesterday, asked residents and businesses to voluntarily cut use by 20 percent and warned that mandatory restrictions may follow.
 State emergency disaster planners are bracing for a record wildfire season as the lack of snow and rain has left most of the state with tinderbox conditions.
 Fishing Restrictions The emergency declaration advises local communities to establish contingency plans and warns that sport fishing in some lakes and rivers that are home to threatened species could be restricted.
 The state will draft a plan to provide emergency food supplies, financial assistance, and unemployment services in communities that suffer high unemployment from the drought.
 The two-year floater is aimed at people wanting to hedge against an increase in government yields later this year, while four to seven years is the sweet spot” The company will use the proceeds of the sale for general corporate purposes, which may include financing mergers and acquisitions, said the person with knowledge of the deal.
 Zegas previously represented attorney Matthew Kluger, who stole corporate merger tips from four law firms in a 17-year insider trading scheme that generated $37 million in illegal profit.
 City Liability Lawsuits could also be lodged against the city, if it didn’t follow guidelines for handling the emergency and dispersing the vapor, and people ended up in the hospital, said Becnel, who’s not involved in the cases in West Virginia.
 Chairwoman Mamphela Ramphele as its presidential candidate and merged with her party to challenge the ruling African National Congress in elections this year.
 are changing their policies as merger deals and initial public offerings have fallen from pre-crisis peaks and average pay drops at the largest US.
 Goldman Sachs and Bank of America also have encouraged time off on weekends for junior bankers as mergers remain below their pre-crisis peak.
 Companies globally announced $18 trillion of mergers and acquisitions last year, 46 percent lower than the 2007 high of $332 trillion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Japan Exchange Group Inc, formed from the merger of rivals in Tokyo and Osaka, has made expanding services in derivatives a key objective.
 “It fails to prioritize clean energy and solutions that have already begun to replace fossil fuels, revitalize American industry, and save Americans money” The letter emerged as the US.
 “Amid the economic recovery and normalizing credit conditions, the specialty finance industry has successfully emerged from the financial crisis,” said Philip Drury, co-head of equity capital markets for the Americas at Citigroup Inc, which managed the Springleaf and Santander Consumer IPOs.
 emerged from the IPO with more than a 300 percent paper gain, a person familiar with the matter said at the time.
 Mulligan, 54, a former vice chairman of media and telecommunications investment banking at Europe’s largest investment bank by revenue, last year sued police officers James Nichols and John Miller, as well as the City of Los Angeles, seeking $20 million in damages over claims he was beaten so badly he required emergency facial surgery.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- The European Medicines Agency will review emergency contraceptives to discover whether increased bodyweight or body mass index makes them less effective in preventing pregnancy.
 New data suggests that high bodyweight reduces the efficacy of emergency contraceptives, EMA said.
 Access to emergency contraception varies across the continent, according to the European Consortium for Emergency Contraception, a network of organizations and individuals working in the field.
 Last year was the first time that Boston emerged as the premium winter power market, averaging $623 from November through March.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- The Ibovespa rose for the second time in three days as Oi SA led a rally in telecommunications companies after Brazil’s antitrust regulator approved its planned merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 “Cade’s approval pushes Oi higher, with investors betting that the merger will create a big company, with more power to face its competitors,” Pedro Galdi, the head strategist at SLW Corretora in Sao Paulo, said in a phone interview.
 Cade said in a statement that the merger won’t affect competition because Portugal Telecom doesn’t hold interests in phone companies operating in the Latin American country besides a stake it already owns in Oi.
 Rochester, New York-based Kodak emerged from bankruptcy protection last September as a smaller company making equipment for commercial printing and packaging after selling units including its photographic-film business.
 Kodak’s shares have rallied 78 percent in New York trading since September, when the company emerged from Chapter 11.
 The brokerage said Sprint would struggle to obtain regulatory approval for a merger with T-Mobile US.
 investors poured money into Chinese stocks in 2009 that went public via reverse mergers amid optimism about the world’s second-biggest economy.
 FirstEnergy was formed by the merger of Ohio Edison Co.
 27 to satisfy strict British stock-market regulations designed to limit merger speculation, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing a private matter.
 senators, Joe Manchin and Jay Rockefeller, today proposed legislation to boost inspections of above-ground chemical storage facilities and require companies to develop state-approved emergency-response plans.
 “Source water protection efforts should be directed toward the establishment of an effective and efficient emergency response plan if one does not currently exist,” according to the assessment.
 An increasing number of Chinese cities have introduced emergency measures to fight smog.
 After a meeting on job creation and economic fairness with President Barack Obama and other newly elected mayors last month, de Blasio emerged as the group’s spokesman.
 “It appears that 2014 may prove to be a typical cyclical recovery for the institutional business” at major investment banks, with Morgan Stanley and Goldman Sachs to benefit most because of their mergers-and-acquisitions and capital-markets units, Hintz said.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Ulrich Hartmann, the chief executive officer who shook up the European energy market when he engineered the merger that turned EON SE into Germany’s largest utility, has died.
 As CEO of the Dusseldorf-based energy, mining and telecommunications firm Veba AG for seven years, Hartmann was the driving force behind its merger with Munich-based Viag AG in 2000, two years after the German government liberalized the energy market.
 Under Hartmann and Wilhelm Simson, the Viag boss who became his co-CEO at EON, the merged company acquired UK.
 Andrea Orcel, the chief executive officer of UBS’s investment bank, has recently hired other senior Nomura dealmakers including Piero Novelli, now global chairman of mergers and acquisitions, and William Vereker, who runs investment banking in Europe.
 While the euro-area economy emerged from its longest-ever recession last year, growth slowed in the third quarter as exports and household consumption cooled.
 But of course, if the decision doesn’t go our way, we have to look at alternatives” Denmark’s mortgage industry was blindsided in November, when it emerged the London-based EBA would ignore the findings of its own technical study, which showed covered bonds are as liquid as government debt.
 This was followed by Cuomo’s 2011 merger of state insurance and banking regulators into a Department of Financial Services under Benjamin Lawsky, a top prosecutor when Cuomo was attorney general.
 Europe has more than 100 wireless carriers, weighing on prices and earnings, and operators have struggled to gain regulatory approvals for mergers.
 The courtroom offensive will begin by targeting closely held Freedom Industries, a little-known amalgamation of four smaller companies whose merger was finalized less than two weeks before the leak became public on Jan.
 Fees from investment banking, which includes managing stock and bond sales for clients and providing advice on mergers and acquisitions, rose 22 percent to 158 billion yen.
 Investment Banking While Nomura was the top bond and stock underwriter in Japan last year, its ranking for mergers advisory slipped to fifth from fourth, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The firm missed out on Tokyo Electron Ltd’s $68 billion merger with Santa Clara, California-based Applied Materials Inc.
 last year to a brokerage venture owned by Mitsubishi UFJ and Morgan Stanley, which topped Japan’s mergers advisory rankings in 2013.
 distiller Beam Inc, the world’s biggest merger announced so far this year.
 Iron Ore A surplus of supply will emerge in the second quarter as production outweighs demand, Goldman Sachs said Jan.
 “Bankia was born with vast problems and this is a tentative step away from all that” Formed in 2010 from a merger of seven former savings banks, the Valencia-based lender became a symbol of Spain’s banking crisis after mounting writedowns caused it to post the country’s biggest ever corporate loss.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Symantec Corp’s shares slid the most since October after the company forecast revenue that fell short of some analysts’ estimates, as declines in the personal-computer market and the emergence of advanced hacking threats hurt demand for traditional antivirus software.
 “The mood music from Moscow this week has been that it would rather delay lending any further monies to Ukraine until there is clarity over the future shape and direction of the new administration” Russia’s Wait Putin told Medvedev to remain in contact with Ukrainian officials and said “it’s reasonable” to wait until a new cabinet emerges.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Bankers who sold Detroit interest rate swaps placed “a ticking time bomb” in their structure, the city’s emergency manager said in court as a trial resumed over a proposal for canceling the transaction.
 Although the city collected $40 million over eight months from the swaps deal, falling interest rates helped the banks behind the deals turn a profit, Kevyn Orr, the emergency manager, testified today before US.
 Orr testified that after he became emergency manager last year he had “plenty” of concern over whether the swaps were fraudulently put together.
 “We are looking at the medium-to-large category of helicopters which are relevant to the offshore oil and gas sector, search-and-rescue, and emergency helicopter services,” Crispin said.
 Formed from a merger of seven former savings banks, the Valencia-based lender became a symbol of Spain’s banking crisis when its nationalization threatened to overwhelm government finances in 2012, pushing the country into a European banking bailout.
 As an executive vice president at Star Banc Corp, he oversaw its 1998 merger with Firstar Corp.
 -Details of the Fiat-Chrysler merger are released along with 2013 results for the combined carmaker.
 SSAB sees annual cost savings of 14 billion kronor within three years of completing the merger, the Stockholm-based company said in a statement today.
 “We consider the merger as strategically logical,” Antti Viljakainen, an analyst at Inderes Oy, said in a note to clients.
 Even so, “both companies have struggled with profitability and we don’t believe that the merger will significantly remedy the steel industry’s overcapacity problem and the resulting weak pricing power” Share Swap SSAB will offer Rautaruukki shareholders 04752 new Class A shares and 12131 new Class B shares for every share they hold in the Finnish company.
 Solidium Oy, the Finnish state’s equity-investment manager holding 397 percent of the shares of Rautaruukki, and Industrivaerden AB, which owns 182 percent of the stock in SSAB, both support the planned merger.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Bats Global Markets Inc’s merger with Direct Edge Holdings LLC will put a broker-owned stock exchange operator in the top ranks on Wall Street for the first time since NYSE Euronext and Nasdaq OMX Group Inc.
 The merged Bats Global Markets, whose owners include Goldman Sachs Group Inc, Morgan Stanley, Credit Suisse Group AG, Citadel LLC, Citigroup Inc.
 Knight last year merged with high-frequency trading firm Getco LLC, which held a stake in Bats, to form KCG.
 Railroad company ALL - America Latina Logistica SA jumped 88 percent to 680 reais after Valor Economico reported it may resume talks to merge with Cosan SA Industria e Comercio’s logistics unit.
 27 and will host a conference call then, one of the few it’s held since Lampert merged Kmart Holding Corp.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Hitachi Ltd, a Japanese maker of railcars, electronics and power station equipment, will consider mergers and acquisitions to expand its business, said its incoming president Toshiaki Higashihara.
 “We will also look at partnerships” Hitachi has merged units, pared costs and cut television output under Hiroaki Nakanishi, the current president, to help improve competitiveness against Siemens AG and General Electric Co.
 The Tokyo-based company has over the past three years sold its hard-disk drive business and announced plans to merge the energy-equipment businesses with Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd.
 The data security firm slid the most since October after the company forecast revenue that fell short of some analysts’ estimates, as declines in the personal-computer market and the emergence of advanced hacking threats hurt demand for traditional antivirus software.
 FirstEnergy was formed by the merger of Ohio Edison Co.
 AT&T’s battle with T-Mobile is intensifying after the former merger partners spent 2013 exchanging volleys through advertising.
 Twenty-eight people were injured, according to the Erawan Emergency Medical Center’s website.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Clifford Chance LLP formed an association with Linda Widyati & Partners of Indonesia, a boutique law firm with experience in corporate mergers and acquisitions, banking and finance, and capital markets.
 FTC Veteran Richard Dagen Joins Axinn Veltrop in Washington Axinn, Veltrop & Harkrider LLP said Richard Dagen, former assistant director and special counsel to the director of the Federal Trade Commission’s Bureau of Competition, joined the firm’s antitrust group in Washington   During his tenure at the FTC, Dagen was involved in both federal and administrative trials and investigations involving prominent FTC merger and non-merger cases including Toys ‘R’ Us Inc, HJ Heinz Co, Rambus Inc.
 Data sought included analyst views on the likelihood of a surprise to their forecasted earnings estimate and the possibility a company they cover would be acquired in a merger, according to the pact.
 Pressure on Turkey’s lenders is growing after the central bank increased the one-week repo rate to 10 percent from 45 percent at an emergency meeting this week and limits on consumer credit were introduced earlier this year.
 The index’s value has fallen 20 percent in lira terms since a corruption probe emerged on Dec.
 government ownership, Chrysler merges with Fiat SpA and Ford likely enters a new generation of leadership.
 Vedanta completed the sale through unit Sterlite Industries (India) Ltd, which in August was merged with iron ore miner Sesa Goa Ltd.
 Morgan Stanley was the second-ranked adviser on global announced mergers and acquisitions in 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Emergency authority to obtain the records might be granted to the government on occasion and then a warrant can be sought, he said.
 “We continue to believe that a merger of these two companies is in the best interests of all shareholders” Eminence said it holds 98 percent of Men’s Wearhouse’s stock.
 The full picture of what happened at the IRS tax-exempt office hasn’t emerged.
 Justice Antonin Scalia emerged as a central figure in the case today, hinting through his questions that he might agree with the court’s Democratic appointees and back the Illinois rules.
 “Fiat couldn’t get a better deal” The agreement limits the amount of money that Turin-based Fiat must spend to take over and merge with Chrysler, which it helped rescue from bankruptcy almost five years ago.
 Italian Investment A merger will allow Fiat to pool funding with Chrysler and tighten cooperation between its Alfa Romeo, Lancia and Maserati brands and the Chrysler, Dodge and Jeep nameplates.
 Italian Industry Minister Flavio Zanonato said in a statement today that his government is ready to support the Fiat-Chrysler expansion, and that the full takeover agreement is “very positive” The time line for a merger may be outlined as soon as late January, when Fiat’s board meets, said two people familiar with the situation who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 Marchionne estimated in June that a merged Fiat and Chrysler will rank seventh in global deliveries.
 Itau will inject $652 million of capital and merge its Chilean and Colombian units with Corpbanca, according to a statement today.
 The merged bank will have 66 percent in Banco Corpbanca Colombia and will offer to buy the remaining stake for $894 million.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Sergio Marchionne’s five-year effort to merge Fiat SpA and Chrysler Group LLC culminated in a Florida beach town, where the workaholic chief executive officer spent hours nailing a deal that was announced New Year’s Day.
 While a merger with Chrysler would make Fiat the world’s seventh-largest carmaker and give it better scale to compete with GM, Volkswagen and Toyota Motor Corp, the combined company still needs a bigger presence in Asian growth markets and has to prove it can make money in Europe.
 “Now the merger of Fiat and Chrysler is a done deal” A time line for the combination may be outlined in late January, when Fiat’s board meets, said two people familiar with the situation.
 The merger might cut down on Marchionne’s travel, including frequent transatlantic flights to manage the two companies.
 Furthermore, as shown by the merger of West and East Germany after the Berlin Wall came down in 1989, it isn’t easy to recombine two groups of people that have been separated by distinct cultures for decades.
 Biggest Earner VTB Capital earned the most in fees last year in Russia from IPOs, mergers, bonds and loans, taking in $101 million, Freeman data show.
 The European Commission is concerned that the deal to merge two of Ireland’s four mobile-phone operators would shrink competition, hamper smaller rival Eircom Group by threatening a network-sharing deal and reduce options for companies seeking to sell services under their own brands using networks provided by mobile operators, one of the people said.
 Both spoke on condition of anonymity because the merger probe is private.
 Getting a statement of objections in an EU merger review is a sign that the EU is leaning toward blocking the transaction unless it receives concessions allaying its concerns.
 Meanwhile, Peltz is abandoning a proposal for Mondelez to merge with Pepsico Inc.
 CNBC reported earlier today that Peltz wouldn’t renew pressure for a Mondelez-PepsiCo merger.
 ‘More Deals’ “Big beverage companies have enough cash to undertake acquisitions after years of austerity and investment cutbacks,” said Enrique Quemada, chief executive officer of OnetoOne Corporate Finance, a Madrid-based investment bank specializing in mergers & acquisitions.
 Not content to manipulate and discredit official economic statistics, it issued a “presidential emergency decree” in 2010 removing the governor of the central bank for refusing to use central-bank reserves to service government debt.
 The bank’s business plan will involve a “smallish number of positions that become redundant, that fall away,” partly due to duplication in the consumer and commercial divisions being merged, Sands said.
 Paulson, Bridgewater Paulson & Co, the $20 billion New York-based hedge fund run by billionaire John Paulson, posted a 31 percent gain last year in its Paulson Partners Enhanced Fund, a merger strategy that uses leverage to amplify returns, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Zachodni, which completed a merger with Kredyt Bank SA in January last year to become the country’s biggest lender after state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA and UniCredit SpA’s Bank Pekao SA, is benefiting from continued demand for retail loans in the European Union’s largest eastern economy.
 In the last few weeks, T-Mobile, the fourth-biggest mobile-phone company in the US, has been linked in merger speculation with Sprint Corp, the third-largest.
 He took on the CFO role in 2009 and is responsible for finances as well as mergers and acquisitions and business improvement.
 Railroad company ALL America Latina Logistica SA capped its biggest three-day gain since 2009 after Valor Economico newspaper said minority shareholders of Cosan SA Industria e Comercio’s logistics unit favor a merger.
 Brazil’s securities regulator CVM said controlling holders can’t take part in the process of pricing the company’s assets in the merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS, newspaper Valor Economico reported today.
 At the same time, the euro-area economy is predicted to grow 1 percent this year, after contracting 04 percent in 2013, according to ECB estimates, as it slowly emerges from a record-long recession.
 Martin Marietta’s sales from Texas, the US’s largest consumer of cement and aggregates, will double to 34 percent with the merger, Nye said.
 “The ability to merge units will enable it to cut costs and that could unlock significant value, offsetting the negative impact of competition” Lower Costs Bezeq offers fixed-line, international calls, mobile and television services via units that operate as separate entities due to regulatory constraints.
 The changes will allow the subsidiaries to merge.
 The end of structural separation “will enable the company to lower costs from the merger of its units by at least 600 million shekels a year by 2018,” Roni Biron, a Herzliya, Israel-based analyst at UBS AG, said by phone Jan.
 Iron ore mining accounted for 98 percent of earnings at Sesa Goa Ltd, which in August merged with sister company and zinc, copper and aluminum producer Sterlite Industries (India) Ltd.
 caps a merger trend in the industry and may pave the way for a shift to initial public offerings, according to the man behind the move.
 I don’t think you’ll see a lot more consolidation, it’s hard to do” AerCap’s agreement to buy Los Angeles-based ILFC from insurer American International Group Inc, which gets a 46 percent stake in the merged business, will create a lessor with 1,329 planes, narrowing the gap to General Electric Co-owned market leader Gecas, which has 1,635 aircraft.
 Lessors provide close to half the more than $100 billion in financing required to fund annual jetliner purchases, with a spate of mergers paralleling consolidation among top airlines, Jeff Knittel, who runs the transportation-finance unit of New York-based CIT Group Inc, said earlier this week at the Airline Economics Growth Frontiers conference, also held in Dublin.
 The AerCap-ILFC merger has broken a log-jam in the industry after New York-based AIG failed to sell its leasing arm to Chinese bidders who missed specified deadlines, John Higgins, chief commercial officer at Dublin-based lessor Avolon, said in an interview at the Airline Economics event.
 Acquisition Potential A generics mega-merger would likely be very profitable for the companies involved.
 market had performed better than the rest of the world in mergers and acquisitions.
 Akerson, the out-going CEO, spent yesterday evening in Detroit at a dinner for the final night of the Automotive News World Congress, an annual industry event, where he spent almost an hour on stage sharing his experiences at GM and talking about the re-emergence of the automaker from bankruptcy.
 The merger reduced its tax rate by about 10 percentage points, Royal Bank of Canada said on Jan.
 was formed from the merger of the nation’s two biggest bourses last year, with cash trading moving to Tokyo and OSE managing the derivatives business.
 Delta, adjusted for its 2008 merger with Northwest Airlines Corp, last had a first-quarter operating margin at that level in 1998, according to Jamie Baker, a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “We believe that all video must think of itself as omni-channel, and therefore the nomenclature of TV content versus digital videos should merge,” Martin said in a report.
 Speaking in Edinburgh yesterday, he said the recovery “has some way to run before it would be appropriate to consider moving away from the emergency setting of monetary policy” Favorable Environment The lending “environment is more favorable than it’s been in quite some time, banks have gone a long way to recapitalizing themselves,” said Philip Rush, an economist at Nomura International Plc.
 That slipped to about 99,000 in September 2007 when the central bank had to provide emergency funding to Newcastle-based Northern Rock to prevent collapse, triggering the first run of deposits for a UK.
 “At today’s share prices, we think the banks need now to show how the economic recovery will translate into real earnings and how such earnings compare with market expectations” Spanish banks’ shares have increased as the economy emerged from a five-year slump and a rally in sovereign debt pushed borrowing costs down.
 “Consequently, we intend to keep our options open should another suitor for F&C emerge” Bank of Montreal’s offer may flush out other bidders, Arun Melmane, a Canaccord Genuity analyst, said today in a note to clients.
 Weisman is AG&P’s general counsel and executive vice president for mergers and acquisitions, according to the company’s website.
 Before OfficeTiger, Weisman was a mergers and acquisitions attorney at Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP in New York and a corporate attorney at Dechert LLP in Philadelphia, according to AG&P’s.
 Japan’s main exchange operator, formed last year from the merger of the Tokyo and Osaka bourses, will start trading JPX-Nikkei Index 400 futures this year, Hiromi Yamaji, head of the Osaka Securities Exchange, said in an interview.
 China’s National Computer Network Emergency Response Center in China said it had come to the preliminary conclusion that the outage was caused by a cyber-attack, according to a statement on its website yesterday.
 The bank was absorbed by Bank of Cyprus Pcl, which also took on Laiki’s 9 billion-euro liability from the central bank’s Emergency Liquidity Assistance program.
 stocks rose, giving the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index its biggest gain of the year, as better-than-forecast retail sales and corporate merger activity signaled confidence in the economy.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat SpA Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne plans to propose to the carmaker’s board that the New York Stock Exchange be the primary market for shares of the company created from a merger with Chrysler Group LLC, people familiar with the matter said.
 Fiat, which gained full control of Chrysler earlier this week after buying the remaining 415 percent holding, intends to decide on details of a merger on Jan.
 Marchionne has run the Auburn Hills, Michigan-based carmaker, since it emerged from a US.
 Ellison’s future projects include a reboot of the “Terminator” movie series with her brother, David Ellison, whose Skydance Productions has emerged as a production and co-financing partner with Viacom Inc’s Paramount Pictures.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, hired former Serbian Finance Minister Bozidar Djelic for its sovereign-advisory group headed by Matthieu Pigasse in Paris.
 A merger could be announced imminently, said the person, who asked not to be named because the information is private.
 Dees and Noto will run a group that ranked first in advising technology, media and telecom companies on mergers and acquisitions.
 Economy Strengthens China’s economy emerged from a two-quarter slowdown in the three months through September, with factory output in August reaching the fastest pace in 17 months.
 Six lenders, including Liberty Home Equity Solutions and American Advisors Group -- the company that pays Thompson to appear in its ads -- are funding a branding campaign this year in an attempt to convince consumers to use reverse mortgages as part of a long-term plan instead of as an emergency source of funds.
 The firm, which emerged largely unscathed from scandals including one in 2003 when competitors were accused of market timing, has drawn regulatory scrutiny recently.
 It ranked first in advising on announced mergers and acquisitions and fifth in underwriting US.
 Schoen, mergers and acquisitions, Eric W.
 While billionaire cable veteran John Malone is seen as the top proponent of industrywide mergers, Rutledge has been quietly plotting a takeover strategy for more than two years, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Rutledge’s merger strategy got a jump-start last year, when Malone’s holding company Liberty Media Corp.
 Marcus, meanwhile, has said he’s willing to step aside if an attractive enough offer emerges.
 The implementation of a single bank supervisor in the region could trigger a wave of bank mergers, ECB Vice President Vitor Constancio said last month.
 While large industry mergers are unlikely “given that regulators remain focused on repairing bank balance sheets,” Italian banks, selected Spanish lenders, Raiffeisen and Danske Bank A/S are most vulnerable, Berenberg said.
 Warburg brand, the advisory business founded by Siegmund Warburg, said Wheeler, a name that disappeared after the merger between Union Bank of Switzerland and Swiss Bank Corp.
 Gunfire was reported and two people were injured near a rally at the city’s Patumwan intersection, Bangkok Emergency Medical Service said on its website.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- A Saudi Arabian Airlines Boeing 767 carrying 315 passengers from Mashhad, Iran, made an emergency landing in Medina after problems with its landing gear.
 In June, Enbridge won an emergency order to reject oil with high hydrogen-sulfide levels from its pipelines after telling the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission it found dangerous levels of the compound at a Berthold, North Dakota, rail terminal.
 automaker’s emergence from bankruptcy.
 Matlock, 48, spent 25 years at Morgan Stanley and most recently worked as its chairman of international mergers and acquisitions, based in London.
 for providing advice on mergers and acquisitions with about $492 billion in announced transactions globally, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Overnight borrowing costs for banks have surged above the ECB’s benchmark rate even as policy makers argue that it’s not yet time to exit emergency stimulus.
 “If a need was felt to respond, then it would be logical to contemplate further rate cuts in the main refinancing operations and, in that case, also the deposit rate” Liquidity Drop Liquidity in the financial system has fallen as banks return the emergency three-year loans they took from the central bank in 2011 and 2012.
 While falling liquidity can push overnight borrowing costs higher as banks compete for tighter funding, the early repayments may be a signal that banks simply don’t need emergency central-bank cash as confidence returns to the region.
 The AMCU emerged as an alternative force among South African mining employees during a strike at Impala in early 2012, growing to displace the National Union of Mineworkers as the largest among platinum employees.
 Donor Support Several Florida-based Christie donors said they would continue to support the governor as long as no evidence emerged linking him directly to the traffic jam.
 Partner Moves Lowenstein, Epstein Becker, Kaye Scholer: Lateral Partner Moves Lowenstein Sandler LLP is adding to its private equity and mergers and acquisitions practices with the hiring of Michael A.
 Suning, Zoomlion United Biscuits, based in Hayes, England, was created in 1948 from the merger of two Scottish companies, McVitie & Price and MacFarlane Lang.
 There has been speculation that ONO may be a takeover target for Newbury, England-based mobile-phone operator Vodafone Group Plc as Europe’s telecommunications industry undergoes a wave of mergers and acquisitions.
 “Companies whose access to capital has been cut off because of the current market sentiment will be compelled to consider mergers to conserve cash and survive until conditions improve,” Michael Faralla, head of global mining investment banking at Toronto-Dominion Bank, said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Some companies with good deposits and management will emerge as “winners” while others will be challenged as the industry gets smaller, said Joe Wickwire, who manages more than $15 billion at Fidelity Investments, including the Select Gold Portfolio.
 “There’s not that many ready buyers” ‘Lot of Sense’ Deals with low-to-no premiums such as mergers of equals “could make a lot of sense,” because they give companies a way to transform their businesses, reduce costs and strengthen balance sheets, said Matthew Hind, the Toronto-based head of Canadian metals and mining investment banking for Credit Suisse.
 A merger should tighten cooperation between Fiat’s Alfa Romeo and Maserati brands and the Chrysler, Dodge and Jeep nameplates.
 Marchionne estimated in June that a merged Fiat and Chrysler will rank seventh in global deliveries.
 “The demerger will add value as now shareholders have a choice for a pure play of either food and beverage or property,” said Goh Han Peng, a Singapore-based analyst at DMG & Partners Securities Pte.
 The emergence of the anti-graft Aam Aadmi Party, which is planning to contest the national vote after taking power in Delhi state last month, has added further uncertainty to the election outcome.
 Costs Drop Operating costs fell 08 percent in the quarter, as United works to control expenses since its 2010 merger with Continental Airlines.
 Net income in the 2013 period was $140 million, or 37 cents a share, including $158 million for severance and expenses related to merger integration.
 The Canadian agency recommended tougher standards for the type of tank car involved in the Lac-Megantic disaster, improve route planning and require detailed emergency-response plans in communities where oil shipments travel.
 “They have been doing it in spite of themselves, as they do not want to sell to the US” China has emerged as a strategic source of financing for Venezuela, lending the OPEC-member more than $40 billion since 2008 in exchange for future oil deliveries.
 The Philippines sought support from the Organization of Islamic Cooperation to review the 1996 deal and merge it with the MILF agreements.
 The proposal, which helpfully included a draft merger agreement of about 78 pages, should prompt an effort to find other potential buyers, Jesse Cohn, a portfolio manager, wrote in a letter.
 The events of the week could augur not only more activism but also more mergers and acquisitions this year, said Ken Squire, president of 13D Monitor, which tracks activist funds.
 The benchmark SET Index trades at a valuation premium over the Hang Seng Index and Singapore’s Straits Times Index, even amid anti-government protests that spurred Prime Minister Yingluck Shinawatra to declare a state of emergency in Bangkok yesterday.
 While Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter, Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho still has to trim spending by 32 billion euros this year to meet targets in the bailout plan after relying mostly on tax increases in 2013.
 Public Listing Hapag-Lloyd is turning to Latin America’s biggest container shipper after talks to merge with local competitor Hamburg Sued failed in March because shareholders of both companies couldn’t agree on terms.
 It ranked first in advising on announced mergers and acquisitions and fifth in underwriting US.
 It will use funds from the placing to accelerate drilling plans and to bolster output at the Athena field, as well as for mergers and acquisitions, it said.
 Upcoming Reports More winners and losers of the Christmas season are set to emerge next week, with Tesco Plc, Marks & Spencer Group Plc and J Sainsbury Plc among retailers due to report.
 “If we can show that we’ve implemented reforms that have created jobs and also had an ability to lead Sweden through a difficult crisis, and that we emerge stronger than other countries, then I think people have an ability to value that,” Reinfeldt said in an interview.
 and China contracts at a time that water supply crises, including a drought emergency in California, threaten energy production as power demand rises and the Earth’s population surpasses 7 billion.
 A certified public accountant, Pfeiffer began her career at Coopers & Lybrand, where she was a supervising accountant, before the firm merged with Price Waterhouse in 1998.
 Emergency Network The auctions help fulfill a priority of the administration of President Barack Obama, who has pledged to almost double the airwaves available for mobile Internet service by reallocating 500 megahertz of government and commercial spectrum.
 Congress said the first $7 billion from the auctions will go to fund a nationwide network for emergency workers, helping to fulfill a gap in radio capabilities identified by the 9-11 Commission, which said communications difficulties contributed to deaths during the terrorist attacks of Sept.
 The stock has climbed about 40 percent since the beginning of June on renewed speculation of cable mergers.
 When Time Warner Cable responded to that with a request for a higher bid including a higher cash component, Charter determined its bigger peer wasn’t interested in pursuing a merger agreement, according to the letter.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA’s merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, the biggest Brazilian deal announced last year, hit a snag after minority shareholders won an early victory in their fight for more favorable terms.
 “This is a fundamental step in the merger, and they’re going to have to convince minority shareholders of the advantages of the operation, or it won’t happen,” said Raphael Martins, a lawyer representing Oi investor Tempo Capital.
 “If the base-case scenario for the merger is maintained, there won’t be an accord among shareholders for a capital increase” Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava is pushing for the merger to help the phone carrier compete with America Movil SAB and Telefonica SA in Brazil.
 Bava told investors that same month that the companies would hire an independent appraiser to make a publicly available estimate of the assets’ value “in due course” While controlling holders will have their debts paid off through the merger transaction, minority shareholders -- who are getting diluted by the new shares being issued -- receive no payout.
 The details of the merger are still on the drawing board, said Pedro Galdi, the head strategist at brokerage firm SLW Corretora in Sao Paulo.
 “If the CVM goes along with this initial recommendation (not guaranteed), the companies will be ready to make some concessions” Even if Oi can complete its merger with Portugal Telecom, it still needs to upgrade its network to fight Telefonica, America Movil and Telecom Italia SpA for the most lucrative customers in a market where new user growth is slowing.
 Bava has said the merger would allow the new company to spend less by becoming more efficient.
 Its ratio of net debt to earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization was 34 at the end of June, and Bava has said it will be 33 once the merger is completed.
 “We would also consider mergers or acquiring some local partners in China” About 90 percent of the company’s profit comes from the columbarium and cemetery business, according to Lee, who is targeting 10 percent growth in both revenue and profit this year compared with 2013.
 Long saddled by uncompetitive labor costs, GM emerged under the leadership of Dan Akerson from near-collapse a half-decade ago.
 Southeast Asia emerged as the main drag on Toyota last year.
 We’ll synergize all these and expand our expertise in the equity capital market” Malaysia’s smaller banks and brokerages have been forging domestic mergers to stay competitive, while their bigger competitors, including Malayan Banking Bhd, have bought abroad in Southeast Asia to expand.
 Affin wants to complete the acquisition by April and finalize the merger of Hwang-DBS’s operations by October, Maimoonah said.
 Intesa, which is one of the 15 Italian banks that will be reviewed by the European Central Bank this year, will emerge strongly from the assets review, according to Messina.
 “We expect a modest shift in emphasis to dividends or other forms of capital deployment such as mergers and acquisitions, deleveraging, or legal-entity restructurings” Fewer Buybacks Principal Financial Group Inc.
 to merge with Sprint Corp, and thinks the US.
 Third Point also established a stake in T-Mobile in the carrier’s November secondary offering, positioning Loeb on both sides of a potential merger with Sprint.
 His firm has invested in SoftBank Corp, the Japanese wireless carrier that owns Sprint, and Loeb says in the letter that a merger could navigate antitrust hurdles by creating a stronger competitor to AT&T Inc.
 “Snowden’s actions are likely to have lethal consequences for our troops in the field” The classified Pentagon report marked the first official assessment to emerge of how much data Snowden took and the risk to military and intelligence personnel.
 If Sprint agrees to host Dish’s wireless airwaves on itsnetwork, allowing the satellite company to enter the mobile-phone business, regulators may approve a Sprint takeover of T-Mobile because a new competitor would emerge, Chaplin saidSprint has begun to test a wireless Internet service with Dishin Corpus Christi, Texas, a potential prelude to a futurepartnership, Chaplin said.
 “We estimate that non ad hoc group holders will have to pay 162 cents per bond to participate in the DIP financing and recommend they do so” Oleo & Gas, which intends to emerge from bankruptcy protection by March, last month reached an agreement with creditors, including holders of most of its $36 billion in bonds, to swap debt into a 90 percent equity stake.
 Dealing with high cholesterol, chronic sinus pain and a bad back, she depends on emergency rooms and nonprofit clinics -- when they can see her.
 A follow-up report last week said Medicaid recipients visited emergency rooms more often than the uninsured.
 “2014 could be the year when monetary policy moves in opposite directions and this could have a profound impact on the euro” Europe’s common currency rose against all nine of its developed-country peers last year, based on Bloomberg Correlation-Weighted Currency Indexes, posting its first gain since 2008 as the economy emerged from its longest recession on record.
 27, from a peak of 31 trillion euros in June 2012 after banks repaid almost half the 1 trillion euros of emergency loans provided by the ECB under two longer-term refinancing operations, or LTROs, in December 2011 and February 2012 to avert a credit crunch.
 While JPMorgan emerged from the financial crisis as the only large US.
 brought in to oversee emergency repairs.
 He has previously structured and negotiated merger and acquisition transactions for private equity funds and their portfolio companies, as well as publicly held clients.
 “Scott’s work in mergers and acquisitions, bankruptcy, private equity and real estate position him to make a significant contribution to our practice,” Jeffrey Samuels, co-chairman of the tax department, said in a statement.
 The agreement limits the amount of money that Turin-based Fiat must spend to take over and merge with Chrysler, which it helped rescue from bankruptcy almost five years ago.
 merger.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- United Continental Holdings Inc’s plan to furlough 685 flight attendants shows how the world’s second-largest carrier still struggles with multiple labor contracts more than three years after its creation in a merger.
 Some other union workers also remain on separate contracts following the 2010 merger between UAL Corp, the parent of the old United, and Continental Airlines Inc.
 United was familiar with job cuts before the merger, too, as it shrank employment to 47,000 at the end of 2009 from 55,000 two years earlier, regulatory filings show.
 While Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter of last year, Coelho still has to trim spending by 32 billion euros ($436 billion) in 2014 to meet targets in the country’s EU-led aid plan after relying mostly on tax increases last year.
 AB InBev, created in the beer world’s biggest merger, sells beers including Bud Light and Stella Artois.
 accelerates a pharmaceutical merger wave that stands to engulf even more drugmakers.
 Valeant, the $49 billion company that’s aiming to more than triple its market value by the end of 2016, could merge eventually with the new Actavis-Forest, Stifel Financial Corp.
 Actavis and Valeant held talks about a merger last year, and the discussions eventually stalled because of a disagreement over price, Bloomberg News reported in April.
 The companies initially expected to merge in the first quarter of 2014.
 Publicis and New York-based Omnicom have said a merged company will offer clients integrated campaigns and advanced technology while helping contain costs at the companies.
 have questioned the logic behind the merger and said they are picking up disgruntled customers who fail to see how it benefits them.
 The evaluation will cover population density, local emergency-response capability and track quality, according to the railroad association.
 By thwarting Malone’s attempts to get his hands on Time Warner Cable and with NBCUniversal already in his pocket, Roberts also has emerged with the power to reshape the cable-media landscape.
 Roberts wanted to be seen as the white knight in Time Warner Cable’s protracted merger talks with Charter Communications Inc, according to one of the people.
 Both led deals including the company’s 2006 purchase of Houlihan Lokey Howard & Zukin, a merger and acquisition adviser.
 ‘Cruel Violation’ Fei, the mother of one of the infants, wrote on Slatecom that her daughter weighed 1 pound 9 ounces when born by emergency cesarean section in October 2012, just five months into an otherwise routine pregnancy.
 satellite-TV provider, has been piling up $5 billion in wireless-airwave licenses, a useful asset as the company evaluates its future amid a wave of merger activity in the phone and media industries.
 While Ergen may not stand in the way of a wireless merger, he’s taking a more combative stance against a deal to combine two of his biggest competitors.
 Indian service revenue, excluding the effect of mergers and currency swings, rose 13 percent to 937 million pounds.
 Apple, in an emergency request to be considered tomorrow by a federal appeals court in New York, is seeking to halt oversight by Michael Bromwich, the court-appointed compliance monitor in the Justice Department’s lawsuit.
 “We expect that it would take a significantly-enhanced offer to compel a friendly agreement and that there would be considerable interest from other potential acquirers” Should competing bidders emerge, HudBay can probably only increase its exchange ratio up to 0333 before triggering a Toronto Stock Exchange rule that would give HudBay’s shareholders a chance to block the deal, Chang of Laurentian Bank said.
 Technip’s spending is expected to decline this year, while mergers and acquisitions are “not on our mind,” Chief Financial Officer Julian Waldron said on a conference call.
 Potential power failures, home losses, lost tourism dollars and crop damage could jeopardize the world’s 10th largest economy as California struggles to emerge from the deepest recession since the 1930s.
 The New York City Emergency Management Office posted a hazardous-travel advisory because of the ice and a state of emergency was declared in New Jersey.
 Salt Shortage New York Governor Andrew Cuomo, who also declared an emergency, said parts of New York City and Long Island face a shortage of salt.
 Heenan is closing after more than 40 years as it faces competition from larger firms and a slump in mergers and acquisitions.
 Ratings remain under pressure more than four years after the outbreak of the European debt crisis, which led the EU to offer emergency financing to Greece, Ireland, Portugal, Spain and Cyprus to shore up their bonds and banks.
 Weather Report Economists’ forecasts for the January report varied based on their assumptions for effects such as the inclement weather and the expiration of emergency unemployment benefits.
 Fees from Nomura’s investment-banking operations, which include managing stock and bond sales for clients and providing advice on mergers and acquisitions, totaled 158 billion yen ($150 million) last quarter, the lowest in a year, the company said in a statement on Jan.
 jumped 22 percent after Macquarie North America analysts said it may be a target for mergers and acquisitions.
 reorganized in bankruptcy before its December merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 With a merger the rules would extend to the acquired Time Warner broadband subscribers, Comcast’s Cohen said yesterday.
 Representatives Bob Goodlatte, a Virginia Republican who’s chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, and Spencer Bachus, the Alabama Republican who’s the antitrust subcommittee chairman, said in an e-mailed statement the merger “could have a significant impact on competition” A hearing would help ensure that consumers and competition are protected, they said.
 Michael Copps, a former Democratic FCC commissioner, said in a statement released by Common Cause that the deal “is so over the top that it ought to be dead on arrival at the FCC” The merger may face “raw political pushback from cable critics and possibly rivals” who would argue it goes too far and needs to be reined in, Stifel’s King and James wrote.
 Chamber of Commerce wants legal protections to ensure that threat and vulnerability information companies share with the government or each other will not lead to frivolous lawsuits, be publicly disclosed or used in regulatory actions, Ann Beauchesne, the group’s vice president of national security and emergency preparedness, said in a statement.
 The debtor-in-possession financing will help cover costs at its only producing oil field as the company looks to emerge from bankruptcy protection after triggering Latin America’s largest corporate default last year.
 “Three will detail these and other points in our response to the commission’s statement of objections, and are confident that we can convince the commission of the pro-competitive benefits of the proposed acquisition” The EU is concerned that the deal to merge two of Ireland’s four mobile-phone operators would shrink competition, hamper smaller rival Eircom Group by threatening a network-sharing deal and reduce options for companies seeking to market services under their own brands using networks provided by mobile operators, a person familiar with the EU process said last week.
 Statements of objections in EU merger reviews cite possible competition problems that the firms must allay.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Statoil ASA, Europe’s second-largest natural-gas supplier, will merge its gas- and oil-trading units as differences in buying and selling the two commodities fade and competition increases.
 The merger of the two units won’t have direct consequences for staffing beyond current cost-saving measures, Saetre said.
 “We have yet to get any good explanation” Oil Benchmarks In addition to the merged marketing-and-trading unit for oil and gas, Statoil’s marketing, processing and renewable-energy unit will from May 1 include individual departments for renewables, operations and asset management, splitting ownership of installations such as refineries from day-to-day work.
 Exchange Critic Sprecher, 58, has emerged since ICE’s purchase of NYSE Euronext as a critic of the current system for trading stocks, a landscape dominated by automated traders who supplanted human market-makers after a decade of technology advances and changes in laws.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- The 2007 merger that created Bank of New York Mellon Corp, the world’s largest custody bank, failed to deliver higher profits as the company lags behind its biggest rivals, according to Mike Mayo, an analyst at CLSA Ltd.
 “The end result has not panned out as well as peers, or would have been expected for a company that says it achieved synergies from its 2007 merger,” Mayo, who covers banks at CLSA in New York, wrote today in a note to clients.
 on its merger with Aldar Properties PJSC, the emirate’s largest developer.
 He decided that a Comcast-Time Warner Cable merger would produce a better balance sheet with less debt and more cost savings, said these people.
 Not only is Comcast’s offer higher than Charter’s, it’s also giving Time Warner Cable shareholders a piece of a stronger merged entity, according to Grayson Witcher, a Calgary-based money manager at Mawer Investment Management Ltd, which oversees about $20 billion including shares of Time Warner Cable and Comcast.
 business returned to growth following its merger with MetroPCS Communications Inc.
 economic strength re-emerges” US.
 Under the proposal, LightSquared would emerge as a standalone company worth $77 billion.
 satellite-TV provider, has been piling up $5 billion in wireless-airwave licenses, a useful asset as the company evaluates its future amid a wave of merger activity in the phone and media industries.
 The company, which emerged from bankruptcy a year ago following a leveraged buyout from real estate developer Sam Zell, is hiving off its newspapers to focus on its more lucrative broadcast television properties.
 Justice Department lawsuit that sought to block its merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 The carriers’ merger, which closed Dec.
 Jurors found that he traded on tips from an associate director of mergers and acquisitions at Zurich-based UBS AG.
 Two Years Banco Santander SA Chairman Emilio Botin said last week the time was right for the government to sell a stake in Bankia, as Spain begins to emerge from the real estate collapse that fueled a financial crisis and two recessions.
 BFA-Bankia, which was formed from a merger of seven former savings banks, suffered an after-tax group loss of 212 billion euros in 2012.
 “They have salespeople all over the country, interacting with the schools,” said Lawee, who previously ran mergers and acquisitions at Google.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- States from California to Maine are hiring rail inspectors and oil-spill experts as they draw up emergency plans after trains carrying crude derailed and burst into fireballs, including a crash in Quebec that killed 47.
 “There is not one action that will solve this issue, and we need to make sure the focus of our wide-ranging approach is on prevention, mitigation, emergency response and stakeholder outreach,” Hernandez said by e-mail.
 Maine Wilderness Last year, as rail cars carrying crude came rolling in from Canada, emergency planners in Maine traveled the line to map how they could reach spills deep in the wilderness, Jessamine Logan, a spokeswoman for the Maine Environmental Protection Department, said by phone.
 Banks that fail will need to raise capital, seek mergers or be wound down.
 “Clearly we are not dominant in that sector as a whole, so we believe that we should actively pursue the consolidation of the cable industry and of the telecommunications industry in Mexico” Telefonica Chief Executive Officer Cesar Alierta is moving his focus to Mexico this year after spending 2013 finding a merger partner for Telefonica in Germany, increasing the company’s indirect stake in Telecom Italia SpA, and shedding assets in Ireland and the Czech Republic.
 Syngenta is launching a new, larger efficiency drive to reap more savings from a merger of its seeds and crop chemical businesses along eight key crops such as corn and soybean.
 We don’t believe that a systemic bad bank in the Spanish style is the appropriate recipe for Italy, because this isn’t a systemic problem” Bad-Bank Successes Italian banks’ bad loans, at a record high, are curtailing their ability to lend as the country struggles to emerge from its longest recession in two decades.
 “We are looking at longer-term commitments so that our own companies can learn alongside foreign companies” Iraq, Iran’s neighbor to the west, has emerged as a global energy investment hub over the last five years, offering oil and gas production rights and attracting companies such as BP, Shell and Exxon Mobil Corp.
 Instead, he pledged to use data to improve city services like repairing streets and getting fire engines to emergencies more quickly.
 Peltz, whose Trian Fund owns less than 1 percent of PepsiCo, had also pushed for a merger with Mondelez International Inc.
 lender scaling back in some emerging markets, plans to invest in Africa as it sees a pickup in mergers and acquisitions as well as debt and equity capital market deals on the continent.
 Turkey’s central bank raised all its main interest rates at an emergency meeting Jan.
 Glass will focus on securities transactions, mergers and acquisitions and general corporate matters.
 Daniel Oates, a mergers and acquisitions and private equity lawyer, is joining O’Melveny & Myers LLP as a partner in its London office and as a member of the firm’s mergers & acquisitions practice.
 Senator seeks to profit from events such as corporate restructurings, mergers and share sales, a strategy known as event-driven investing.
 Jana is an event-driven fund, generally investing in companies undergoing shifts such as mergers, spinoffs and bankruptcies, and is known for pushing management to make changes.
 The Skadden team includes mergers and acquisitions partners Paul Schnell and Jeremy London, corporate finance partner Laura Kaufman Belkhayat, banking partner Steven Messina and real estate partner Neil Rock.
 ASX’s expansion into Singapore comes about three years after it had an A$83 billion ($73 billion) merger with Singapore Exchange Ltd, Asia’s fourth-largest listed exchange, vetoed by the government.
 Bank Clothiers Inc, the retailer resisting a merger with Men’s Wearhouse Inc, said it will buy the Eddie Bauer brand for cash and new shares, and buy some of its own stock at an 18 percent premium to reward shareholders.
 in June, have contributed to $47 billion of technology mergers and acquisitions in the past decade, according to Tel Aviv-based IVC Research Center.
 “There really are a lot of issues around mergers, and a number of acquisitions have run into trouble,” King, chief executive officer of BB&T, said in an interview.
 regional banks, spooked by crisis-era deals gone awry and a regulatory review holding up M&T Bank Corp’s merger with Hudson City Bancorp Inc, are buying pieces of rivals to sidestep pitfalls of acquiring whole firms.
 bank merger.
 Overseas Communications “If the stocks are surging prior to merger announcement, particularly in the US, my guess is those would be targeted by the SEC and or Finra from an insider trading perspective,” Malcolm E.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Tinto Group head of mergers and acquisitions Philip Mitchell has left after more than 30 years with the world’s second-largest mining company.
 Court of Appeals in Manhattan to grant an emergency request to court to halt oversight by Bromwich.
 27 to satisfy British stock-market regulations designed to limit merger speculation, the people said last month.
 Chief Executive Officer Scott Bok said the focus at public companies on raising shareholder payouts has been a drag on mergers and acquisitions.
 “The corporate bias towards dividends and buybacks” has to change before any significant rebound in mergers and acquisitions, Bok told analysts today in Boca Raton, Florida during an industry conference sponsored by Credit Suisse Group AG.
 Nokia wants to deepen its sales cooperation with Sunnyvale, California-based Juniper and a merger could be an alternative to a deal with Alcatel-Lucent SA, the magazine said.
 emerge as a potential competitor to Vodafone Group Plc and Bharti Airtel Ltd.
 Videocon Industries Ltd’s wireless business, Norway’s Telenor ASA and Russia’s Sistema JSFC could also engage in merger talks with larger carriers, he said.
 Goldman became the target of popular protest in Denmark after it emerged in December that the investment bank will receive some veto rights over how Dong is managed in exchange for its capital injection.
 The dead included nine students from Busan University of Foreign Studies, school official Ryoo Chang Won said by phone, while 103 people were injured, South Korea’s National Emergency Management Agency said on its website.
 More than 500 people were killed when a shopping mall collapsed in Seoul in 1995, the deadliest case, according to the National Emergency Management Agency.
 Still Snowing Television footage on YTN showed snow still falling at the scene as emergency workers pulled bodies from the gymnasium, while others shoveled piles of snow around the crumpled structure.
 The Skadden Arps team includes mergers and acquisitions partners Kenneth Wolff and Pierre Servan-Schreiber.
 Turberg said the payout to investors “falls short of compensating” them for “a strategic merger in which Actavis anticipates achieving over $1 billion in operating and tax synergies” A telephone message left at the company seeking comment on the lawsuit wasn’t immediately returned.
 JPX, created last year from the merger of the Tokyo Stock Exchange and Osaka Securities Exchange, will weigh combining its Mothers, TSE Second Section and Jasdaq markets, Yasuyuki Konuma, executive officer for the new listings department, said in an interview in Tokyo yesterday.
 Serious discussion has yet to begin and there is no schedule for the merger, he said.
 “We need to begin discussing whether we need to merge them, the merit being simplicity” The creation of the national bourse last year was part of a state plan to streamline Japan’s securities industry and revive its standing as a financial hub.
 and Direct Edge Holdings LLC, have retained their four individual markets even after the parent companies completed their merger this month.
 A merger of the three JPX markets would create a trading venue with more than 1,600 stocks.
 cable companies and creates a bulwark against competition from phone and satellite providers is the “ideal merger,” Paulson said today in a telephone interview.
 His main strategies rebounded last year with prescient bets on companies in takeovers, a strategy known as merger-arbitrage, where he got his start as a trader, and by investing in stocks that surged as global central bank policies propped up markets.
 Founded in 2007, Gilt was forced to cut divisions and eliminate jobs as competition emerged for its flash sale model, which involves offering limited-time deals at steep discounts.
 Calm Consensus “As we emerged from 2013, market participants were believing that the worst of the ‘crises’ were in the rear-view mirror and perhaps that encouraged more to look to equities,” said Yousef Abbasi, market strategist at JonesTrading Institutional Services LLC, a Westlake, California-based broker.
 and Direct Edge Holdings LLC merged earlier this year, creating an exchange operator with about 20 percent of US.
 Emergency payments to households and businesses totaled 14 million pounds since Dec.
 Quebecor, which began offering mobile-phone service in Quebec after buying spectrum in the last auction in 2008, is poised to emerge as a challenger to Rogers Communications Inc, Telus Corp.
 reorganized in bankruptcy before the December merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- A spinoff of French phone company SFR from owner Vivendi SA is the only plan for the unit, its chief executive officer said, dismissing an alternative merger involving the country’s second-largest carrier.
 There’s only a single track” While Vivendi and cable operator Numericable SAS have held talks on and off in the past year about a merger without being able to agree on valuation, Altice SA, Numericable’s biggest investor, is making a renewed push to consolidate telecommunications assets in Europe, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 While the IPO is subject a so-called share lockup for 180 days, an exception allows Altice to issue new shares starting 45 days after the IPO if the proceeds are used to finance a merger or acquisition, according to regulatory filings.
 Stryker said last month that mergers and acquisitions are the top priority for its $4 billion in cash.
 The buckles present a safety hazard in the event of a crash, fire or other emergency, NHTSA said.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- ALL-America Latina Logistica SA, Brazil’s largest railroad operator, jumped the most since 2008 after it said merger talks were advancing with Rumo Logistica SA, a unit of sugar producer Cosan SA Industria & Comercio.
 The newspaper Valor Economico reported today that the two companies are close to ending a dispute over sugar transportation contracts and that a merger agreement may be concluded as soon as next week.
 “Maybe the merger with Rumo is the best outcome” Sao Paulo-based Cosan, which runs the world’s largest sugar-cane processor in a joint venture with Royal Dutch Shell Plc, gained 5 percent to 3647 reais.
 “The merger would be good for both companies,” Lenon Borges, an analyst at brokerage Ativa Corretora, said by phone from Rio de Janeiro.
 Actavis depends on mergers and acquisitions to sustain earnings growth, since developing drugs through research and development is so costly, said Ori Hershkovitz, a partner at Sphera Funds Management Ltd.
 “To quote Shakespeare, ’All’s well that ends well,’ and we applaud Brent Saunders, who, in less than 6 months at the helm, has helped to bring about in my opinion one of the best pharma mergers in the last decade,” Icahn said.
 Basir is seeking growth from farmers by setting aside as much as 2 trillion rupiah to buy a mid-size lender to merge with unit PT Bank Rakyat Indonesia Agroniaga.
 “With still only 10 percent market share post-merger, we are confident of our prospects for driving further long-term revenue growth” The combined company’s properties will offer services including assisted living, dementia care, skilled nursing, outpatient therapy, home health and hospice care.
 “We have emerged from 2013 a stronger, better company, characterized by stable and diversified earnings,” Wilmar Chief Executive Officer Kuok Khoon Hong said in the statement.
 shareholder sued to block Comcast Corp’s proposed $452 billion takeover, saying the merger of the two biggest US.
 The merged company would account for almost three-quarters of the cable industry, data from the National Cable Television Association show.
 The merger also would bring Comcast’s subscribers to about 30 million, the investor said in the lawsuit.
 “Given Comcast’s dominance in the cable industry, Time Warner’s merger with Comcast raises antitrust issues that another potential acquirer, like Charter for example, may not have faced,” Barrett said.
 Gun Battle Yingluck deployed 10,000 police in Bangkok yesterday,having declared a state of emergency to avoid a repeat of theviolence that obstructed advance voting on Jan.
 The Bank of Canada has been “disappointed” by the “wedge” that has emerged between sluggish exports and rising global demand, Macklem said in response to an audience question.
 So it’s now all about how do we mobilize the capital to build it” The 12 projects will allow the nation, which emerged from a 10-year civil war in 2002, to attract investors, including Chinese companies that want guarantees of a reliable power grid before expanding mining of iron ore, the raw material used to make steel.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Abu Dhabi and Dubai completed due diligence on a potential merger of the two stock markets in the United Arab Emirates, bringing the combination a step closer, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The merger would come after the exchanges failed to attract local listings in 2013 and would create the largest bourse in the Middle East after Saudi Arabia.
 There isn’t a clear timetable as to when the merger will take place, the two people said.
 The possible merger is “another important step in taking the UAE.
 Liza Heapes, a spokeswoman for Ariad, didn’t return a phone call and an e-mail seeking comment on the options trading as well as the merger speculation.
 “China’s M&A activities were predominately coming from state-owned enterprises five to six years ago and now we’re seeing a strong emergence of private companies coming to the market,” said Sodhi.
 Alestra, owned by Alfa SAB, is interested in a merger with home-phone provider Axtel SAB as a way to gain consumer users, though no talks are currently under way, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 It first emerged during the swine flu outbreak in 2009 that also landed more adults in doctor’s offices and hospitals.
 Turkey’s central bank raised all its main interest rates at an emergency meeting Jan.
 of Japan, which spent 200 billion yen for a 70 percent stake in Japan Display when it was formed through a three-way merger in 2012.
 Bank, which has been resisting a merger with Men’s Wearhouse, said it will buy the Eddie Bauer brand for an enterprise value of $825 million.
 Mello, 39, will work in the Sao Paulo office for the New York-based merger-and-acquisition advisory firm, according to Daniel Wainstein, a former partner and chairman of Goldman Sachs’s Brazil investment-banking business who joined Greenhill in October.
 Announced mergers and acquisitions involving companies in Brazil increased more than 18 percent to $788 billion last year from 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Cox and Charter held talks last year about a possible merger, people familiar with the matter said last August.
 From Weil were mergers and acquisitions partners Keith Flaum and Richard Climan in Silicon Valley and Henry Ong in Hong Kong; technology & intellectual property transactions partner Jeffrey Osterman in New York and John Brockland in Silicon Valley and counsel Arlene Hahn in New York; tax partner Helyn Goldstein in New York; employment partner Paul Wessel and counsel Steve Margolis in New York; finance partner Gabriel Gregson in Silicon Valley; and antitrust partner John Scribner in Washington.
 Perez joined Greenberg Traurig LLP as shareholders in its mergers and acquisitions practice.
 Lee advised UAL Corp’s United Airlines while Kindler worked with Continental Airlines on their $31 billion merger in 2010.
 Morgan Stanley is the top adviser on mergers and acquisitions this year including the Comcast-Time Warner Cable transaction, with 21 deals valued at $115 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Antitrust Scrutiny While Valspar also would offer PPG the opportunity to expand its higher-margin industrial coatings, such a merger would face serious antitrust scrutiny, said Silversteyn at Longbow.
 The insurance expansion may produce a surge for CVS of prescription orders and patients with sniffles and other minor maladies seeking to avoid high emergency room costs and long waits for doctor appointments.
 is trying to end an era in which unrealistic financial and schedule assumptions derailed major projects as budget gaps emerged.
 Total mergers and acquisitions are “set to accelerate” this year because companies have “firepower” of $23 trillion and cash-financed acquisitions and buybacks can boost earnings per share, according to a Jan.
 The DIP financing will help cover costs at its only producing oil field as the company looks to emerge from bankruptcy protection after triggering Latin America’s largest corporate default last year.
 Turkey’s central bank raised all its main interest rates at an emergency meeting Jan.
 The draft plan given to creditors this week by Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr offers different recovery rates for classes of unsecured creditors.
 The company has merged units, pared costs and cut television output as it focuses on expanding its infrastructure business.
 Hitachi has over the past three years sold its hard-disk drive business and announced plans to merge the energy-equipment businesses with Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd.
 The company has also said it will consider mergers and acquisitions to expand its business.
 Gun Battle Yingluck deployed 10,000 police in Bangkok yesterday, having declared a state of emergency to avoid a repeat of the violence that obstructed advance voting on Jan.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Jack Butler, the bankruptcy attorney who helped negotiate the merger of American Airlines and US Airways, is leaving law firm Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP for Hilco Global.
 and advised on last year’s merger with US Airways Group Inc, which created American Airlines Group Inc, the world’s biggest airline.
 and advised Kmart Corp, which came out of bankruptcy in 2003 and has since merged with Sears Holdings Corp.
 extended their merger deadline by three months, adding to the tally of financial industry takeovers stalled by extra scrutiny from regulators.
 M&T Bank Corp’s offer for Hudson City Bancorp Inc, the industry’s biggest and longest pending merger, has been delayed twice amid Fed probes into M&T’s money-laundering controls.
 Seven firefighters and two emergency services personnel were killed after the fire caused part of Iron Mountain’s warehouse in southern Buenos Aires to collapse.
 The cuts planned for this year follow a loss of 7,438 jobs in 2013 as the Anglo American Plc unit known as Amplats merged five mines at its Rustenburg complex into three.
 Living Expenses While countries that issued linkers benefited by lowering their debt costs, investors in the bonds suffered unprecedented losses last year as price pressures from central bank stimulus dissipated, signs of disinflation emerged and the Fed moved to curtail its bond purchases.
 Heenan, which counted former Prime Ministers Jean Chretien and Pierre Trudeau among its employees, is closing after more than 40 years amid competition from larger firms and a slump in mergers and acquisitions.
 Allen & Overy to Open in Barcelona With Freshfields Hire Allen & Overy LLP is opening an office in Barcelona with the addition of Spanish lawyer Antoni Valverde, a mergers and acquisitions attorney at Freshfields Bruckhaus Deringer LLP.
 “Disruptions in the credit markets could affect future refinancing” Issuance this year will be led by mergers and acquisitions and dividends and share repurchases, compared with the predominance of refinancing-based offerings last year, according to Moody’s.
 “The CLO new-issue market may remain sluggish until there is regulatory/legislative relief from Volcker for existing holdings of CLO tranches for banks or until clarity emerges about the way forward for resolving Volcker compliance,” the analysts wrote.
 Ukrainian bonds rallied on speculation the European Union will offer financial aid to rival emergency loans from Russia.
 In September, the Chicago-based company delayed CME Europe for a second time, citing a “technical issue around the delivery of physical currencies” Eurex, Europe’s largest futures exchange, and parent Deutsche Boerse have also said they will focus on Asia for growth after European regulators blocked plans to merge with NYSE Euronext in 2012.
 Uebber, 54, will continue to oversee finance and mergers and acquisitions through 2019, the Stuttgart, Germany-based owner of the Mercedes-Benz brand said in a statement today.
 Emergency Reduction The previous week, the FOMC had cut its main interest rate by three quarters of a percentage point in its first emergency reduction since 2001.
 In FOMC discussion before the emergency reduction, Yellen said “the outlook has deteriorated” and “I think the risk of a severe recession and credit crisis is unacceptably high” At the Jan.
 Yesterday’s tax proposal emerged after months of talks between the government and industry representatives.
 31 have been peaceful and a state of emergency isn’t needed, according to a statement.
 It stopped short of ordering the government to cancel an emergency decree imposed Jan.
 Sixteen people have been killed in protest violence, according to the Bangkok Emergency Medical Service.
 18, the Bangkok emergency center said.
 The Civil Court ruled that measures approved under the emergency decree, including limits on the size of public gatherings and the use of certain roads, infringed on the constitutional rights of protesters.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, posted fourth-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates as asset-management revenue rose to a record.
 TUI is focusing on cutting costs and selling vacation packages directly to customers as Europe emerges from the longest recession since introducing a common currency.
 The company also has been largely unaffected by the emergence of a new countrywide operator based on the mobile assets of state-run OAO Rostelecom and Tele2 Russia, he said.
 Merger Law In response, parliament agreed on legislation designed to encourage mergers and prevent insolvencies from triggering more creditor losses.
 “In my view, some of the smaller banks with capital challenges ought to consider whether it is better for their shareholders to seek a merger partner rather than issuing new shares,” he said.
 Outperforming Danske Even after a series of mergers since 2008, in which insolvency was often averted at the 11th hour, there are still about 80 independent banks left in Denmark, a nation of 55 million inhabitants.
 Other mergers in the past few years include the combinations of Salling Bank with Vinderup Bank, Moens Bank with Fanefjord Sparekasse and Sparekassen Vendsyssel with Sparekassen Hvetbo.
 It's also handing out $3 billion in restricted stock units to the employees2 There's a breakup fee of $2 billion -- $1 billion in cash and $1 billion in stock -- in the event that regulators don't approve the deal, which is a hard outcome to imagine but I guess everyone got dressed up to do a merger and in a merger you have regulatory termination events and breakup fees and so that's what they did.
 That's in part because Facebook doesn't have $19 billion in cash; it doesn't even have $19 billion in assets3 Weirdly, the price is "subject to certain adjustments such that the cash paid will comprise at least 25% of the aggregate transaction consideration," and it's fun to imagine what that could mean4 Here is a sensible John Cassidy column pointing out that Facebook stock is pretty much funny money for mergers, and is burning a bit of a hole in Zuckerberg's metaphorical pocket: "After all, with such a highly priced stock, Facebook faces enormous pressure to justify its valuation.
 Overseas Communications “If the stocks are surging prior to merger announcement, particularly in the US, my guess is those would be targeted by the SEC and or Finra from an insider trading perspective,” Malcolm E.
 FICC Revenue Fixed-income, currencies and commodities revenue, or FICC, the single biggest source of income for Barclays’s investment bank, fell by 16 percent in the fourth quarter from the year-earlier period, while income from investment banking, which includes underwriting and mergers advisory, shrank 5 percent.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Hillary Clinton, once President Barack Obama’s political foe, emerged as his top ally on what would become his signature policy achievement: revamping the US.
 What transpired in Benghazi, and the administration’s reaction afterward, will re-emerge in the 2016 presidential race should Clinton choose to run.
 (Also, later Robinson's account was accessed "from an IP address assigned to Evercore's Manhattan office" while Hixon was in New York, and later from an IP address in Austin when he was in Austin) Most embarrassing of all, perhaps, is that the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority does a lot of spot-checking on mergers.
 So in early 2013, Finra sent everyone at Evercore a list of everyone who had traded in Titanium stock in the weeks leading up to the merger announcement.
 were the last two firms holding assets that were the subject of a 2012 Securities and Exchange Commission probe of illegal trades ahead of the merger announcement, the agency said in a statement yesterday.
 The mergers and acquisitions group, led by Don Harrison, has expanded by at least 50 percent in the past two years, a person with knowledge of the unit said.
 ‘War Chest’ Fission CEO Devinder Randhawa, who told Bloomberg News last month that the C$414 million company is for sale, said he was “very happy to hear” about Cameco’s stake sale, which gives Cameco “a war chest to go after some names” Cameco doesn’t comment on speculation about merger activity, Gord Struthers, a spokesman for Cameco, said in an e-mail Feb.
 Persistent Drought Production gains may be limited by dry weather in Texas and water shortages in California, the nation’s third-largest grower, which declared a drought emergency on Jan.
 Midwest and Northeast, where cold weather has caused heating-fuel prices to climb, federal regulators ordered in the first use of their emergency powers.
 We will not stand by at the stages any more, we are on a mission to follow and chase Yingluck the murderer out of this country” Live Ammunition Five people were killed and at least 65 injured in yesterday’s clash, the Bangkok Emergency Medical Center said on its website.
 “This is purely a momentum-driven market and there is a lot of positive news, such as better-than-expected corporate earnings, a merger between the United Arab Emirates’ two exchanges, and Amlak going back to the market,” Tariq Qaqish, a director at Dubai-based Al Mal Capital PSC, said by e-mail.
 Amlak Resumption Dubai and Abu Dhabi completed due diligence on a potential merger of the two stock markets in the UAE, bringing the combination a step closer, two people familiar with the matter said Feb.
 cable carrier, has said a merger would help the companies save money on programming and technology as the industry adjusts to lower demand for cable TV.
 “Now is the time for the current board and management of Time Warner Cable to respond to their shareholders and work with us to complete a merger” Charter’s Nominees Time Warner shareholders can vote on the proposed nominees at the company’s annual meeting this year.
 The former investment banker held a variety of roles, including CEO, at UnitedGlobalCom Inc, a former European cable TV and telephone company Malone merged with his former Liberty Media International Inc.
 Garden Well mine was submerged under about 47 million cubic meters of water and the Rosemont North pit under 620,000 cubic meters, the Perth-based company said in a statement.
 Telefonica’s plan to merge the two companies’ German units, which would reduce the country’s mobile operators from four to three, will soon receive a formal list of the European Commission’s concerns over how the deal may harm competition, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the merger approval process isn’t public.
 ‘Highly Concentrated’ Joaquin Almunia, the EU’s antitrust chief, hasn’t been swayed by telecommunications firms’ calls to ease merger rules, saying national markets are “often highly concentrated with only a limited number of network operators” in each EU nation.
 Companies that receive statements of objections in an EU merger review can try to allay antitrust concerns by making concessions.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- The world’s mining assets may be the target of mergers and acquisitions as an $8 billion pool of private-equity money that has lain dormant is stirred this year by attractive valuations and predictions of resilient demand for raw materials.
 “The sand is going through the hourglass and the money is going to get taken away if they don’t start spending” The optimism for a revival in mergers and acquisitions this year comes as nearly 8,000 executives, bankers and analysts descend on Cape Town this week for the annual Mining Indaba conference.
 “We expect to see evidence emerge from next quarter that an increase in lending volume can cover the narrowing loan margins,” said Shinichi Ina, an analyst at UBS AG in Tokyo.
 Barnier two years ago voiced concerns over Almunia’s decision to block a merger of Deutsche Boerse AG and NYSE Euronext.
 It emerged from bankruptcy the following year, according to Moody’s Investors Service.
 That would tie November for the lowest level since 2006, before Russia pledged $15 billion in emergency loans a month later.
 The rate fell 171 basis points in the previous two days as prospects of western aid emerged.
 are considering emergency funding for Ukraine if a new government is formed, US.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- India announced guidelines for mergers and trading of spectrum among wireless carriers, opening the door for operators, including including Vodafone Group Plc and Bharti Airtel Ltd, to bolster airwave assets.
 The rules cap a merged entity’s market share at 50 percent per service area, according to the document published on the Department of Telecommunications’ website today.
 Vying for customers with the top versions of Bayerische Motoren Werke AG’s X3, Daimler AG’s Mercedes GLK and the Range Rover Evoque, the compact model will probably emerge as Porsche’s most popular model next year.
 has pledged that its $452 billion merger with Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “Companies are in the business of making money and they go through mergers to make more money.
 ‘Scale Matters’ On a conference call after announcing the deal yesterday, Comcast and Time Warner Cable executives said the merger would improve customer service and let the combined company roll out new products more quickly.
 No Improvement? “There is no reason to think that just the merger itself would change the level of satisfaction of the customer service,” said Alexander Chernev, a marketing professor at Northwestern University.
 The merger also will undergo scrutiny from regulators, who may be swayed by public opinion.
 After experiencing fewer service outages and shorter maintenance wait times with Verizon’s service, Weller said he wouldn’t go back to the new merged company.
 “I’d like to not get exposed to some of those riskier places from a margin and return standpoint early on and instead pick places that we feel are more confident in return and margin growth” Superior also owns Wild Well Control, a business that brings workers in to handle on-site emergencies at oil and natural gas fields.
 While they continue trying to negotiate an end to the swaps, which cost taxpayers about $4 million a month, the city and the banks will refrain from taking court action against each other, according to Bill Nowling, a spokesman for Detroit’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr.
 China’s Wanxiang Group emerged in December as a suitor for Fisker, challenging Hybrid Tech Holdings LLC, a Chinese-backed firm that had been jockeying to take over the bankrupt automaker.
 * Andy Wang joined CIBC’s mergers and acquisitions team as an analyst, having most recently worked with the private capital unit of Ontario Teachers’ Pension Plan.
 3 that mining mergers and acquisitions will probably increase this year, led by more than $10 billion of privately funded deals, after 2013 saw the fewest buyouts in seven years.
 An $8 billion pool of private-equity money that has lain dormant may be deployed in mergers and acquisitions this year, stirred by attractive valuations and predictions of resilient demand for raw materials, Bloomberg News reported this week.
 The SEC said it won an emergency request freezing about $12 million in Robinson’s brokerage account, most of which represents proceeds from Hixon’s trading.
 The 50-year-old executive chairman informed the board of the judge’s decision to charge him over his 2009 appointment to head Banque Populaire and Caisse d’Epargne, two customer-owned lenders that then merged to form France’s second-biggest bank by branches, BPCE said in a statement today.
 The government encouraged the lenders’ merger to help stem losses at Natixis SA, their investment-banking unit.
 Suppliers for the semiconductor industry are under pressure to merge because there are fewer big customers to go around.
 “Our most important assets are our reputation and the trust we have earned from our clients and other market participants for more than a half century” By directly subscribing to Business Wire’s stream of potentially market-moving corporate statements, traders could shave thousandths of a second off the amount of time it took to receive and process the information in corporate press releases, including earnings and merger announcements.
 “My first memory of white people was of South African Defence Force soldiers occupying the streets during the state of emergency” Married to Natalie, who’s white, Maimane is the father of a three-year-old girl and 18-month-old boy.
 Failed Merger The DA has struggled to gain traction among black voters since its birth 13 years ago from a merger of the Democratic Party, the Federal Alliance and the New National Party, an offshoot of the National Party that governed during white minority rule.
 Chairwoman and anti-apartheid activist Mamphela Ramphele as the party’s presidential candidate and sealed the merger with a kiss on national television on Jan 29.
 “Possibly it would involve a name change -- Canadacor” Quebecor, which began offering mobile-phone service in Quebec after buying spectrum in the last auction in 2008, is poised to emerge as a challenger to Rogers Communications Inc, Telus Corp.
 “We do operate Saturday only in certain markets, but not Sunday only” Southwest’s acknowledgment accounts for the final pair of slots at Reagan that American agreed to divest to settle a federal antitrust lawsuit that sought to block its merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 “We view this move as a positive one for United as there has been a continued shift from smaller aircraft with numerous frequencies to larger aircraft with less frequency” United set its savings goal in November as the Chicago-based carrier continues to struggle to control costs since its merger with Continental Airlines in 2010.
 “The demand for hub-level connecting flying through Cleveland simply isn’t there” Cleveland was the smallest domestic hub for Continental, which merged with former United parent UAL Corp.
 Under a 2010 agreement, most Cleveland flights were to be retained for at least two years after the merger.
 “If Verso is unable to satisfy the exchange offer condition, we will re-evaluate the merger and consider all our options,’ he said.
 NewPage, which emerged from bankruptcy in 2012, has less than half of Verso’s debt and about twice the earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, according to Brian Bogart, a Montpelier, Vermont-based analyst at KDP Investment Advisors Inc.
 He dismissed speculation of an alternative merger deal for France’s second-largest carrier.
 Vivendi and cable operator Numericable SAS have held talks in the past year about a merger without agreeing on valuation, Altice SA, Numericable’s biggest investor, is making a renewed push to consolidate telecommunications assets in Europe, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 ArcelorMittal is seeking to emerge from an industry trough after dwindling demand and excess capacity eroded profit margins at steelmakers.
 “The argument that a third player in a market wants to merge with No.
 While the two sides haven’t worked out a deal and haven’t decided who will lead a merged company, a process which could take several months, they have had preliminary conversations, according to three of the people.
 “The acquisition of T-mobile is aimed at increasing customers in the US, and Son will take various measures to achieve the goal” The breakup fee has already emerged as a point of contention, said two of these people.
 Talks to merge the unit with Meredith Corp, owner of women’s titles such as Ladies’ Home Journal, broke down last year.
 and the failed Shanxi Zhenfu Energy Group have already emerged this year, as slowing economic growth and anti-pollution policies drive coal prices to near a four-year low.
 The expo’s $32 billion of orders, while modest compared with a Gulf carrier-inspired $206 billion splurge in Dubai three months earlier, highlighted the emergence of the latest class of airline serving intra-Asian routes that are starting to criss-cross the continent.
 shares fell the most in nine months as Australia’s largest investment bank said mergers and acquisitions activity was muted even as it forecast a higher profit for the year.
 News American Airlines Merger Lawyer Butler Leaves Skadden for Hilco Jack Butler, the bankruptcy attorney who helped negotiate the merger of American Airlines and US Airways, is leaving law firm Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP for Hilco Global.
 and advised on last year’s merger with US Airways Group Inc, which created American Airlines Group Inc, the world’s biggest airline.
 and advised Kmart Corp, which came out of bankruptcy in 2003 and has since merged with Sears Holdings Corp.
 Turkey’s central bank increased the one-week repo rate to 10 percent from 45 percent at an emergency meeting in January.
 Prime Minister Yingluck Shinawatra has declared a state of emergency and is deploying 10,000 police in Bangkok alone for the Feb.
 31, according to the Bangkok Emergency Medical Service.
 “With still only 10 percent market share post-merger, we are confident of our prospects for driving further long-term revenue growth” The deal will increase Brookdale’s presence in high-population states in the West and Northeast, more than doubling its units in California, New York, New Jersey and Massachusetts.
(Corrects merger description in second paragraph of story published Feb.
 The real estate investment trust was spun off from Starwood Property Trust Inc, a commercial-property investment and finance REIT based in Greenwich, Connecticut, following a merger between Waypoint Homes and an affiliate of Sternlicht’s Starwood Capital Group.
 “Earnings have come in fine and we’re seeing some activity in mergers and acquisitions,” John Carey, a fund manager at Pioneer Investment Management Inc, a Boston-based firm that manages about $220 billion worldwide, said by phone.
 life policies emerged in the 1980s when the AIDS epidemic led some patients to sell their insurance policies to pay for treatment.
 Two weeks after emergency measures by Turkey’s central bank pulled the lira back from a record low, the government sold $15 billion of 31-year dollar bonds yesterday in its longest-dated debt in the currency ever.
 ‘Cruel Violation’ Fei, the mother of one of the infants, wrote on Slatecomthat her daughter weighed 1 pound 9 ounces when born byemergency cesarean section in October 2012, just five monthsinto an otherwise routine pregnancy.
 27, AT&T said it had no intention of bidding for Vodafone in the next six months, to satisfy British stock-market regulations designed to limit merger speculation.
 The company depends on mergers and acquisitions to sustain profit growth, since developing new drugs through research and development is so costly, said Ori Hershkovitz, a partner at Sphera Funds Management Ltd, a Tel Aviv-based hedge fund.
 Mello, 39, will work in the Sao Paulo office for the New York-based merger-and-acquisition advisory firm, according to Daniel Wainstein, a former partner and chairman of Goldman Sachs’s Brazil investment-banking business who joined Greenhill in October.
 Announced mergers and acquisitions involving companies in Brazil increased more than 18 percent to $788 billion last year from 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Pressure is mounting for China to contain air pollution, which reached record levels in Shanghai last year and prompted many cities to introduce emergency measures, including restricting the use of vehicles on heavily polluted days.
 “However, we are somewhat puzzled by the unexpected strength in the January trade data” Improving economic data may spur investors to focus on policies that emerge from the National People’s Congress scheduled for next month, Michael Yu, a strategist at JPMorgan in Hong Kong, wrote in a report dated Feb.
 Spanish banks rose this year in Madrid trading as lenders including Bankinter SA said bad loans may be nearing their peak after the country emerged from two recessions.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd, the utility that supplies 95 percent of South Africa’s electricity, ended emergency measures to cut power consumption after some of its generating capacity came back online after maintenance.
 The state-owned utility made the request earlier the same day under the so-called declaration of emergency protocol after four generating units went down for maintenance and power imports dropped.
 Eskom, which produces about 85 percent of its electricity from coal, last declared a power emergency in November, when supplies remained tight for about 10 days.
 “We will see a quicker pace of uptake than we’re used to,” and mergers and acquisitions are picking up, said the Swede, who is also chairman of drugmaker AstraZeneca Plc and Ericsson AB, the world’s largest maker of wireless networks.
 Markets from Turkey to South Africa and Argentina were roiled during the past month as investors sold off emerging-economy currencies, stocks and bonds, prompting emergency measures from governments and central banks.
 managing director who later oversaw a series of mergers as chief executive officer at F&C Asset Management Plc, operator of the UK’s oldest investment fund, has died.
 “Alain will be sadly missed by all of us who had the privilege of both knowing him and of working together” F&C Years After Grisay’s appointment as CEO, he presided over F&C’s merger with real-estate investment firm REIT Asset Management in 2008; its breakup the following year with UK.
 In 2000, the bank merged with Chase Manhattan Corp.
 After moving to F&C, Grisay became deputy CEO and chairman of the company’s Dutch unit, where he remained until 2004, when F&C merged with the UK.
 “It required some reasonably tough management to sort that out,” Grisay said of the Isis merger, according to the Financial Times.
 10, emerged in a forensic report required under security standards set by the major credit card brands.
 “If I was still managing a portfolio at a bank, I’d be unloading like mad” Market Develops While banks have been trying to reduce their loans to the shipping industry for years, a market for secondary debt didn’t emerge until 2012, Paul Leand, AMA’s chief executive officer, said in a telephone interview.
 “When there are 20 funds bidding on the same portfolio, and the consensus is, ‘The markets have turned around and we better get on the wagon or we’ll miss this opportunity,’ that’s when people get too optimistic” Growing Fleet Just as the industry emerges from the worst glut in decades, fleet growth is poised to accelerate again as orders increase.
 TUI Travel TUI dropped a plan to merge with TUI Travel Plc a year ago after concluding it would not benefit its shareholders.
 The merger also will help the companies cope with an industrywide decline in cable-TV viewers following years of inroads by phone and satellite companies, as well as newer Internet services such as Hulu LLC and Aereo Inc.
 ‘More Free’ “In general, an environment that would foster more mergers and acquisitions suggests corporations are willing to be more free with their cash,” John Canally, an economic strategist at LPL Financial Corp.
 Returns on that investment have been boosted by the emergence of the shale gas industry, which has caused ethane costs to plummet.
 “The general policy is for Toyota to send parts by ship, but if it’s an emergency we will consider flying the parts,” said Dion Corbett, a Tokyo-based spokesman for Toyota.
 The debtor-in-possession financing will help cover costs at the company’s only producing oil field as it looks to emerge from bankruptcy protection after triggering Latin America’s largest corporate default last year.
 when the company went public in 1994 and remained chairman as it merged in 1997 with Mack Co.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal named Lyle Wilpon, a former executive with Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit, to head its mergers-and-acquisitions business in the US.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo BTG Pactual, Latin America’s biggest merger adviser, said fourth-quarter profit dropped 10 percent, missing analysts’ estimates on declining revenue from financial advisory and asset management.
 BTG said the division was hurt by a “lower number of mergers and acquisitions and weaker capital markets activity” Asset-management revenue dropped 25 percent to 480 million reais.
 While she said she must return to work right after the competition, the planning it takes to juggle work, family and sport merge together to help her as an athlete and lawyer, she said.
 In Tennessee, the majority-black Memphis schools last year merged with the majority-white county district.
 And, in Dallas, a move to create a district emerged last year.
 Now that Direct Edge has completed its merger with Bats Global Markets Inc, the combined company will vie with NYSE to be the biggest operator of US.
 Reshaping Industry The emergence of a challenger to the NYSE shows how much high-frequency trading has done to reshape the industry.
 While the merger of Bats and Direct Edge reduces exchange owners, it won’t reduce the number of exchanges.
 “And when you have two pairs of venues with identical business models and very similar pricing structures, why wouldn’t you merge?” ‘More Efficient’ Academics have scoured market data to determine if the proliferation of venues and automated, high-speed trading has improved markets.
 The land grab era is over” Technology also has pushed the debate about market fairness off the exchange floor and onto the Internet for all to see, said O’Brien, who relinquished the CEO title to Bats’s Joe Ratterman after the merger closed yesterday as the Direct Edge brand is slowly phased out.
 O’Brien’s advocacy for the markets “lines up with our DNA and is why this merger is a natural fit,” Ratterman said in a Jan.
 held 49 percent before the merger.
 The merged company will be headquartered in Bats’s home of Kansas.
 The agency said it also sought to learn why there wasn’t an effort to ease the helicopter’s descent or an emergency call from the pilot, who had 5,592 flight hours.
 Bank Clothiers Inc’s resistance to a merger with rival Men’s Wearhouse Inc.
 Apple has an emergency request before the US.
 Shufersal Ltd, the country’s largest supermarket chain, and Cellcom Israel Ltd, its biggest mobile-phone provider, are among about 40 companies likely to be sold or merged, Morris Dorfman, deputy head of the National Economic Council, said in a Feb.
 Sibanye was among mining companies asked to reduce energy use in November as Eskom declared an emergency power shortage.
 ‘Need Certainty’ Ann Beauchesne, vice president of national security and emergency preparedness for the US.
 Buyout Offers Nontraded REITs have a finite life span and eventually have to merge with another company, list their shares, or liquidate portfolios to return money to shareholders.
 “We could list, but we’re still going to be $2 billion” The Kite merger is expected to be completed late in the second quarter or in the following three months.
 The transactions “were nothing more than borrowings by the city of Detroit, thinly disguised as a back-to-back series of contract payments” When Detroit’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr, put the city into bankruptcy in July, he cited the pension debt and a related set of interest-rate swaps as contributing to the financial crisis.
 Phone carrier Oi SA rallied after saying banks it didn’t name agreed to underwrite 6 billion reais of new shares as part of its merger with parent Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 “It’s pretty unusual for a CEO to discuss a merger directly with regulators before a deal is announced,” said Paul Gallant, Washington-based managing director for Guggenheim Securities, in an interview.
 After the merger, the lenders will save about 20 million euros in costs and boost revenue by about 30 million euros, Ari Lampinen, senior vice president in corporate planning at OP-Pohjola, said on a call with investors.
 Bank also raised antitrust concerns about any merger between the two companies even though it had previously offered to buy Men’s Wearhouse.
 mergers and acquisitions at RBC Capital Markets and a former Harvard University rugby player, said the “Dan and Dave” marketing campaign was part of the American psyche for those who grew up in the era.
 He played a key role in Catalyst Health Solutions Corp’s recent merger with SXC Health Solutions Corp, Hughes Hubbard said in a statement.
 He has more than 10 years’ experience in mergers and acquisitions and private-equity transactions, acquisition and capital market law and restructuring.
 He joins from Squire Sanders LLP, where he was formerly the head of the banking practice at Hammonds before it merged with Squires.
 “We view this move as a positive one for United as there has been a continued shift from smaller aircraft with numerous frequencies to larger aircraft with less frequency” United set its savings goal in November as the Chicago-based carrier continues to struggle to control costs since its merger with Continental Airlines in 2010.
 “The demand for hub-level connecting flying through Cleveland simply isn’t there” Cleveland was the smallest domestic hub for Continental, which merged with former United parent UAL Corp.
 Under a 2010 agreement, most Cleveland flights were to be retained for at least two years after the merger.
 Klarna late last year merged with Germany’s Sofort to gain control of 10 percent of the combined $100 billion market in countries where the companies operate.
 Some firms may need to “disappear in an orderly fashion” rather than be recapitalized or merged with other banks, Daniele Nouy, hired as chief of the ECB’s regulator in December, said in a Financial Times interview published Feb.
 It washes over everything else, like a magic blanket that we lay over the market and everyone feels better” $100 Million The first $100 million listing emerged in July 2012, when Steven Klar, a Long Island developer, decided to sell his triplex at Midtown’s CitySpire tower, listed as the highest terraced residence in the US.
 Yesterday, Facebook Chief Executive Officer Mark Zuckerberg bought their five-year-old company in the largest Internet deal since Time Warner’s $124 billion merger with AOL in 2001, a deal that will almost certainly make Koum and Acton billionaires several times over.
 “One of the ideas that emerged was to see whether banks, including Indian banks can help in this” The high commission has stepped up dormitory visits in the past few months, Singh said.
 Dunn, mergers and acquisitions; Stephen L.
 Oi SA rallied after Folha de SPaulo reported that a group of 12 banks agreed to raise as much as 8 billion reais to buy a stake in the company that will result from the merger of the phone carrier and parent Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 in January 2011 to support current business development and potential merger and acquisitions, it said today in the e-mailed statement.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Patriot Coal Corp, which emerged from bankruptcy in December, spilled waste into a creek feeding West Virginia’s Kanawha River, a month after Freedom Industries Inc.
 Capital controls may not ease pressure on the currency and risk leading to the emergence of a “parallel market,” he said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- David Jones Ltd’s refusal to merge with its closest competitor, followed by a board shakeup, has only increased speculation more bids will come for Australia’s oldest department store.
 The company and Myer published details after the Australian Financial Review reported last month the companies could merge.
 “There needs to be a better offer” Myer has more to gain from a merger than David Jones, according to Tim Montague-Jones, a Sydney-based analyst at Morningstar Inc.
 That’s assuming the merged company commands a higher price-earnings multiple than Myer currently does, he said.
 Australia’s competition regulator may not necessarily clear a merger of Myer and David Jones, said Andrew McLennan, an analyst at Commonwealth Bank of Australia.
 “But that would be strange because they’re competing against specialty and online retailers” The regulator this week said it hasn’t formed a view on a possible merger of David Jones and Myer.
 antitrust regulators for its December merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 “Thanks to our recent merger, American Airlines now has an expanded, robust global network,” including 800 daily flights from Dallas-Fort Worth airport, Matt Miller, a spokesman, said in an e-mail.
 Apple made an emergency request today before a three-judge panel in New York, seeking a longer delay in the supervision by the monitor, Michael Bromwich.
 to merge with OfficeMax Inc.
 Krumpelman spent nine years at Goldman Sachs and started its small- to mid-sized bank merger practice, advising Bankia SA last year on the $883 million sale of its US.
 “There’s a lot of permutations of things that could happen” A tie-up of Reynolds and Lorillard is one possibility, and the merged company may even appeal to BAT, he said.
 Reynolds has long explored a merger with Lorillard though any such deal is unlikely right now, a person familiar with the matter said.
 BAT has also studied the merger because it would have an impact on the value of Reynolds and could require financing support from the British cigarette maker, said this person.
 There would be antitrust hurdles to a merger in the US.
 Time Warner Cable, meanwhile, refused to engage with Charter to develop a merger deal, Charter said.
 Comcast’s merger offer was worth $15882 a share when it was announced Feb.
 “We are fully committed to our merger with Comcast, which we believe is in the best interests of shareholders,” Time Warner Cable said today.
 Product tankers emerged from the slump as one of the first ship types attracting interest from investors.
 Yuan Decline Economists were split last month over whether January’s trade figures showed a re-emergence of inflated export invoices to disguise capital inflows after authorities started a crackdown in the second quarter of last year.
 “There’s a lot of permutations of things that could happen” A tie-up of Reynolds and Lorillard is one possibility, and the merged company may even appeal to BAT, he said.
 Reynolds has long explored a merger with Lorillard though any such deal is unlikely right now, a person familiar with the matter said.
 BAT has also studied the merger because it would have an impact on the value of Reynolds and could require financing support from the British cigarette maker, said this person.
 There would be antitrust hurdles to a merger in the US.
 industry, as the carrier reaps merger benefits faster than in rivals’ tie-ups.
 left bankruptcy and merged with US Airways Group Inc.
 Neither Delta nor United got $1 billion in new revenue and savings by the second full year of their mergers, said David Fintzen, a Barclays Plc analyst.
 “United, at the other extreme, is three-plus years now into its merger and still has a small revenue dis-synergy the way I calculate it” Most of American’s $1 billion goal for so-called merger synergies will be in revenue, about $900 million, according to the airline, whose changes include calibrating jet assignments to match demand so the planes on a given route are as full as possible.
 “Those changes don’t require a merger,” McAdoo said in an interview.
 I’m skeptical about a lot of low-hanging fruit being left” Parker publicly established the merger’s tempo by moving top executives from Tempe, Arizona-based US Airways into American’s headquarters before the deal closed.
 Booking Trips The new American also is ahead of the pace set in rivals’ mergers in linking computer systems so that the old American and US Airways can book fliers onto each other’s planes, said Bob Mann, a former American executive who now runs aviation consultant RW.
 Parker and his lieutenants are getting a boost from an early start to integration planning, beginning within two months of the airlines’ February 2013 agreement to merge and running through a US.
 (SWY) bonds are signalingthe grocer’s borrowing costs will rise about 33 percent to fundits $9 billion buyout by Cerberus Capital Management LP as thenew owner piles on debt to merge the company with Albertsons.
 ChristineWilcox, a spokeswoman for Albertsons, declined to divulge thecompany’s financing plans for the merger.
March 10 (Bloomberg) -- NII Holdings Inc, which offers Nextel mobile-phone service in Latin America, retained UBS AG for advice on potential strategic opportunities, including partnerships, a merger or a sale of the company or its assets.
 The rating also accommodates the company’s plans to grow through mergers and acquisitions.
 and other leaders from the Group of Seven nations also are holding an emergency meeting tonight to discuss suspending Russia’s participation in the group, he said.
March 7 (Bloomberg) -- Cerberus Capital Management LP’s $9 billion deal to merge Safeway Inc.
 “This merger will improve our competitive position,” Safeway Chief Executive Officer Robert Edwards, who will be in charge of the combined company, said yesterday on a conference call.
 Cerberus and its Boise, Idaho-based Albertsons operations had emerged as the leading bidder for Safeway last month.
 The merger will allow the new company “to compete more effectively and efficiently in meeting customer’s changing needs in an increasingly competitive landscape,” Edwards said.
 in Brazil, the New York-based merger adviser said.
 Moelis ranked 11th among merger advisers in the US.
 executives in Brazil to advise on mergers and acquisitions.
 Under the exit plan, LightSquared would emerge as a standalone company valued at $77 billion, with more funding to pursue its ambitions with regulators.
 The water will travel through a 43-mile pipeline that Cadiz wants to build along a railroad spur, then merge into the Colorado River Aqueduct into Los Angeles.
 During the week Governor Jerry Brown declared a drought emergency on Jan.
 Because there’s no excess flow in the Colorado any longer, he put off the storage component and rebranded, without irony, Cadiz’s plan to pump the desert aquifer as a “conservation, recovery and storage project” Wells on the property will suck water from the underground rock formations and pump it through the 43-mile pipeline before it merges into the Met’s aqueduct carrying Colorado River water from Arizona to the Los Angeles Basin.
 in its merger with Blyth & Co.
 Boothby’s career was shaped by two deals that demonstrated the finance industry’s merger frenzy in the 1970s, as business boomed and firms sought economies of scale.
 Paine Webber, under CEOs James Davant and Donald Marron, was seeking to merge its way into the top tier of Wall Street firms.
 “In the long run it’s a good buy for SDI because the merger will create synergies for both in areas such as cars and OLEDs,” Kim Chang Jin, a Seoul-based analyst at NH Investment & Securities said by phone today.
 The revival of Alfa Romeo is key to Marchionne’s plans for the merged carmaker.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Anhanguera Educacional Participacoes SA and Kroton Educacional SA sank after Brazil’s antitrust regulator indicated that the education companies may have to sell some schools before their merger is approved.
 The findings of Cade attorneys’ office will be presented to the regulator’s board, which will have final say on the merger.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve Bank of New York in 2012 examined how benchmark currency rates were calculated after accusations emerged that banks manipulated the London interbank offered rate.
 Hapag-Lloyd turned to CSAV after talks to merge with local competitor Hamburg Sued failed a year ago because shareholders of both companies couldn’t agree on terms.
 Ireland exited an international bailout plan in December, the first euro-area nation to emerge from a rescue, boosting confidence in the region’s recovery from its four-year debt crisis.
 Airport firefighters are maintaining an emergency service, preventing a shutdown of the hub.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable SA’s proposed merger with SFR, the French phone carrier owned by Vivendi SA, would probably avoid a lengthy antitrust challenge because of little overlap in businesses, people familiar with the matter said.
 Combining Numericable’s 17 million broadband users with SFR’s 21 million mobile-phone customers is unlikely to lead to an extended review by regulators because it would involve a merger of landline with wireless assets, said the people, who asked not to be named discussing private deliberations.
 Numericable and its shareholder Altice SA, both controlled by billionaire Patrick Drahi, are preparing a $20 billion offer to merge with SFR, a person familiar with the matter said.
 “Regulators probably would have no problem about fixed-mobile consolidation in France,” said Andres Bolumburu, an analyst at Banco de Sabadell SA in Madrid, who drew comparison of a Numericable-SFR merger with Vodafone Group Plc’s acquisition of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG in Germany last year.
 Telefonica SA and Royal KPN NV’s proposal to merge their German phone units received a statement of objections from the European Commission last week, signaling the carriers will have to make concessions to win approval.
 While talks with Numericable are the most advanced, Iliad and Bouygues are trying to derail those negotiations and overcome regulators’ skepticism about mobile mergers, they said.
 A merger of SFR with Numericable would keep the number of wireless network operators in France to four.
 Lampert, who engineered the merger of Kmart Holding Corp.
 “So as long as DOJ approves this merger, states are highly likely to do the same” Florida and Pennsylvania were part of a group of states that joined the Justice Department’s lawsuit last year seeking to block the merger of AMR Corp.
 WWE isn’t in merger talks, Chief Financial Officer George Barrios said in an interview March 6.
 By 2008, mounting losses on home loans triggered JPMorgan Chase & Co’s emergency acquisition of Bear Stearns Cos.
 While Imerys said today it determined not to increase its offer again, the company has four business days to match the bid under the terms of the merger agreement.
 Assuming synergies of about $50 million, Imerys could offer up to about $4870 a share before the deal starts becoming dilutive to shareholders, according to Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried.
 is considering a merger as the maker of flavors for Coca-Cola Co.
 “We are open to discuss opportunities, which we are doing, to merge with larger companies,” Yehudai said in a March 6 interview at Bloomberg’s Tel Aviv office.
 Chief Executive Officer Federico Ghizzoni, who merged the bank’s two Ukrainian units last year, has said the bank may scale back operations in the country.
 A merger with Wesco “makes intuitive sense” because Anixter’s strengths are complementary and would create a company with combined annual sales of almost $14 billion, he wrote in a Feb.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Oleo & Gas Participacoes SA is selling everything from trash cans to coffee cups as Eike Batista’s Brazilian oil company tries to raise funds and emerge from Latin America’s biggest corporate default.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Thailand’s benchmark stock index rose to a three-month high and the baht strengthened after the national police chief said the government may end Bangkok’s state of emergency amid easing political tensions.
 The government may lift the state of emergency before its expiration on March 23 because of an improving political situation, national police chief Adul Sangsingkeo said yesterday.
 “Removal of the emergency decree will significantly help the overall economy, especially the tourism sector,” Rakpong Chaisuparakul, an investment strategist at KGI, said by phone.
 Thai Prime Minister Yingluck Shinawatra, accused by protest leaders of corruption and abuse of power, declared a 60-day state of emergency in Bangkok on Jan.
 Vintage is “essentially a strategic buyer and they’re committed to doing the deal,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said in a phone interview.
 Ireland emerged from its bailout program in December and Portugal is set to follow in May.
 both decided last month that it was worth losing millions of dollars in fees to get credit on a big merger they didn’t work on, four people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The investment banks asked for credit in league tables -- rankings of advisers on mergers and acquisitions maintained by both Bloomberg LP and Dealogic -- for working on the $25 billion sale of Forest Laboratories Inc.
 “This has emerged at the same time data from Statistics Canada was released that suggests the net worth of Canadian families has increased” The survey also showed growing optimism about the economy’s prospects, the real estate market and job security, which reached the highest in more than two years.
 Adding ammunition is the most vibrant IPO market since 2007, as well as Facebook Inc’s agreement last month to pay $19 billion for texting service WhatsApp Inc, the biggest Internet deal since the disastrous AOL-Time Warner merger in 2001.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Buchanan Ingersoll & Rooney PC and Florida-based Fowler White Boggs PA agreed to merge effective today, giving the combined firm about 530 lawyers and government relations professionals.
 Buchanan Ingersoll, based in Pittsburgh, has 18 offices following the merger, including sites in California, New York and Washington  Deals Proskauer Advises American Realty on Shopping Mall Spinoff Proskauer Rose LLP is advising American Realty Capital Properties Inc.
 The Simpson Thacher team is led by mergers and acquisitions partner Chad Skinner and includes partners Brian Steinhardt, credit; David Rubinsky, executive compensation and employee benefits; and Peter Thomas, antitrust.
 merger and acquisition deals topping $100 million were challenged last year, according to a report issued by Cornerstone Research, which said the data was part of a trend that began in 2010.
 “None of the lawsuits in our data went to trial, and all judgments, including summary judgments or judgments on the pleadings, were granted to the defendants” Plaintiff attorneys filed 612 suits challenging mergers and acquisitions in 2013, with most deals averaging five lawsuits.
 After the suit was reinstated, the settlement emerged from mediation.
 Belz, president and chairman of Peabody Hotel Group, is hoping to emerge from his individual Chapter 11 case shortly after an April 16 confirmation hearing for approval of his plan.
 8 proposal, Elliott helpfully included a 78-page draft merger agreement with a go-shop provision that would let the company “secure a healthy premium” by talking to other suitors who may be willing to pay a higher price.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- The timing may be right for a $34 billion merger between two of the biggest managers of US.
 Good Timing “This probably is a more likely time than normal for a merger to happen,” John Leslie, a money manager and analyst at Miller/Howard Investments Inc, said in a phone interview.
 Should HCN or Ventas merge with HCP, the combined company would be valued at about $34 billion, based on yesterday’s closing stock prices.
 ‘Very Large’ “They’re all very large so a merger between any two of the three would create a very, very large REIT,” Stephanie Thomas, a fund manager at Cincinnati-based Bahl & Gaynor, which oversees about $11 billion including shares of HCP, HCN and Ventas, said in a phone interview.
 The appeal of a merger with HCP for either would be the opportunity to reduce capital costs, said Rob Mains, a Saratoga Springs, New York-based analyst at Stifel.
 The program, which is watched closely by foreign companies and prompts some to prepare emergency response plans, “didn’t go for as spectacular or as big a target as in previous years,” Stocker said.
 A merger between Scania and less-profitable Munich-based MAN “would benefit Volvo,” in which Cevian has held shares since 2006.
 bank merger, has been stalled twice because regulators found flaws with M&T’s money-laundering controls.
 Lazard Capital was spun out by Hamilton, Bermuda based merger-advisory firm Lazard ahead of its 2005 initial public offering.
 That move is part of a plan by the Bologna, Italy-based company to merge with Premafin Finanziaria SpA, Fondiaria and its unit Milano Assicurazioni to become Italy’s second-biggest insurer after Assicurazioni Generali SpA.
 Jon Corzine emerged from that episode saying he held a newfound appreciation of family and that it had caused him to rethink his priorities.
 industrial production probably rebounded in February following the biggest drop in nine months, according to a Bloomberg survey, as the world’s largest economy emerged from winter weather that slowed growth.
 Flyht’s AFIRS hardware box generates non-emergency, mechanical information about the jet back to flight maintenance crews in real-time, saving up to $100,000 a year in maintenance and flight turnaround costs, said Tempany.
 Moynihan said efficiency will improve as litigation costs fade and benefits emerge from spending on smartphone technology and back-office operations.
 The revised proposal includes 1315 billion euros ($181 billion) in cash -- an increase of 185 billion euros -- and a 215 percent stake in the entity created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
 “An IPO of the new entity is planned as soon as the merger is completed, thus giving Vivendi an immediate opportunity to monetize the remainder of its interest,” Bouygues said yesterday.
 “This merger application is currently under MOFCOM’s review and we have no further comment,” Joanna Li, a Beijing-based spokeswoman for Microsoft, said in an e-mail today.
 The top banks may see combined revenue from trading, underwriting and advising on mergers drop 11 percent in the first quarter as clients cut back on activity, JPMorgan analysts wrote in an e-mailed report from London last week.
 -Russia’s central bank, which raised interest rates at an emergency meeting on March 3, holds its scheduled monetary-policy meeting.
 South Africa-born Davis, 56, is looking to repeat his success at Xstrata, where he led the management team that transformed the $500 million-market-value coal producer into a $50 billion giant through a decade of mergers, acquisitions and expansion.
 “Monetary policy has some scope to ease, in order to lend more support to the economy and ensure continuous financial accommodation” Since the protests to oust Prime Minister Yingluck Shinawatra began, 23 people have been killed and the government imposed an emergency decree in the capital in January for a period of 60 days.
 Saskatchewan Premier Brad Wall and Liberal MP Ralph Goodale have called on the federal government to pass an emergency law to clear the backlog on rails controlled by Canadian Pacific and Canadian National.
 Spring Thaw The government’s action comes too late as emergency laws should have been enacted late last year when the backlog began to reach a crisis, Goodale said in a telephone interview from Ottawa.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s senior mergers and acquisitions lawyer, Chris Barbuto, joined Sidley Austin LLP as a partner and member of the global M&A practice in New York.
 Three studies of Amgen’s evolocumab, presented today at the American College of Cardiology meeting in Washington, showed the drug’s benefits emerged within weeks of starting therapy and showed no serious safety risks in patients taking the drug for as long as a year.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Anhanguera Educacional Participacoes SA sank the most on the Ibovespa as Kroton Educacional SA said the conditions imposed by Brazil’s antitrust regulator could derail the education companies’ merger plan.
 “Depending on the conditions, it could mean a breach in the merger terms” Anhanguera has lost 16 percent this year, while Kroton has advanced 19 percent.
 He expects the decision on the merger in May or June.
 The FCC has approved 85 shared-ad sales arrangements in merger reviews since 2008, said Smith, whose group is based in Washington.
 While dissent within the AMCU has also emerged, the size of the factions hasn’t been established.
 The measure was designed as a permanent mechanism to follow the EU emergency market fix known as backloading, which will withhold 900 million allowances at auctions between 2014 and 2016 and return them to the market in 2019-2020.
 “This merger will improve our competitive position,” Safeway Chief Executive Officer Robert Edwards, who will remain in charge of the combined company, said during a conference call today.
 Cerberus and its Boise, Idaho-based Albertsons operations had emerged as the leading bidder for Safeway last month.
 “You knew, didn’t you,” as a result of the police information? “The whole truth didn’t emerge during the trial” Brooks, 45, is one of seven people standing trial on charges related to phone hacking and bribing public officials at the New York-based company’s UK.
 The Cleary Gottlieb team is led by New York mergers and acquisitions partner Paul Shim and includes partners Tihir Sarkar, M&A; Mark Nelson and Romano Subiotto, antitrust; Arthur Kohn, employee benefits; Len Jacoby, IP; Bill McRae, tax; Derek Bush and Paul Marquardt, regulatory; and Steven Horowitz, real estate.
 Bouygues today boosted the cash portion of its offer by 800 million euros ($11 billion) to 113 billion euros and promised Vivendi a smaller stake -- 43 percent instead of 46 percent -- in a merged SFR and Bouygues Telecom.
 29 that Itau would inject $652 million of capital and merge its Chilean and Colombian units with Corpbanca in exchange for 172 billion new Corpbanca shares.
 “The law in Chile is clear that a tender process isn’t required” because the transaction is a merger, not an outright sale, Felipe Larrain, Corpbanca’s legal counselor, said on the call with analysts today.
 knows your shopping habits and police use mobile phones to pinpoint locations of emergency calls, how can a wide-body Boeing Co.
 Pilots can code them to emit distress signals for an emergency or hijacking, said Hans Weber, president of San Diego-based Tecop International, a consultant focusing on aviation safety and security issues.
 Competition between AT&T and T-Mobile, which abandoned a merger attempt in 2011, has intensified in part because they use similar technology, making it easier for customers to switch devices between their networks.
 In Riau, officials declared a state of emergency on Feb.
 Those bankers offer services from capital raising to trade finance and mergers and acquisitions advice, John Wright, a managing director and market leader for Africa at Credit Suisse, said in an interview in Cape Town.
 Forecasts call for Greece to emerge this year from its six-year recession, which has seen unemployment rise to 275 percent.
 European Union leaders will consider repercussions for Russia at an emergency meeting today on the Ukraine crisis, after Russia’s foreign minister fended off a US.
 carriers have endured bankruptcies and consolidation to emerge as disciplined competitors, said Richard Aboulafia, aerospace analyst with Teal Group, a Fairfax, Virginia-based consultant.
 A stand-off between Turkish Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan and the judiciary put pressure on the lira in January, forcing the central bank to increase its benchmark rate to 10 percent from 45 percent in an emergency overnight meeting on Jan.
 New York Gallery After becoming CEO, Hartmann later shook up the European energy market when he engineered the merger with Munich-based Viag AG that turned EON into Germany’s largest utility in 2000.
 The top investment banks may see combined revenue from trading, underwriting and advising on mergers drop 11 percent in the first quarter as clients cut back on activity, JPMorgan Cazenove analysts said in an e-mailed report from London today.
 Homes along the River Thames west of London suffered water damage, while parts of Somerset in southwest England were submerged after a series of storms in the wettest winter for some areas since records began.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Tom Kloet is retiring as head of Canada’s largest stock exchange almost three years after his plan to merge with the London bourse was foiled, leaving the exchange vulnerable to a commodities slump that sliced trading volumes and its share price.
 Kloet’s plan to merge the former TMX with London Stock Exchange Group Plc and give it a global footing collapsed in June 2011 after it failed to get enough shareholder support, just as a global commodities downturn set in.
 The case isalso a precursor of future battles over telecommunicationsmergers elsewhere as European phone companies look toconsolidate to cope with rising network costs and slow growth.
 The Competition Authority, which would have to sign off ona merger, is more concerned about preserving the broadest rangeof consumer choice in the French mobile market, the peoplefamiliar with the talks said.
 In its discussions with regulators, Bouygues will arguethat a reduction to three operators in the French market fromfour is different from that in Germany, where European Unionregulators are challenging the merger of Telefonica SA and RoyalKPN NV’s local units, the people said.
 needs American-owned and -crewed ships available in the event of war or national emergencies.
 tankers could emerge as a condition, according to Winston & Strawn LLP, a law firm specializing in shipping.
 “Operating company bondholders have benefited from mergers and acquisitions as they have been paid incentive fees to allow securitisation structures to be implemented,” he said.
 Jersey City, NewJersey-based KCG was formed last year when Getco LLC merged withKnight Capital Group Inc.
 in New YorkThe shares have climbed 18 percent since Knight’s merger withChicago-based Getco, a high-frequency trading firm.
 emerged as another suitor yesterday with an offer of $350 million, though it said it hasn’t lined up financing yet.
 Source: mubicom via Bloomberg Close Close Open Source: mubicom via Bloomberg Venture Capital MUBI’s subscriber base has been growing at a rate of 3 percent a week for the past 18 months, according to Cakarel, 37, who said he worked on public offerings, mergers and private equity investments at Goldman Sachs in London and New York.
 oil field, says a prospect called the Tuscaloosa Marine Shale is among the last great fields that may emerge in the US.
 MMI, formed by the merger of Metropolitan Group Ltd.
 On the Spanish side, you can still reduce debt and sell assets, but the operating activities are not in a growth phase and don’t have potential from restructuring measures” Perez turned ACS into one of Europe’s largest builders by using mergers and acquisitions to expand Catalan construction company Construcciones Padros SA, where he became CEO in 1983.
 GM as currently constituted is protected from claims over deaths or economic losses occurring before the so-called old GM emerged from bankruptcy in July 2009.
 Without the cash, OGpar would face closure, the company said in its plan to emerge from protection, presented to a Rio court Feb.
 Asset Review Ghizzoni is targeting 2 billion euros of net income in 2014 as Italy begins to emerge from its longest recession in decades.
 Those that fail will need to raise capital, seek mergers or be wound down.
 While Youku hasn’t had any merger talks, the industry is at a stage where partnerships are being considered, Koo said.
 Paul Dabbar, managing director of global mergers and acquisitions at JPMorgan Chase & Co, Philadelphia’s broker on the sale of its gas works, said publicly traded utilities are interested in municipal systems offering stable, regulated cash payments.
 While Youku hasn’t had any merger talks, the industry is at a stage where partnerships are being considered, Chief Executive Officer Victor Koo said.
 Doing so will let Mitsubishi UFJ lend out UnionBanCal deposits, something it couldn’t do before the merger, according to the Japanese firm.
 Detective Hilton Botha, who also was at the scene, quit the police in March last year after being dropped as lead investigator when it emerged that he was facing seven charges of attempted murder for allegedly firing at a minibus in 2011.
 Spanish rival eDreams Odigeo, Europe’s largest online travel agency formed from the merger of three companies, plans to raise about 350 million euros in an initial public offering and could be valued at about 15 billion euros, people with knowledge of the situation said earlier this month.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA tumbled in Sao Paulo trading by the most since October after Brazil’s securities regulator sided with majority shareholders in a dispute over a planned merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Controlling shareholders won a victory as regulator CVM ruled last night that they’ll be allowed to vote tomorrow on a capital increase of as much as 141 billion reais ($61 billion) and the valuation of assets involved in the merger.
 The merger is “a transaction that many perceived as not only being dilutive, but one in which the company failed to provide any details,” said Walter Piecyk, an analyst with BTIG LLC, in a telephone interview from New York.
 Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava is pushing for the merger to help the phone carrier compete with America Movil SAB and Telefonica SA in Brazil.
 Previ Backing The merger won the backing of Brazil’s largest pension fund, known as Previ, which said the transaction will be worth the share dilution that investors will suffer.
 and Institutional Shareholder Services Inc, agreed that the merger would improve Oi’s corporate governance.
 Tiziana, which is working on a therapy that suppresses breast-cancer growth, is planning a reverse merger with another UK.
 Thompson, mergers and acquisitions; Stephen M.
 “There will be new products that emerge because people need retirement security and that will be our focus” Great-West reported C$326 billion ($29 billion) of insurance and annuity sales in the UK.
 ANA won more than double the amount of new international slot pairs as JAL from Asia’s second-largest air hub, helping make up for tax breaks for the rival which emerged from bankruptcy in March 2011.
 Japan Airlines, the nation’s second-largest carrier, emerged from bankruptcy after cutting about a third of its staff, grounding 103 planes and reducing its flight network.
 To boost its weakening currency and defend against outflows, Turkey more than doubled its one-week repo rate to 10 percent in an emergency meeting on Jan.
 Wrangler Hamm, 29, began trapping four years ago to supplement his day job as an emergency room nurse.
 “If we turn into a closed country, we will be poorer and have higher unemployment” The true impact of the debate on voters’ opinions will take time to emerge, said Andrew Hawkins, the chairman of polling company ComRes Ltd.
 Eskom declared its most recent emergency on Feb.
 “It is anticipated that the emergency will continue until after the evening peak tonight,” he said.
 “Eskom has basically no emergency capacity, which means it cannot absorb any hits on random events,” Peter Attard Montalto, a London-based emerging-markets economist at Nomura International Plc, said in a text message.
 Rusal is seeking to merge the remainder due on the $475 billion loan with a separate $400 million credit, according to the statement.
 Before joining Goldman, Greenwald focused on mergers and acquisitions and private-equity transactions at Fried Frank.
 After selling units including its photographic-film business, Rochester, New York-based Kodak emerged from bankruptcy last year as a smaller company making equipment for commercial printing and packaging.
 Since the company emerged from bankruptcy in September, the shares have risen 37 percent.
 Apollo and Guggenheim Partners LLC are among investors increasing bets on retirement products via mergers and acquisitions.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Credit Agricole SA, France’s third-largest bank, is targeting at least 4 billion euros ($55 billion) of annual net income by 2016, above analysts’ estimates, as its main European markets emerge from recession.
 The analysts said the company is making progress in its push to maintain market share of its best-selling drug Copaxone while a boom in mergers and acquisitions in the industry yields deals of as much as $21 billion.
 A wave of mergers and acquisitions among generic drug companies has also triggered a rally in Teva’s shares, according to Jason Kolbert, an analyst at Maxim Group LLC.
 The indexing industry has seen recent mergers.
 Reaching that goal will require a mix of mergers and acquisitions, and internal improvements, and an equal weighting between those two drivers is a “reasonable” assumption, the executive said.
 Catalunya Banc, NCG Banco and Bankia, lenders created through the mergers of former savings banks, sold 98 billion euros of loss-absorbing securities to retail investors mostly after the credit crisis left them shut out of wholesale debt markets.
 Ballard, which got 11 percent of its revenue last year through its Plug relationship, will benefit from efforts to increase the reliability of mobile phone systems in the wake of Hurricane Sandy and other emergencies that leave consumers without power, Osborne said.
 Bill Nowling, a spokesman for Detroit emergency financial manager Kevyn Orr, said this isn’t the first time Syncora has tried to put off a court showdown over the swaps.
 $120 Million For emergency vehicles, Detroit said it would spend $362 million on the police department and $285 million on the fire department if it receives the $120 million loan.
 A more than doubling of the central bank’s one-week repo rate following an emergency meeting Jan.
 Bitcoin emerged from source code written by an anonymous developer or group of developers using the name Satoshi Nakamoto in 2009, and attracted a following motivated in part by the ability to escape the strictures of traditional currency, notably government control.
 The lender ranks third in advising on North American mergers and acquisitions this year, behind Morgan Stanley and JPMorgan Chase & Co, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Seventy Seven would emerge as one of the smaller players in the services market.
 Richmond, Virginia-based James River filed for Chapter 11 reorganization in April 2003 and emerged from bankruptcy a little more than one year later.
 Peladeau’s emergence as a backer of independence has dominated much of the election news coverage, with his candidacy adding some economic heft to Marois’s campaign.
 ambulance service operator and provider of emergency room doctors.
 Rural/Metro shareholders sued over the buyout, claiming the company’s board accepted a lowball offer from Warburg after getting advice from conflicted RBC bankers, who botched the effort to shop around the emergency services company to the highest bidder.
 RBC’s bankers used their efforts in the Rural/Metro sale to persuade Clayton Dubilier & Rice in 2011 to allow the bank to provide $10 million in financing as part of the $32 billion acquisition of Emergency Medical Services Corp, investors’ lawyers said in court filings.
 Former Rural/Metro investors allege RBC’s drive for fees prompted the bankers to mislead the company’s board about the emergency services firm’s valuation to make Warburg’s offer look better.
 There is also a $25 million bonus assuming that Time Warner Cable’s performance remains on target through the merger’s completion.
 The official said no smoking gun has emerged thus far, though the FBI’s work won’t be complete for another few days or a week.
 Thailand’s baht rose to a three-month high after the Cabinet approved lifting the state of emergency tomorrow, while China’s yuan had the biggest three-day drop since 2007.
 Thailand’s baht rose for a fourth day as Deputy Prime Minister Yukol Limlamthong said the emergency decree, which was imposed on Jan.
 Interest in mergers continues, with Japanese billionaire Masayoshi Son, chairman of Tokyo-based SoftBank Corp, considering a purchase of fourth-largest US.
 The agency needed an emergency infusion of funds in January just to keep its doors open, four people with familiar with the matter said at the time.
 3 legal adviser to banks handling merger deals, were charged with a “blatant” $200 million fraud that spurred the largest law firm bankruptcy in history.
 Goodman, 56, is one of two people who pleaded guilty to hacking phones in 2006 when the allegations first emerged at News Corp.
 The “100” series patents, which also apply to methods helping to place emergency calls, are the central piece of its portfolio.
 Both figures exclude potentials for cost savings and additional revenue from a merger.
 Iliad, which Niel said tried to buy SFR itself in 2012, is also open to a merger with Bouygues Telecom should Vivendi choose Altice’s bid, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Vivendi’s Timetable A successful combination between Bouygues and SFR could encourage other European mobile operators to attempt mergers.
 Moelis ranked 11th among merger advisers in the 2013, its highest ever position, after advising companies such as HJ Heinz Co.
 Staff Costs Moelis is seeking to raise funds as mergers and acquisitions activity had its strongest start to the year since before the global financial crisis.
 Telefonica’s separate plan to merge its German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus is another tie-up that’s testing how far regulators are willing to allow consolidation in the telecommunications industry.
 Businesses that might have opted for a merger or acquisition are finding they are better off taking the IPO route, according to Doron Averbuch, managing director at Credit Suisse and head of its Israel office.
 The merger reduced its tax rate by about 10 percentage points, Royal Bank of Canada said last month, freeing up cash for more acquisitions.
 “I have been privileged to have had the opportunity to be part of the exciting emergence of TMX Group as Canada’s national exchange group and a partner of companies the world over” Before joining TMX in 2008, Kloet was chief operating officer at brokerage Fimat USA LLC and its successor, Newedge USA LLC.
 of Atlanta are implementing an industry-backed plan to make equipment such as back-up generators available to plants during an emergency.
 A slumping PC market and the emergence of advanced hacking threats also has crimped demand for traditional antivirus software like Symantec’s.
 The official said no smoking gun has emerged thus far, though the FBI’s work won’t be completed for another few days or a week.
 The billionaire’s offer is backed by 11 billion euros ($15 billion) of bonds and leveraged loans to be raised by a merged SFR and Numericable SA, while Drahi’s Altice SA will issue 3 billion euros of junior debt, according to two people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the deal is private.
 Demand in China is starting to emerge from industries including construction and power, and some fabricators are considering buying more copper due to increased orders and lower prices, according to a survey by Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Malone has pushed for mergers in the cable industry, arguing that companies can gain greater leverage in negotiations with TV networks and more purchasing power for expenses such as marketing.
 Merger Talks While Youku hasn’t had any merger talks, the industry is at a stage where partnerships are being considered, CEO Koo said.
 As part of the strategic review, Banca IMI, which focuses on Italian customers, is seeking to be a market leader in underwriting securities sales, advising on mergers and project and structured finance, the company said.
 The Jerry Zucker Revocable Trust, which controls about 13 percent of Fyffes, also has committed to backing the merger.
 Portugal Competitors Portugal’s biggest cable-TV provider, Zon Multimedia, last year merged with the country’s smallest mobile-phone operator, Optimus, to compete against Portugal Telecom SGPS SA and Vodafone for cable-TV, Internet and telephone clients.
 Emergency Meeting The People’s Bank of China said in a statement it didn’t participate in an “emergency meeting” yesterday on Zhejiang Xingrun.
 Fiat bought full control of Chrysler in January as part of Marchionne’s strategy to merge the two regional players into a manufacturer with the scale to challenge the likes of General Motors Co.
 The CEO is scheduled to publish a business plan May 6 providing details on new models and financing once the merger with Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler is completed later this year.
 Airport firefighters will maintain an emergency service, the union has said, preventing a shutdown of the hub.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- The World Water Council is warning Sao Paulo, Brazil’s biggest city, to take emergency measures to conserve water as the region reels from a record drought or risk supply shortages during the World Cup.
 “We’re fairly indifferent between the two” The price of gas sold from seaside export terminals has emerged as a critical issue as the industry races to capture markets in Asia where gas sells for five times more than in North America.
 Anadarko expects to see first production from the Mozambique fields in 2018, and Walker has said the country will emerge as the world’s third-largest natural gas producer.
 This merger created the largest pension fund in the US, with about $30 billion in assets, the Economist magazine reported in 1981.
 The Dish chairman’s statements about why he dropped the LightSquared spectrum bid came as Bloomberg News, citing several people with knowledge of the matter, reported that he recently contacted DirecTV Chief Executive Officer Mike White to discuss a merger of their two satellite-television companies.
 Phone company Oi SA sank the most since October after securities regulators sided with controlling shareholders in a dispute over a planned merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Controlling shareholders will be allowed to vote on a capital increase and the valuation of assets in the merger with Portugal Telecom.
 The case is also a precursor of future battles over telecommunications mergers elsewhere as European phone companies look to consolidate to cope with rising network costs and slow growth.
 The Competition Authority, which would have to sign off on a merger, is more concerned about preserving the broadest range of consumer choice in the French mobile market, the people familiar with the talks said.
 In its discussions with regulators, Bouygues will argue that a reduction to three operators in the French market from four is different from that in Germany, where European Union regulators are challenging the merger of Telefonica SA and Royal KPN NV’s local units, the people said.
 Even so, investors have cheered the prospect of a merger in the past.
 By picking Altice, which is seeking to merge SFR with its cable provider Numericable SA, Vivendi is choosing the option that is more likely to pass antitrust hurdles because it keeps the number of French wireless carriers at four.
 State Pressure Vivendi’s merger plans could create an “unbalanced competitive position” on networks and content distribution that calls for remedies, Orange SA, France’s largest phone company, said in a statement.
 Even if the merger sparks competition with cable, the elimination of one of four major wireless carriers won’t be overlooked by antitrust regulators, said Maurice Stucke, a law professor at the University of Tennessee.
 “He has to overcome the presumption that this merger is anticompetitive,” said Stucke, a former Justice Department lawyer.
 “You can’t argue we should allow this market to be more concentrated in order to better compete in a separate market” Son didn’t mention a possible merger during his remarks.
 “Yes we can” Son’s presentation “was very well crafted for a Washington audience, but it won’t be easy to move regulators off their clear skepticism of a merger” of Sprint and T-Mobile, Paul Gallant, Washington-based managing director for Guggenheim Securities, said in an interview.
 “Before we start treating wireline and wireless as competitors and allowing various mergers to skate through as a consequence, I want to see it in the real world,” Bergmayer said.
 European Union companies sold 152 billion euros ($210 billion) in goods and services to Russia in 2012, up 14 percent from the previous year, European Commission data show, highlighting the importance of a neighboring export market as their domestic economies emerge from a three-year recession.
 Beating Germany For Russian companies, one potential solution is a merger with a rival based in Europe or the US, which offers a base of foreign shareholders and employees.
 VimpelCom Ltd, the wireless carrier controlled by Russian billionaire Mikhail Fridman, in 2010 merged with Weather Investments SpA, a holding company controlled by Egyptian tycoon Naguib Sawiris.
 Morgan Stanley was the sole adviser in the $15 billion state-backed merger of two aluminum producers in the United Arab Emirates last year.
 The bank also had an advisory role on merger between Abu Dhabi’s Aldar Properties PJSC and Sorouh Real Estate early in January 2013.
 The firm weighed a series of merger options between Irish lenders as well as the creation of a nationalized bank to wind down toxic commercial real estate loans.
 While he projects an image of socialist prosperity in the North, the UN report found evidence of “extermination, murder, enslavement, torture, imprisonment, rape, forced abortions and other sexual violence” Bond Outlook “It’s inevitable that social conflict will emerge soon after reuniting of the two Koreas,” Hong said by phone on March 21.
 The cost of a merger may total as much as $591 billion over a decade if it occurred in 2020, estimates from South Korea’s finance ministry show.
 “It is not unthinkable that South Korea could grow significantly larger in a single leap if a unified Korea emerges in coming years,” Sharma, who identified the South as one of the world’s “Breakout Nations” in his 2012 book of the same title, said in an e-mail interview on March 21.
 Hostile bids that are successful can help boost mergers and acquisitions in the sector more broadly, said Isser Elishis, managing partner and chief investment officer at Waterton, a Toronto-based private equity firm that invests in precious metals assets and companies.
 and to support other non-bank institutions through emergency lending programs.
 Fed officials have also pledged greater scrutiny on mergers by large banks, while urging banks to increase capital buffers through annual stress tests that pose catastrophic economic scenarios.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- KCG Holdings Inc, the firm created when Getco LLC merged with Knight Capital Group Inc, hired Anthony Abenante as a senior adviser to its global execution services business.
 KCG was created after last July’s merger between Chicago high-frequency trading firm Getco and Jersey City, New Jersey-based Knight, which specialized in market-making for individual investor orders sent by retail brokers.
 Marois’ best bet may be to capitalize on any groundswell of animosity that may emerge outside the province if Quebeckers re-elect separatists, said Bachand, a former lawmaker from Quebec who now works at Earnscliffe Strategy Group in Ottawa.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Almost 40 years after Ebola emerged from the jungles of Africa as one of the world’s most lethal diseases, scientists are beginning to close in on treatments that may be able to stop the virus.
 “There are already candidate cocktails that can be used in an emergency,” said Erica Ollmann Saphire, a professor at the Scripps Research Institute in La Jolla, California, who’s leading a consortium of 15 public and private institutions to develop treatments to fight the virus.
 “It’s a really exciting time to be working on Ebola” Regulatory Steps The WHO has not requested emergency use of any experimental treatments that have not been through the necessary clinical tests, said Tarik Jasarevic, a spokesman for the Geneva-based agency.
 Trials showing the drugs are safe, plus ethical and regulatory clearance from the health ministries of affected countries, and regulatory clearance from the country where the drug is made, would be needed before any experimental treatments could be used in an emergency situation, said David Heymann, a professor of infectious disease epidemiology at the London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine who has worked on Ebola since the first outbreak in 1976.
 It said “the agency is concerned that this decision could impact the safe operation of the national airspace system and the safety of people and property on the ground” No Rules The agency may also have the power to issue emergency regulations restricting commercial uses of small unmanned aircraft if it determines that a flood of unregulated drone flights poses a safety risk.
 “They have good brands, they’re very well-known but that would be a very large purchase price,” Scott Rostan, founder of New York-based Training The Street, which teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions, said in a phone interview.
 “The market will now be looking for a merger between Iliad and Bouygues Telecom” Representatives for Bouygues and Iliad, both based in Paris, declined to comment.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- The world’s top investment banks may see combined revenue from trading, underwriting and advising on mergers drop 11 percent in the first quarter as clients cut back on activity, JPMorgan Cazenove analysts said.
 Sales from trading stocks are on course for a 6 percent decline in the quarter while revenue from advising on mergers and underwriting securities sales may rise 1 percent, the analysts said.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Bets against the share prices of fuel-cell manufacturers are climbing as questions emerge about the prospects for profits at some of the Nasdaq’s best performers this year.
 Emergency services contribute about 75 percent of the business’s 582 million euros of annual revenue, with Spain and Italy the biggest markets and few rival helicopter operators of significant scale in the sector, the CEO said.
 Even if they don’t opt for a service with a cellular backup plan, users can make 911 emergency calls on a mobile-phone network.
 Justice Department lawsuit opposing its merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 9 merger to shed the gates, and the Justice Department must approve the buyers.
 Under rules for a so-called prepackaged bankruptcies such as the one Dolan proposes, a company can reorganize and emerge quicker than normal, so long as it wins enough support from creditors.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Kenneth Moelis is set to harvest the rewards of setting up his own business as his merger advisory firm heads toward an initial public offering.
 Moelis, 55, and his partners are planning to cash in as peers have done, capitalizing on the company’s growth and a rebound in the pace of mergers and acquisitions worldwide.
 “He’s like a great football coach -- he makes you want to work hard and win for him” Moelis ranked 11th among merger advisers in 2013, its highest-ever position, after advising firms such as HJ Heinz Co.
 That’s why Urban, 71, declared a financial emergency three months into budget year.
 Fried Frank also represented Media General in last year’s merger with New Young Broadcasting Holding Co.
 The Weil team was led by corporate/mergers and acquisitions partners Glenn West and James Griffin.
 “Bank of Ireland has emerged from the balance sheet assessment with its capital ratios intact,” said Stephen Lyons, an analyst with Dublin-based securities firm Davy, adding that the bank is still factoring in a “conservative” 55 percent peak-to-trough fall in house prices in its earnings, even as values rose last year.
 Vivendi, which had planned to spin off SFR and distribute stock in France’s second-largest wireless carrier to shareholders, will have to evaluate whether any proceeds would compensate for the political and antitrust risks of clinching a merger agreement with either billionaire.
 Such a merger would likely attract intense regulatory scrutiny, people familiar with the situation said.
 Numericable’s proposed merger with SFR would probably avoid a lengthy antitrust challenge because it would involve a merger of landline with wireless assets, people familiar with the matter have said.
 New regulations may have begun to slow down growth in the economy starting from last month” Forecasts for Turkey’s economic growth have been downgraded since December, when news emerged of an investigation into alleged government corruption.
 The Turkish central bank raised rates after an emergency meeting Jan.
 John Fund and represented by David Boies, contend that from 1999 to 2001 Halliburton falsified earnings reports, played down estimated asbestos liability and overstated the benefits of a merger.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Telekom AG’s Timotheus Hoettges, who helped engineer the merger of its T-Mobile US Inc.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Investors’ confidence in companies making acquisitions is emboldening management to execute deals, spurring a mergers and acquisitions boom, according to Michael Carr, co-head of Americas M&A at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 cable deal since Comcast’s $72 billion merger with AT&T Broadband in 2001, helped propel Morgan Stanley and JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Bankers earned about $143 million on that merger, the third-largest payday for any deal since 2009, according to New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Japan Display Inc, a merger of three struggling screen-makers that’s supported by a government-backed fund, posted the worst debut of any Asia-Pacific initial public offering worth at least $1 billion since 2008.
 “Japan Display is the merger of three companies that have been bleeding red ink and haven’t undergone any drastic business model changes,” said Makoto Kikuchi, Tokyo-based chief executive officer for Myojo Asset Management Co.
 “Today’s IPO offered a good example that it will end up in failure if the government simply force companies to merge” The company is taking the share price reaction seriously, President Shuichi Otsuka told reporters in Tokyo today.
 Controlling CEOs tend to ignore such short-term moves, in part because they are less worried about losing their jobs, said Paul Parker, Barclays Plc global head of mergers and acquisitions.
 ‘Strong Personality’ Ergen, 61, is sniffing around another possible multibillion-dollar deal, having contacted DirecTV Chief Executive Officer Mike White to discuss a merger of the two satellite-television companies, people with knowledge of the matter said March 26.
 Goodman is one of two people who pleaded guilty to hacking phones in 2006 when the allegations first emerged at News Corp.
 The two films emerged as big winners at the 86th Academy Awards, broadcast last night in a live ABC telecast from the Dolby Theatre in Los Angeles.
 It’s the busiest start to the year for mergers and acquisitions in Europe since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Loan financings for mergers and acquisitions by investment-grade companies in the region shrank to just $22 billion in 2013, less than a 10th of the figure at the market’s 2007 peak, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP’s $9 billion deal to merge Safeway Inc.
 The operator of phone carriers from Israel to Portugal can issue new shares starting 45 days after the flotation if the proceeds are used to finance a merger or acquisition, according to regulatory filings.
 Bouygues last week brought in a government-controlled fund and sweetened its cash offer to 1315 billion euros ($182 billion), plus a 215 percent stake in the entity created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
 The unions are seeking today to get Vivendi, Drahi and Bouygues to agree not to cut jobs for at least 48 months after a merger, according to a draft of a proposal union officials showed to reporters in Paris.
 The company could be a candidate for a merger or acquisition “with an attractive product, pipeline and technology,” said Butt, the analyst, who didn’t mention any potential suitors by name.
 They rebounded from a record low of 246 euros in April after the EU adopted last month an emergency market fix known as backloading, which will withhold 900 million allowances at auctions between 2014 and 2016 and return them to the market in 2019-2020.
 Entwistle, 51, will become executive chairman, taking over from Brian Canfield, who announced today that he’s retiring after 58 years with Telus and BC Telecom, which merged with Telus.
 from 2004 to 2011 via reverse mergers.
 Reverse Merger AgFeed did a reverse merger in 2006 and listed on Nasdaq the next year, raising more than $100 million in the US.
 and its allies are beginning to emerge from the deep freeze that began when the self-proclaimed Iranian students overrun the embassy and took the hostages.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA reversed an earlier decline, joining a rally for Brazilian equities, after shareholders approved a capital increase of as much as 141 billion reais ($61 billion) to cement a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava is pushing for the merger to help the phone carrier compete with America Movil SAB and Telefonica SA in Brazil.
 Bouygues yesterday boosted the cash portion of its offer by 800 million euros ($11 billion) to 113 billion euros and promised Vivendi a smaller stake -- 43 percent instead of 46 percent -- in a merged SFR and Bouygues Telecom.
 Senate panel approved a bill on emergency funding for the country that would widen the scope of sanctions to include any Russian involved in “significant” corruption.
 He and a partner owned half of RosUkrEnergo, which was founded in 2004 and emerged as Ukraine’s sole gas importer in 2006 to 2009, between price disputes with Russia that led to supply halts and shortages across Europe.
 said it will liquidate, marking the end of a four-year decline that started when banker Eric Gleacher sold his merger-advisory firm to a bond brokerage.
 The board decided to liquidate its assets after attempts to find a merger partner or sell the defunct brokerage failed, Chairman Mark Patterson, the private-equity executive who ousted Gleacher’s former chief executive officer, Thomas Hughes, said in the statement.
 Competitors include Mountain View, California-based Elance Inc, which announced a merger with oDesk Corp.
 “The forest region where Unicef delivered the emergency assistance on Saturday is located along the border with Sierra Leone and Liberia with many people doing business and moving between the three countries,” said Laurent Duvillier, a Unicef spokesman, in an e-mail yesterday.
 “The central bank decision is having a limited impact” Russia’s central bank failed to stem the ruble’s slump since its emergency rate move this month, with the currency losing 23 percent against the dollar in March, more than any peer in emerging markets after Chile’s peso, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In January, the National Computer Network Emergency Response Center in China said that month’s outage was caused by a cyber-attack, according to a statement on its website.
 “Transparency and accountability will lead to stronger Ecobank governance, and will enable the institution to capitalize on its fundamental strengths” New Rules Under the new articles of association approved at yesterday’s meeting, Ecobank shareholders agreed that the bank shall not undertake any acquisition, merger or disposal of the company’s assets whose value is equal to or above 20 percent of the book value of the lender without the approval of a majority of investors present in a general meeting.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- German stocks rose for a second day as investors weighed Crimea’s vote to leave Ukraine and join Russia, while RWE AG and Allianz SE climbed amid mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Elpida was formed through the 1999 merger of NEC Corp’s and Hitachi’s memory businesses.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Certain patients who showed up at Mount Sinai Hospital’s emergency room on Sunday mornings stood out, and not because they were cases of gruesome trauma or exotic illness.
 The New York hospital’s cath lab has regularly scheduled such emergencies-by-appointment, according to three doctors and another medical professional, all of whom said they had direct knowledge of the practice.
 The reports of scheduled ER visits raised a concern internally that some cardiologists might be using the emergency department to get the costs of uninsured patients’ procedures covered, according to hospital correspondence.
 In some cases, the government’s Medicaid program and private insurers will pay for procedures done via an emergency-room visit that wouldn’t be covered otherwise.
 A Mount Sinai spokesman didn’t address whether the hospital has routed cath-lab patients through the emergency room.
 Mount Sinai’s cath lab sits atop the competitive New York market after more than doubling its annual number of stent-related procedures during the 2000s -- just as the use of cardiac stents in non-emergency cases became one of the most contentious issues in cardiology.
 Emergency Coverage Allegations that pre-scheduled cath-lab patients showed up at the ER may signal efforts to get unwarranted payments from health insurers or federal coverage programs for patients who wouldn’t be covered otherwise, said James Sheehan, chief of the charities unit for the New York state attorney general’s office.
 In emergency situations, patients cannot be turned away just because they can’t pay for care, according to federal and New York state laws.
 New York’s Medicaid system spends about $500 million a year on emergency procedures for uninsured patients.
 After Andy Jagoda, Mount Sinai’s emergency-department chief, heard in 2012 that cardiologists were sending patients through the emergency ward with previously scheduled cath-lab appointments, he indicated that he had brought the matter up with the hospital’s administration and would do so again.
 It also said it removed a financing contingency from an earlier merger agreement sent to Amcol’s board.
 “The emergence of Internet financing is inevitable in China because it serves the grassroots better, but whoever is engaging in financial services, no matter online or off-line, must comply with regulations.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks advanced, following their biggest weekly drop since January, as companies from RWE AG to Vodafone Group Plc rose amid renewed merger-and-acquisition activity.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- M&T Bank Corp, the lender struggling to complete its merger with Hudson City Bancorp Inc, cut Chief Executive Officer Robert Wilmers’s pay by 23 percent last year as the stock lagged.
 M&T’s stock has trailed peers as the bank waits for regulators to approve its takeover of Paramus, New Jersey-based Hudson City, the industry’s biggest and longest pending merger.
 The measure was designed as a permanent mechanism to follow the EU emergency market fix known as backloading, which will withhold 900 million allowances at auctions between 2014 and 2016 and return them to the market in 2019-2020.
 Goldman Sachs was also a shareholder of Direct Edge Holdings LLC, which merged this year with Bats Global Markets Inc.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Charlie Ergen, who scrapped plans 11 years ago to merge his Dish satellite business with DirecTV because of regulatory concerns, is at it again.
 preparing for a $45 billion merger.
 At the same time, he has to convince regulators that a satellite merger wouldn’t harm competition.
 Government regulators forced Ergen to scrap the merger in late 2002.
 Comcast and Time Warner Cable operate in different cities and don’t overlap, potentially making their merger more palatable to regulators than a Dish-DirecTV deal that would eliminate a pay-TV option for consumers.
 The cable merger will give the combined company greater leverage in negotiations to carry programming from cable networks, reducing expenses.
 Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter of last year, supporting Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho’s attempts to regain full access to debt markets once the country’s 78 billion-euro ($108 billion) bailout program ends in May.
 “In five to 10 years the Internet will be merged in the physical world,” he said.
 Representative Billy Tauzin, who was Republican chairman of the Energy and Commerce Committee when he and Upton led the Firestone tire investigation, said Upton was a tough fact-finder in 2000 and let the information that emerged guide the committee toward a new law.
 Baer previously represented NBC Universal as a lawyer in private practice at law firm Arnold & Porter LLP when Comcast merged with the network in 2011, according to court documents.
 Get AS, which competes with larger Telenor ASA’s Canal Digital unit, is the latest cable company to join a flurry of mergers and acquisitions as demand for bundled broadband, pay-TV and wireless services increases.
 The company, formed from the merger of Grupo Martinsa and Fadesa Inmobiliaria SA in 2007, blamed a slow recovery in Spain’s real estate market for the missed debt payment in a Jan.
 The euro-area’s fourth-biggest economy emerged from the slump in the third quarter of 2013, allowing it to sell bonds at record-low yields and encouraging foreign investors such as Bill Gates to invest in Spanish companies.
 “What happened here was that during the crisis, banks very conservatively provisioned their loans, even too conservatively, and now it’s emerged that parts of those provisions still work.
 “We will work to realize our export potential from the UK, expanding into Europe and emergent markets” Japan’s trainmakers are seeking orders abroad as demand for new railroads shrinks at home, where the population is falling.
 Copycat Competition World Trade Organization rules allow compulsory licenses to improve access in the case of national emergencies.
 Greenhill expands in merger advice.
 The Milan office of K&L Gates LLP added Arturo Meglio as a partner in the corporate/mergers and acquisitions practice.
March 15 (Bloomberg) -- Ireland’s 10-year securities rose for a ninth week as the nation auctioned its first bonds since 2010, marking its successful emergence from bailout measures and adding to signs the euro area’s financial woes are abating.
 Bitcoin, the most popular digital currency, emerged from a 2008 paper written by a programmer or group of programmers under the name Satoshi Nakamoto.
 Steven Metro, 40, the managing clerk at Simpson Thacher in New York, was accused of stealing confidential information on mergers, acquisitions and tender offers and tipping a middleman who passed it to Vladimir Eydelman, 42.
 Basile, Weil, Gotshal & Manges LLP’s former Boston office managing partner, joined Foley Hoag LLP as a partner and co-chairman of its mergers and acquisitions practice.
 “The variety and complexity of the transactions he has led span every element of mergers, acquisitions and investment counseling,” Foley Hoag co-managing partner William R.
 Haire’s practice focuses on mergers and acquisitions.
 Italy is riding a swell of investor confidence as it emerges from the deepest recession since World War II.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA’s shareholders should vote in favor of the Brazilian phone carrier’s merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, advisory firm Glass Lewis & Co.
 While Oi could disclose more helpful information to shareholders, such as how its board determined the merger was its best option, the transaction appears to be reasonable, Glass Lewis said in a document obtained by Bloomberg News.
 Vivendi will have to evaluate whether any proceeds would compensate for the political and antitrust risks of clinching a merger agreement with either billionaire.
 A merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom would create a carrier with more than 21 million contract customers, catching up with Orange SA, and will probably attract intense regulatory scrutiny, people familiar with the situation have said.
 26, joining calls by other French carriers to the government and the competition watchdog to let mergers and acquisitions through.
 Both offers would have to go through the French competition watchdog before being implemented, though Numericable’s proposed merger with SFR would probably avoid a lengthy antitrust challenge because it would involve a combination of landline with wireless assets, people familiar with the matter have said.
 For-profit college operator Anhanguera Educacional Participacoes SA declined on speculation Brazil’s antitrust regulator won’t allow its merger with Kroton Educacional SA to go forward.
 Veja magazine reported that chances for the Kroton-Anhanguera merger to succeed are shrinking after Brazil’s antitrust regulator suggested that the companies sell some distance-learning schools so that the deal can be approved.
 Recchi worked at General Electric for more than a decade in finance, mergers and acquisitions, and strategy.
 The company is seeking a valuation of about $3 billion, about twice as much as rival KCG Holdings Inc, which was created last year in the merger of Knight and Getco LLC, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 If people are going to get engaged, they’re going to make that trip to the store” Tiffany emerged relatively unscathed from a Christmas season that saw companies from Best Buy Co.
 The Weil team includes partners Morgan Bale and Danek Freeman, banking and finance; Matthew Bloch, capital markets; Raymond Gietz, mergers and acquisitions; William Horton, tax; and Annemargaret Connolly, environmental.
 Patton Boggs, which has about 370 lawyers and is known for its lobbying practice, and Squire Sanders, a 1,300-lawyer firm with broad international reach, announced their merger discussions last month in a joint statement saying the talks were in the early stages.
 Patton Boggs, which announced in December that merger talks were called off with another firm, Locke Lord Bissell & Liddell LLP, has been struggling financially.
Oleo & Gas Participacoes SA (OGXP3), EikeBatista’s oil unit, received the first payment from a $215million creditor funding plan as the Brazilian producer seeks toemerge from bankruptcy protection.
 7 while parked at Boston’s airport and forced an emergency landing by an ANA Holdings jet in Japan nine days later.
 Investigators are looking at whether faulty wiring on an emergency locator transmitter caused the blaze.
 completed a merger today with vitamin maker Royal DSM NV’s drug business, generating about a 200 percent gain on its equity investment, Miles said in a telephone interview.
 when the clinical researcher was recapitalized and merged with a competitor.
 In the transaction completed yesterday, JLL merged Newtown, Pennsylvania-based BioClinica and CCBR-Synarc, a Newark, California-based clinical services provider backed by Water Street Healthcare Partners LLC, a Chicago-based private-equity investor.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Jan Brand, the founder of staffing company Brunel International NV, which specializes in finding workers jobs in the energy industry, emerged as a billionaire after the company closed at a record Tuesday.
 ThyssenKrupp was formed in 1999 from the merger of Thyssen AG and Fried.
 Comcast could increase its repurchases by that same amount if Time Warner Cable shareholders vote to approve the merger, Angelakis said.
 Charter Communications Inc, which was outbid by Comcast, has asked Time Warner Cable shareholders to vote against the merger.
 Comcast may boost its buybacks even further after the merger by using the proceeds of the planned sale of cable systems serving 3 million subscribers, Angelakis said.
 Comcast Chief Executive Officer Brian Roberts said last month that he was prepared to divest subscribers as part of the takeover to keep the merged company’s customers below 30 percent of the total US.
 cable operator by subscribers, trailing the merged Comcast-Time Warner Cable, Cox Communications Inc.
 Bouygues, seeking to merge SFR with its wireless unit, yesterday increased the cash portion of its offer with the financial backing of a French government-controlled fund.
 Altice, which wants to unite SFR with its cable unit Numericable Group, is open to mergers in the wireless industry after the planned combination is completed, the person said.
 Bouygues’s revised proposal includes 1315 billion euros ($181 billion) in cash -- an increase of 185 billion euros -- and a 215 percent stake in the entity created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
 Itau Unibanco Holding SA slipped as a minority shareholder of Corpbanca SA sought to block a merger deal between the lenders.
 was said to have contacted the company about a merger.
 Although companies have emerged as global powerhouses -- think Samsung Electronics Co.
 Any changes should be limited to brokers affiliated with banks with access to the Federal Reserve’s emergency-lending window, he said.
 Anhanguera Educacional Participacoes SA fell 16 percent to 1251 reais after Kroton investor relations officer Carlos Lazar said the merger between the two companies may not go through depending on the restrictions that antitrust regulators may impose.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP agreed last week to merge Safeway with its Albertsons chain in a $40-a-share bid of cash, stock and asset sales.
 In one instance, a government lawyer prepared Rubin to testify in a criminal case just outside the Los Angeles hospital room where his wife was being treated for a medical emergency.
 “Countries emerged from the financial crisis with an even bigger problem: Many banks were even larger than before and so were the implicit government guarantees,” IMF economists wrote.
 local time yesterday after the pilot declared an emergency, Anthony Black, a Delta spokesman, said in an interview today.
 Pilots attempting emergency water landings typically deploy flaps on the trailing edge of the wings to lower their speed.
 “The city disagrees with the characterizations and legal arguments made by Syncora and other insurer litigants,” Bill Nowling, a spokesman for Detroit’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr, said in an e-mail yesterday.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Borsa Italiana SpA Chairman Massimo Tononi has emerged as a candidate to head Telecom Italia SpA’s board, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Jon Corzine emerged from that episode saying he held a newfound appreciation of family and that it had caused him to rethink his priorities.
 Mitsubishi Electric, based in Tokyo, will also consider mergers and acquisitions to help improve its overseas businesses and do research and development locally, Sakuyama said.
 “We’re closely watching the performance of banks, especially those who have difficulties,” he said, adding that the monetary authority had encouraged lenders to restructure themselves through mergers and acquisitions or partnerships with foreign companies.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable SA and its shareholder Altice SA are preparing an offer valued at about $20 billion to merge with Vivendi SA’s French telecommunications unit SFR, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Vivendi would keep a minority holding in any merged entity, the person said.
 While talks with Numericable are the most advanced, Iliad and Bouygues are trying to derail those negotiations and overcome regulators’ skepticism about mobile mergers, they said.
 Telefonica SA and Royal KPN NV’s proposal to merge their German phone units received a so-called statement of objections from the European Commission last week, signaling the carriers will have to make concessions to win approval.
 Vodafone Deal A merger of SFR with broadband provider Numericable will keep the number of wireless network operators in France to four.
 Son is not planning to make a direct appeal for a merger of Sprint Corp.
 He’s now trying to reframe the argument around the emergence of a new option for Internet in the home, said Jennifer Fritzsche, an analyst with Wells Fargo & Co.
 Broadband Competitor “They would like to position Sprint/T-Mobile, not just as a competitor to AT&T and Verizon, but as a new competitor to the broadband industry if they were allowed to merge,” Piecyk said.
 Recovery prospects have been brightening as the euro area, Sweden’s biggest export market, emerges from its record-long recession.
 In addition to the store opening plans, the retailer expects to merge as many as 100 small stores into neighboring ones.
 That’s not soon enough for Saskatchewan Premier Brad Wall, who called on the federal government to pass an emergency law to clear the backlog on rails controlled by Canadian Pacific and Canadian National.
 DBRS will review its evaluation of the province after the election when the fiscal plan that emerges is clearer, he said.
 China has emerged as a strategic source of financing, lending the OPEC-member more than $40 billion since 2008, not including today’s deal.
March 7 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc, Japan’s largest financial firm by market value, plans to boost its mergers and acquisitions business in Singapore by moving bankers into the unit that makes corporate loans.
 The value of mergers involving companies in the emerging Asia-Pacific region climbed to $422 billion in 2013, the highest in at least five years, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 There will be a clear separation, or firewall, between the mergers advisory and lending departments at Mitsubishi UFJ’s Singapore banking unit, he said.
 EU leaders appeared to draw a red line at an emergency summit on Ukraine on March 6 when they warned that “any further steps” by Russia to “destabilize the situation” would be met with broader sanctions that go to the heart of EU-Russia economic ties.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA investors weighing a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA got opposing recommendations from the two biggest shareholder advisory firms, setting up a showdown in a vote on the deal later this month.
 and Institutional Shareholder Services Inc, the advisory firms, agreed that the merger would improve Oi’s corporate governance.
 Oi has sought the merger, in which it plans to raise at least 7 billion reais ($3 billion) in capital and then pool its assets with Portugal Telecom’s, to gain purchasing power with suppliers and to have more diverse sources of revenue.
 Any changes should be limited to brokers affiliated with banks with access to the Federal Reserve’s emergency-lending window, he said.
 “The law will step up awareness of the role banks play in property trading” Denmark emerged as Scandinavia’s weakest economy after the nation’s housing boom turned to bust in 2008, sending property prices plunging about 20 percent through last year.
 The ruling People’s Democratic Party, in power since Nigeria emerged from military rule in 1999, will face its most serious challenge in polls set for Feb.
March 10 (Bloomberg) -- Bouygues SA, seeking to preempt antitrust concerns over its proposed wireless merger with Vivendi SA’s SFR, is in talks to sell spectrum and its network to Iliad SA for as much as 18 billion euros ($25 billion).
 Both figures exclude synergies from a merger.
 Niel’s Bet Iliad is also open to a looking at Bouygues as a merger target in the event Vivendi chooses to combine SFR with Altice, according to a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified discussing internal deliberations.
 The case is also a precursor of future battles over telecommunications mergers elsewhere as European phone companies look to consolidate to cope with rising network costs and slow growth.
 The Competition Authority, which must sign off on any merger, is more concerned about preserving the broadest range of consumer choice in the mobile market, the people familiar with the talks said.
 In its discussions with regulators, Bouygues will argue that a reduction to three operators in the French market from four is different from that in Germany, where European Union regulators are challenging the merger of Telefonica SA and Royal KPN NV’s local units, the people said.
 The company, controlled by founder and Chief Executive Officer Vince McMahon through Class B shares with added voting rights, isn’t in merger talks, he said.
 and FermaVir Pharmaceuticals, which merged with Inhibitex Inc.
 European Union foreign ministers will hold an emergency meeting.
 “This essentially throws his short thesis out the window, but it’s unclear if he’s losing money,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone.
 Rusal is seeking to merge the remainder due on the $475billion loan with a separate $400 million credit, according tothe statement.
 Under the exit plan, LightSquared would emerge as a standalone company valued at $77 billion, with more funding to pursue its ambitions with regulators.
 industrial production probably rebounded in February following the biggest drop in nine months, according to a Bloomberg survey, as the world’s largest economy emerged from winter weather that slowed growth.
 War Crimes The LRA emerged in northern Uganda in the 1980s with the aim of imposing rule based on the Bible’s 10 Commandments.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Oleo & Gas Participacoes SA, Eike Batista’s oil unit, received the first payment from a $215 million creditor funding plan as the Brazilian producer seeks to emerge from bankruptcy protection.
 The company was the first large Chinese solar maker to emerge from a two-year slump caused by oversupply.
 Oil Drilling Yesterday, BP also emerged as the most likely winner of its first new leases to drill for crude oil and natural gas in the Gulf of Mexico in two years just a week after the US.
 The Spanish market is showing “positive signs” as the economy emerges from a recession, Colao said.
 Jacobs Holding became a main shareholder in Adecco after late billionaire Klaus Jacobs merged Adia Interim SA with Philippe Foriel-Destezet’s Ecco SA in 1996.
 The city’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr, has been in court-supervised mediation with creditors including bondholders and pension funds to seek an agreement on cuts.
 In 2007, MatlinPatteron’s 2004 fund invested in New York-based bond-trading firm Gleacher, which will liquidate after failing to find a merger partner or sell the brokerage.
 Pension deficits emerged as the 18-month recession that ended in 2009 drove down stocks, trimming the value of investments used to pay benefits.
 Interest in mergers continues, with Japanese billionaire Masayoshi Son, chairman of Tokyo-based SoftBank Corp, considering a purchase of fourth-largest US.
 The BOE cut its benchmark rate to a record-low 05 percent and started its emergency bond-purchase program in March 2009.
 “This essentially throws his short thesis out the window, but it’s unclear if he’s losing money,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone.
 ECB Governing Council member Gaston Reinesch told Germany’s Boersen-Zeitung in an interview published last week that “hard data” suggest that the euro region’s economic recovery “seems to be gaining momentum slowly” Draghi put investors on notice last month for potential stimulus and repeated last week that the ECB remains “alert as to whether any indication on further downside risks to price stability emerge” Testimony Today Over the past five years, the ECB has “continued to take the necessary measures with a view to maintaining price stability in the euro area,” Draghi told lawmakers at the European Parliament in Brussels today.
 The financing was led by Meritech Capital Partners, with participation from investors including Kleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers, Emergence Capital Partners and Mayfield Fund, the Pleasanton, California-based company said in a statement today.
 economy emerge from a weather-related setback.
 lifted its power emergency in South Africa after the first rolling blackouts in six years shut shops and factories and delayed flights in the continent’s biggest economy.
 Eskom, which produces 95 percent of the nation’s electricity, declared an emergency yesterday after heavy rains disrupted its coal supply used to generate more than 80 percent of power.
 “The bottom line in all of this is that we have a vulnerable system and any shock to it can precipitate an emergency,” Chairman Zola Tsotsi said at the same briefing.
 Eskom declares power emergencies only after consulting with the nation’s energy regulator, and rolling blackouts end once the alert is lifted, CEO Brian Dames said.
 Fuel cells could be used in rural communities disconnected from power grids to store energy and by data centers that need an emergency power source, Bhangui said.
 “One can see great expenditures having to be incurred in the next couple of quarters, perhaps, to revive elements of the infrastructure which has fallen behind through this” Downpours in South Africa’s northeastern provinces caused Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd, the state-owned utility that generates 95 percent of the country’s electricity, to declare an emergency and enforce rolling blackouts last week because wet coal affected production at power plants.
 Peltz, who was pushing for Mondelez to merge with PepsiCo Inc, has abandoned that proposal and is expected to push Chief Executive Officer Irene Rosenfeld to deepen cost cuts.
 EU Push Pressure from Tusk and Sikorski drew a February pledge from EU foreign ministers that Ukraine’s association agreement is not the “final goal” EU Enlargement Commissioner Stefan Fule told Die Welt newspaper on March 18 that the bloc should use enlargement as “its strongest instrument” for change in eastern Europe -- a sentiment shared by few governments as group emerges from its worst economic crisis that also fostered the rise of anti-EU political movements.
 Hastings announced his opposition to Comcast Corp’s merger with Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Now scientists are starting to use sophisticated DNA sequencing technology to determine if these “exceptional responders” carry gene variations that can lead to new treatment approaches, better targeted therapies or even the re-emergence of experimental drugs once deemed failures.
 Conoscenti, who focuses on mergers involving US.
 Credit Suisse in December hired McCabe, a pipeline merger specialist, from Morgan Stanley to help run its Americas oil and gas group.
 Under the circumstances, mergers and acquisitions arealso a key driver, according to the note.
 companies using mergers as ways to slash income tax bills by shifting their head office overseas -- often on paper only.
 Those rules only prevent companies from getting the tax benefit of an overseas merger if their existing shareholders still own 80 percent or more of the company’s stock after the deal.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- The pound advanced to a four-year high versus the dollar as prospects for stronger economic growth and a wave of mergers and acquisitions boosted demand for the British currency.
 this week could further boost sterling sentiment” Sterling has climbed against all but two of its 16 major peers this month amid an increase in mergers and acquisitions activity.
 That inaction gives companies a window to look for offshore mergers.
 Blocked Benefit Two years later, the ensuing law prevented companies from receiving the tax benefit of an overseas merger if their existing shareholders still owned 80 percent or more of the company’s stock after the deal.
 Skadden’s team includes mergers and acquisitions partners Howard Ellin and Neil Stronski, tax partner Cliff Gross, executive compensation partner Neil Leff, intellectual property partner Stuart Levi, real estate partner Audrey Sokoloff, health-care enforcement partner Jennifer Bragg and labor and employment law partner David Schwartz.
 As economies in peripheral Europe emerge from recessions, companies will benefit, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co’s Andres Garcia-Amaya.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- The Asia Pacific mines said to have stymied merger talks by Barrick Gold Corp.
 Newmont and Barrick’s merger talks broke down last week over disagreements on which mines to include in the spin off, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- France’s Socialist President Francois Hollande may not have planned on a wave of mergers and acquisitions by his country’s biggest companies to be a defining feature of his term.
 agreeing to create a global cement giant with more than $40 billion in revenue, Vivendi SA deciding to sell its SFR phone unit for more than $23 billion and computer services companies Sopra Group SA and Groupe Steria SCA planning a merger.
 The merger of Lafarge with Holcim, which will create the world’s largest cement manufacturer, may help reduce overcapacity in a sector that has struggled since the recent financial crisis depressed building activity.
 Along with antitrust concerns, layoffs will also be a key point of discussion with politicians in the merger of Lafarge and Holcim, which employ about 7,000 staff in France altogether.
 The $85 million deal, part of emergency manager Kevyn Orr’s program to restructure Detroit’s finances, was opposed by creditors including Syncora Guarantee Inc, which insures some of the city’s debt.
 Orr and other officials have said that after decades of decline and the near-disappearance of manufacturing jobs, city services including street lighting, trash pickup and emergency services are inadequate.
 Shares of both companies, halted yesterday amid reports of merger talks, remained suspended.
 “The future performance of Stanley Black & Decker will tell us if this bonus was for actions that contributed to the long-term success of the company or if this was nothing more than a contractual agreement entered into at the time of the merger,” Frank Glassner, CEO of Veritas Executive Compensation Consultants, said in a phone interview from the company’s San Francisco headquarters.
 Mega-Mergers A merger of this reported size would top Pfizer’s 2000 purchase of Warner-Lambert Co.
 Pfizer has been at the center of the biggest drugmaker mega-mergers, making up three of the 10 deals worth more than $30 billion in the last two decades.
 Merger Comments Since taking over in 2010, Pfizer Chief Executive Officer Ian Read’s answers to whether or not he would pursue a mega-merger such as a deal with AstraZeneca have shifted.
 Yet the two brothers -- former mergers and acquisitions bankers at Morgan Stanley and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Just this month, the Zaouis have worked with GlaxoSmithKline Plc on a complex $23 billion deal with Novartis AG, and advised Lafarge SA on its $40 billion merger with Holcim Ltd.
 On a merger worth $25 billion, advisory fees can be as high as $100 million in total, according to estimates by New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
 Taubman, who has no other employees, briefly ranked at number seven globally among merger advisers, ahead of Credit Suisse Group AG and Deutsche Bank AG, after advising Verizon Communications Inc.
 The firm jumped to fourth place on the global league table of financial advisers for media mergers and acquisitions in February 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, seven months after it was founded.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cable billionaire John Malone, mounting a challenge against Vodafone Group Plc, would consider acquiring wireless customers and stores in Germany that may be put up for sale pending a review of a merger of the country’s third- and fourth-biggest network operators.
 Concession proposals to allay regulators’ concern that a merger of their O2 and E-Plus businesses would harm competition are due April 16, people familiar with the matter said this week.
 The joint company must give up wireless frequencies in the 900 megahertz- and 1,800 MHz ranges should the merger win approval, Germany’s Federal Network Agency said in a position paper this week.
 The benchmark rose 21 percent in the past three days as GlaxoSmithKline Plc and AstraZeneca Plc rallied amid mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA, Brazil’s biggest phone carrier, raised 825 billion reais ($37 billion) in a capital increase, paving the way for a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 The company is seeking to merge with Portugal’s largest phone operator to get savings on costs such as network equipment.
 1, the day before the merger was announced.
 The UN Security Council held an emergency meeting yesterday in New York on the situation in South Sudan and discussed the need for “serious consequences” to mass violence in Bentiu, council president and Nigerian Ambassador to the UN Joy Ogwu said.
 “To maximize the value of these assets to the province, they will look at measures such as efficient governance, growth strategies, corporate reorganization, mergers, acquisitions, and public-private partnerships,” Sousa said.
 faced off at an emergency meeting of the United Nations Security Council, blaming each other for causing the unrest.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- A flurry of billion-dollar deals announced today including a swap of cancer and vaccine drugs between Novartis AG and GlaxoSmithKline Plc will reshape the pharmaceutical industry as it looks to cut costs and may herald another round of mergers and acquisitions.
 and AstraZeneca Plc recently fizzled, it may be revived, or Pfizer could seek a merger with Amgen Inc.
 Daniel Vasella, the former chairman and CEO of Novartis, amassed a 33 percent voting stake in Roche more than a decade ago and has unsuccessfully sought a merger of the companies.
 Unlike the Chevrolet Cobalt, which was recalled for a flawed ignition switch and is no longer sold, the Impala represents the “new GM” that emerged in 2009 after a government-backed bankruptcy.
 Yancoal is assisting emergency services and the regulator, the producer said.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- Metso Oyj, a Finnish manufacturer of rock crushers, rejected a merger proposal from British pressure-pump maker The Weir Group Plc, saying that a deal would dampen its growth prospects.
 A merger of Weir and Metso would generate synergies of at least 300 million euros ($415 million), according to Canaccord.
 “The board of Weir believes that it has made an attractive merger proposal and there is no certainty that it will revise the terms of its proposal,” the company said today.
 The optimism injected into the near-six week search after pinger signals were picked up may also prove ill-founded because the sounds could have come from sources other than the emergency beacons, said Peter Herzig, executive director of the Geomar Helmholtz Center for Oceanographic Research in Kiel, Germany.
 Hastings announced his opposition to the Comcast-Time Warner Cable merger in a letter to shareholders today.
 Global Center “New York City has emerged as a global center for innovation, and my administration is committed to leveraging all of our resources effectively so that technology companies start and thrive here,” the mayor said in a prepared statement.
 and Lafarge SA, whose boards approved a merger to create the world’s biggest cement maker, will be led by the French company’s chief executive officer, Bruno Lafont, said people familiar with the matter.
 The Lafarge executive’s appointment may be announced as early as today along with the all-share merger, which will create a company with $40 billion in sales, the people said, asking not to be identified because discussions are private.
 The merger of equals would build on their “strengths and identities,” Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge said April 4 after confirming a Bloomberg News report about the talks.
 Representatives for Lafarge and Holcim declined to comment on any details of the merger beyond the company statements.
 “We are increasing our efforts on reducing our costs and capital spending in order to ensure we maintain our competitiveness and emerge stronger from the current price cycle,” the company said.
 Toronto-based Barrick’s CEO Jamie Sokalsky would have led a smaller gold producer spun off from the merged company, according to the people.
 “It’s a merger to set them up for bigger, future M&A deals which may in fact include an element of diversification” Spokesmen for Barrick and Newmont both declined to comment on last week’s talks.
 Before talks broke off April 18, the companies had agreed to an all-stock merger in which Barrick was to offer Newmont shareholders a premium of 13 percent more than Newmont’s average share price over the latest 20 trading days, one of the people with knowledge of the situation said.
 The companies, which have tried to merge several times in the past, still have interest in getting a deal done, the people said.
 “The prime minister’s office will continue offering every possible assistance to the RCMP’s investigation” The police decision not to charge Wright marks a break for Harper’s Conservative Party, whose popularity slumped after the senate expense scandal emerged last year, reaching the lowest since they took power in 2006.
 Chicago Suburbs The government unit provides two-way radios, mobile computers and other communications equipment and networks for emergency personnel, police and utilities.
 The company that also trades in Toronto and has operations in Colombia and Ecuador was in merger talks with C&C Energia Ltd.
 The agreement, part of a 141 billion-real capitalincrease, is a condition of Oi’s planned merger with PortugalTelecom SGPS SA.
 Cutting Debt Oi needs the merger to help reduce debt and give it moreflexibility to compete with bigger rivals such as Telefonica SA,Telecom Italia SpA and America Movil SAB.
 After the merger, theratio will drop to 33, Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava hassaid.
 The merger was projected togenerate 55 billion reais in cost savings and additional salesof 18 billion euros ($24 billion), creating a more solidcompetitor in the world’s fifth-biggest wireless market, withsome 270 million accounts.
 “The question now is how provisions will trend and how quickly these charges will normalize” Banco Popular Espanol SA, a lender forced into an emergency share sale in 2012 to avoid a state bailout as loan losses mounted, witnessed a “radical” change in its asset quality trends in the early part of this year, Chairman Angel Ron said in an interview in March.
 Kevyn Orr, the emergency financial manager shepherding Michigan’s largest city through bankruptcy, has said time is running for creditors to agree on proposed cuts before the court imposes a plan on them.
 “The emergency manager is confident that the city can emerge from bankruptcy by mid-October,” Bill Nowling, a spokesman for Orr, said in an e-mail.
 The merger isn’t a departure from Orbital’s conservative approach to business, said Chris Quilty, an analyst with Raymond James & Associates in St.
 Asian collectors have emerged in the past five years as the fastest-growing geographic segment, even as Americans remain the largest single group of buyers in the category, according to David Norman, Sotheby’s co-chairman of Impressionist and modern art worldwide.
 At 372 percent, Portugal’s 10-year bond yields are near an eight-year low and the nation last week held its first auction of longer-term debt since seeking an emergency rescue in 2011.
 Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter of 2013.
 The Finance Ministry will step in with corrective action should “inappropriate tax constructs emerge,” Kalwey said.
 The European Central Bank kept its rate unchanged at a record low of 025 percent last week and revealed it was considering quantitative easing to fight deflation as the 18-nation bloc emerges from its recession.
 “What the market is waiting for is more details on their strategy following the completion of the merger” The forecast, which would represent a 30 percent fall in net income compared to the year ended March, comes as Japanese equities lose their allure after surging in 2013.
 Japan Exchange was established in January 2013 through the merger of Tokyo Stock Exchange Group Inc.
 “Our view has long been that the marriage of linear television and streaming over-the-top TV is the future of television, and Netflix has clearly emerged as a must-have over-the-top service,” TiVo President and CEO Tom Rogers said in an e-mailed statement.
 Doximity was started in 2011 and previously raised about $27 million from investors including Emergence Capital Partners and Morgenthaler Ventures.
April 5 (Bloomberg) -- France’s Socialist President Francois Hollande may not have planned on a wave of mergers and acquisitions by his country’s biggest companies to be a defining feature of his term.
 A merger of Lafarge with Holcim, which would create the world’s largest cement manufacturer, could help reduce overcapacity in a sector that has struggled since the recent financial crisis depressed building activity.
 Along with antitrust concerns, layoffs will also be a key point of discussion with politicians in the merger of Lafarge and Holcim, which employ about 7,000 staff in France altogether.
 With borrowings to fund mergers and acquisitions accelerating amid an improving economy, the number of credit-ratings cuts linked to such deals is exceeding increases by the most since the fourth quarter of 2009, according to data from Moody’s Analytics.
 The gauge posted a weekly advance of 03 percent amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 sells shares to the public, the merger advisory firm’s founder will own stock worth about $386 million with another $100 million in trust for his family, according to a filing.
 Companies pay the bankers for advice on mergers and acquisitions, with fees sometimes topping $10 million for a single deal.
 tax code is helping drive billion-dollar mergers and acquisitions.
 and Perrigo Co, have been most active in doing mergers and then moving their tax domiciles overseas, in what’s known as an inversion.
 The authority would be created through a merger of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.
 The Center recommended a transition to a consolidated examination force through a merger of the banking agencies into a unified supervisory agency.
 The QFMA also issued new rules on licensing and regulating acquisitions and mergers and on corporate governance in venture and main markets, according to the statement.
 Under the circumstances, mergers and acquisitions are a key driver, Matthew and Kato wrote.
 The slump included some of the most lucrative segments, with fees from mergers and acquisitions falling 33 percent to $46 million, Freeman reported.
 VTB Capital, a unit of Russia’s second-largest lender VTB Group, led the nation in fees last year from initial public offerings, mergers, bonds and loans, taking in $101 million, Freeman’s data show.
 “Korean companies emerged as global brands not just because of currency depreciation or gains, but because they have real market share gains from product improvisation, increased spend on research and development, and real product innovation,” Medha Samant, a Hong Kong-based investment director at Fidelity, said by phone on April 11.
 In a statement today, Bouygues said its March 12 bid, made up of 113 billion euros ($156 billion) in cash and a 43 percent stake in the entity created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom, as well as a revised proposal giving Vivendi 1315 billion euros in cash and a 215 percent stake in the new company, are both valid through April 25.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- South Asia, home to a quarter of the world’s population, will probably get less monsoon rainfall than normal this year as odds increase for the emergence of the El Nino weather phenomenon that has previously caused droughts.
 ended merger talks, the latest of several attempts over more than two decades to combine the world’s two largest gold producers and wring cost savings from their adjacent mining operations in Nevada.
 Barrick, the biggest gold miner, and Greenwood Village, Colorado-based Newmont discussed a merger earlier this month and identified annual savings of $1 billion, two people with knowledge of the matter said April 19.
 Barrick founder and Chairman Peter Munk said last week that the latest round of talks may be different from previous attempts to merge because of the increased pressure to cut costs following gold’s decline.
 Department of Homeland Security’s Computer Emergency Readiness Team issued similar advice today.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- France will encourage mergers and acquisitions among the country’s wireless carriers and has asked market leader Orange SA to seek European alliances, Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg said.
 A merger of Bouygues Telecom and Iliad isn’t planned for now, the minister said.
 “There are questions about what Bouygues and Iliad’s future will be if they don’t merge,” Montebourg said.
 Orange isn’t in discussions with Germany’s Deutsche Telekom about a possible merger, Richard said in a December interview.
 Though carriers have called for softer antitrust rules that would allow for more mergers and acquisitions in the region, they’ve resisted Kroes’ proposals, arguing that eliminating roaming revenue is a burden for the companies that have been battered by price wars and the economic crisis.
 The increase comes as proposed mergers and acquisitions worth $285 billion helped send health-care stocks up 84 percent since the start of 2011, the most of any industry.
 The biotech selloff has coincided with merger announcements by Pfizer, Forest Laboratories Inc, Allergan Inc.
 The yield dropped to a record-low 341 percent on April 7 as the leadership challenge for the ruling party emerged.
Talks to merge the world’s biggestgold-mining companies, Barrick Gold Corp.
 The companies had agreed to an all-stock merger and plannedto announce the deal this week, the people said, asking not tobe identified discussing private information.
 The mergertalks follow gold’s 28 percent plunge in 2013, the most in threedecades, which squeezed profits and spurred at least $30 billionof writedowns by producers.
 The merger plan hit a snag only when Barrick and Newmontfailed to come to a complete agreement on which mines to includein the spinoff, the people said.
 The two have tried tomerge several times in the past and still have interest ingetting a deal done, the people said.
 Savings Goal Spokesmen for Barrick and Newmont both declined to commenton the merger talks.
 The success of the latest potential merger would depend onthe value of the spinoff and the enlarged company achieving theenvisaged cost savings, Greg Barnes, an analyst at TD NewcrestInc.
 Thornton Role Under the most recent merger plan, the combined company’schief executive officer would have been current Newmont CEO Gary Goldberg, while Barrick Co-Chairman John Thornton would havebeen executive chairman, the people said.
 Barrick and Newmont held merger talks in 1991 and 2000,according to the book “Going for Gold: the History of NewmontMining Corporation” by Jack H.
 Based on the latest discussions, the merged company wouldhave a 14-person board comprising seven people from Barrick,five from Newmont and two new directors, one of the people said.
 The benchmark measure advanced yesterday as companies from AstraZeneca Plc to Bayer AG rose amid an increase in mergers-and-acquisitions activity, offsetting new US.
 Cheaper funding costs are helping smaller lenders arrest five years of market-share loss to the four pillar banks, named after a law that prevents mergers between them.
 “It allows us to be manically and singularly focused on growing the public-safety business” The government unit provides two-way radios, mobile computers and other communications equipment and networks for emergency personnel, police and utilities.
 Oi’s main rivals -- Telefonica SA’s Vivo, America Movil SAB’s Claro and Tim Participacoes SA -- have backed off their earlier calls for a delay, said Carlos Baigorri, superintendent of mergers and acquisitions for regulator Anatel in Brasilia.
 Postponing the auction would give Oi more breathing room to complete its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA while working to replenish its balance sheet, the most indebted among Brazilian phone carriers.
 After the merger, the ratio will slide to 33, according to regulatory filings.
 Difficult M&A Proceeding with the auction could make it more difficult for companies to attempt mergers or acquisitions in the Brazilian telecommunications market, said Robin Bienenstock, senior analyst of European and Latin American telecommunications at Sanford C.
 “The anti-incumbency vote may not necessarily go to AAP in many seats in Delhi as the BJP has emerged as a strong contender making it a three-cornered fight” The BJP will win four seats in Delhi, with two going to AAP and one to Congress, according to a nationwide opinion poll of 200,000 voters conducted in February and published by NDTV television channel.
 Fighting between government forces and insurgents loyal to Boko Haram, the main Islamist rebel group, intensified last month in the northeast, where a state of emergency has been called in three states.
 JinkoSolar last month reported its highest quarterly earnings in almost three years as the solar industry emerges from a slump resulting from a global oversupply of panels that drove down prices and ate into margins.
 The probe also includes an investigation of obstruction and illegal monetary transactions, and violations of the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, Assistant US.
 Any type of transaction would set Teradata on a similar course as clients such as Comcast and P&G, which are doing deals such as mergers and asset sales to pursue growth and extract value.
 The energy infrastructure company, based in Calgary, expects its 38 percent share price jump in the past six months will help secure financing for mergers and acquisitions as its Jordan Cove LNG project advances, Chief Executive Officer Don Althoff said in an interview.
 Massachusetts Governor Deval Patrick issued a statement March 27 declaring a public health emergency and directing the state to take steps to deal with “an epidemic of opiate abuse” The declaration empowered the state’s health department to immediately prohibit Zohydro ER from being prescribed and dispensed until the agency determined that adequate measures to safeguard against diversion, overdose and misuse were in place.
 mergers, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It’s seventh in stock underwriting and fourth in merger advice in the US.
 Barclays ranks 12th in underwriting European stock sales this year, down from ninth last year and ranks 16th among merger advisers involving European companies this year, the data show.
 It surged for a second day yesterday after an emergency interest-rate increase, gaining 53 percent to 113 per dollar.
 Part of the city exists within a 30 kilometer (19 mile) radius from the Oma plant that must prepare for emergency evacuations under government rules.
 ABN Amro is seeking to rebuild after it was nationalized, dismembered and merged with part of another bank.
 A group of pilots stayed away from work for two months in 2012, protesting the carrier’s decision to give training on Boeing Co’s 787 Dreamliners to captains belonging to Indian Airlines, a domestic carrier that was merged with it in 2007.
 Voice Essential While Tokyo-based Mitsubishi, Japan’s biggest importer of coal and liquefied natural gas, uses electronic trading it still considers voice trading “essential,” particularly in times of emergency, the company said in an e-mailed response to questions on March 31.
 The agreement, part of a 141 billion-real capital increase, is a condition of Oi’s planned merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Oi needs the merger to help reduce debt and give it more flexibility to compete with bigger rivals such as Telefonica SA, Telecom Italia SpA and America Movil SAB.
 After the merger, the ratio will drop to 33, Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava has said.
 The merger was projected to generate 55 billion reais in cost savings, creating a more solid competitor in the world’s fifth-biggest wireless market, with some 270 million accounts.
 The Internet company, which has already raised about $28 million from Emergence Capital Partners, Morgenthaler Ventures and others, may be valued at about $500 million, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 Vivendi would receive 10 percent of a company created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom, Paris-based Bouygues said.
 The fight for SFR, whose previous owners included Vodafone Group Plc, represents a milestone in European carriers’ push to merge in response to stricter regulations and increased competition.
 Antitrust Risks An SFR-Bouygues Telecom merger is more likely to attract antitrust scrutiny than SFR-Numericable combination because it would reduce the number of mobile network operators in France from four to three.
 Representatives for Roche and Teva didn’t respond to requests for comment about their merger or acquisition plans.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Detroit’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr, said the city may be able to conclude its record $18 billion bankruptcy in October, less than 18 months after seeking court protection from creditors.
 The emergency manager was in court today to seek approval of an $85 million settlement with UBS AG and Bank of America Corp.
 That’s a risk that’s specific to Deutsche Bank” Popularity While notes such as Deutsche Bank’s are gaining popularity among European firms looking to boost capital, the instruments have yet to be fully tested in emergencies, said Barbara Matthews, managing director of BCM International Regulatory Analytics LLC, a Washington-based consulting firm.
 The shift by the world’s biggest bond fund manager reflects a rebound in Brazilian assets in the past month as speculation emerges that Rousseff will alter policies before October elections as her approval ratings sag.
 The funding paved the way for a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 1, the day before the merger was announced.
 The company is seeking to merge with Portugal’s largest phone operator to get savings on costs such as network equipment.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Baidu Inc’s Qunar travel website is in discussions to merge with Ctripcom International Ltd, according to two people with direct knowledge of the talks.
 The talks include a range of possibilities, from a full-blown merger to a partnership, the people said, asking not to be identified because the negotiations are private.
 Different Segments A merger would reduce costs for Ctrip, which often pays Qunar to acquire Web traffic to bolster its bookings, according to TH.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Indonesia needs greater consolidation in its banking industry and will push small lenders to merge or seek strategic investors, the Financial Services Authority’s top official said.
 Schuman said on his LinkedIn page that he’s seeking opportunities in fields such as investing, finance and mergers and acquisitions.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Sopra Group SA and Groupe Steria SCA, two of France’s oldest computer-services providers, are planning to merge in an attempt to win business from rivals including Atos and International Business Machines Corp, a person familiar with the matter said.
 A merger could help the companies offer a wider array of services and reduce costs as they compete against larger peers IBM and Accenture Plc as well as local rivals Atos and Cap Gemini SA.
 Boursiercom reported the companies’ plan to merge earlier today.
 Phone company Oi SA sank to a record before pricing shares in an offering that is part of its plan to merge with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 The Rio de Janeiro-based company is poised to move ahead with its merger with Portugal Telecom by completing a share sale today to raise at least 7 billion reais.
 The GE deal would be subject to merger control and other regulatory clearance, and final approval will be sought from shareholders, Alstom said.
 sank on failed merger talks.
 broke off talks to merge the world’s two largest gold producers.
 Materials producers sank 12 percent Merger Talks Barrick Gold retreated 31 percent to C$1912 after Newmont Mining criticized the company’s Co-Chairman John Thornton as a factor in breaking off discussions to merge the two companies, the latest of several failed attempts over more than two decades.
 government stepped in with emergency funding in 2008.
 EDreams Odigeo, the continent’s largest online travel agency formed from the merger of three companies, plans to raise as much as 420 million euros in an initial public offering, valuing the company at as much as 12 billion euros.
 Emergency Motion Bob Hilliard, a lawyer for plaintiffs, said it was important for the court to act quickly because the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration has no authority to issue park-it alerts to recalled vehicle owners.
 “We’re here on an emergency motion because this is an ongoing public safety issue,” Hilliard said.
 Chairman Peter Munk said spinning off assets as part of a proposed merger with Newmont Mining Corp.
 A merger also would reduce costs in Nevada, where the companies operate “cheek by jowl,” he said.
 Under the most recent merger plan, Newmont CEO Gary Goldberg would have retained that title at the combined company, while Thornton would have been executive chairman, the people said.
 A merger with Newmont wouldn’t necessarily mean Barrick’s production would increase significantly, Munk said.
 If a merger and spinoff were completed, the companies would be able to reduce their combined production of more than 13 million ounces to a range of 65 million to 7 million, he said.
 “The merger will bring synergy gains to ALL” The combination “has enormous potential to contribute to the development of the country’s infrastructure,” Cosan Chief Executive Officer Marcos Lutz said in an e-mailed statement.
 Under Cosan’s proposal unveiled in February, ALL will merge with Cosan’s logistics unit Rumo.
 While Abiove, a soybean processors group, expressed concern that the deal could be harmful for the transportation of crops as it concentrates power in the hands of an important user of ALL lines, companies including Vanguarda Agro SA said the merger will allow for investments in railroads to increase at a faster pace.
 The ministry called an emergency meeting of prefectural officials in charge of animal health and disease control on April 2 as the number of infected farms jumped in March.
 The automaker, which emerged from a US.
 The increase, to 50,000 miles for trips on days like the Sunday after Thanksgiving, is among changes American announced today to better match its policies with those of merger partner US Airways.
 The shares have risen 46 percent from when the two carriers merged on Dec.
 said they were in merger discussions.
 Radian last year “capitalized on improving macroeconomic trends to emerge from a prolonged period of losses,” the insurer said in the filing.
 The bank’s share price then climbed the most in 6 years after news of talks with QIB emerged last month.
 In the new pharmaceutical world, the power to control a tightly focused market with the potential for growth now tops the riskier transformational megamerger of a decade earlier.
 “I don’t know if mega-mergers are gone or not gone, all I know is that everybody in the industry is looking at their portfolio and they are deciding how they think they should strengthen it” Jimenez said he was told “for many months” that a swap like this couldn’t occur because it was too complex.
 Megamergers, on the other hand often bring problems with integration and large-scale job cuts in unwanted divisions.
 with Pershing Square Capital Management LP after rebuffing merger efforts for more than a year.
 “There will probably be more mega-mergers in the future, but more likely once companies are done cleaning up their portfolios,” said Odile Rundquist, an analyst with Helvea in Geneva, said in a telephone interview today.
 and Lafarge SA may face prolonged antitrust investigations and asset sales around the globe to win approval for a merger that would create the world’s biggest cement maker.
 The merged company would overtake HeidelbergCement in aggregates sales and Cemex SAB for ready-mixed concrete.
 “There is no chance of a merger without significant asset divestment and a deal that could take a very long time to complete” The antitrust implications of the merger in the US.
 would be reviewed by the Federal Trade Commission, which cleared the merger of Lafarge and Blue Circle Industries in 2001 after ordering the companies to divest cement businesses in three regions.
 Internet and smaller companies pulled back from a selloff amid optimism over merger activity.
 mergers-and-acquisitions business.
 mergers and acquisitions at BMO Capital Markets in New York.
 He worked also at General Electric for more than a decade in finance, mergers and acquisitions, and strategy.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- The Weir Group Plc, a British pressure pump manufacturer, proposed a merger with Finnish rock crusher maker Metso Oyj to cut expenses as mining companies worldwide put investments on hold.
 Weir, whose market value of 53 billion pounds ($88 billion) was about 50 percent higher than Metso’s before today, proposed an all-share merger, it said in a statement today.
 Weir said a merged entity could be listed on the London and Helsinki stock exchanges.
 A merger of Weir and Metso would generate synergies of at least 300 million euros, according to a separate note from Canaccord.
 Metso’s second-largest shareholder Solidium said today that Weir’s merger proposal was a “natural activity” as mining companies face pressure to reduce investments.
 Goodman Fielder was formed in 1986 from a merger between Australian and New Zealand food companies established in 1909 and 1968 respectively, according to its website.
 and Lafarge SA, the world’s two biggest cement makers, are in advanced merger talks to create a company with $40 billion in sales and better able to deal with production overcapacities and higher energy costs.
 The companies are exploring a merger of equals that would build on their “strengths and identities,” Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge said today.
 “Their review is essentially ‘it’s ok so far,’” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 city could be more competitive if the nation’s busiest seaport complex, the ports of Los Angeles and Long Beach, were to merge and regional tourism agencies were combined to speak with one voice, according to the report by the LA.
 “What you need is somebody brazen enough that sees this opportunity to kind of stick it to Valeant and that has the firepower Valeant has,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 They were net sellers of 73 billion pounds in equities since the start of 2011 through March 30, amid unrest that followed the uprising against Mubarak’s regime, according to bourse data that excludes so-called special-market operations such as mergers and acquisitions.
 Phone company Oi SA rebounded from the lowest in 19 years after Brazil’s securities regulator lifted a suspension of its share offering that’s part of a plan to merge with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 The two left to found their own firms, then merged them.
 emerges from an unusually harsh winter.
 Announced mergers and acquisitions involving US.
 New Management CVC built the asset from two European ink companies bought in 2004 from BASF SE and Akzo Nobel NV and merged with Flint Ink Corp.
April 26 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks posted a second week of gains as companies from Alstom SA to GlaxoSmithKline Plc rallied amid mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 A boom in initial public offerings and mergers and acquisitions in the first quarter is fueling optimism that the New York-based firm’s shares will resume a run that saw them double in 2013.
 Technology Impact The issue may be pivotal if Aereo is to emerge victorious, though the hourlong hearing didn’t clearly indicate the likely outcome.
 Zimpleman today discussed the possibility of future mergers and acquisitions.
 Terrace Hill, based in Glasgow, also plans to raise 170 million pounds in a share placement to fund development at the merged company, which will be called Urban & Civic, it said today in a statement.
 The merged companies will retain some commercial properties, rental homes and affordable housing to generate regular income and they will target property returns of 20 percent a year, Terrace Hill said “As local economies and real wages outside central London begin to recover, the new business has good momentum,” Robert Adair, executive chairman of Terrace Hill, said in the statement.
 The merged company plans to acquire plots of land for homes within one hour’s commute of London and then sell them off in bundles to homebuilders, Urban & Civic founder Nigel Hugill said in an interview.
 The merged company also plans to develop cinemas, hotels and restaurants around the UK, Hugill said.
 Own Line The power failure on a 38-year-old line belonging to the local municipality triggered an emergency plan that has successfully tested the terminal’s ability to handle 91 million tons a year because of the need to clear the backlog, Siwisa-Damasane said.
 In addition to finding a white knight to merge with, Irvine, California-based Allergan’s choices include buying another company to make itself tougher to acquire and negotiating with Valeant.
 Facebook had to deal with smaller screens and the emergence of other social applications designed specifically for phones.
 The merger, which made Kraft General Foods Inc.
 The offering ispart of Oi’s plan to merge with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 If the merger is completed, Oi shares may gain about 150percent in the next 12 months to 18 months and Portugal Telecomcould rise 90 percent, according to estimates by Sanford CBernstein analysts led by Robin Bienenstock in an April 2research report.
 Oi share prices imply a 90 percent probabilitythat the merger and capital increase will fall through,according to the report.
 Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr had proposed giving investors in debt with unlimited tax backing from the bankrupt city the same 15 cents on the dollar he offered those holding limited bonds.
 Governor Rick Snyder declared a financial emergency in the Detroit suburb of Lincoln Park this week.
 Other localities such as Hamtramck and Flint have emergency managers of their own.
 In the future, the i3 will also be available with a 34-horsepower, two-cylinder gasoline engine expressly used to recharge the batteries on the go in emergency conditions.
 King, an American, was head of global mergers and acquisitions at Salomon Brothers and later oversaw banking in Europe for New York-based Citigroup.
 “It’s certainly a bold move, which in my mind is attributable to increased confidence by management to do a transaction like this,” said John Emanoilidis, co-head of the mergers practice at Torys LLP law firm in Toronto.
 Banco Popular, whose shares have recovered this year after an emergency stock sale in 2012, disclosed the negotiations today in a Spanish regulatory filing.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- The monsoon in India, which provides most of the annual rainfall, will be below normal this year amid a 60 percent chance for the emergence of an El Nino that previously caused droughts, the country’s forecaster said.
 Even if El Nino emerges as predicted, the impact can vary, it said.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Detroit, months from a court battle over how to reduce $18 billion owed to creditors including bondholders and retirees, doesn’t want to wait to start spending money on emergency vehicles and basic services it needs now.
 “Detroit needs improved services now, and this financing will help it improve basic services to its residents,” Bill Nowling, a spokesman for the city’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr, said in an e-mail.
 Orr and other officials have said that after decades of decline and the near-disappearance of manufacturing jobs, city services including street lighting, trash pickup and emergency services are inadequate.
 equities rallied early in the session as large companies climbed on optimism over the outlook for merger activity.
 airports, according to a study ordered by Congress in the wake of airline mergers.
 Since 2005, mergers have winnowed the number of major carriers to four: American Airlines Group Inc, United Continental Holdings Inc, Delta Air Lines Inc.
 With the last of the major mergers completed Dec.
 offered to merge with the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
 Two years later, the ensuing law prevented companies from receiving the tax benefit of an overseas merger if their existing shareholders still owned 80 percent or more of the company’s stock after the deal.
 “The hard-line attitude from a few countries like Poland won’t achieve anything, unless there’s a united front” These divisions emerge at EU summits, said the person familiar with the deliberations.
 During a due diligence period from mid-December through mid-January, a handful of bidders emerged.
 Squire Sanders added mergers and acquisitions partner Kenneth Regensburg in New York.
April 26 (Bloomberg) -- The American Airlines settlement that cleared the carrier’s $17 billion merger with US Airways Group was formally approved by a federal judge, capping the biggest antitrust case brought by regulators last year.
 The Justice Department sued American and US Airways in August to block the merger, saying the deal would raise prices for consumers by removing any incentive for US Airways to offer lower fares.
 The lawsuit marked a break with the Justice Department’s past policy, which allowed mergers involving six unprofitable airlines over the past five years in an effort to cut costs and end losses.
 Merger Completed The airlines didn’t wait for the judge’s approval, which was expected, completing their merger in December to create American Airlines Group Inc.
 The settlement drew opposition from the American Antitrust Institute, a nonprofit organization in Washington that said the sale of gates and slots to other carriers won’t replicate the competition lost as a result of the merger.
 Bitcoin, the most popular digital currency, emerged from a 2008 paper written by a programmer or group of programmers under the name Satoshi Nakamoto.
 Signs of a recovery have emerged after a harsh winter.
 Chief Executive Officer Ian Read has been firing people, trimming research initiatives and shedding businesses in a less-is-more strategy designed to cut back the excesses from a decade of megamergers.
 Yesterday’s announcement that Pfizer is seeking to buy AstraZeneca Plc in a new $100 billion megamerger is putting the industry on notice that a company that was once the world’s biggest drugmaker is seeking to quickly reclaim its title.
 Yet “doing yet another big merger can certainly be viewed as a potential failure of sorts” Pfizer’s offer, quickly rebuffed by AstraZeneca as too low, was revealed after a pair of experimental drugs thought to have billion-dollar potential for Pfizer, Eliquis and Xeljanz, fizzled in their starts and a third, the breast cancer treatment palbociclib, will soon face a potent competitor in Eli Lilly & Co’s experimental drug bemaciclib.
 As head of Barclays Capital, the London-based bank’s securities unit, he expanded headcount and made the company a global leader in fixed income, foreign exchange and mergers and acquisitions.
 Few takers have emerged, and the property market’s rebound from a three-year slump may be delayed until 2015 as families struggle to access affordable loans and confidence lags, according to CBRE Group Inc.
 and was owned by Carlyle Group LP after it emerged from bankruptcy in 1999.
 “Today it is the various mergers and acquisitions stories that are driving the market,” Raimund Saxinger, a fund manager at Frankfurt-Trust Investment GmbH, which oversees about $22 billion, said in a phone interview.
 Russia, the world’s biggest energy exporter, called for an emergency meeting of the United Nations Security Council after Ukrainian security forces clashed with pro-Russian gunmen in the eastern town of Slovyansk.
 “Henchmen” of the government in Kiev are organizing attacks with the backing of Western nations, Russia’s Ambassador to the United Nations Vitaly Churkin said at an emergency session of the Security Council in New York.
 4 adviser for mergers and acquisitions involving Japanese companies in the quarter, working on deals valued at $68 billion, up from $35 billion a year earlier.
 Both nations count China as their largest export market, and speculation that policy makers will take emergency steps to stimulate the struggling Asian economy are helping their currencies.
 In the UK, mergers and acquisitions are largely dictated by rules implemented by the Takeover Panel in 2011 after unidentified bidders complicated Kraft’s takeover of Cadbury a year earlier.
 “Talk is cheap,” said Scott Moeller, a former Deutsche Bank AG banker and a mergers and acquisitions expert at London’s Cass Business School.
 Other bidders for AstraZeneca may also emerge.
 The company may seek a merger of equals with AbbVie Inc.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Sanofi Chief Executive Officer Chris Viehbacher said the return of mega-mergers doesn’t change his approach to deal-making: smaller purchases in emerging markets and consumer health-care.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Detroit won court approval to issue $120 million in bonds to pay for emergency vehicles and basic services while it prepares for a court battle with creditors over how to reduce $18 billion in debt.
 The time to begin is now, if not before now” Creditors including Syncora Guarantee Inc, which insures some of the city’s debt, have opposed emergency manager Kevyn Orr’s program to restructure Detroit’s finances, including the $120 million loan.
 Orr and other officials have said that after decades of decline and the near-disappearance of manufacturing jobs, city services including street lighting, trash pickup and emergency services are inadequate.
 Expansion Plans The aircraft changes come amid expansion plans at LaGuardia and Washington Reagan, where Southwest bought flight rights divested as part of American Airlines Group Inc’s 2013 merger with US Airways, and Dallas Love Field, where a federal law limiting nonstop service is expiring in October.
 While dissent within the AMCU has emerged, the size of the factions hasn’t been established.
 “The question is, ‘Can they do something more than just slavishly follow the market cap?’” Goldman Sachs, which has avoided large mergers throughout its history, has made several purchases in the past two years to grow an asset-management business that saw outflows in three straight years ended in 2012.
 “Opportunities for mergers and acquisitions are limited at the moment as industry earnings are doing well and targets are therefore rather pricey,” Wallin said.
 stocks rose, with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index erasing an earlier slide, as Internet and smaller companies pulled back from a selloff amid optimism over merger activity.
 equities began higher as large companies rallied on optimism about merger activity.
 Before that, Lee spent more than eight years at Del Monte Foods where he held leadership positions including overseeing corporate strategy, mergers and acquisitions, transformation and corporate affairs.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- Sopra Group SA founder Pierre Pasquier said the company resulting from the French computer-service provider’s merger with Groupe Steria SCA aims for sales of about 4 billion euros ($55 billion) in about three years.
 Securities regulator CVM last month sided with Oi SA controlling shareholders in a dispute over a 141 billion-reais capital increase preceding a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 “It sends a very poor message” Tempo Capital, which led the fight to block the Oi-Portugual Telecom merger, said the CVM’s March 25 ruling was a step backward for the regulation of Brazilian capital markets.
 Stand Up Brazil’s biggest phone company, Oi plunged 11 percent the day after the ruling and has declined 33 percent since the merger was announced Oct.
 Minority investors had fought to block controlling shareholders from voting on the capital increase and the valuation of assets involved in the merger because the deal involves paying off 45 billion reais in the controlling group’s debt in addition to diluting holdings.
 CVM also ruled against minority shareholders in cases including drink-maker Interbrew’s merger with Cia.
 Amplats, the world’s largest platinum producer, last year lost 7,438 jobs as it merged five mines at its Rustenburg complex into three to help it return to profit.
 Even if the pattern emerges as predicted, the weather impact can vary.
 South African-born Davis, 56, is seeking to repeat his success at Xstrata, where he led the management team that transformed the company from a coal producer with a market value of $500 million into a $50 billion diversified giant during a decade of mergers, acquisitions and expansion.
 Paulson’s Strategies Funds focused on corporate activism and events such as mergers and spinoffs beat the US.
 The firm’s merger-arbitrage fund Paulson Partners Enhanced, which uses leverage to amplify returns, rose 22 percent last quarter, and the Advantage Plus fund, an event-driven strategy that uses leverage, gained 43 percent.
 “It’s normal to defend your industries but the 35-hour workweek, 75 percent tax on the wealthy and a government that meddles in private deal-making projects an image of France that deters investors” Bouygues on March 21 brought in state-controlled fund Caisse des Depots et Consignations, sweetened the cash part of the bid to 1315 billion euros ($182 billion) and offered Vivendi a 215 percent stake in the entity that would be created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
 Ken Moelis, 55, and his partners are planning to capitalize on the company’s growth and a rebound in the pace of mergers and acquisitions worldwide.
 “Now is probably a good time to be a seller into the IPO market,” said Peter Nesvold, a managing director at merger advisory firm Silver Lane Advisors LLC in New York.
 “Moelis’s valuation reflects the increased competition and limited growth opportunity in investment banking today” Moelis ranked 12th among merger advisers in 2013, its highest ever position, after advising companies such as HJ Heinz Co.
 The Shearman & Sterling team included partner Scott Petepiece, mergers and acquisitions; Patricia Hammes, project development and finance; Larry Crouch and Jessica Delbaum, antitrust; Alan Goudiss, litigation; Doreen Lilienfeld, executive compensation and employee benefits; and Samuel Waxman, intellectual property transactions.
 Lowenstein Sandler Adds Ropes & Gray Private-Equity Partner Lowenstein Sandler LLP added Christopher Henry, who will work on private equity and mergers and acquisitions matters, as a partner in New York office from Ropes & Gray LLP, where he had been a partner since 2006.
 advanced 64 percent as it discussed a possible merger with Barrick Gold Corp, people with the knowledge of the matter said.
 Talks to merge the world’s largest gold mining companies broke down April 18 amid minor disagreements that leave open the possibility that a deal could be revived, two people familiar with the matter said.
 “Over the next 60 months, we will deliver a government that will reverse the growth slowdown and fulfill the desires and aspirations of Indians” Opinion polls show Modi’s BJP will emerge as the largest party while falling short of a parliamentary majority as voters punish the ruling Congress party for rising vegetable prices, graft scandals and the slowest economic growth in a decade.
 The carrier created from the proposed merger of Telefonica Deutschland Holding AG with E-Plus would hold more than half of all available 900-megahertz and 1,800-megahertz frequencies, ranges that are crucial for providing high-speed Internet connections, the Bonn-based telecommunications watchdog said in a 12-page position paper on its website.
 Telefonica and KPN last year agreed on the 86 billion-euro ($119 billion) merger, which would create Germany’s largest wireless operator by customers to surpass market leaders Deutsche Telekom AG and Vodafone Group Plc.
 Freenet AG, owner of the MVNO Mobilcom-Debitel, has also voiced concern over gaining access to the merged provider’s network.
 As a second step, the agency will review the effects of the merger and the allocation of new spectrum, it said.
 Deals Jones Day’s Profusek Says 2014 May Set M&A Record Robert Profusek, head of the mergers and acquisition practice at Jones Day, says the value of M&A may top $4 trillion in 2014.
 The company was spun off from Starwood Property Trust Inc, a Greenwich, Connecticut-based commercial-property investment and finance company, following a merger between Waypoint Homes and an affiliate of Starwood Capital Group.
 The new GM accepted claims for compensation by victims of accidents occurring after it emerged from bankruptcy, leaving pre-reorganization customers to get little or nothing from old GM, whose best assets it stripped away for itself.
 mergers and acquisitions last year, up from 24th in 2010, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Bouygues also pledged a so-called break-up fee of 500 million euros ($689 million) should antitrust authorities reject its proposal to merge SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
 Bouygues last month brought in a government-controlled fund and sweetened its cash offer to 1315 billion euros, plus a 215 percent stake in the entity created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
 said it is in advanced merger discussions with Lafarge SA.
 A merger of Holcim and Lafarge would create the world’s biggest company of the material.
 The two companies are talking about a merger of equals, Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim said in a statement.
 It’s also among Chrysler’s biggest investments in a new model since Fiat SpA took control of the automaker after it emerged from bankruptcy in 2009.
 *** You may not always like the news you read (see above) -- and before the re-emergence of the partisan press, combined with the electronic delivery, it wasn’t always like this.
 wireless carrier will provide mobile connections for Volvo Cars’ services, such as Internet radio, maps and Volvo On Call, which lets drivers remotely start up their cars and alerts the company’s emergency center if an airbag goes off.
 An all-share merger, creating a company with $40 billion in sales, will likely be announced as early as tomorrow, the people said, asking not to be identified because discussions are private.
 The companies are exploring a merger of equals that would build on their “strengths and identities,” Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge said April 4 after Bloomberg News reported the discussions.
 Representatives for Lafarge and Holcim declined to comment on any details of the merger beyond the company statements.
 He and a partner owned half of RosUkrEnergo, which was founded in 2004 and emerged as Ukraine’s sole gas importer from 2006 to 2009, between price disputes with Russia that led to supply halts and shortages across Europe.
 Colombia may not have to declare a state of emergency to fix the pipeline as the damage is located outside the U’wa’s indigenous reserve, Acosta said.
 An emergency declaration would give Colombian President Juan Manuel Santos powers to rule by decree for 30 days and would potentially overrule standard protocol when dealing with the group.
 Chief Executive Officer Pascal Soriot said AstraZeneca is making progress independently by developing new medicines, and said he didn’t necessarily think big mergers are a bad idea.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Barrick Gold Corp, which failed in an attempt to merge with its biggest rival this month, reported earnings that topped analysts’ estimates as it continues to reduce costs following a plunge in the price of the metal.
 identified annual savings of $1 billion as part of a proposed merger in which Barrick was to offer Newmont shareholders a takeover premium of 13 percent, two people with knowledge of the matter said April 19.
 The state, where both Barrick and Newmont produce more than a third of their gold, would have represented the majority of the cost savings from the merger, the people said April 19.
 “It was a difficult decision, but I believe it is best for GM” Barra has been under increasing pressure to act decisively as facts of the matter emerge.
 DeGiorgio and Altman emerged at the center of US.
 Price, who joined Wal-Mart in 2009 as Asia CEO, will be an executive vice president heading up areas including international strategy, real estate, and mergers and acquisitions, the retailer said in a statement.
 The A&O Paris team providing mergers-and-acquisitions advice was led by Marcus Billam and included partners Frederic Moreau and Frederic Jungels.
 The Shearman & Sterling team included partners Peter Lyons and Eliza Swann, mergers and acquisitions; Patrick Robbins and Richard Schwed, litigation; and Jessica Delbaum, antitrust.
 Court Supervision Gleeson said he would continue supervising implementation of the deal, under which the bank agreed not to contest criminal charges of failing to maintain an effective anti-money-laundering program, failing to conduct due diligence and violating the Trading With the Enemy Act and the International Emergency Economic Powers Act.
 is working on a number of options, including a demerger and individual asset sales, according to the Financial Review report.
 in 2000, now known as Arrium Ltd, and demerged the rest of its steel business in 2002 to create a company later renamed BlueScope Steel Ltd.
 emerge and offer a 15 percent to 20 percent premium, that would imply as much as $70 a share in a takeout, the New York-based analyst wrote in an April 11 report.
 Where swaps had been one-on-one deals before, now they would be backstopped by third parties in clearinghouses that ensure everyone can pay, with the aim of avoiding emergency bailouts and panic.
 The lender became Bank Canadian National after a 1924 merger with a competitor, and by 1979 had combined with Provincial Bank to become National Bank of Canada.
 Super-Hub Ataturk, in which Charles de Gaulle-owner Aeroports de Paris has an interest via a 38 percent stake in TAV, has also been aided as a weakening Turkish lira boosts competitiveness as West European rivals emerge more slowly from the recession.
 The benchmark gauge is little changed in 2014 as the escalating tensions in Ukraine offset an increase in mergers and acquisitions.
 Munk’s comments are being scrutinized particularly closely after failed merger talks between Barrick and Newmont Mining Corp.
 Had it gone ahead, the merger would have been the kind of bold deal extolled by Barrick’s founder, combining the world’s two largest gold producers after the biggest slump in the market for the precious metals in 32 years.
 According to Barrick, the merged Barrick-Newmont would have been based in Toronto.
 Munk spoke April 23 at Bloomberg headquarters, five days before Barrick and Newmont reported that their merger talks had been terminated.
 Last year, authorities in Neapolis, Greece, noted deficiencies in the Summer Wind’s lifeboats, emergency lighting, fire-fighting equipment and instruction manual.
 “Expectations tend to rise that Orix would buy back its shares unless they deploy their capital otherwise, so they will likely continue with mergers and acquisitions” Among Orix’s biggest takeovers was the purchase of the Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit from Rabobank Groep last year for about $26 billion.
 The miner, which is said to have held merger talks this month with Barrick Gold Corp, reported first-quarter earnings that beat analysts’ estimates.
 Andrea Orcel, the chief executive officer of UBS’s investment bank, has hired other senior Nomura dealmakers including Piero Novelli, now global chairman of mergers and acquisitions, and William Vereker, who was appointed in 2013 to run corporate client solutions in Europe.
 are among banks that may split as much as $100 million in fees for their roles advising on the merger of Holcim Ltd.
 On a $25 billion merger, advisory fees are customarily between 01 percent to 02 percent of the deal value -- for each side, according to Jeffrey Nassof, a New York-based vice president at Freeman.
 Sopra Group SA and Groupe Steria SCA, two of France’s oldest computer-services providers, are planning to merge in an attempt to win business from rivals including Atos and International Business Machines Corp, a person familiar with the matter said.
 United’s struggles to reap the benefits of its 2010 merger with Continental Airlines contrasted with the performance of American and Delta Air Lines Inc.
 American has gained 51 percent since closing on the US Airways merger on Dec.
 “In the entire history of American Airlines, we have never earned $400 million in the first three months of a year, but in the first three months since the merger, we did,” CEO Doug Parker said in a message to employees today.
 Justice Department as a condition of its approval of the merger.
 The carrier merged with Northwest Airlines Corp.
 advanced 64 percent in normal trading hours as it discussed a possible merger with Barrick Gold Corp, people with the knowledge of the matter said.
 The company said the flaw re-emerged in Saturn models and the 2005 Cobalt and it considered and rejected several fixes.
 Novakovic will also take over leadership of the Swiss corporate client solutions business, which includes underwriting bonds and stocks and advising on mergers and acquisitions, according to a memo to employees today.
 Another Malaysian Air plane had to deal with an emergency today.
 Bouygues said yesterday its March 12 bid, comprising 113 billion euros in cash and a 43 percent stake in the entity created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom, as well as a subsequently revised proposal giving Vivendi 1315 billion euros in cash and a 215 percent stake in the new company, are both valid through April 25.
 Leadership Positions Before Best Buy, Lee spent more than eight years at Del Monte Foods where he held leadership positions including overseeing corporate strategy, mergers and acquisitions, transformation and corporate affairs.
 The debt-to-GDP ratio in Spain, a country with a similar population that emerged from a dictatorship 15 years earlier, is about twice that, as is unemployment.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- Talks to merge the world’s biggest gold-mining companies, Barrick Gold Corp.
 The companies had agreed to an all-stock merger and planned to announce the deal this week, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The merger talks follow gold’s 28 percent plunge in 2013, the most in three decades, which squeezed profits and spurred at least $30 billion of writedowns by producers.
 The merger plan hit a snag only when Barrick and Newmont failed to come to a complete agreement on which mines to include in the spinoff, the people said.
 The two have tried to merge several times in the past and still have interest in getting a deal done, the people said.
 Savings Goal Spokesmen for Barrick and Newmont both declined to comment on the merger talks.
 The success of the latest potential merger would depend on the value of the spinoff and the enlarged company achieving the envisaged cost savings, Greg Barnes, an analyst at TD Newcrest Inc.
 Thornton Role Under the most recent merger plan, the combined company’s chief executive officer would have been current Newmont CEO Gary Goldberg, while Barrick Co-Chairman John Thornton would have been executive chairman, the people said.
 Barrick and Newmont held merger talks in 1991 and 2000, according to the book “Going for Gold: the History of Newmont Mining Corporation” by Jack H.
 Based on the latest discussions, the merged company would have a 14-person board comprising seven people from Barrick, five from Newmont and two new directors, one of the people said.
 You’ll see that people are just waiting to grab a second sport” Second Sport Manchanda said more details about sponsors would emerge in about four months.
 ‘Changed’ Company Soriot “decided to go for collaboration and in-licensing deals” when he arrived, rather than seek out a megamerger, Rundquist said in an interview.
 The Skadden lawyers on the deal are partners Stephen Arcano, mergers and acquisitions; Robert Copen, banking; Steven Sunshine, antitrust and competition; Richard Aftanas, corporate finance; and David Rievman, tax.
 The Kirkland & Ellis partners representing Pershing Square are Stephen Fraidin, mergers and acquisitions and corporate, and Richard Brand, corporate.
 The Davies team includes partners Patricia Olasker and Alex Moore, capital markets, mergers and acquisitions.
 Opportune Time The merger won’t dilute the value of TUI’s stake, and might be a “good opportunity to sell for a good price,” Jochen Rothenbacher, an analyst at Equinet Bank AG in Frankfurt, said in a note to clients today.
 In the first quarter, more than 5,000 mergers or acquisitions were struck across all industries globally for a total of $660 billion, a post-financial crisis high, the data show.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks advanced as companies from AstraZeneca Plc to Bayer AG rose amid an increase in mergers-and-acquisitions activity, offsetting new US.
 The benchmark gauge had gained 32 percent in the past three days amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity and better-than-estimated US.
 Russia called for an emergency meeting of the United Nations Security Council after Ukrainian security forces clashed with pro-Russian gunmen in eastern Ukraine.
 Altice will pay 135 billion euros in cash and give Vivendi20 percent of the company created from a merger of itsNumericable Group with Vivendi’s SFR.
 Altice has taken on “formal engagements to guaranteeemployment in the framework of this merger,” Drahi said in astatement.
 Antitrust Review Combining Numericable’s 17 million broadband users withSFR’s 21 million mobile-phone customers is less likely to leadto an extended antitrust review than Bouygues’s proposal becauseit involves a merger of landline with wireless assets, peoplefamiliar with the matter have said.
 The merger will also keepthe number of mobile-network operators in France to four.
 and Lafarge SA,the world’s two biggest cement makers, said April 4 they are inmerger talks to create a company with $40 billion in sales.
 The transaction also represents a milestone in Europeancarriers’ push to merge in response to stricter regulations andincreased competition.
 The French government will be “extremely vigilant” towhether Altice and Numericable will stick to their commitmentnot to cut jobs at SFR after the merger, Industry MinisterMontebourg said in a statement.
 An all-share merger, creating a company with $40 billion in sales, will likely be announced as early as tomorrow, the people said, asking not to be identified because discussions are private.
 The companies are exploring a merger of equals that would build on their “strengths and identities,” Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge said April 4 after Bloomberg News reported the discussions.
 Representatives for Lafarge and Holcim declined to comment on any details of the merger beyond the company statements.
 Esser’s statements were a rare public appearance for the closely held company, which is trying to talk more openly about its business plans given the attention on mergers and new offerings across the cable-TV industry.
 It has also missed out on a wave of mergers and acquisitions in the industry in the past decade.
 Mega-Mergers A merger of this reported size would top Pfizer’s 2000 purchase of Warner-Lambert Co.
 Pfizer has been at the center of the biggest drugmaker mega-mergers, making up three of the 10 deals worth more than $30 billion in the last two decades.
 Merger Comments Since taking over in 2010, Pfizer Chief Executive Officer Ian Read’s answers to whether or not he would pursue a mega-merger such as a deal with AstraZeneca have shifted.
 The city has more flexibility to pay for the obligations because it no longer has to make an annual payment to city schools after they were merged with a county system, she said.
 Tamboran is studying a reverse merger in the US, a deal that involves a private firm purchasing a public company to gain a listing, or an initial public offering in Singapore or Australia, Joel Riddle, chief executive officer of the Sydney-based company, said in a phone interview.
 As it moves to limit the risks from any defaults, the government will “encourage consolidations among the smaller banks, and mergers of the smaller banks with the bigger ones,” Lianhe Credit’s Li said.
 Sorrell said a merger between WPP rivals Publicis Groupe SA and Omnicom Group Inc, which would create the world’s largest advertising company, risks not being approved after delays in its progress.
 The merger, which was announced last July, is taking longer than expected and still awaits antitrust approval in China, Publicis and Omnicom said separately in recent weeks.
 The new holding company for the merged company will be legally domiciled in the Netherlands, and Publicis and Omnicom have said operating offices will remain in Paris and New York.
 Publicis has also asked France for a tax ruling, which is a condition of the merger and is needed for the business to benefit from a deferred tax regime.
 A total $760 billion in mergers and acquisitions of US.
 The strongest single quarter on record for merger loans was when $118 billion were raised in the last three months of 2007, Bloomberg data show.
 “Shifting competitive dynamics and the persistence of new behaviors that emerged during the recession are both impacting key indicators in the sector,” Andrew Tessler, the report’s author and an associate director at Oxford economics, said in a press statement.
 The fight for SFR, whose previous owners included Vodafone Group Plc, represents a milestone in European carriers’ push to merge in response to stricter regulations and increased competition.
 Decision Time Bouygues’s offer, comprising 113 billion euros in cash and a 43 percent stake in the company created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom, and a subsequently sweetened proposal giving Vivendi 1315 billion euros cash and a 215 percent stake, are both valid through April 25.
 “After an especially challenging environment in the second half of 2013, greater demand and stability emerged early in the year,” Potash Corp.
 Tapping into rising global demand for the SUV nameplate is part of Fiat Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne’s growth strategy as he merges the Turin-based manufacturer with Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler.
 Marchionne said in March that the merged Italian-US.
 Mercedes merged the sales operations last year.
 The judge yesterday also approved a $120 million loan to buy emergency vehicles and remediate blight in the city of about 700,000 people.
 He called the leftover money a “very safe buffer for the Greek banking system” Greece may hire banks to sell bonds this year as it weans itself off 240 billion euros in emergency aid granted since early 2010, when investors shunned the nation’s debts because of alarm over a budget deficit that was five times the European Union limit.
 The government and EU predict that Greece will emerge in 2014 from six years of recession.
 Suri, who worked at the network unit’s strategy, mergers and acquisitions, and sales functions before becoming its head, cut more than 25,000 jobs over the past two years to bring the division back to profit.
 Clinton Alumni Clinton alumni seeking office this year include former Federal Emergency Management Agency Director James Lee Witt, running for a US.
 AstraZeneca may seek a merger of equals with Amgen Inc.
 Astra could also seek a merger of equals with the likes of an Amgen.
 Reports this month of the talks sparked a rally in AstraZeneca shares and a flurry of other deals in the industry also refocused attention on mergers.
 AstraZeneca could pursue a merger of equals with either AbbVie, the North Chicago, Illinois-based drugmaker split from parent Abbott Laboratories last year, or Amgen, the analyst wrote.
 Legal Curbs Hogan’s strategy is partly a response to legal curbs that generally limit full airline mergers to intra-national and regional deals such as those that saw the emergence of three main network carriers in the US.
 “The more we get into the planning efforts on our side, the more confident we are in the potential and the potential synergies,” Chief Executive Officer Brian Roberts said of the planned merger on a conference call today.
 As the company looks to complete the deal toward the end of the year, Comcast plans to increase repurchases of its own shares by an additional $25 billion this year as a way to sweeten the offer if Time Warner Cable shareholders approve the merger.
 “But you cannot kill one tribe” The White Army emerged in the early 1990s when Machar and Lam Akol, who’s from the Shilluk ethnic group, split from John Garang, the former leader of the Sudan People’s Liberation Movement who died in a helicopter crash in 2005.
 At an emergency meeting of the United Nations Security Council, Russia demanded the US.
 State of Emergency The month-long confrontation at the Ecopetrol-owned pipeline is threatening Colombia’s ability to meet oil export targets and may force the government to declare a national emergency, Mines and Energy Minister Amylkar Acosta said.
 “This almost merits a declaration of emergency by the national government,” Acosta told local radio station Caracol yesterday.
 “There are reasons of state, and there’s a public interest that takes precedence” An emergency declaration would give Colombian President Juan Manuel Santos powers to rule by decree for 30 days and would potentially overrule standard protocol when dealing with the indigenous group.
 The split will be followed by a tax-free, all-stock merger between Dulles, Virginia-based Orbital Sciences and ATK’s aerospace and defense business by the end of the year, according to an Orbital statement.
 Orbital and Alliant had been discussing the merger for about six months, Mark DeYoung, ATK’s CEO and president, said in an interview.
 “We recognized the best outcome would be a merger of equals,” said DeYoung, who will be chairman and CEO of the outdoor sports spinoff.
 While the region emerged from its worst recession ever last year, CEOs remain skeptical about the euro area’s economic recovery and want to see results of monetary policy, according to RMG Wealth Management LLP’s Stewart Richardson.
 The region emerged from the longest recession since the euro’s inception in 1999 in last year’s second quarter, according to the European Union statistics.
 In Europe, an increase in mergers and acquisitions may signal that companies will move away from using cash to boost share buybacks and dividends to instead start growing their businesses, according to Raiffeisen Capital Management’s Herbert Perus.
 agreed this week to a merger that will create the world’s biggest cement maker.
 Coke Potential For Keurig, the bullish bets now are mostly because of its partnership with Coca-Cola, rather than expectations of a takeover, according to Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 considered a spin off of assets including some in Australia under now aborted talks to merge the two companies, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Japanese Regional Banks Poised to Resist Regulator’s Merger Push Japanese regional banks are resisting the financial regulator’s calls to merge, damping prospects for the revival of an industry plagued by falling interest rates and stagnating rural economies.
 Financial Services Agency Commissioner Ryutaro Hatanaka urged local bank chiefs in January to consider mergers and alliances to address a worsening profit outlook, according to three people who attended the meeting.
 “Now that national drivers are less significant to the market, you’re seeing the re-emergence of local economic factors” Buyers, already handicapped by tight credit and weak wage growth, felt the hit to their purchasing power when mortgage rates jumped last year.
 was founded last year by brothers Michael and Yoel Zaoui, former merger and acquisition bankers at Morgan Stanley and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 They have worked this month with GlaxoSmithKline Plc on a $23 billion asset swap deal with Novartis AG, and Lafarge SA on its $40 billion merger with Holcim Ltd.
 The firm ranked 12th among merger advisers in 2013, its highest-ever position, with roles on Heinz’s buyout and the merger of Omnicom Group Inc.
 Roberts handles emergency matters from the appeals court that handled the Copaxone case.
 With combined annual sales of about $57 billion, the merged group will have more buying power than Abercrombie & Fitch Co.
 They can operate anywhere in the world without all the palaver that used to be required to operate in multiple jurisdictions” Growing Scale Moir said the merger will allow Woolworths to combine the advantages of scale with those of geography.
 The merged group’s combined sales of $57 billion last year compare with more than $4 billion from Inditex’s stores outside Europe and the Americas and about $175 billion from H&M’s outlets in the same region.
 economic data and an increase in mergers and acquisitions.
 The aircraft was equipped with four emergency-locator transmitters designed to send signals to a satellite when triggered by a crash or by contact with water, CNN said.
 The health-care industry is seeing a flurry of deals, and Bayer’s mergers and acquisitions team is largely focused on pursuing the company’s chosen targets in that area.
April 26 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA, Brazil’s biggest phone company, has raised more than the minimum 7 billion reais ($312 billion) needed to move ahead with its Portugal Telecom SGPS merger, said two people with direct knowledge of the deal.
 Investors are showing interest in the transaction with the shares down 43 percent since the merger was announced on Oct.
 Alstom, they said, was after all the product of a 1920s merger between a French engineering company and the local subsidiary of Thomson-Houston Electric Co, itself a cousin of General Electric.
 The company in February said it wouldn’t emerge from a difficult transition period until 2015 after earnings plunged on weak demand in US.
 He expects the lender to emerge from the ECB’s asset review with a clean bill of health.
 Prices may surge as much as 33 percent to 3,500 ringgit ($1,074) a metric ton by February or March if evidence emerges of a prolonged drought, said Dorab Mistry, a director at Godrej International Ltd, who correctly forecast the price peak in the first quarter.
 “I’m pleased to close the final chapter in our litigation over Bank of America’s merger with Merrill, and I will continue to hold individuals -- as well as corporations -- accountable for their actions,” Schneiderman said today in a statement.
 blamed each other for a breakdown in merger talks, the latest of several failed attempts over more than two decades to combine the world’s largest gold producers and extract cost savings from adjacent US.
 Barrick said today that after signing the term sheet, Newmont sought to back out of agreements to locate the merged company’s head office in Toronto, define the assets to be included in a spinoff company, and to outline the roles of the chairman, chief executive officer and lead director.
 Efforts ‘Rejected’ Under the most recent merger plan, Newmont CEO Gary Goldberg would have retained his title while Thornton would have been executive chairman, the people familiar with the proposed deal said.
 Munk, who will retire as chairman on April 30 and be succeeded by Thornton, said last week that the latest round of talks may be different from previous attempts to merge because of the increased pressure to cut costs following gold’s decline.
 Vivendi would receive 10 percent of the company to be created from a merger of SFR with Bouygues Telecom.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Lufthansa AG said curbs on airline mergers are limiting its ability to target emerging markets and channeling takeover activity into service operations where investment rules are less stringent.
 Europe’s second-largest airline is particularly concerned given growth rates at Chinese and Gulf competitors, Isabel Todenhoefer, who heads Lufthansa’s mergers and acquisitions department, said today during a debate at an M&A conference.
 Spieth’s emergence comes as golf’s biggest names are struggling in major tournaments.
 Miners such as Emerge Energy Services LP, US.
 That’s on you,’” Rick Shearer, chief executive officer of Southlake, Texas-based Emerge, said in an April 14 phone interview.
 Now, with fracking helping drive oil output, Emerge fills trains pulling 100 cars on newly laid track from shiny metal silos.
 The cost savings is as much as 20 percent, Emerge’s Shearer said.
 “The big guys are really going to take a lot of market share because they have the capital to make the investments” Emerge is building toward 20 unit trains of sand a month from none two years ago, Shearer said.
 It surged for a second day yesterday after an emergency interest-rate increase, gaining 53 percent to 113 per dollar.
 Metso Oyj soared 19 percent after Weir Group Plc proposed a merger with the Finnish maker of rock crushers.
 Weir said in a statement that its indicative all-share merger proposal offers significant efficiencies and synergies, without giving further details.
 The purchase was made in the name of Aircraft Purchase Fleet, an entity created to help fund purchases for Air One, which later merged with state-controlled rival Alitalia.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- John Thornton’s start tomorrow as chairman of Barrick Gold Corp, succeeding founder Peter Munk at the largest gold producer, is being overshadowed by the acrimonious failure of merger talks with its biggest rival and opposition to executive compensation plans.
 It’s the latest of several attempts over more than two decades to merge the companies and realize cost savings from combining adjacent Nevada operations.
 Barrick will probably reach a merger agreement with Newmont at some point, said Patrick Chidley, a New York-based analyst at HSBC Securities USA Inc.
 In response, Barrick said that after Newmont signed a term sheet on the proposed merger, it tried to back out on agreements regarding the location of the new company’s headquarters in Toronto, the specific assets to be spun off after the deal, and the roles of the chairman, CEO and lead director.
 A spinoff of lower-quality assets is a vital part of a successful merger, said Jorge Beristain, an analyst at Deutsche Bank AG in Greenwich, Connecticut.
 A Homeland Security office monitors social media to detect naturally occurring health emergencies -- and “acts of malice,” SY.
 cable provider Comcast Corp’s proposed $452 billion merger with No.
 The group opposes the merger, saying it would give Comcast too much power over prices and distribution.
 Holcim jumped 69 percent after saying it has held advanced merger discussions with Lafarge, which surged 89 percent.
 The discussions between the world’s two largest cement makers may lead to a merger of equals, Holcim said in a statement.
 The obstacles to better and mandatory flight tracking are less about technology than whether improvements are worth the cost, since so few planes disappear, and about whether to upset a decades-old philosophy that pilots should be able to shut down electronic components in emergencies.
 Most airliners now are equipped with emergency locator beacons that don’t work under water and data recorders whose battery-powered homing signals will last only about 30 days.
 It would send a burst of data to satellites if a plane’s systems detected an emergency, said James Cash, the former chief technical adviser for recorders at the US.
 The Flight Safety Foundation, a non-profit group, and the International Air Transport Association, a Montreal-based industry group, last week endorsed some form of flight monitoring or emergency beacons.
 The plane-tracking system that received the highest total score for practicality and cost in the BEA’s analysis was a combination black-box recorder and emergency-locator beacon that would break away from a plane during a crash.
 The emergency-locator beacons transmit Global Positioning System coordinates to satellites once triggered, helping rescuers know within minutes where to hunt for wreckage, van den Heuvel said.
 They are assuming he has a lot of information” Firtash’s role in Russian gas exports became public in 2006, when Raiffeisen, after pressure from the US, revealed that it held, on behalf of Firtash and his partner, half of the Swiss company that had just emerged as Ukraine’s sole supplier.
 The merger must come with certain guarantees, CBS Corp.
 ease the approval process for its merger with Time Warner Cable Inc.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- Prelios SpA, the Italian asset manager studying a merger of two units with those of Fortress Investment Group LLC, said it expects Italian banks to sell as much as 50 billion euros ($69 billion) of bad loans in the next two-to-three years.
 Italian banks are sitting on 160 billion euros of non-performing loans, a figure that will swell to 200 billion euros in the next two years as Italy emerges from recession, according to Riccardo Serrini, chief executive officer of Prelios Credit Servicing SpA, a unit of Milan-based Prelios.
 The UniCredit and Banco Popolare businesses are complementary, he said, declining to comment on the value of the bids and whether Prelios would merge its NPL unit with UniCredit’s.
 “We’re running out of time interms of the battery life on the emergency locator beacon” The Haixun 01 detected a pulse with a frequency of 375kilohertz while searching in the southern Indian Ocean, China’sofficial Xinhua News Agency said yesterday.
 German-born Reitzle brings strategic merger experience following a successful $14 billion takeover as CEO of Linde AG.
 Reitzle will serve as chairman of the merged LafargeHolcim, as it will be called, while Lafont will be its chief executive officer.
 Holcim CEO Bernard Fontana will remain in his post until the merger is completed -- targeted for the first half of next year -- then will leave the company.
 “Holcim is about delegating to the regions” The companies say the merger will lead to cost savings of 14 billion euros ($19 billion) annually.
 Deliver Benefits “Big mergers do work out for a lot of people,” Nuno Fernandes, a finance professor at the Lausanne-based IMD business school, said by phone.
 “They only don’t work out on average for the buyers because they overpaid” Managers need to execute on promised savings and communicate quickly with the market and clients about the benefits of the merger, he said.
 For Lafont, the merger means relinquishing the combined titles of chairman and CEO, which he’s held for seven years, to become just the chief executive of the new company.
 said in February they are considering a three-way merger, while Redefine Properties Ltd.
 Growthpoint is exploring options to take control of the whole merged entity, Chief Executive Officer Norbert Sasse said in an e-mailed statement.
 expects Pfizer to approach the company again, or AstraZeneca could opt to merge with another peer such as Amgen Inc.
 “Everybody’s scrambling for these assets,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried in New York, said in a phone interview.
 AstraZeneca Options AstraZeneca may seek a merger of equals as a defense strategy against Pfizer or other potential suitors, according to Andrew Baum, a London-based analyst at Citigroup, noting that Amgen, with a market value of $89 billion, and AbbVie Inc, at $79 billion, both have cancer programs.
 Drugmakers have been using mergers to re-domicile in more attractive tax jurisdictions such as Ireland.
 Since then, Nigeria’s military has sought to contain the violence in the northeast of the country, with Jonathan declaring a state of emergency in three states in the region.
 is back in the megamerger game.
 “That price would have to begin with a 50 and not a 40” An acquisition of AstraZeneca would add to the $127 billion of mergers among pharmaceutical companies this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Firm News Kirkland Opens Houston Office With Hiring of M&A Attorney Calder Kirkland & Ellis LLP opened a Houston office, its seventh in the US, with the hiring of mergers-and-acquisitions specialist Andrew T.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Ghana’s central bank will probably keep its benchmark interest rate unchanged today to help support growth in the West African economy after tightening monetary policy at an emergency meeting two months ago.
 Altice, which has said the enlarged company created from a merger of its Numericable Group with the SFR phone company will have a valuation of 20 billion euros including debt, may still opt to keep its original offer unchanged, and remains in discussions with Vivendi based on that bid for now, the people said.
 A representative for Luxembourg-based Altice said the company is working on an agreement to merge Numericable with SFR within the framework of ongoing exclusive negotiations.
 The regulator said a plan could include a merger.
 Denmark has emerged as Scandinavia’s weakest economy after a 2008 property crash left many households struggling to service their debts.
 “CapitaLand is streamlining its business after its plan to merge its mall unit and divest its stake in Australand.
 “We need a longer period, because we know from experience that problems” at banks can “emerge with longer delays,” said Bailey, chief executive officer of the Prudential Regulation Authority and a deputy governor of the Bank of England.
 ‘Deeply Concerned’ The soy industry group is “deeply concerned about the proposed merger between ALL and Cosan,” Abiove said in the statement.
 and Lafarge SA start shedding assets across the world to complete their $40 billion merger, cement producers from Europe to the US.
 This merger is potentially a game-changer, so it’s going to focus a lot of minds on what the industry is going to look like” $11 Billion Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge confirmed their merger plans earlier this month after Bloomberg News first reported the discussions.
 Besides selling assets in Europe, where the companies are based, disposals also may take place in Canada, the US, Brazil, India and China, said Lafarge Chief Executive Officer Bruno Lafont, who will lead the merged entity.
 The merged entity would overtake Cemex, which was previously No.
 The government merged and renamed the banks in 2011 and started to liquidate the entity last year.
 complete their merger later this year.
 29 emergency move.
 “Emergency rate cuts would be a disaster,” Erkin Isik, a strategist at Turk Ekonomi Bankasi AS in Istanbul, said by e-mail yesterday.
 Emergency Meeting Basci raised the benchmark one-week repurchase rate to 10 percent from 45 percent following the January policy meeting after direct interventions in the currency market and increases in the average cost of funds for lenders failed to stem the lira’s slide to a record 239 per dollar.
 While Erdogan said another emergency session was needed to undo the increase, Basci said his preferred course was to monitor inflation and gradually decrease rates.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Cheniere Energy Inc’s Charif Souki emerged as the highest paid US.
 The probe includes an investigation of obstruction and illegal monetary transactions, and violations of the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, according to Assistant US.
 “Anything that results in having access to food products or the infrastructure that takes them from the farm to the port and out to sea, there’ll be demand for,” Neil Pathak, a Melbourne-based mergers and acquisition lawyer with Gilbert & Tobin, said in a phone interview.
 physical assets may mark the re-emergence of a “great merchant class” that formed in the 1990s around the time of Enron Corp, said Register of Sapient Global Markets.
 The purchase remains the biggest in the history of the firm, which is the world’s largest adviser on mergers and acquisitions in 11 of the past 13 years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 There isn’t an enormous demand to hedge because a lot of the people who would be natural hedgers have already bailed out’’ *** As we await the announcement of more sanctions on Russia, expected today, divisions have emerged over how strong the next actions should be and whether they should push beyond what the EU is proposing.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- Newmont Mining Corp, which is said to have held merger talks this month with Barrick Gold Corp, reported first-quarter earnings that beat analysts’ estimates as gold costs declined.
 There were also Drexel’s mergers and acquisitions alumni, who included Black, Josh Harris and Marc Rowan.
 Altice will pay 135 billion euros in cash and give Vivendi20 percent of the company created from a merger of itsNumericable Group with Vivendi’s SFR.
 Photographer: Balint Porneczi/Bloomberg Cable billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA will pay 135 billion euros in cash and give Vivendi SA 20 percent of the company created from a merger of its Numericable Group with Vivendi's French phone unit SFR.
 Read More Close Open Photographer: Balint Porneczi/Bloomberg Cable billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA will pay 135 billion euros in cash and give Vivendi SA 20 percent of the company created from a merger of its Numericable Group with Vivendi's French phone unit SFR.
 Altice has taken on “formal engagements to guaranteeemployment in the framework of this merger,” Drahi said in astatement.
 Antitrust Review Combining Numericable’s 17 million broadband users withSFR’s 21 million mobile-phone customers is less likely to leadto an extended antitrust review than Bouygues’s proposal becauseit involves a merger of landline with wireless assets, peoplefamiliar with the matter have said.
 The merger will also keepthe number of mobile-network operators in France to four.
 Holcim Ltdand Lafarge SA, the world’s two biggest cement makers, saidApril 4 they are in merger talks to create a company with $40billion in revenue.
 The transaction also represents a milestone in Europeancarriers’ push to merge in response to stricter regulations andincreased competition.
 Bouygues-Iliad? The French government will be “extremely vigilant” towhether Altice and Numericable will stick to their commitmentnot to cut jobs at SFR after the merger, Industry MinisterMontebourg said in a statement.
 and Lafarge SA -- the world’s two biggest cement makers with a combined market value of more than $50 billion -- are in advanced merger talks.
 The merger will likely spur even more deals as the companies are forced to sell off assets to appease regulators, according to Cantor Fitzgerald LP.
 “They don’t want to wait until the peak like we saw last time” The discussions between Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge “are based on principles consistent with a merger of equals which build on the strengths and identities of the two companies,” Holcim said in an e-mailed statement today.
 Holcim and Lafarge face antitrust hurdles to completing their merger, and regulators across the globe will likely require divestitures, according to Ian Osburn, a London-based analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald.
 assets that will be divested from the merger, said Osburn, who also sees Vulcan as a potential takeover target as the industry consolidates.
 Should the Holcim-Lafarge merger go forward, “there would have to be a large number of asset sales in quite a number of countries,” Osburn said in a phone interview, referring to Holcim-Lafarge.
 The brokerage said the management should revisit a potential merger between Suez and Veolia Environnement SA, the largest water utility in Europe.
 He received a bonus for meeting cost savings as a result of the 2010 merger of Stanley with Black & Decker.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks rose, rebounding from yesterday’s loss, as companies from Alstom SA to Telekom Austria AG rallied on mergers-and-acquisitions activity, while Russia resumed military drills along its border with Ukraine.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Hamburg Sued Group, Germany’s second biggest container shipping line, may revive merger plans with Hapag-Lloyd AG after a failed attempt to combine operations with its local peer last year.
 Hapag-Lloyd, Germany’s industry leader with a fleet of 151 vessels, turned to CSAV after talks to merge with Hamburg Sued failed more than a year ago because shareholders of both companies couldn’t agree on terms.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA, Brazil’s biggest phone company, sank to a record low as it prepared to price shares in a capital increase that’s part of its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 The Rio de Janeiro-based company is poised to move ahead with its merger with Portugal Telecom by completing a share sale today to raise at least 7 billion reais ($312 billion).
 1, the day before the merger was announced.
 “These two appointments are important steps and represent further investment in this strategically important region,” Bob Elfring and Diego De Giorgi, co-heads of Europe, Middle East and Africa corporate and investment banking, said in the memo  Bank of America, which ranks fifth in merger advice in Europe this year, has been hiring a handful of bankers in Europe including Kevin McLoughlin in insurance and Nikolaus Naerger for its corporate banking business in Germany, Austria and Switzerland.
 The bank also hired Birger Berendes as head of mergers for Germany, Austria and Switzerland from Greenhill.
 Many European businesses remain heavily indebted, which may force them to trim their portfolios and spin off units, according to Enrique Quemada, chief executive officer of OnetoOne Corporate Finance, a Madrid-based investment bank specializing in mergers and acquisitions.
 who sold units to focus on pharmaceuticals and made three attempts to merge before changing the company’s name to Wyeth, has died.
 in failed merger attempts before a $58 billion deal with Warner-Lambert Co.
 “He did so while consistently achieving impressive financial returns” American Home’s attempts to merge with Warner-Lambert, the maker of the cholesterol treatment Lipitor, followed its removal of two diet pills and one painkiller from the market and a $375 billion settlement of diet-pill litigation in 2000.
 The government and EU predict that Greece will emerge in 2014 from six years of recession and German Finance Minister Wolfgang Schaeuble last week said euro-area governments are discussing ways to boost growth in the bloc’s most indebted nation.
 The company, which was privatized by the state in 1995, merged with its Spanish counterpart Tabacalera in 1999 to form Altadis and was bought by Imperial Tobacco in 2007.
 “The merged company will be very well placed to take advantage of those opportunities” There may be assets available in Asia as North American producers divest projects in the region to focus on shale oil or shale gas options in the US, according to Emmett.
 Liberty offered to buy Barnes & Noble in 2011 for about $1 billion, spurring speculation that a takeover battle would emerge.
 The numbers aren’t comparable with the year-earlier period as the merger of copper producer Sterlite Industries (India) Ltd.
 HSH also is urging debtors to merge with other firms to prevent bankruptcy, while Commerzbank is leasing out some ships that borrowers had previously used as collateral to help reduce losses from lending that turned sour.
 after talks to merge the unit with Ladies’ Home Journal publisher Meredith Corp.
 private-equity firm in the country since it emerged from military rule three years ago.
 IMF Assistance The International Monetary Fund’s executive board will receive within days a staff report detailing Ukraine’s proposed loan program, in an effort to approve emergency financing by early May, a board official said.
 That merger was reversed last year in preparation for a sale.
 “And I don’t pretend to really understand them either” Munk, who is set to retire next week, said spinning off assets as part of a proposed merger with Newmont Mining Corp.
 The possibility that the brewer may consider selling its stake in Tsogo Sun increased after SABMiller merged the company with Gold Reef Resorts Ltd.
 financial system is growing as new online products emerge and weapons for hackers become more accessible, Comptroller of the Currency Thomas Curry said in a Sept.
 The Fed itself last year found a minor security breach on a website it uses to stay in touch with banks during emergencies.
 With the ouster of Levin and the arrival of Vigodman, there has also been speculation that Teva may be acquired, broken up or take part in a merger of equals.
 The deals come as Alibaba prepares for an IPO that may value the company at as much as $200 billion as it capitalizes on China’s emergence as an economic superpower.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- The merger of the United Arab Emirates’ two main stock exchanges may take place “very soon,” according to a Dubai government official, a move that will create the Middle East’s second-biggest bourse.
 The merger would further stimulate the economy, Mohammed Al Hashemi, chairman of the UAE Financial Markets Association, said in October.
 The UAE’s two biggest sheikhdoms completed due diligence on the potential merger at the end of last year, two people familiar with the matter said in February.
 “The industry is going through a major shift to software-defined networking so he certainly has plenty of work ahead of him” Suri has spent almost 20 years in Nokia’s networks business, dealing with strategy, mergers and acquisitions, sales and marketing before becoming its head in 2009.
 We expect Ebitda will stabilize in the near term and rise in the medium term” Telecoms Acquisitions The telecommunications industry is a favorite for mergers and acquisitions this year.
 ease the approval process for its merger with Time Warner Cable Inc.
 In the first step of today’s three-part agreement, Charter said it will buy 14 million Time Warner Cable customers for $73 billion after the merger of Comcast and Time Warner Cable closes.
 Charter shares climbed 77 percent to $14005 today, the highest closing price since the company emerged from Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection in 2009.
 “This transaction today gives federal, state, and local regulatory bodies early identification of our divestiture process, which we believe should be helpful in our efforts to gain approval for our merger with Time Warner Cable,” Brian Roberts, Comcast’s chief executive officer, said on a conference call today.
 “This convoluted transaction may change the final tally of subscribers under the proposed merger, but it can’t change the fact that this deal is a big loss for innovation and competition,” Matt Wood, policy director for advocacy group Free Press, said in an e-mailed statement.
 “This morning’s announcement is a win-win-win and moves us one step closer to completing our merger with Comcast,” Time Warner Cable said in an e-mailed statement.
 Lilly engaged in a famous, creepily amusing experiment which involved research assistant Margaret and a dolphin named Peter who lived together in a partially submerged house for several months.
 The strategy shift follows a decade of megamergers, including Sanofi’s $74 billion purchase of Aventis SA in 2004, Pfizer’s $64 billion purchase of Wyeth LLC in 2009, and four other deals since 2002 valued at $40 billion or more that consolidated the industry into today’s multinational giants.
 offered to merge with the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
 wireless carrier will provide mobile connections for Volvo services such as Internet radio, maps and Volvo On Call, which lets drivers remotely start up their cars and alerts the company’s emergency center if an airbag goes off.
 Marcus, who became Time Warner Cable’s CEO in January, stands to benefit from the merger with a hefty payout.
 The bidding war also marks a revival for gold-mining mergers and acquisitions.
 James River emerged from a previous bankruptcy in May 2004.
 Patriot emerged from Chapter 11 in December.
 called off merger talks that might’ve led to the largest mining-industry transaction since Glencore and Xstrata Ltd.
 merged in 2012, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “In the meantime, the company can lose ground and its key managers, so the value for creditors is reduced” Sophisticated Tools This year’s reforms, passed by French lawmakers last month, do provide more sophisticated tools to restructure companies’ debt, said Laurent Assaya, a restructuring and distressed mergers and acquisition specialist at law firm Jones Day based in Paris.
 In New Mexico, Presbyterian Health Plan, the insurance subsidiary of hospital system Presbyterian Healthcare Services, saw an increase in nonemergency cardiac and orthopedic surgeries after the beginning of the year, said Lisa Lujan, the president of the division.
 issued conflicting statements on merger talks with a competitor.
 In 2009, after polls forecast a close fight, Congress emerged with the largest tally in 20 years, lifting the Sensex by a record 17 percent.
 The all-cash transaction will add sales of 34 billion kroner from Frank Mohn’s range of submerged pumping systems and an order intake of 61 billion kroner, with higher margins than the Lund, Sweden-based company’s, Alfa Laval said today.
 “The price was definitely too expensive,” Senri Sasahara, chief executive officer of merger advisory firm Innovative Advisor Corp, said by phone in Tokyo.
 in 2012 and Excel Maritime Carriers Ltd, which filed last year and emerged from court protection Feb 14.
 Altice will pay 135 billion euros in cash and give Vivendi 20 percent of the company created from a merger of its Numericable Group with Vivendi’s SFR.
 Altice has taken on “formal engagements to guarantee employment in the framework of this merger,” Drahi said in a statement.
 Antitrust Review Combining Numericable’s 17 million broadband users with SFR’s 21 million mobile-phone customers is less likely to lead to an extended antitrust review than Bouygues’s proposal because it involves a merger of landline with wireless assets, people familiar with the matter have said.
 The merger will also keep the number of mobile-network operators in France to four.
 and Lafarge SA, the world’s two biggest cement makers, said April 4 they are in merger talks to create a company with $40 billion in sales.
 The transaction also represents a milestone in European carriers’ push to merge in response to stricter regulations and increased competition.
 The French government will be “extremely vigilant” to whether Altice and Numericable will stick to their commitment not to cut jobs at SFR after the merger, Industry Minister Montebourg said in a statement.
 In February, he complained about “this endless negotiation with the Swiss about their laws instead of implementing our laws” The Swiss government invoked emergency powers in 2009 to allow the one-time handover of account data from Zurich-based UBS.
 Since then, the government has said it won’t repeat such emergency measures, effectively drawing a line with the US.
 Prices in Canary Wharf, the redeveloped dockland that has emerged as London’s second business district, jumped 162 percent.
 may propose a $30 billion merger in June or July, and Dish Chairman Charlie Ergen has said he would be interested in acquiring T-Mobile if regulators block Sprint’s efforts.
 ‘Too Frothy’ While Ergen this month said DirecTV’s price was “too frothy” for him to make an offer that would compete with AT&T, he did approach White about a possible merger earlier in the year, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 unexpectedly forecast a drop in profit this year as the Japanese manufacturer projected declining revenue from its power and industrial systems businesses following a unit merger with Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd.
 The planned merger of cable rivals Comcast Corp.
 When Bloomberg News reported in March that Dish Chairman Charlie Ergen had approached DirecTV about a merger, some analysts said that AT&T would be a better suitor for his satellite-TV business and wireless spectrum.
 Dish or DirecTV “would probably like to be merged with or acquired by just about anybody,” Michael McCormack, a New York-based analyst at Jefferies Group LLC, said in a phone interview.
 A merger of DirecTV and Dish was blocked more than a decade ago.
 Comcast and Time Warner Cable, on the other hand, don’t compete head-to-head because they operate in different cities, potentially making their merger more palatable to regulators.
 ‘Staggering’ Synergies The synergies of a Dish-DirecTV merger would be “staggering,” according to Craig Moffett, founder of research firm MoffettNathanson LLC in New York.
 Verizon Option If Dish gets left out of this merger, being bought by Verizon is a possibility, S&P’s Amobi said.
 “There are only three outcomes that are attractive if you’re a Dish shareholder: You either merge with DirecTV, you sell to AT&T, or you sell to Verizon,” Moffett said in a phone interview.
 Squire Sanders Chairman Jim Maiwurm said that “substantially everyone will be joining” the merged firm, except for a few who may have conflicts or “don’t feel comfortable” with the deal.
 The merger is expected to take effect by June 1, Squire Sanders said.
 The combination is part of a trend of “continuing robust merger activity” in 2014 after a “banner year” in 2013, according to data compiled by law firm consultancy Altman Weil.
 The organization reported 88 law firm mergers last year, up from 60 in both 2011 and 2012.
 and Delphi Automotive Systems LLC won a delay of four lawsuits by Texas customers over accidents in recalled cars as a panel of judges granted the companies’ emergency requests.
 Some compared such a situation to Bear Stearns Cos, which was battered by doubts about its strength in 2008, leading to its emergency sale to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “But its application will change” Instead of relying on diesel for continuous power, generators will increasingly be used as an emergency energy source, similar to markets such as the US.
 More than two years after discounter Iliad became France’s fourth network operator, resulting in price cuts and hurting profits across the industry, French carriers are seeking to merge.
 The United Nations Security Council held an emergency meeting at Russia’s request.
 CDP is looking for new deals as Italy emerges from its longest recession since World War II.
 and Shearman & Sterling LLP to study alternatives including “a possible sale or merger of the company; the sale, spin-off or other separation of selected businesses” The company, which has a market value of $93 billion and canceled its investor meeting tomorrow, said that “no decision has been made” and the board’s exploration of alternatives may end with no deal.
 Sikorsky emerged as the sole bidder in the latest round after other companies considered and then dropped plans to compete.
 When Read began to respond, Binley cut him off: “You answer my question, sir, don’t answer yours” ‘Breaking Down’ Robin Walker, another Conservative, suggested that the proposed merger was “the last hurrah of a business model that’s fundamentally breaking down” Binley focused on Pfizer’s record in Sweden, where Prime Minister Fredrik Reinfeldt has said the country had “negative experiences” after the New York-based company bought Pharmacia Corp.
 ‘Too Small’ “Alstom Transport is simply too small” to face Chinese, Japanese, Korean and Canadian competitors if it doesn’t merge with Siemens’s rail business, de Maistre said.
 Sulzberger has denied that Abramson’s compensation wasn’t comparable with Keller’s, and in his statement said “a shallow and factually incorrect storyline has emerged” around the firing.
 Yesterday’s order “means the merger won’t get stalled and the process can now be initiated,” said Ranjit Kapadia, an analyst at Centrum Broking Pvt.
 “The high court has clearly separated the merger from the insider trading allegations” India’s biggest broker group in April said it would ask regulators to probe the trades that occurred before the deal was made public.
 Instead, growth slowed, signs of disinflation emerged in Europe and tensions between Ukraine and Russia sparked demand for the safety of fixed-income assets.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Morgan Stanley, the top-ranked merger adviser so far this year, hired Barclays Plc’s Brad Whitman for its financial institutions banking group.
 bank as a vice chairman in that group, after serving as Barclays’s head of financial institutions mergers and acquisitions, according to an internal Morgan Stanley memo.
 Newman Lowther is a corporate finance and merger adviser that started an exclusive partnership with Nomura Holdings Inc.
 Reynolds is in advanced talks to acquire Lorillard in a possible three-way transaction that could see BAT backing the merger, Reuters reported yesterday.
 pursues a merger.
 before the companies merged last year.
 ‘Direct Investments’ Temasek is set up as a holding company, and mergers and acquisitions “is where its expertise lies,” said Enrico Soddu, an analyst at the Sovereign Wealth Center.
 Soddu added that the increase in transactions this year “is not surprising” because they will mainly stem from the two large deals by Temasek and also because 2013 was a “relatively quiet year” The total value of the 184 direct investments by sovereign wealth funds in 2013 reached $435 billion, 23 percent less from the previous year in value, mainly in line with a drop in cross-border mergers and acquisitions, according to the data.
 “The mix of our portfolio may change from time to time, not to fit any target that we have, but to cater to new opportunities that emerge” Temasek’s holdings jumped to a record S$215 billion in the year ended March 2013, as surging global stock markets bolstered assets.
 to oversee its mergers and acquisitions team in Europe, the Middle East and Africa as Switzerland’s largest bank overhauls management of the business.
 The short-lived dispute flared in the middle of United’s effort to create a single collective bargaining contract for attendants at the two carriers that merged in 2010 to create parent United Continental Holdings Inc.
 The carrier’s management has had an often-fractious relationship with the union representing pre-merger United attendants since the Continental deal.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Tesco Plc, the UK’s largest grocer, said it will focus on its better performing stores in Turkey after the collapse of merger talks there, suggesting it may close some of its more than 190 stores in the country.
 “That’s an abuse of market power” Schaeffer and other critics of the merger testified as the Justice Department and Federal Communications Commission consider Comcast’s $452 billion proposal in February to acquire Time Warner Cable.
 “This merger is very likely illegal,” Grunes said.
 Consumer Benefits Cohen defended the merger as providing the company the scale needed to make investments leading to more reliable service and faster Internet speeds for consumers.
 “I wouldn’t expect it to derail the merger” Netflix, the largest subscription streaming service, agreed this year to pay Verizon Communications Inc.
 Netflix said in an April letter to shareholders that it opposes the merger because the combined company would gain leverage “to charge arbitrary interconnection tolls for access to their customers” Budding Opposition Cogent, based in Washington, joins Netflix, of Los Gatos, California, among the few companies publicly opposing the deal.
 After the merger, Philadelphia-based Comcast would provide access to 33 percent of US.
 Comcast dropped Rural Media’s RFD-TV in Colorado and New Mexico after its merger with NBCUniversal, he said.
 “Up until now it’s been relatively difficult to get opponents of the merger to come forth,” Bert Foer, president of the Washington-based American Antitrust Institute that opposes the deal, said in an interview.
 “Then we’ll get a bonus with consolidation” He expects that Liberty Global will be acquired by Vodaphone Group Plc and that the merged companies may then be bought by AT&T Inc.
 In the film, Godzilla is pitted against two huge cockroach-like beasts that emerge, bent on destruction, 15 years after the troubling events at a Japanese nuclear plant.
 “Like many races, the leaders change, and in the case of LNG terminals, there is more than one jockey on each horse, and there will be project mergers down the road,” according to the AltaCorp report.
 During apartheid, black people weren’t allowed to buy clear or full-strength beer, leading to the emergence of illegal bars known as shebeens.
 The list would be held under confidentiality provisions by the State Geologist, to be released to first responders and medical personnel in the event of an emergency, the newspaper said.
 Read said the merger would result in job cuts and a reduction in total R&D spending.
 The bank, which posted a record 15 billion-euro loss in the fourth quarter as it increased provisions and revalued companies it acquired, is targeting 2 billion euros of net income in 2014 as Italy emerges from its longest recession in decades.
 During his tenure, Richardson Securities of Canada merged with Greenshields Inc.
 if its merger with Sprint Corp.
 While a DirecTV merger is also tempting, the satellite-TV rival is too expensive to pursue, Ergen said today on a conference call to discuss first-quarter earnings.
 The chief executive officer of Deutsche Telekom AG, which owns T-Mobile, said earlier today that he doubts a merger of T-Mobile and Sprint could win regulatory approval anytime soon.
 Plot Twist Bloomberg News reported in March that Ergen contacted DirecTV to discuss a merger.
 A merger between AT&T and DirecTV would make more sense strategically than financially and would leave Dish in a good position, Ergen said today.
 Raines was forced out two years later after it emerged that reporter Jayson Blair had fabricated stories.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- Heineken NV, the world’s third-biggest brewer, said it plans to merge its two units in Nigeria, pooling the country’s industry leader with the no.
 Nigerian Breweries will remain listed after the merger, it said.
 Now that earnings season is over, there’s a clear picture of which groups of number crunchers emerged with reputations so bruised they look like they’ve been riding the elevator with Beyonce’s sister.
 “Alstom Transport is simply too small” to face Chinese, Japanese, Korean and Canadian competitors if it doesn’t merge with Siemens’s rail business, de Maistre said.
 companies’ ability to move their legal addresses out of the country for tax purposes through mergers.
 “No meaningful and coherent opposition force emerged from Gezi and while polarization remains deep, Erdogan has shown he can successfully exploit it to his party’s benefit,” Wolfango Piccoli, managing director at Teneo Intelligence in London, said by e-mail yesterday.
 Carmakers are introducing smarter dashboard navigation systems, adding features such as real-time traffic information and automated calls to emergency services in case of accident.
 “Any merger of this magnitude is disruptive and that’s why we would want to discuss strategy, the operating model and how we would go about merging these companies, if we ever get to this” Pfizer would try to protect AstraZeneca’s most valuable products in a takeover and wouldn’t jeopardize the pipeline, Read said to the Science and Technology committee today.
 US Airways merged with American in December, although it continues to fly under the US Airways name.
 announced plans to merge with Time Warner Cable Inc, forcing AT&T to focus on the lucrative, though shrinking, US.
 Comcast Deal Now, Stephenson is responding to Comcast’s $45 billion agreement to merge with Time Warner Cable to create an even larger cable provider, underscoring the need for national scale.
 AT&T’s deal for DirecTV would merge the second-largest US.
 If DirecTV isn’t able to renew its exclusive rights to NFL Sunday Ticket on terms discussed between AT&T and DirecTV, then AT&T can call off the merger.
 faces investor opposition, said the A$800 million ($748 million) merger will help the Australian company add assets in Malaysia and Indonesia.
 We will be able to actively pursue more opportunities in the region” The merged Australian oil and gas company would eventually consider having its shares trade on an Asian stock exchange, Roc Chairman Mike Harding said in the interview.
 It’s a question of fiduciary duty” A 55-year-old engineer, Piou became CEO of the company after Gemplus International SA and Axalto Holding NV agreed to merge in 2005.
 The emergence of regional markets accessible by pipeline “has pushed the need for LNG into a later phase of development versus our earlier plans,” Chief Executive Officer Charles Davidson said.
 “We’ll have a strong summer” TUI is cutting costs and is increasingly selling vacation packages directly to customers as Europe emerges from the longest recession since introducing a common currency.
 Without state money for the Democratic city, the court-mediated deal would likely collapse, leaving a plan by Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr to exit bankruptcy vulnerable to litigation and increasing the likelihood that US.
 “The British competition merger regime is non-political in the way it is applied, I think that’s valued in that Britain is open in that respect,” said Cable, a member of Cameron’s Liberal Democratic junior coalition partner.
 The prime minister responded that day by describing these as “robust assurances,” and saying that “any merger is a decision for both companies” Miliband, in contrast, told the BBC that Pfizer’s promises were “pretty weak” Cable said that “obviously there is a lot of small print to study the question about how these obligations are binding” ‘Substantive Assessment’ Miliband wrote a letter to Cameron yesterday to set out his concerns, saying a more thorough review is needed to determine if the takeover is in Britain’s economic interest.
 It’s a crapshoot” Resilient Industry Florida has taken measures to improve its response to supply disruptions, by strengthening port security and efforts to reopen ports and roads after natural disasters, Bryan Koon, director of the state’s Division of Emergency Management, said by telephone from Tallahassee on May 5.
 Exane BNP Paribas said the report may spark mergers and acquisitions in the industry.
 and part of the team that oversaw the carrier’s merger with Continental Airlines Inc, GM said.
 The benchmark gauge has risen 51 percent since April 15 amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity and the European Central Bank’s pledge to ease monetary policy next month if necessary.
 Parsley to take control of more than 100 wells Parsley retained when the business he co-founded, Parker & Parsley, merged with another company to form Pioneer Natural Resources in 1997, according to regulatory filings.
 The division advises on mergers and acquisitions, and capital-raising activities such as initial public offerings.
 Hayashi became deputy president of Mizuho’s corporate banking unit in April last year, three months before it merged with the retail lending arm to form Mizuho Bank.
 Traders are betting that an even higher offer will emerge for Hillshire and that its plans to buy Pinnacle are probably dead.
 Big Goal Valeant built itself into a dealmaker through its 2010 merger with Biovail Corp.
 “Is this built for the long haul? That’s something I have real concerns about” Buying Spree Following the Biovail merger, Valeant bought more than 30 businesses and boosted its stock price 469 percent to a record on Feb.
 In February, a lower court stripped the government of many of the powers provided by a state of emergency called to deal with the protests.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- General Motors LLC and Delphi Automotive Systems LLC asked the Texas Supreme Court to merge four driver-injury suits tied to faulty ignition switches into one state case, just as it earlier moved to combine litigation over the loss of value tied to cars recalled due to the defect.
 The split would end the monopoly of Saudi Electricity, created after the merger of the kingdom’s power companies in 2000, and with a market value of about $18 billion.
 The merger through an all-stock transaction with Sabine Oil & Gas, announced today, would make the combined business one of the biggest operators in East Texas.
 jobs and “intellectual asset stripping” ‘The Beast’ “The head of the beast, the central management of the new merged entity, will be in the US.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- The bankruptcies, mergers and jet-fuel shocks that rocked US.
 quartet emerged at the top of rankings compiled by Bloomberg that included airline-specific gauges such as the share of occupied seats.
 At the same time, “much like products, whether it be tobacco or other industries people may not like, they are starting to make money” Filling Seats Airlines such as Delta and Chicago-based United have held capacity little changed or even retrenched since their mergers.
 Telefonica’s separate plan to merge its German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus is another tie-up that’s testing how far regulators are willing to allow consolidation in the telecommunications industry.
 Alibaba Group, which rode China’s emergence as an economic superpower over the last 15 years to become a massive online marketplace, filed yesterday for what could become the largest US.
 Home sales have been slow to emerge from a slump early this year.
 As well as covering the hearing, they’ll be breaking down the size of the combined company by the numbers, explaining the principles of an unrestricted Internet known as net neutrality that’s lurking behind the merger, and examining Comcast’s playbook in its effort to get the deal cleared by lawmakers and regulators.
 If a company faces a merger review in three EU countries, it can ask the Brussels-based commission to handle the case.
 “Depending on where Facebook would have had to file, it may feel safer with dealing with the sophisticated, unbiased” commission merger people, Matthew Hall, a lawyer at McGuire Woods LLP in Brussels, who isn’t involved with the case, said in an e-mail.
 In addition to antitrust issues, the merger has sparked concerns about privacy as data-protection regulators question how the mobile-messaging startup’s client data will be used.
 emerged from a severe winter.
 “No data is negative data,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 The CEO targets completing the merger of the Italian and US.
 They announced merger talks in February.
 Spokesman at both firms didn’t immediately return e-mails sent after regular business hours seeking comment on the merger talks.
 The benchmark gained for a third straight week last week amid a flurry of mergers-and-acquisitions announcements.
 business, while Brown told the Irish Times in March that RBS hired Morgan Stanley to advise on potential merger opportunities in the Republic of Ireland.
 He also cited speculation that Ulster Bank may merge with Permanent TSB Group Holdings Plc.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Thai soldiers arrested a former education minister as he was being interviewed in Bangkok by foreign reporters after he emerged from hiding to criticize last week’s coup.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Orange SA and Bouygues SA are exploring a potential combination after French Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg called for the country’s mobile-phone companies to merge.
 “What I can tell you is that the government favors and encourages the return to three operators” More than two years after discounter Iliad SA became France’s fourth network operator, resulting in price cuts and hurting profits across the industry, carriers are seeking to merge.
 “All market operators are looking at hypotheses, opportunities, work sharing, partnerships and commercial exchanges” Antitrust Concern In a joint letter to Prime Minister Manuel Valls yesterday, representatives of the CFE-CGC union at Orange and Bouygues Telecom called for the carriers to merge to save jobs.
 Such a merger will likely attract intense scrutiny by antitrust regulators.
 “Action on any merger is a decision for both companies.
 Smith & Nephew Plc climbed 17 percent to 1,046 pence for a fourth day of gains as UBS AG added the stock to a list of companies to watch for mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Kmart merged with Sears Roebuck in 2005 in a $123 billion takeover -- a deal that Lampert said would create a company with enough scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 The Times of India newspaper reported in January that the two online retailers were in talks for a merger.
 We will emerge from this situation a stronger company” GM has said heavy key rings or jarring can cause ignition switches on some cars to slip out of the “on” position, cutting off power and deactivating air bags.
 “We’re not waiting for trends to emerge” Valukas Investigation Barra has asked Valukas, who served as the Justice Department’s examiner of the downfall of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc, to help lead the automaker’s internal probe of the recall along with GM General Counsel Michael Millikin.
 From 1975 to 1977, he was detained for protesting the Congress party’s imposition of emergency rule, during which civil liberties were curbed.
 It would bolster an existing industry cap prohibiting mergers that create a bank with more than 10 percent of US.
 Deutsche Boerse Says Court Hearing on Merger Ban Set for June 4 Deutsche Boerse AG’s challenge to the European Commission’s ban on its plans to merge with NYSE Euronext will be heard by the European Union’s General Court on June 4, spokesman Frank Herkenoff said in phone call May 9.
 Deutsche Boerse asked an EU court June 16 to overturn a ban on its planned merger with NYSE Euronext, saying regulators made errors when reviewing the deal that would have created the world’s biggest exchange.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Rainfall in Serbia abated, helping emergency workers begin the muddy cleanup from deadly floods that inundated whole towns and farms and prompted the country to seek worldwide aid in food, medicine and building materials.
 “The situation is under control” and the state of emergency will be lifted by week’s end, Premier Minister Aleksandar Vucic said.
 “We have a large number of victims and it will be even greater when the waters retreat” Serbia declared a state of emergency on May 15 after the worst rainfall since records began to be kept 127 years ago triggered floods leaving 19 dead in the largest former Yugoslav republic, 17 in neighboring Bosnia and two in Croatia.
 Paul Parker, 50, the bank’s head of mergers and acquisitions, is expected to quit, the Financial Times reported on its website yesterday, citing people familiar with the bank.
 Barclays ranks seventh in stock underwriting and fourth in merger advice in the US.
 Recession Concern Five years after Zimbabwe emerged from recession, ended hyperinflation by abandoning its local currency and spurred farming production, the economy is at risk of contraction again.
 A demerger of Telco, set up in 2007 as Telecom Italia sought to fend off a takeover bid by AT&T Inc.
 Before the gifts scandal emerged in the Virginia and Washington media, McDonnell, 59, was often mentioned as a potential Republican presidential candidate for 2016, attractive in part because of Virginia’s swing-state status.
 The country is waiting to see which Modi will emerge: the Hindu activist faulted for failing to stop 2002 anti-Muslim riots or the business-friendly son of a tea vendor who is focused on reviving Asia’s third-biggest economy.
 “If there’s even a hint of communal tensions in the country, all eyes will be on him to see which Modi emerges” BJP spokesman Prakash Javadekar blamed concerns of rising nationalism under Modi on “Congress propaganda” Modi will represent all of India, not just the Hindu majority, Javadekar said on May 14.
 In their letter, the governors included six questions, saying they wanted information to better understand how Pfizer’s potential merger would affect their states and the role they play in the pharmaceutical industry.
 Their list included questions about how many jobs would be cut or relocated from Maryland and Delaware as a result of any transaction, about future investment in the states and plans for splitting a merged company into different businesses.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- Lafarge SA, the French cement maker that plans to merge with Holcim Ltd.
 The French company is looking to wrap up its merger with Holcim by the first half of 2015.
 The United Nations Security Council is preparing to hold an emergency meeting at Russia’s request.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen has contacted El Segundo, California-based DirecTV to discuss a merger of the two satellite-TV companies.
 A merger of DirecTV and Dish was blocked more than a decade ago.
 “The exchange is taking this action following a decision by the board of directors of CBSX to cease trading activity on NSX, if the NSX’s trading volume does not materially increase or a purchaser does not emerge,” NSX said in an informational circular today.
 Demand for sovereign bonds was also bolstered by the risk that conflict may escalate in Ukraine after casualties among separatist militias prompted Russia to call for “emergency” measures.
 Ring Tones Vringo was a company that sold telephone ring tones before it merged with Innovate/Protect, which owned the Lycos patents.
 Financial firms are poised to boost assets under management and benefit from an increase in mergers and acquisitions, and independents facing fewer regulations may win business from larger banks, Johnson said.
 The report found that advisers in mergers and acquisitions may see their bonus pool expand by as much as 15 percent.
 government stepped in with emergency funding in 2008.
 The merged business will be run from the Netherlands by the leasing company’s management team.
 Rules reserving airwaves for smaller companies might disappear if Sprint and T-Mobile propose a merger, Paul Gallant, Washington-based managing director for Guggenheim Securities, said in an April 23 note.
 Today’s merger notice didn’t provide further details.
 It’s something we will have to deal with for a while because I don’t see it going away right away” The United Nations Security Council held an emergency meeting on Ukraine today after the country sent armored vehicles and artillery to retake Slovyansk, defying a demand by Russian President Vladimir Putin to pull back troops.
 “Such assets as Uralkali rarely go on sale” Uralchem isn’t considering a merger at present.
 “We are not in the discussions for the time being on the merger of the two companies,” he said.
 gained 13 percent after saying it would save more money from its merger with Aastra Technologies Ltd.
 “Pfizer needs to come back to convince shareholders to get the board to engage them,” said Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried in New York.
 “This is a scenario that’s emerged in the aerospace industry and it could happen in trains, but it’s too early to say,” Troger said.
 Amado Yanez, 49, is under police supervision while recovering in a hospital after undergoing emergency surgery last week, Mexico’s attorney general said today in an e-mailed statement.
 No Emergency There was no sign of an emergency or tension in the cockpit in five recordings of radio contacts with controllers.
 Aircraft designers and aviation regulators currently give pilots the option of cutting power to electronic devices in case of a fire or another emergency.
 “We will emerge as a clear winner and best in class in the AQR exercise” Intesa is close to completing a transaction with KKR & Co.
 in New York Iovine’s Overture The deal had been anticipated, after news of Apple’s talks with Beats emerged earlier this month.
 “We’re not serial mergers and acquirers,” Frazier said in an interview after his Whitehouse Station, New Jersey-based based company announced it had sold its over-the-counter business to Bayer AG for $142 billion.
 “Merck did the Schering-Plough merger in 2009,” Frazier said, referring to a $47 billion deal.
 “Before that the last major merger Merck did was with Sharpe & Dohme in 1953” That deliberateness is -- for some investors -- part of the problem.
 Easy to Overlook Even a $142 billion deal is easy to overlook in the frenzy of mergers and acquisitions going on.
 Informed that “any kind” now could mean a $100 billion megamerger like Pfizer’s, he scaled back.
 Gap is investing $300 million in technology over the next three years as it merges online and in-store services to provide features including self checkouts and Internet reservations for store pickup.
 As competition intensifies with proposals in Australia and Mozambique, Canada is poised to bring online at most two projects by the end of the decade, Jeff Lyons, a partner at Deloitte LLP who runs the company’s mergers and acquisitions advisory business from Calgary, said today at the conference.
 The benchmark has still rallied 53 percent from a low on April 15 as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said officials are ready to ease monetary policy at their June meeting if necessary.
 The plan was negotiated by Detroit’s emergency financial manager, Kevyn Orr, who was previously a partner at Jones Day, where he helped shepherd Chrysler Group LLC through its bankruptcy.
 Margules, formerly a partner at Wilmington, Delaware-based litigation boutique Bouchard Margules & Friedlander PA, joined Ballard Spahr LLP as a partner and a member of the litigation department and the firm’s commercial litigation, appellate and mergers and acquisitions/private equity groups.
 The company bought control of Satyam in 2009 and then merged with it in the middle of last year in an 899 billion-rupee ($15 billion) transaction.
 The merger made Tech Mahindra the fifth-largest Indian software exporter by revenue.
 Sales for the year that ended March 31, the first full year after the merger, are estimated to have been 1876 billion rupees, more than double the 12 months before, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Bankruptcy Judge Robert Gerber to tell the owners that damages stemming from before the company’s collapse are barred under his rulings in 2009, when GM emerged from Chapter 11.
 It includes requirements for more crash-resistant rail cars, restrictions on the speeds trains may travel and provisions on emergency response to rail accidents, he said.
 Before that Warmstein was a merger adviser at Credit Suisse First Boston.
 Deals Frenzy About $118 billion of health-care mergers and acquisitions were announced or proposed last month, a record, according to data compiled by Bloomberg that dates back to 2002.
 HSBC also hired Jason Rynbeck, the former Asia-Pacific vice-chairman for mergers and acquisitions at Barclays Plc, as head of mergers and acquisitions in the region, two people with knowledge of the matter said today.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- The question that’s always nagged at us about activist investing emerges today in a story by Peggy Collins and Noah Buhayar, who got Bill Ackman and Carl Icahn to respond to the disdain Warren Buffett and Charles Munger expressed over the weekend for their style of play: Are these activist investors really in it for the good of shareholders or are they in it for their own gains? When you’re the type who schemes to seize control of a company, secretly acquires an influential stake in it, then announces in a surprise that you’re delivering the company into the hands of its aggressors from that inside position -- basically, you’re a Trojan horse -- that doesn’t really have the ring of selflessness to it.
 is akin to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac because taxpayers would shoulder the burden of its rescue in an emergency, rather than let it collapse.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- The banks working on the largest advertising merger in history will probably miss out on the bulk of $70 million in fees after Publicis Groupe SA and Omnicom Group Ltd.
 Paris-based Publicis and New York-based Omnicom yesterday announced they would end discussions on the $35 billion merger they announced in July of last year as they couldn’t overcome obstacles.
 Unlike law firms, which typically bill by the hour, investment banks advising on mergers generally receive substantial fees only if deals are completed.
 Just four months after the chief executive officer of Publicis SA agreed to a $35 billion merger with Omnicom Group Inc.
 We are divorcing before getting married” Levy said the deal fell apart because it felt more like a takeover by Omnicom than what was billed as a merger of equals.
 Other disagreements emerged over the chief operating officer and general counsel positions, the people said.
 Levy kept up a brave face in public until very recently, saying in an April 17 interview with Bloomberg Television he was confident the companies would win antitrust approvals to complete the merger.
 “It will be a very long time before I try to do a merger of equals again,” Wren said.
 Steel computers, including servers used for emergency response, network monitoring, network security,” and mobile devices, according to the indictment.
 The benchmark has climbed for the last three weeks amid an increase in mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 A “less secure near-term outlook” has emerged for EDF, HSBC analysts including Adam Dickens wrote today in a note, cutting the stock to neutral from overweight.
 News Squire Sanders Suspends Vote on Patton Boggs Merger, WSJ Says Squire Sanders LLP suspended its merger vote with Patton Boggs LLP, according to the Wall Street Journal, which confirmed the news with a Squire Sanders spokesman.
 “We delivered in the first quarter of 2014 $85 million in savings, bringing the total to $275 million since the merger” Sales volumes rose 13 percent after discounting for the colder weather.
 Telefonica’s separate plan to merge its German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus is another tie-up that’s testing how far regulators are willing to allow consolidation in the telecommunications industry.
 The merger will create a company with a presence in 210 markets and more than 3,900 theaters, according to National CineMedia.
 It rose to a six-year high on May 13 as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said officials are ready to ease monetary policy at their June meeting if necessary.
 A coalition led by Social Democrats and the Green Party, which enjoys as much as 15 percentage points more voter support than Prime Minister Fredrik Reinfeldt’s tax-cutting government, says the mandate of the world’s oldest central bank is up for review after Sweden emerged from the crisis with Scandinavia’s highest jobless rate.
 The CEO has used dividends and repurchases to reward shareholders who’ve helped recapitalize AIG as the company emerged from the US.
 ‘Formidable Competitor’ The merged entity will have sales in excess of $7 billion and be the market leader in countries such as France and Austria.
 The equity benchmark rallied 63 percent from a low on April 15 to a record 9,75443 yesterday as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said officials are ready to ease monetary policy in June if necessary.
 “But it is way too early to claim victory or count your chickens” The 44-story Liberty Street tower, located on the Hudson riverfront, emerged as a favorite after BNY Mellon also considered space in new skyscrapers at the World Trade Center site, according to the person with knowledge of the discussions.
 Chairman Lee Kun Hee, who leads Asia’s biggest technology company and helps generate about a quarter of South Korea’s economic output, remains hospitalized in stable condition after emergency surgery following a heart attack.
 Combes, who took over last year, is focusing on innovation to turn around the company after years of losses following the 2006 merger of Alcatel SA and Lucent Technologies Inc.
 Typically, a merger results in cost reductions equivalent to about 10 percent of the target’s global sales, Wenner said.
 He also said the board’s sales procedure was “fundamentally flawed” “Not only did the board fail to run a full and fair sales process on the front-end of the transaction, it ensured no competing bid would emerge on the back-end as well,” according to the complaint.
 30 after Chairman Sergio Marchionne merged Turin, Italy-based Iveco producer Fiat Industrial with its CNH agricultural and construction-equipment division.
 Regulators would intensify a crackdown on insider trading, look at improving delisting rules, encourage fair competition for investors to participate in mergers and acquisitions, and develop commodities trading tools such as options.
 Corporate-client solutions includes mergers advisory, capital markets and financing for companies, financial institutions and private-equity firms.
 Deals Experience Hanning, a lawyer by training, joined UBS from Morgan Stanley in 2006 as head of mergers and acquisitions for the Asia-Pacific region.
 He has been based in Hong Kong since 2004, and advised on more than 50 initial public offerings, financings and mergers, according to a profile provided by the Swiss bank.
 4 as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said policy makers are ready to ease monetary policy.
 The deal could take the form of a three-way transaction involving British American Tobacco Plc, which would take a “major role” in backing the merger, Reuters said.
 “We don’t know precisely what, if any, transaction could emerge, but we suspect that assuming one does it will be advantageous for BAT,” Adam Spielman, an analyst at Citigroup Inc.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- The pace of mergers and acquisitions in Europe’s $11 trillion chemical industry is poised to catch up with the bonanza of deals seen in areas such as drugs and manufacturing gear.
 The Swiss government won’t resort to emergency laws to help Credit Suisse, Schweiz am Sonntag reported yesterday, citing comments by Swiss Finance Minister Eveline Widmer-Schlumpf to politicians at closed-door talks on May 16.
 “The removal of Ziggo as an autonomous player could increase the likelihood that the remaining competitors, in particular the merged entity and KPN, would coordinate their competitive behavior and increase prices or delay investments,” the EU said.
 Opinion polls through mid-April, the latest available, signaled the BJP would emerge as the largest party in the lower house of parliament while falling short of a majority.
 Hertz, a law partner in the mergers and acquisitions and private equity groups at New York-based Debevoise & Plimpton LLP, where he worked for almost three decades, has died.
 The group will also draw up a plan to deliver emergency supplies to countries like Ukraine that may face shortages, Italy’s Federica Guidi said.
 Chief Executive Officer Ken Moelis, 55, a Wall Street veteran who founded the firm in 2007, took the company public amid an increase in mergers and acquisitions.
 Tribune emerged from bankruptcy at the end of 2012 with creditors Oaktree Capital Management LP, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “If you are smaller, the big two do not react as aggressively” Billionaire Masayoshi Son, who controls Sprint and has met resistance from regulators skeptical about a merger with T-Mobile US Inc, has been trying to recast the potential combination as being beneficial for consumers.
 Suez Environnement was spun off from Suez SA in 2008 when that company merged with French monopoly gas supplier Gaz de France SA to form GDF Suez.
 “It’s good that despite the long preparation for the sale, those in charge have now pulled the emergency brake at the last minute and stopped the sale,” Gerhard Schick, finance policy spokesman in Parliament for the opposition Green party, said in an e-mailed statement.
 If regulators decide to block a merger of Sprint and T-Mobile US Inc, “then T-Mobile would have strategic interest to us,” Ergen said yesterday on a conference call to discuss first-quarter earnings.
 Hoettges told reporters last week he’s pessimistic about the chances of authorities approving such a merger in the near term.
 “We believe the market has spoken, and that shareholders see substantial value in the merger proposal,” Pershing Square said in its regulatory filing, urging Allergan’s board to “promptly engage in good faith discussions with Valeant” on merging.
 Indictment RosUkrenergo, a Swiss company Firtash set up with Gazprombank, emerged as Ukraine’s sole gas importer in 2006-2009, between two Gazprom shutoffs that led to shortages across Europe, where Russia has 30 percent of the market.
 Goldman Sachs was the top-ranked adviser on mergers and acquisitions involving technology, media and telecommunications companies last year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 We will emerge from this situation a stronger company” Systemic Issues GM hasn’t fully complied with a request by NHTSA to answer 107 questions related to the recall.
 “The plan must include detailed information describing the steps the company is taking to enable it to repay its convertible senior debt holders and continue operations as a going concern in the event its pending merger with ACP Re Ltd.
 “The companies will have to sell Uniasselvi, because the biggest issues were on long-distance courses” The all-stock merger, the result of a year of negotiations, will create a company with more than 1 million students in universities, post-graduate classes and long-distance courses.
 The merger should close within two months, Carlos Lazar, Kroton investor relations director, said.
 Teva rallied 32 percent in the first quarter of 2014 as the company said it was making progress in its push to maintain Copaxone market share and a boom in mergers and acquisitions in the pharmaceutical industry lifted investors’ growth expectations.
 Vallares that year agreed to merge with Genel, the biggest oil and gas operator in Kurdistan.
 The chemicals have been on the market for two decades, though lower-toxicity neonics such as clothianidin, marketed by Bayer as Poncho, emerged a decade ago and opened the door to widespread use in corn and soybeans, the two largest US.
 4 amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity and as ECB President Mario Draghi said policy makers are ready to ease monetary policy if necessary.
 Emergency Rule The kidnapping sparked international outrage, and a global campaign to free the girls has been joined by US.
 Jonathan yesterday asked parliament to extend a year-old state of emergency in three northeastern states where Boko Haram, which means “western education is a sin” in the Hausa language, has focused its attacks.
 “Both are some of the largest mergers in our nation’s telecommunications history,” Matsui said today at a House Energy and Commerce subcommittee hearing about FCC oversight.
 Eshoo asked, “Can anyone here today piece together the effects of the Comcast-Time Warner merger and the AT&T-DirecTV merger on consumers and a free and open Internet?” “These are massive decisions,” she said.
 aims to merge with T-Mobile US Inc.
 The magazine also said Honda’s hybrid scored lower than the four-cylinder engine gasoline version due to ride comfort, emergency handling and cabin noise issues.
 Other senior departures in recent weeks include Robert Morrice, Asia-Pacific chairman and CEO, Jason Rynbeck, vice-chairman of mergers and acquisitions for the region, and Marc Benton, Asia-Pacific head of oil and gas investment banking.
 The British bank is looking for investors to buy a stake inits operations in the Republic or for another bank to merge withthe division, allowing RBS to dilute its holding, after rackingup 17 billion pounds of losses from bad loans in the worst real-estate crash in western Europe.
 Executives are also considering whether to merge theoperation in the Republic with another lender, reducing RBS’sholding in the operation, the people said.
 KBC Groep NV’sIrish unit may be another possible merger candidate.
 “A merger would give the new entity critical mass andexternal investment would help, when RBS are reluctant to commitany further capital to the Republic,” said Kinsella.
 The merged company, to be named Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, will have its main stock listing in New York and will be registered in the Netherlands with the fiscal domicile in the UK.
 Do we face a global storm of malaria? If one arrives, the world will finally sit up and notice the emergency – but at that point, it may be too late to intervene.
 “Deutsche Bank is a very powerful brand and has global reach as well as a good regional presence” Qatar, the wealthiest nation on a per capita basis, invested billions in emergency fundraising by Barclays in 2008, becoming the London-based bank’s second-largest shareholder in the process.
 “How quickly that’s going to happen I can’t say” Clippers Suitors A number of suitors have emerged as possible buyers for the Clippers, including music executive David Geffen, who said his bid group would include Oracle Corp.
 An acquisition of AstraZeneca would add to the $127 billion of mergers among pharmaceutical companies this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The benchmark gained 13 percent last week, its largest rally in a month, amid renewed mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 The benchmark gauge has slipped 01 percent this week following three straight weekly gains amid a boom in mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Sikorsky emerged as the sole bidder in the latest round after other companies considered and then dropped plans to compete.
 The movie, a new take on the 1950s monster picture, pits Godzilla against two huge cockroach-like beasts that emerge, bent on destruction, 15 years after the troubling events at a Japanese nuclear plant.
 Liberty Global, which owns cable companies from Hungary and Poland to Germany and the UK, said EU merger watchdogs will probably extend their examination of its planned purchase of Ziggo for 49 billion euros ($68 billion).
 He rejected calls from lawmakers in his then governing Labour Party for new powers to stop such mergers and said he would meet with Kraft to “hear how Kraft will fulfill the commitments they made to Cadbury and its workforce” In Cameron’s favor is the fact that AstraZeneca, while it is Britain’s second biggest pharmaceutical company, does not enjoy the same household status as Cadbury, maker of chocolate Creme Eggs and Dairy Milk bars.
 It really needs to be a strategic buyer with the level of debt Gentiva has” About $118 billion of health-care mergers and acquisitions were announced or proposed last month, a record, according to data compiled by Bloomberg that dates to 2002.
 Then Edward Snowden emerged.
 From 1975 to 1977, Jaitley was detained for opposing emergency rule imposed by former Prime Minister Indira Gandhi’s Congress party.
 in 2002 after multiple mergers, shut most international operations after the US.
May 30 (Bloomberg) -- Oleo e Gas Participacoes SA, the oil startup that triggered Eike Batista’s financial collapse, will emerge as a viable producer once creditors approve a recovery plan at a meeting scheduled for next week, Chief Executive Officer Paulo Narcelio said.
 President Barack Obama and German Chancellor Angela Merkel set a May 25 trigger for possible economic sanctions against Russia, and the United Nations Security Council held an emergency meeting on Ukraine today after the country dispatched forces to retake a separatist stronghold.
 When asked about Musk’s comments, Orbital CEO David Thompson said in an April interview that his company would be competitive with SpaceX, especially after its pending merger with Alliant Techsystems Inc.
 combined, heightening the carrier’s allure as Sprint pursues a merger.
 Baker Donelson entered the Florida market in November 2011 through a merger with the Orlando firm Litchford & Christopher.
 The changes would allow “emergency payments which might not otherwise be set out” in the policy and gives the renumeration committee “discretion to pay additional benefits in exceptional circumstances,” according to the company’s 2013 annual report.
 Fiat SpA Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne will within two years reduce the nameplate to a single model that will be sold only in Italy as part of a merger with Chrysler Group LLC.
 The merger of the two brands kicked off in 2011, when Marchionne pulled the US.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA, Brazil’s biggest phone company, reported a second consecutive quarter of declining revenue, underscoring its plan to cut costs through a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 The company is seeking to merge with Portugal’s largest phone operator to get savings on costs such as network equipment.
 in 2011 from participating in building a nationwide emergency network and in 2012 Australia banned the company from bidding for work on its national broadband fiber network, citing “national interests” The tables were turned on the US.
 “The majority of investors are content to sit on their hands until the next signal emerges,” said William Leys, a sales trader at CMC Markets Ltd.
 agreeing to merge and AT&T Inc.
 “People say, ‘well don’t you have to do a merger?’” McAdam said.
 “Well I just did a $130 billion merger.
 While the country has emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years, Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho’s government must trim spending this year and next to meet deficit targets.
 “We are on the right path to never again allow Portugal to go through another collapse, another rescue, another national emergency,” Coelho said in a televised address on May 4, flanked by his ministers.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- The European Commission’s review of the proposed merger of Telefonica SA and Royal KPN NV’s German wireless units focuses on bolstering smaller competitors that lease capacity rather than attracting a new network operator, according to people familiar with the process.
 It’s highly unlikely that there will be a new one” A merger of Telefonica Deutschland and KPN’s E-Plus would reduce the number of network operators to three from four.
 Ledoux focuses on domestic and cross-border transactions including mergers and acquisitions, restructurings and joint ventures.
 Louis, who was acquired in a March trade with Tampa Bay, has emerged as a leader of the team, a role Messier played while helping end New York’s 54-year title drought in 1994.
 Fifty Shades The most noteworthy Bertelsmann deal in recent yearsdidn’t involve money, but rather a share swap announced in 2012to merge Pearson Plc (PSON)’s Penguin books unit with Bertelsmann’sRandom House.
 While the mergedcompany is now the world’s largest book publisher, its profitsover the past two years have been largely dependent on thesuccess of the “Fifty Shades of Grey” series.
 4 as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said policy makers are ready to take action in June.
 He said the emergence of a Ukrainian leader with broad support may help diplomacy because “it’s easier to have such an interlocutor than self-appointed people” Lavrov also said Russia has no intention of sending troops into eastern Ukraine.
 Taking into account savings from a merger, the offer valued Metso shares at 3598 euros apiece, 58 percent more than their pre-approach level, said Weir, which also proposed a post-closing dividend equal to 213 euros.
 searching for a merger partner, and Sprint Corp’s parent SoftBank continues to vie for T-Mobile US Inc.
 “They may be wondering, is there going to be a third deal in this space? They don’t want to make their decision in a vacuum” A tie-up of AT&T and DirecTV would create a stronger competitor to a merged Comcast-Time Warner Cable, easing Comcast’s ability to obtain clearance, said Herbert Hovenkamp, a law professor at the University of Iowa.
 Easier Path? On top of that, Sprint and T-Mobile may bring a $30 billion merger before US.
 Bloomberg News reported in March that Chairman Charlie Ergen had approached DirecTV about a merger.
 AT&T Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson said that “merger synergies” would make it possible to wire 15 million additional households, mostly in rural areas.
 each surged at least 9 percent after a report they will merge.
 The two companies will merge under a holding company in October, according to a statement to the Tokyo Stock Exchange after the market close today.
 The Mexican company would be open to any strategic options that it thinks will generate value for shareholders, including mergers and acquisitions, and it may also seek to invest in some assets with partners to avoid falling further in debt, the pair said.
 companies would face strict limits on mergers in which they move their tax address outside the US.
 “Any company that seeks to invert from this point on is taking the risk that a bill that is passed would prevent them from benefiting” Levin is responding to 14 companies that have conducted mergers since 2011 in which they moved headquarters outside the US.
 The Sullivan & Cromwell team was led by New York-based mergers and acquisitions partner Matthew G.
 4 amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity and as ECB President Mario Draghi said policy makers are ready to ease monetary policy if necessary.
 Taishin Financial, which last year failed to merge its banking unit with Chang Hwa Commercial Bank, is open to merger and acquisition opportunities in Vietnam and other parts of Southeast Asia, Jao said.
 Deputy Finance Minister Wu Tang-chieh said by phone yesterday Chang Hwa Bank “is operating well” under the current arrangement and that any proposal to merge or buy Taishin’s stake must take into account the interest of employees and government-related shareholders.
 Dixons Retail Plc, whose Currys chain sells everything from tablets to vacuum cleaners, agreed to an all-share merger of equals with Carphone Warehouse Group Plc, a deal they say will enable them to capitalize on the growth of Internet-enabled devices, such as washing machines controlled from your phone.
 “Although there are plenty of reasons to view the merger in a positive light, the history of mergers and acquisitions is littered with the corpses of failed unions,” David Alexander, an analyst at researcher Conlumino, said by e-mail.
 The merger will also help bolster defenses against mobile-network operators that are seeking to reduce reliance on third-party retailers and open more of their own stores.
 The merger faces a “small chance” of being referred to UK.
 “This isn’t a land-grab, or a marriage of convenience, but a sound move based on uniting different strengths” The merger, which follows almost three months of negotiations, brings together companies with combined revenue of about 12 billion pounds.
 “This merger is ahead of the curve, it’s about thinking about the future and how people will live their lives, because we’ve put these very powerful computers into smartphones and into people’s pockets,” Carphone Warehouse Chief Executive Officer Andrew Harrison said by phone.
 Dixons head Sebastian James will be CEO of the merged company, with his Chief Financial Officer Humphrey Singer also continuing in that role.
 The executives are “all committed to staying within the business,” said Harrison, who will be James’s deputy at the merged company.
 Billionaire Masayoshi Son, who controls Sprint and has met resistance from regulators skeptical about a merger with T-Mobile, is also making efforts to recast any deal as being beneficial for consumers.
 4 as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and ECB President Mario Draghi said policy makers are ready to take action to support the economic recovery.
 The insurance expansion may produce a surge for CVS of prescription orders as well as patients with sniffles and other minor maladies seeking to avoid high emergency room costs and long waits for doctor appointments.
 Holcim and Lafarge, which agreed to a merger last month, may divest in Brazil, India, China, Canada and the US, Lafarge Chief Executive Officer Bruno Lafont told investors on April 7.
 In India, the merger will create the largest market share in the eastern states of West Bengal, Jharkhand and northern Odisha, making these the probable hotspots for asset sales, according to Mukherjee.
 plan their own merger and as consolidation accelerates across the entire communications industry.
 The person said White’s future after a merger is also still being negotiated.
 A merger of DirecTV and satellite-TV rival Dish Network Corp.
 Since then, Bloomberg reported in March that DirecTV had also drawn merger interest from Dish Chairman Charlie Ergen.
 While a DirecTV merger is tempting, the US.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- Palm oil production in Indonesia, the world’s largest grower, will probably be less than a forecast this year with the emergence of an El Nino set to cause more damage in 2015, according to the country’s largest producer.
 “The overlapping retail footprint resulting from the merger provides us with a unique opportunity to consolidate” The move is part of a broader push by retailers to reduce store count in the US.
 The company, which as more than 2,000 stores in total, expects to spend $400 million in cash on the merger integration from 2014 through 2016, with $300 million coming this year.
 The payout was related to option-acceleration in a merger with another firm, Innovate/Protect Inc, according to court papers, and occurred the same year Vringo won the patent case against Google.
 Turin-based Exor is reorganizing assets amid preparations by Fiat to merge with US.
 market this month as signs emerge that the for-profit college operator with declining enrollments will seek to swap its debt for equity.
 Lawyers for shareholders were briefed by the committee that was examining possible litigation strategies for Hewlett-Packard over its $88 billion writedown of the Autonomy merger, according to the filing in federal court in San Francisco.
 Jonathan yesterday asked parliament to extend a year-old state of emergency in three northeastern states where Boko Haram, which means “western education is a sin” in the Hausa language, has focused its attacks.
 “This merger will improve Comcast’s chances,” Hovenkamp said.
 “What you want to do in a merger case is show that there are other competitors out there and as a result any opportunity to behave anticompetitively is going to be disciplined by this other competitor” With DirecTV, Dallas-based AT&T will be able to combine services it can sell to customers, including mobile phone, Internet and television, Hovenkamp said.
 Merger Wave Comcast’s $45 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable, announced in February, and AT&T’s May 18 deal to buy DirecTV for $485 billion are part of a wave of merger activity in the telecommunications industry.
 ‘Massive Decisions’ Gina Talamona, a Justice Department spokeswoman, declined to comment on the review of the Comcast-Time Warner merger.
 “Can anyone here today piece together the effects of a Comcast-Time Warner merger and an AT&T-DirecTV merger on consumers and a free and open Internet?” Representative Anna Eshoo of California, the top Democrat on the House communications subcommittee that oversees the FCC, said at a May 20 hearing.
 “These are massive decisions and massive pieces that are moving forward” Senator Al Franken, who opposes the Comcast-Time Warner Cable merger, said in an interview on Bloomberg Television yesterday that he’s concerned the AT&T purchase of DirecTV marks further consolidation in the industry.
 Even as the Federal Reserve starts slowing its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities known as quantitative easing, other buyers have emerged, surprising traders expecting a surge in yields.
 Steep Cuts The utilities signaled their demands on the greenhouse-gas rule as the contours of the administration’s proposals began to emerge.
 “I told myself I’m going to forget about the word ‘merger,’ I’m going to focus solely on the business,’” Austin said in a 2003 interview with Forbes.
 She started her career at Deloitte & Touche LLP, where she worked on mergers and acquisitions for eight years before joining Hughes.
 As buyers re-emerge in certain parts of the country, prices, which have dropped an average of 47 percent since the peak in 2007, are starting to increase in cities such as Barcelona, the second-largest, according to Idealista.
 emerged “as a heavy equipment competitor as a result,” Rodzianko said.
 After the Pfizer bid, amid a wave of other industry merger activity, Roche reiterated its strategy of looking for partnerships to bring in new compounds and technologies that could be first or best in antibiotics.
 That merger was reversed last year in preparation for a sale.
 Investment-banking revenues at Canada’s largest lenders may slump on fewer mergers and acquisitions and a decline in the amount raised from equity financings in the period.
 Earlier today, representatives of the CFE-CGC union atOrange and Bouygues Telecom said the carriers should merge tosave jobs, in joint letter to French Prime Minister ManuelValls.
 The benchmark climbed 28 percent in April amid an upsurge in mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 “We do have a net 2 percent dilution of equity over the past few years and we need to consider that going forward” Shell created the Class A and B shares following the merger of Royal Dutch Petroleum Co.
 The Anglo-Dutch company, which has been examining plans to merge the two categories of shares, declared more than $11 billion in dividends and executed about $57 billion of buybacks in the past 12 months.
 While Telecom Italia Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano is in favor of keeping Tim Brasil and expanding the division through an eventual merger with Vivendi SA’s Brazil unit GVT, Telefonica and Oi SA -- the country’s No.
 Oi raised 825 billion reais in a capital increase last month as part of its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Still a merger with GVT would make more sense because it would allow Tim to add TV offers, he said.
 Allan Gray Australia Pty, Roc’s largest investor with almost a fifth of the shares, opposes the merger, Simon Marais, Sydney-based managing director of the investment company, said today by phone.
 Only Horizon investors get to vote on the deal under the merger agreement.
 They look at the transaction and can see the merits” Horizon and Roc agreed last week to merge operations stretching from China to Malaysia, saying a combined company would be in a better position to expand.
 The Australian newspaper reported earlier today that Allan Gray opposed the merger.
 The National Energy Board, which regulates pipelines, will gain powers to advise operators on safety, including which materials to use and how to respond to emergencies.
 Future Commitments They asked Pfizer to tell them details on how many jobs may be cut or relocated from their states as a result of a deal, what future investment they might get in the states and the drugmaker’s possible plans for splitting a merged company into different businesses.
 “If AstraZeneca does merge with Pfizer or with any other company, we think it is essential that the R&D and manufacturing capabilities it offers to the UK.
 addresses through mergers shows the need for a more complete revision of the tax code, which isn’t likely until 2015 at the soonest.
 Blaming “a problem with alcohol,” the mayor of Toronto has taken a leave of absence from the office and his re-election campaign after another video emerged purporting to show him smoking crack cocaine.
 Areva said yesterday it may examine a tieup with Alstom’s offshore wind-turbine business once the merger of its own wind operations with that of Spain’s Gamesa Corp.
 Goodman, 56, is one of two people who pleaded guilty to illegally accessing voice-mail messages in 2006 when the allegations first emerged at News Corp.
 He emerged unscathed barring a foam-pie assault by a member of the public after telling members that his appearance was “the most humble day of my life” His son James wasn’t so lucky, with his account of events disputed by two former executives.
 The New York-based bank is the No2 global mergers-and-acquisitions adviser this year, working on $394 billion of announced deals and trailing only Goldman Sachs Group Inc, Bloomberg data show.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- It’s payback time for Irish workers now the country has emerged from its bailout.
 Schools’ Resistance Signs of a rebound have yet to emerge among schools, which in March 2012 were given the choice to order beef in patties, crumbles or ground form, with or without lean, finely textured beef.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- New risks to financial stability could emerge from the combination of generous central bank policies and investors’ search for yield in a low-interest rate environment, Bundesbank board member Andreas Dombret said.
 Lowy wants to merge the group’s Australian and New Zealand operations with the trust to create Scentre Group, with A$379 billion ($35 billion) of domestic assets under management, and create Westfield Corp.
 Merger Action Equities also rose amid merger activity.
 The bill also includes provisions for emergency circumstances.
 “This opens the door to do more mergers and acquisitions, and I think you’ll see more deals around content and products,” Munster said.
 Until now, Cook has closely followed Jobs’s mergers strategy.
 “We’re not waiting for trends to emerge” Barra has tasked Jenner & Block LLC Chairman Anton Valukas, who served as the Justice Department’s examiner of the downfall of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc, to help lead the automaker’s internal probe of the recall along with GM General Counsel Michael Millikin.
 in October of that year, after regulators told the company to seek a merger partner because it was on the verge of collapse.
 “The last two years the company has been focused on getting costs out,” said Beaufait, who is based in Beijing and worked on mergers, acquisitions and partnerships at General Electric Co.
 “Kakao’s move to possibly list itself through the merger with Daum cuts down time and costs,” Huh Nam Kwon, chief investment officer at Shinyoung Asset Management, said in an interview in Seoul today.
 “It ultimately produces synergy for them, as the leading players in the online and offline industries join forces” Daum shares were suspended from trading today as the Korea Exchange reviews whether the merger plan meets its rules for backdoor listings, according to today’s filing.
 “The merger will act as a strong growth boost for Daum, which has been struggling to keep up with Naver,” Heo Pil Seok, chief executive officer at Midas International Asset Management Ltd, said by phone.
 “Kakao would have needed to consider a merger at some point, even if it had decided to go public on its own” The number of unique visitors to Daum’s portal dropped to 266 million as of the end of March from 29 million at the end of April 2010, according to regulatory filings.
 Kakao shareholders will receive 15557456 of shares in the merged company for every share they hold, according to today’s filing.
 It hasn’t been decided who will run the merged company, Kakao’s Lee said today.
 Kakao’s Lee said the merger will help the company to cope with a “fast-changing global market” Kakao competes directly with Naver-controlled Line Corp.
 The benchmark gauge gained for the third week amid a flurry of mergers and acquisitions.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- The spread of polio to countries previously considered free of the crippling disease is a global health emergency, the World Health Organization said, as the virus once driven to the brink of extinction mounts a comeback.
 Pakistan, Cameroon and Syria pose the greatest risk of exporting the virus to other countries, and should ensure that residents have been vaccinated before they travel, the Geneva-based WHO said in a statement today after a meeting of its emergency committee.
 It’s only the second time the United Nations agency has declared a public health emergency of international concern, after the 2009 influenza pandemic.
 The disease’s spread, if unchecked, “could result in failure to eradicate globally one of the world’s most serious, vaccine-preventable diseases,” Bruce Aylward, the WHO’s assistant director general for polio, emergencies and country collaboration, told reporters in Geneva today.
 “The consequences of further international spread are particularly acute today given the large number of polio-free but conflict-torn and fragile states which have severely compromised routine immunization services” Travel Rules Under the recommendations adopted by WHO Director General Margaret Chan today, Pakistan, Cameroon and Syria should declare public health emergencies and ensure travelers are vaccinated and provided with documentation proving their status.
 While Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter of 2013, Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho still has to trim spending in 2014 and 2015 to meet budget deficit targets after relying mostly on tax increases in 2013.
 The firm is also more active on mergers involving US.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Casino Guichard-Perrachon SA, the French retailer, rose to the highest in almost 13 years after saying it will merge its Cdiscount and Nova Pontocom e-commerce units, and that it may spin them off in a US.
 Five years after Zimbabwe emerged from recession, ended hyperinflation by abandoning its local currency and spurred farming production, the economy is at risk of contracting again.
 Its roots go back further to the 19th century, when several businesses merged to become American Cereal Co.
 The gauge advanced 3 percent in the past four weeks as mergers-and-acquisitions activity increased and the European Central Bank pledged to ease monetary policy in June if needed.
 “It doesn’t mean they can’t be the best, but we don’t know” In a video released today to explain the benefits of the merger, Pfizer’s president of worldwide research and development, Mikael Dolsten, made no specific references to any experimental drugs in AstraZeneca’s pipeline.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Smith & Nephew Plc, long speculated to be a takeover candidate, has finally been put in play thanks to a merger between two of its competitors.
 The World Health Organization declared its resurgence a global health emergency yesterday.
 Remedies have been hard to come by and those that emerged have gone nowhere, Rubin and Collins find.
 Gibson Dunn Gets Corporate Partner Jonathan Earle in London Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP announced that Jonathan Earle, most recently at Ashurst LLP, is joining the firm as a partner in the London office, where he will continue his corporate practice, focusing on cross-border mergers and acquisitions.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- Harmony Gold Mining Co, South Africa’s third-largest producer of the metal, said it’s monitoring a potential merger between Barrick Gold Corp.
 “If you are cast out of Eden you cannot ever be dispassionate about the choices you make,” said Don Putnam, chairman of PL Advisors, which advises money managers on mergers and acquisitions.
 As Reynolds took the helm, the company merged the retirement businesses of its Putnam and Great-West Financial units underneath him.
 So he devised a plan about a year ago to merge Putnam’s retirement-plan business with its sister-unit at Great-West Financial, which generally administered accounts for small and mid-sized employers with 401(k)s and public entities or nonprofits with the similar 403(b)s and 457s.
 “The last two years the company has been focused on getting costs out,” said Beaufait, who is based in Beijing and worked on mergers, acquisitions and partnerships at General Electric Co.
 Two years later, the ensuing law prevented companies from receiving the tax benefit of an overseas merger if their existing shareholders still owned 80 percent or more of the company’s stock after the deal.
 A coalition led by Social Democrats and the Green Party, which enjoys as much as 15 percentage points more voter support than Prime Minister Fredrik Reinfeldt’s tax-cutting government, says the mandate of the world’s oldest central bank is up for review after Sweden emerged from the crisis with Scandinavia’s highest jobless rate.
 “We are on the right path to never again allow Portugal to go through another collapse, another rescue, another national emergency,” Coelho said.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Lower-rated Canadian companies are seeking to use the country’s junk-bond market to fund mergers and acquisitions as investors take a more forgiving view of the strategy amid a dearth of debt sales by high-yield issuers.
 The Financial Times reported in March that Reynolds was exploring a deal, and merger speculation has propelled both stocks this year.
 The agreement keeping the British company from increasing its stake dates back to the 2003 merger of RJ.
 Huge Opportunity “We don’t know precisely what, if any, transaction could emerge,” Adam Spielman, an analyst at Citigroup Inc.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Lafarge SA, the French cement maker that plans to merge with Holcim Ltd.
 through a merger.
 “We’re working on a lot of deals that have this element to it,” said Robert Profusek, head of the mergers and acquisitions group at Jones Day in New York.
 Global Market That approach won’t work and won’t change the global mergers market, said Douglas Holtz-Eakin, an adviser to the Alliance for Competitive Taxation, a coalition that includes Pfizer, Google Inc.
 “While there’s a lot of noise in media that in some ways may scare people from doing future deals,” he said, “we see a low likelihood of any bill being successful and even less likelihood that any bill that would have a retroactive aspect would be passed through Congress” Companies will continue pursuing global mergers because of the business advantages, with the tax benefit of a new corporate home being a secondary issue, Profusek said.
 Business Strategy “If Congress does something,” he said, “that’s not going to really affect whether global companies combine” Omar Ishrak, chief executive officer of Minneapolis-based Medtronic Inc, said in an interview that business strategy will drive decisions about mergers with taxes as one consideration.
 In 2008, Barclays acquired Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s North American operations out of bankruptcy and then embarked on a hiring spree to add stock underwriting and merger advisory businesses and bankers in Europe and Asia to match its standing in the US.
 Congress authorized the auction to raise money for an emergency-communications network for first responders, compensate broadcasters that vacate spectrum and to add to the US.
 Details about why he said he was unfairly fired never emerged, and both sides declined to comment when the case settled earlier this year.
 Unruffled by the central bank’s emergency measures, the ruble has depreciated as an expanding list of sanctions in response to President Vladimir Putin’s actions in Ukraine sparked a selloff of assets.
 He studied pizza chains and emergency call centers to learn how to make delivery times for ready-mix concrete more reliable.
 Recent Departures Barclays has seen several senior departures in recent weeks, including Jason Rynbeck, vice-chairman for mergers and acquisitions for the region, and Marc Benton, Asia-Pacific head of oil and gas investment banking.
 The agency will require the company to conduct a thorough post-approval study to ensure no unexpected risks or performance problems emerge when the device is used outside of a clinical trial.
 “The solid balance that Mexichem has allows them to continue acquiring and remain effective in regards to mergers and acquisitions,” Perez, who has a hold rating on the stock, said in a phone interview.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Veolia Environnement SA isn’t planning to resume talks with Suez Environnement on a merger between the French waste and water utilities.
 Last month, Holcim and Lafarge SA announced a merger that would create the world’s No.
 “We have very few that are, in the long run, not profitable, and it’s the same with the wine” Cheval Blanc As a bonus, the vineyards have helped him forge relationships with executives involved in the cement merger: Albert Frere, the largest shareholder in Lafarge, is part-owner of Cheval Blanc, a renowned vineyard in Bordeaux’s Saint-Emilion region.
 And Wolfgang Reitzle, the Holcim chairman who will oversee the merger, makes wine in Tuscany.
 The merger of Holcim and Lafarge, he said, takes up most of his time.
 Arima joined Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd, which later merged with two other banks to form Mizuho, in 1986 as part of the lender’s first female career-track positions.
May 31 (Bloomberg) -- Wynnefield Capital Inc’s Nelson Obus was found not liable a day after his lawyer said he would have to be “the lamest insider trader in history” for a jury to believe he relied on an illegal merger tip to make $13 million.
 Euronext, formed from the merger of the Paris, Amsterdam and Brussels exchanges in 2000, completed its initial share sale in 2001.
 Naver Competition Naver slumped 4 percent after Daum Communications Corp, which competes with the company in the Internet portal industry, said it will merge with Kakao Corp, South Korea’s largest mobile messaging service provider.
 “I would say every five to seven years you see sort of a flurry of merger and acquisition activity,” Dekkers told journalists on a conference call yesterday, referring to the past month of dealmaking and not only to Bayer’s announcement.
 “In Japan, the only real opportunity is replacing expired contracts like those from Abu Dhabi or Qatar, but that will not emerge until late this decade or early next decade” China National Petroleum Corp.
 After spending months looking at the financial and tax implications from separating different concepts, Red Lobster emerged as the best candidate because of its limited growth potential.
 Standard Chartered said in January it would merge its consumer and corporate-banking business to cut costs as Finance Director Richard Meddings said he would leave and the head of corporate banking, Mike Rees, was named deputy CEO.
 The cumulative revenue at the firms from advising on mergers and acquisitions and underwriting of stock and bond sales fell 14 percent in the quarter, the data show.
 Felix, the director of the Bureau of Engraving and Printing, said the design changes were needed “to combat the emergence of a new category of counterfeiters who were increasingly using computers, scanners, color copiers and other emerging technologies to replicate notes” Redesigned $20s, $50s, $10s, and $5s were introduced between 2003 and 2008.
 Dixons Retail Plc and Carphone Warehouse Group Plc fell more than 8 percent after agreeing to merge.
 The gauge has still climbed 49 percent from a March 24 low amid an increase in mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Basci said this week the central bank may trim rates gradually, after Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan called for an emergency rate cut earlier this year.
 “Foreigners are demanding the long end of the curve more” Basci said two days ago policy makers did not see any need for additional tightening, after raising the benchmark one-week repurchase rate to 10 percent from 45 percent following an emergency meeting on Jan.
 While Portugal emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years in the second quarter of 2013, Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho still has to cut spending to meet budget deficit goals.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Jones Day announced that Jeff Dinerstein and Arthur Nathan joined the firm’s Houston office as partners in the mergers and acquisitions practice.
 Cost Cuts Nippon Steel & Sumitomo was created in October 2012 by the merger of Nippon Steel Corp.
 Nippon Steel & Sumitomo will pare costs by buying more low-grade coal and iron ore, the key raw materials used to make steel, and from benefits of the merger.
 European equities rose to a six-year high on May 13 amid merger-and-acquisition activity and better-than-estimated earnings in the region.
 consumer-electronics retailer agreed to merge with Carphone Warehouse Group Plc.
 The measure emerged from the Finance Committee on a bipartisan voice vote last month.
 The Fort Worth, Texas-based company merged with US Airways Group Inc.
 The interest in Severstal’s American operations has emerged during the worst standoff between Russia and the US.
 “I only hope the company figures out a solution, but there’s no apparent miracle cure that I see and it’s a bit of a race” When Sears merged with Kmart in 2005, Lampert said it would create a company with enough scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 Much of the questioning focused on how a merged company would look.
 Read said there was “no truth” in yesterday’s suggestion from AstraZeneca that a merger would delay the development of life-saving drugs.
 ‘Lose Momentum’ Soriot replied that mergers cause anxiety, with scientists “not sure if their job will exist tomorrow” In such a situation, he said, “you can quickly lose momentum” Jim Dowd, a lawmaker from the opposition Labour Party, which has opposed the takeover, again raised Pfizer’s record in Sweden, where it closed a research center after a takeover.
 “I’d like people to tell me a commitment Pfizer hasn’t met” Soriot was questioned by Miller about why a merger would be more disruptive than his own plan to move research from Manchester, in England’s northwest, to Cambridge in the east.
 Kvaerner merged with Aker ASA in 2005.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- European regulators need to allow phone businesses within a country to merge to avoid them being choked by network costs, a top industry group said before rulings on whether to approve such deals in Germany and Ireland.
 “It actually makes sense from a competitive perspective in the longer run” Market Entry Regulators reviewing mergers should avoid over-emphasizing short-term price increases in determining whether a deal is detrimental to consumer interests, Phillips said.
 Joaquin Almunia, the EU’s antitrust chief, hasn’t been swayed by telecommunications firms’ calls to ease merger rules, saying national markets are “often highly concentrated with only a limited number of network operators” in each EU nation.
 chairman Charlie Ergen called DirecTV Chief Executive Officer Mike White to discuss a merger of the two satellite businesses, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 A doubling of debt levels following the merger stripped the carrier of its investment-grade credit rating and fueled a 42 percent share slump that sent it from first to 11th place for stock-market value among global airlines.
 Subramanian, who served as India’s top bureaucrat between 1996 and 1998 and is author of the book ‘India at Turning Point, The Road to Good Governance’ “A new paradigm will emerge, where whoever doesn’t want to participate will be left out.
 “Milan will overcome the Expo challenge just as Italy will emerge from fear and desperation,” Renzi said yesterday during his visit to the event’s headquarters.
 in 2007 as both moved merger partners to one provider.
 American was already using Sabre’s platform before the carriers’ December merger, and has said it hopes that will minimize any disruptions when its two systems merge.
 War Coverage The idea of a state-sponsored search engine emerged in 2008 when the Kremlin was disappointed by Internet coverage of Russia’s war with Georgia, Ilya Ponomarev, a lawmaker with the pro-Kremlin Just Russia party, said by phone.
 and Delphi Automotive Systems LLC won a delay of four lawsuits by Texas customers over accidents in recalled cars as a panel of judges granted the companies’ emergency requests.
 emerges from a first-quarter slowdown.
 The person said White’s future after a merger is also still being negotiated.
 A merger of DirecTV and Dish Network Corp.
 DirecTV had also drawn merger interest from Dish Chairman Charlie Ergen, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 While a DirecTV merger is tempting, the satellite-TV rival is too expensive to pursue, Ergen said last week on a conference call to discuss first-quarter earnings.
 Debt Funding “If DTV is willing to sell for $100 then it must be either concerned about its lack of broadband long term, worried about the viability of a Dish merger, or both,” Philip Cusick, an analyst at JPMorgan Chase & Co, wrote in a research note.
 Kmart merged with Sears Roebuck in 2005 in a $123 billion takeover -- a deal that Lampert said would create a company with enough scale to compete with Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 2 insurer, as part of a probe related to its merger with Fondiaria-SAI SpA.
 “The merger with Fondiaria was the starting point for its restructuring and to cut the ties with the previous non-transparent management.
 Cimbri agreed to a four-way merger in 2012 as part of a plan to rescue unprofitable Fondiaria, which was engulfed in probes of alleged misconduct by former managers at the time.
 President Barack Obama and German Chancellor Angela Merkel set a May 25 trigger for possible economic sanctions against Russia, and the United Nations Security Council held an emergency meeting on Ukraine May 2 after the country dispatched forces to retake a separatist stronghold.
 European Union companies sold 152 billion euros ($210 billion) in goods and services to Russia in 2012, up 14 percent from the previous year, European Commission data show, highlighting the importance of a neighboring export market as their domestic economies emerge from a three-year recession.
 The nine power utilities serving Japan’s four main islands were told on May 16 to complete emergency inspections of their power plants by the end of June and advise the ministry of the results, the first time they’ve been ordered to deliver such reports, Matsuta said.
 Reduce Consumption The company doesn’t plan to sign any power-supply contracts that would oblige it to cut electricity use, and won’t be taking up the government subsidy to fuel its on-site generator, which is reserved for emergencies, she said.
 ‘Incredibly Unrewarding’ Part of Fiat’s strategy shift as it merges with US.
 That merger was reversed last year in preparation for a sale.
 To reach that target HSH will sell loan packages to investors, foster mergers between the many smaller German shipping companies, and pool distressed one-ship companies so that they can tap new funds, Wolfgang Topp, who heads the Hamburg-based bank’s unit, told reporters in Hamburg today.
 Lowy wants to merge the group’s Australian and New Zealand operations with the trust to create Scentre Group, with A$379 billion ($35 billion) of domestic assets under management, and create Westfield Corp.
 Traders who speculate on mergers and others who wanted a deal sold, Woodford said.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Telekom AG’s chief executive officer said he doubts a merger of its T-Mobile US Inc.
 “We’re getting signals from the regulatory authority as well as antitrust supervisors that such a merger isn’t seen as expedient,” Timotheus Hoettges said on a conference call while presenting first-quarter earnings today.
 While T-Mobile added 24 million customers in the first quarter, more than AT&T and Verizon combined, Hoettges reiterated that a merger of the smaller wireless operators would make sense as unavoidable investments in spectrum and network upgrades would put them at a disadvantage to larger peers in the longer run.
 The European Commission is due to decide by next month whether an agreed merger of smaller rivals Telefonica Deutschland Holding AG and Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus, which would reduce the number of national network owners to three from four, can go ahead.
 Profitability Improving Alcatel-Lucent is looking to stem losses that have plagued the company since it was created through the 2006 merger of Alcatel SA and Lucent Technologies Inc, as rivals also shift strategies rapidly.
 The company said in February it wouldn’t emerge from a difficult transition period until 2015.
 The countries will also draw up a plan to deliver emergency supplies to countries like Ukraine that may face shortages, Italy’s Federica Guidi said.
 More carve-outs are anticipated as shareholder activism and corporate mergers and acquisitions, up about 50 percent in dollar terms in the first four months of this year, lead companies to sell non-core units to satisfy antitrust concerns or eliminate overlap.
 Buying inexpensive public companies was generally easier for the funds than carve-outs are, said Raymond Lin, a mergers and acquisitions attorney at Latham & Watkins LLP.
 “Private-equity buyers can’t create synergies like company mergers can in most cases” Corporations are more willing to spin off divisions as management continues to clean up underperforming businesses and pay down debt following the financial crisis, said Tom Franco, a partner at Clayton Dubilier.
 physical assets may mark the re-emergence of a “great merchant class” that formed in the 1990s around the time of Enron Corp, said Register of Sapient Global Markets.
 The acquisition will give Amsurg a “leadership position” in anesthesia, children’s services, emergency medicine services and radiology provided to hospitals and medical facilities on an outsourced basis, according to the statement.
 Flamand, 43, will invest globally, focusing on catalyst-driven trades related to corporate transactions such as mergers, share buybacks and bankruptcies, according to the statement.
 Investor optimism in the stock market coincides with Spain’s emergence from three consecutive years of economic contraction.
 “It behooves them to basically spend less time arguing about why the Pinnacle Foods transaction is a superior one, because they’re likely to lose that battle,” said Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 Tyson Chief Financial Officer Dennis Leatherby said on the company’s earnings call this month that the merger and acquisition environment is “very attractive” and the $14 billion company has the ability to go after both “small bolt-on acquisitions or larger more strategic acquisitions” In February, two people familiar with the matter said Tyson made a bid for Michael Foods, the processing and distribution business controlled by Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s private-equity arm.
 in New York after saying profit more than quintupled and fees from advising on mergers doubled.
 Financial-advisory revenue climbed 64 percent to $2755 million from a year earlier, as fees from advising on mergers doubled to $2391 million, a record for the first quarter.
 “The animal spirits of companies are coming back to the market to pull the trigger on deals” Lazard said in the statement that the jump in merger revenue was also partly the result of “a relatively low level of completions” in the first three months of 2013.
 The facility in Bristol, Connecticut, marks an effort by Walt Disney Co’s sports network to merge the TV and mobile entertainment worlds and keep its dominance in the 24-hour sports TV business ESPN invented in 1979.
 may bring a $30 billion merger before US.
 AT&T’s deal for DirecTV would merge the second-largest US.
 That evolution is forcing incumbent businesses to evaluate their models, or seek mergers.
 Dish and DirecTV attempted to merge in 2002, a deal blocked by regulators.
 To prepare Washington for another telecommunications deal, SoftBank founder Masayoshi Son’s lobbying firm, Carmen Group, has again been meeting with elected officials and regulators to argue the merits of a merger with T-Mobile, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 He might receive a better reception from regulators if they are already weighing other larger telecom mergers.
 “We are for a competitive marketplace,” FCC Chairman Tom Wheeler said at an April 23 news conference when asked if he was concerned Sprint or T-Mobile may fail without a merger.
 Regulators will probably judge each merger on its specific impact on competition, rather than evaluating them together, said Blair Levin, a former Federal Communications Commission official who is now a fellow at the Aspen Institute in Washington.
 “It is also possible that the combination of all the rumored deals could create greater moats for the survivors of the game of musical chairs and create a broadband oligarchy that diminishes competition” Levin suggested that mergers aren’t a secret ingredient to make American companies great competitors.
 That ambition has been frustrated twice before, most publicly when a $23 billion merger with India’s Bharti Airtel Ltd.
 MTN’s attempted merger with Bharti collapsed in 2009 when leaders of the ruling African National Congress declined to support a deal that could see Johannesburg-based MTN’s control and primary market listing move abroad.
 Cash Pile To avoid such hurdles for any future deals, MTN could use one of its subsidiaries for a merger or takeover -- a structure that would avoid a dilution in South African owners’ stakes, said Kate Turner-Smith, an analyst at BPI Capital Africa in Cape Town.
 Transportation Department issued an emergency order designed to reduce the risks of transporting crude from North Dakota’s booming Bakken region by rail, a week after an oil train derailed and burned in Virginia.
 The order requires railroads to notify state emergency agencies when they haul Bakken crude through communities.
 BNSF Railway Co, the railroad owned by Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, said in an e-mailed statement it already provides state agencies and emergency response organizations with route information on hazardous materials upon request.
 Nowadays, most companies use an exception to a 2004 anti-inversion law that allows them to take a foreign address during the course of a merger with a non-US.
 Swiss Address In Minnesota, Hogan scored a Swiss address for Pentair through a 2012 merger with a unit of Tyco, which had obtained a foreign domicile under Kozlowski years earlier.
 “More than two-thirds of our employees work outside the United States and at the time of the merger, 60 percent of the combined company’s revenues were generated outside the US,” she said.
 The emergence of shale projects in Asia and Europe affects global gas and oil prices and is changing the energy agendas of governments from London to Beijing.
 Poetzscher joined Uber in March and formerly was a managing director at the Wall Street’s firm merger and acquisition practice in San Francisco, according to his LinkedIn Corp.
 Reynolds is in advanced talks to acquire Lorillard, a deal that could take the form of a three-way transaction with BAT taking a “major role” in backing the merger, Reuters reported late yesterday.
 “We don’t know precisely what, if any, transaction could emerge, but we suspect that assuming one does it will be advantageous for BAT,” Adam Spielman, an analyst at Citigroup Inc.
 A tie-up of Reynolds and Lorillard is one possibility for mergers aimed at restoring long-term growth, and the merged company may appeal to BAT, Kenneth Shea, an analyst for Bloomberg Industries, said in March.
 A spokesman for Bristol, England-based Imperial declined to comment on whether the company would be interested in purchasing any brands from a merged company.
 While antitrust hurdles to a deal remain “considerable,” a merger of the companies would bring “huge” cost synergies and value accretion for Reynolds, Bushnell wrote.
 The company intends to maintain its current annual dividend as it undertakes the merger, though it will suspend a stock buyback program.
 The United Nations Security Council is preparing to hold an emergency meeting at Russia’s request.
 In February, a lower court stripped the government of many of the powers provided by a state of emergency called to deal with the protests.
 The tax-free transaction is completed when the new company merges with a smaller company, giving shareholders of the spinoff a majority stake.
 The Senate Committee on Commerce, Science and Transportation, which prepared a report ahead of the hearing, found that Target appeared to have missed opportunities “to stop the attackers and prevent the massive data breach” The board said today that Steinhafel held himself personally accountable for the breach and “pledged that Target would emerge a better company” Steinhafel, who had been CEO since 2008, will remain an adviser to the retailer during the transition.
 The United Nations Security Council is to hold an emergency meeting on Ukraine at Russia’s request.
 Access roads were blocked, nearby houses were evacuated and emergency services were called in after the bomb threat was made earlier today, Radio-Canada and TVA Nouvelles reported.
 The benchmark gauge has risen 82 percent from this year’s low on February 4 amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity and as ECB President Mario Draghi said policy makers are ready to ease monetary policy if necessary.
 Patton Boggs, which has been struggling financially over the past couple of years, announced last week a merger set for June 1 with Squire Sanders, a 1,300-lawyer global firm.
 Tencent, Asia’s largest Internet company, merged its search business called Soso into Sogou and has also been redirecting search traffic from its QQ instant messaging platforms, said Wang.
 drugmaker bought Pharmacia Corp, the product of a merger of Sweden’s Pharmacia AB and Michigan-based Upjohn Co, in 2003, and has reduced its presence in the Scandinavian country since then.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen had approached DirecTV about a merger, some analysts said that AT&T would be a better suitor for his satellite-TV business and wireless spectrum.
 “We are pleased to have been able to assemble, as our transaction team, two experienced and talented firms in the specialized field of sports mergers and acquisitions,” Bills Chief Executive Officer Russ Brandon said in the statement.
 Wilson paid $25,000 to purchase the Buffalo franchise in the American Football League in 1959, and the Bills became part of the NFL when the leagues merged in 1970.
 The move is part of a suite of measures designed to boost Greece’s competitiveness and attract foreign investment as the country emerges from a six-year recession, he said.
 “We have done almost everything required to reform the Greek labor market” As Ireland, Spain and, this week, Portugal emerge from the strictures of their bailout programs, Greek officials are trying to show they can continue the work of repairing their economy as the financial pressure eases.
 companies to use foreign mergers as a way to change legal residence.
 In April, Mylan proposed a merger with Swedish drugmaker Meda AB that was rejected.
 The gauge climbed 54 percent from a March 24 low through yesterday amid an increase in mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 “It’s necessary to take emergency steps to stop the bloodshed and start an inclusive internal Ukrainian dialog,” Russia’s Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov told his German counterpart Frank-Walter Steinmeier by phone yesterday, according to the ministry’s website.
 The benchmark has climbed 49 percent from a March 24 low amid an increase in mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Unilever was created in 1930 when Lever Brothers merged with the Netherlands’ Margarine Unie.
 Splits have emerged over sanctions to tackle Russia, while money for defense is in short supply after more than four years of debt crisis in the euro area.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Nomura Holdings Inc, trying to regain its lost dominance in advising on Japanese mergers and acquisitions, is facing tough competition from bigger rivals and some bad luck.
 1 mergers adviser in the Asian nation, according to the data.
 Winning mergers enables an investment bank to forge strong ties with a company and become familiar with its strategy, giving the firm the inside running on future business such as arranging fundraising, he said.
 A total of 325 takeovers involving Japanese companies have been scrapped in the past 10 years, and the Yahoo Japan transaction was the biggest among those that had agreed to merge, the data show.
 The others were Sumitomo Metal Industries Ltd’s merger with Nippon Steel Corp.
 in 2012 and Tokyo Electron Ltd’s merger with Applied Materials Inc.
 We are positive on the outlook as we are receiving more inquiries from clients” Companies no longer see that it’s essential to tap Nomura for big or complicated mergers now that its peers have accumulated skills and experience, said Kachitas’s Hirai.
 That will help competition as two of Ireland’s four operators merge, he said.
 Telefonica, which wants to merge its German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus, has separately offered concessions to allay competition concerns over that deal, next in line for an EU decision.
 “If they don’t fulfill the conditions, there’s no merger, that’s all, no problem,” Almunia said of the Irish deal.
 In 2008, Barclays acquired Lehman Brothers’s North American operations out of bankruptcy and then embarked on a hiring spree to add stock underwriting and merger advisory businesses and bankers in Europe and Asia to match its standing in the US.
 Department of Health and Human Services, asking that he “levy the appropriate fines and penalties to hold Oracle accountable” Kitzhaber, an emergency room doctor, wrote to Oregon senators Ron Wyden and Jeff Merkley, both Democrats, for help in recouping the taxpayer dollars Oregon paid to Oracle.
 Timotheus Hoettges, the chief executive officer of Deutsche Telekom AG, which owns T-Mobile, said May 8 that he doubts a merger of T-Mobile and Sprint could win regulatory approval anytime soon.
 Safety has emerged as a key theme in determining Bitcoin’s fate as a viable payment form.
 The combination is part of a trend of “continuing robust merger activity” in 2014 after a “banner year” in 2013, according to data compiled by law firm consultancy Altman Weil.
 The organization reported 88 law firm mergers last year, up from 60 in both 2011 and 2012.
 The merger will transform the brand of Squire Sanders “from being an Ohio firm to being a Washington, DC, firm,” law firm consultant Peter Zeughauser said yesterday.
 Failed Efforts Zeughauser said he advised Patton Boggs on the restructuring and in other previous failed merger efforts, though he hasn’t consulted the firm during the past year.
 Jim Maiwurm, Squire Sanders Chairman and Global Chief Executive Officer, said yesterday in a statement that the combination with Patton Boggs will create the “‘go-to firm for public policy work’’ The merger is expected to take effect by June 1, according to the statement.
 It announced in December that merger talks were called off with Locke Lord LLP.
 Dentons expressed interest after Patton Boggs had already announced merger discussions with Squire Sanders in February.
 Restructuring One potential model for restructuring would be a merged Samsung Electronics, Samsung C&T and Samsung Everland into a holding company, analysts said.
 The group split its main chemical and electronics businesses into operating and holding companies, and merged the holding companies to form LG Corp.
 More damage is expected next year if the El Nino weather pattern emerges later in 2014, Bangun said.
 The emergence of an El Nino in the second or third quarter will affect production in 2015, according to Franky Widjaja, chief executive officer of Golden Agri-Resources Ltd, Indonesia’s largest producer.
 “Even though their share price is very high now, their business and revenue models aren’t clear” More new competitors are set to emerge after China awarded mobile virtual network operator licenses to 11 companies in December, including the HiChina unit of Alibaba.
 announced their own merger, accelerating consolidation across the communications industry.
 Their deals are part of a wave of merger activity in the telecommunications industry as companies seek to control the technology consumers use for entertainment and information.
 A merger of DirecTV and satellite-TV rival Dish Network Corp.
 ‘Merger Mania’ Consumer groups have already started speaking out against the merger.
 These takeovers are expensive, and consumers end up footing the bill for merger mania” DirecTV will give AT&T a pay-TV business that’s expanding in Latin America.
 If the Sunday Ticket rights aren’t renewed on the terms discussed between AT&T and DirecTV, then AT&T can call off the merger, the filing shows.
 DirecTV had also drawn merger interest from Dish Network Chairman Charlie Ergen, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 While a DirecTV merger is tempting, the satellite-TV rival is too expensive to pursue, Ergen said this month on a conference call to discuss first-quarter earnings.
 AT&T’s $95-a-share offer represents a premium of 30 percent over DirecTV’s share price in late March, before Bloomberg News reported Ergen’s interest in a merger.
 Ambit and APT will negotiate a full merger via a share swap, they said.
 Hon Hai beat rivals including Ting Hsin International Group, another new entrant to Taiwan’s mobile market which had proposed a merger of Asia Pacific Telecom with its Taiwan Star unit.
 Ambit and APT expect to reach a decision on merger terms by June 20, the companies said.
 Quarterly Loss The company, formed in the 1991 merger of a bank and an insurer, has been forced to sell some assets below book value to complete its disposal program.
 Dish and DirecTV have attracted merger speculation as Comcast Corp’s offer to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “Both Dish and DTV know that there are a lot of benefits of a merger, either with each other or a carrier” AT&T Inc, the second-biggest US.
 Separately, Bloomberg News reported in March that Dish Chairman Ergen had contacted DirecTV to discuss a merger of the two satellite-TV companies.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent financial-advisory firm, reported a surge in first-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates as revenue from advising on mergers doubled.
 “The animal spirits of companies are coming back to the market to pull the trigger on deals” Financial-advisory revenue climbed 64 percent to $2755 million from a year earlier, as fees from advising on mergers doubled to $2391 million, a record for the first quarter.
 “I think we’re starting to see the impact of that on CEO confidence and sentiment in a positive way” Lazard said in the statement that the jump in merger revenue was also partly the result of “a relatively low level of completions” in the first three months of 2013.
 “We believe that funding demand for capital spending will emerge from small and medium-sized corporates, which are lagging behind larger businesses,” Higashi said.
 “It all supports the reemergence of manufacturing in the United States that we didn’t think was possible five to seven years ago,” MacCleary said.
 At Air Berlin Plc, the German carrier struggling to emerge from losses, Etihad is participating in a financial rescue after the deficit piled up last year.
 The business produces cabin fittings for both commercial airliners and business jets, offering a range of seats and entertainment features, galleys, lighting, storage equipment, emergency oxygen systems and lavatories.
 The merger was almost derailed by controversy surrounding the Chevron case.
 Multiple reports about the planned merger said that a condition included barring Tyrrell from joining the new firm.
 It merged with Hellenic Duty Free Shops SA and Elmec Sport SA in 2010.
 Fee income from underwriting equities and bonds, as well as advising on mergers and acquisitions, fell 23 percent in the region from 2011 to 2013, according to New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
 The insurer, which owns 19 percent of Telco SpA, the vehicle that holds a 224 percent stake in Telecom Italia, said today its board agreed to exercise a “demerger option,” giving its chief executive officer the mandate to “define the exact procedure to implement the exit” from Telco.
 After the demerger, each partner will get back Telecom Italia shares as well as its share of debt.
 28, 2015 or, should the demerger be earlier finalized, until the process is completed, subject to the fulfillment of the necessary requirements before the competent authorities,” Generali said today in a statement.
 The CMA said that a merger situation applies and that its ruling stands.
 special-purpose company to merge with the US.
 gained 32 percent to C$3275 after its chief executive officer said it had already had one company approach the drugmaker with a merger deal and was still a target.
 Merlin is a new company formed to buy and manage real estate as the Spanish market emerges from a crash.
 The family-run construction and media conglomerate will eliminate 17 percent of the jobs at its telecommunications unit after merger talks with Orange SA and separately with Iliad SA failed.
 Following an age-restricted model used by developer Del Webb’s Sun City in Arizona, The Villages emerged as growth among the elderly began outpacing all other age groups.
 in buying real estate in London, which has emerged as a haven for foreign wealth.
 Medtronic has grappled since 2010 with declining sales in its two biggest categories -- heart rhythm devices like implanted defibrillators and spinal products -- as questions have emerged about their safety and overuse.
 If ratified by a bankruptcy court in Rio and approved by shareholders, the plan will give a group of 12 creditors led by Pimco that provided the company with emergency financing at least a 42 percent stake in the restructured oil producer.
 RBS has created an internal bad bank, merged units and is scaling back its securities unit as it strives to return to annual profitability and help the government reduce its 80 percent stake.
 Market Share The share of investment-banking fees paid for mergers and acquisitions, bond sales and initial public offerings to European banks competing in the US.
 Within 30 days of the loan’s issuance, NextEra would seek a merger with the unit that controls Oncor in an all-stock transaction.
 and Morgan Stanley to help prevent a repeat of the 2008 financial crisis, when similar firms became heavy users of the Federal Reserve’s emergency-lending facilities, Commissioner Kara M.
 agreed in April to merge to create the world’s largest cement company, the second time in 18 months that executives tried to put together a transaction, people familiar with the matter have said.
 The company was spun off from Novartis AG in 2000 in order to merge with Zeneca Agrochemicals, weakening its links to Switzerland and opening up its shareholder base.
 “They’re betting the house on equities, and the franchise is not as clean as it ought to be” Some money managers and brokers began shunning Barclays’s dark pool after the allegations emerged.
 A new threat emerged this month when PokerStars, the world’s dominant poker website, agreed to be sold in a deal that could hasten its re-entry to the fledgling US.
 The partners have emerged as the leader in online betting in the state, with almost a 40 percent share of the $105 million in May proceeds, according to a state report.
June 27 (Bloomberg) -- Even utilities are drawing attention in this year’s merger boom.
 Including Cleco and other proposed transactions, merger volume for the last three months rises to $49 billion, the data show.
 Diminished Benefits Utility mergers can be difficult to execute because they tend to attract significant regulatory scrutiny.
 “If it’s contiguous it makes more sense, but then you’ve got to be very careful again because too many states and too many governors and too many regulators want to use it as a pinata” Merger Math Even so, there are acquisition opportunities among regulated utility companies that could offer as much as a 15 percent boost to per-share earnings, Paul Dabbar, head of power and gas mergers and acquisitions at JPMorgan Chase & Co, said at the Edison Electric Institute convention this month.
 4 amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- Investment in Portuguese commercial real estate may more than double this year as investors return to the southern European country after it completed its emergency-aid program, according to Cushman & Wakefield Inc.
 While the country has emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years, Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho’s government must trim spending this year and next to meet deficit targets.
 and Morgan Stanley to help prevent a repeat of the 2008 financial crisis, when similar firms became heavy users of the Federal Reserve’s emergency-lending facilities, Commissioner Kara M.
 Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr plans to complete by October the reduction of $18 billion in debt that led to the largest US.
 Paris-based BNP Paribas will probably plead guilty in early July to a criminal charge of conspiring to violate the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, the person said.
 Natural gas suppliers in Romania, such as EON SE and GDF Suez will also have to trade natural gas on the bourse starting next year, even with imported gas, Energy Minister Razvan Nicolescu said today in Bucharest, announcing an emergency government decree.
June 27 (Bloomberg) -- TUI AG and TUI Travel Plc revived merger talks that broke down last year, targeting a deal that would create the world’s largest tourism business.
 Alexey Mordashov, the Russian billionaire who is the largest shareholder in TUI -- which also owns a portfolio of hotels and cruise ships -- backs the merger, the companies said.
 advised TUI on the merger, while TUI Travel was advised by Lazard Ltd, Bank of America Merrill Lynch and Barclays Plc.
 TravailSuisse argues the latter initiative, which was proposed by Thomas Minder to eliminate sign-on bonuses, severance packages, and extra incentives for merger transactions, has had little impact.
 Victims entering the program should be given time to see the full set of facts that emerge from ongoing investigations, especially the Justice Department’s criminal probe, said Blumenthal, a former federal prosecutor.
 Daimler Chief Executive Officer Dieter Zetsche, who unwound the automaker’s merger with Chrysler, said the cooperation with Renault-Nissan is successful because the companies are independent.
 With almost three years’ worth of footage uploaded last year by customers filming their exploits, GoPro has emerged as one of the hottest new brands, in the league of punk-culture video producer Vice Media Inc, which is said to be valued as high as $3 billion.
 The company introduced new health and messaging features for the software powering the iPhone and iPad, laying the groundwork for a busy second half of the year as the company works to emerge from a stretch of slowing growth.
 “As we go through that process, it should restore market confidence in the banks” For situations where lenders require emergency euro-region funds to plug capital holes, governments today reached a “political understanding” on an operational framework, according to Jeroen Dijsselbloem, who chairs meetings of euro-area finance ministers.
 Williams intends to merge Access Midstream with affiliate Williams Partners LP.
 Access Midstream said separately it hasn’t approved a merger and will consider a proposal.
 Mike Stice, Access Midstream’s CEO, said that “since Williams invested in ACMP in 2012, it’s been clear to me that our companies share many common values” The merged company, which will use the name Williams Partners, would have 2015 adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of about $5 billion, Williams said.
 Funding The merged company would pay investors $120 for every dollar it earns in 2015, Chappel said on the call.
 Hackers would have an unfair edge by being able “to understand the value of trades and the value of mergers and acquisitions before they would happen,” Rogers said.
 As it struggles to emerge from bankruptcy, Detroit is paying $85 million to end swaps.
 Bankruptcy Filing NextEra and the group of second-lien bondholders floated an alternate restructuring plan to the company that would result in a merger between the Juno Beach, Florida-based utility and Energy Future, according to a filing this week.
 The merged company is targeting more than doubling profit and lifting annual deliveries 61 percent over the next five years.
 and that helps” Fiat bought full control of Chrysler in January, with the merger part of Marchionne’s decade-long effort to turn the Turin-based company into a carmaker big enough to challenge General Motors Co, Volkswagen AG and Toyota Motor Corp.
 Fiat plans to raise as much as 4 billion euros by issuing new bonds by the end of 2015, providing flexibility to refinance debt as it implements the merger, the automaker said June 15.
 Simon Thorn has become head of compliance for retail, corporate banking and wealth management after the units were merged, said the person, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 More tapes emerged during the weekend, including one that purportedly features Foreign Minister Radoslaw Sikorski and Jacek Krawiec, chief executive officer of oil refiner PKN Orlen.
 The company’s top priority is integrating American’s loyalty program with that of merger partner US Airways Group, Norton said.
 announced their own merger.
 “Aspen can achieve more value for its shareholders -– and without the significant risks that are inherent in a merger with Endurance -– by continuing to execute its strategic business plan,” Aspen Chairman Glyn Jones said in a statement today.
 The order, issued June 13, came in response to “an in-flight emergency” on June 10, when a Marine Corps version of the plane had to return to base at Air Station Yuma, Arizona, after its engine lost oil.
 Partnow also previously led the China mergers and acquisitions team, which UBS started in 2010.
 Treacy was one of 18 bankers involved in the merger of Xstrata Plc and Glencore International Plc, which was completed in 2013.
 The situation worsened last month after a video emerged on the Internet showing Agarwal talking about the low price he paid for Konkola and the profit it makes.
 Wynnefield Capital Inc’s Nelson Obus defeated the agency last month in a Manhattan court in a suit claiming he relied on an illegal merger tip to make $13 million in 2001.
 On May 13, according to Allergan, Robert Kindler, Morgan Stanley’s global head of mergers and acquisitions, wrote “that Allergan is not being nearly aggressive enough in going after the Valeant business model and currency” In another e-mail, Morgan Stanley managing director David Horn told Allergan Chief Finance Officer Jeff Edwards that Kindler could help thwart a deal.
 Kindler, who joined Morgan Stanley in 2006 after six years at JPMorgan Chase & Co, has been involved in some of the biggest deals, including the $129 billion merger of Continental Airlines with United Airlines in 2010 and 3G Capital Management’s $4 billion acquisition of fast food chain Burger King.
 After seven hours of difficulty, Bildsten and other doctors turned to traditional surgery and then emergency care to repair a rectal laceration.
 and foreign publicly traded stocks using material nonpublic information, such as information about upcoming mergers and quarterly earnings reports” While “under the thumb” of Maksim Bakiyev and managing his money, Gourevitch had access to “real, juicy, immediate, tangible” insider information, Agnifilo said.
 Combes is seeking to turn around Alcatel-Lucent after years of losses following the 2006 merger of Alcatel SA and Lucent Technologies Inc.
 last year contributed to a total $47 billion of technology mergers and acquisitions in the past decade, according to IVC.
 The company may announce “some corporate action” such as a merger with Tata Coffee or spin-off of some business, Amar Mourya, an analyst at India Nivesh Securities Ltd, said by phone.
 The company yesterday said it sent an executive to lead emergency team and draw up a withdrawal plan for staff building the Salah Al-Din power plant in Iraq.
 have announced a merger, and AT&T plans to acquire satellite-TV operator DirecTV for $485 billion.
 The projections are key to convincing regulators that allowing a merger is in consumers’ best interests.
 “In a world that’s unsettled on carbon, we’re making actual progress” More technologies like Skyonic’s could emerge as President Barack Obama steps up his fight against global warming, such as with the regulations to cut carbon pollution from power plants the Environmental Protection Agency proposed June 2.
 Shohidul Ahad-Choudhury, Arabtec’s head of mergers and acquisitions and a former Deutsche Bank AG executive, was among those dismissed, according to a person familiar with the situation.
 Royal Philips NV climbed the most in eight months after saying it’ll merge its LED-component and automotive-lighting units into a 14 billion-euro ($19 billion) separate company.
 Instead, investors poured into fixed income as global growth weakened, disinflation emerged in Europe, and tensions between Ukraine and Russia intensified.
 The CBI last year formally registered a case against the planemaker and seven officials at the Indian carrier, now merged with Air India Ltd.
 Icahn bought the shares because he plans to push for a merger with Dollar General Corp, according to a person with knowledge of the investor’s thinking.
 Family Dollar Chief Executive Officer Howard Levine was reluctant to sell the company his father founded, and no other bidders emerged.
 Dollar General has said it’s not interested in a merger with Family Dollar and Wal-Mart wouldn’t have much use for the company’s stores because they’re too small for its Express format, Montagna said.
 The merger is the latest in a series of cross-border deals proposed by US.
 QLT’s operations will be merged into Auxilium, and the remaining shell of QLT would be renamed “New Auxilium” That company would acquire Auxilium, paying 314 QLT shares for each Auxilium share.
 “The merger with QLT represents a unique opportunity to accelerate our desired strategic transformation into a leading, diversified North American specialty biopharmaceutical company,” Adrian Adams, chief executive officer of Auxilium, said in the statement.
 The carmaker plans to invest 55 billion euros ($74 billion) to transform Maserati, Alfa Romeo and Jeep into global brands to increase net income fivefold over the next five years as part of its merger with Chrysler.
 The monsoon from June to September, which supplies more than 70 percent of annual rainfall, will be below normal at 93 percent of the 50-year average because of the emergence of El Nino, the bureau said.
 “TWGP shares will likely be rife with speculation regarding the outcome of its merger with ACP Re,” Ken Billingsley, an analyst at Compass Point Research & Trading LLC, said in a research note today using Tower’s ticker symbol.
 put on hold a planned merger that would have created a Saudi Arabian chemicals company with about $58 billion in market value.
 The companies said it would be difficult to proceed with the merger using a structure acceptable to both sides under the current regulatory framework, according to a statement yesterday.
 The proposed deal was a rare sign of merger and acquisition activity in the kingdom that has fallen 83 percent this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The possibility of merger talks restarting in the short-term seems unlikely,” Muhammad Faisal Potrik, senior research analyst at Riyad Capital, said by phone yesterday.
 “It’s taken them a year to get to this stage and I don’t see them being able to decide on a new structure for the merger quickly” Shares Decline Shares in Sipchem fell as much as 3 percent yesterday, the most in two months, while Sahara dropped as much as 29 percent.
 Sipchem and Sahara in December proposed a share-swap merger and expected to sign a deal in the first half.
 The decision to put the merger plan on hold isn’t expected to affect the companies’ operations, they said.
 and Lafarge SA to win regulatory approval for their planned 29 billion-euro ($40 billion) merger, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Holcim and Lafarge, which announced their merger plan in April, are working on a list of cement and building-aggregate plants to be sold in order to make a goal of merging in the first half of next year.
 The world’s two largest cement companies are looking to wrap up the merger by the first half of 2015, with a committee comprised of executives from both sides working on the list of potential divestments.
 Japan Exchange was formed last year from the merger of the Osaka and Tokyo bourses.
 He said the settlement suggested “a rather cynical relationship between the parties” “The SEC gets to claim that it is exposing wrongdoing on the part of the Bank of America in a high-profile merger,” Rakoff wrote at the time.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc, the second-biggest manufacturer of jetliner engines, signaled that it’s ready to sit out a boom in industrial mergers, opting instead for a 1 billion-pound ($17 billion) share buyback.
 demanded such warrants from TARP recipients to compensate taxpayers for the risk of providing the emergency funds.
 BNP Paribas probably will plead guilty in early July to a criminal charge of conspiring to violate the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, the person said.
 Rostan’s New York-based firm teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions.
 It will be followed by an effort to replace most of the board and force a merger with Laval, Quebec-based Valeant.
June 15 (Bloomberg) -- Williams Partners LP is proposing a merger with Access Midstream Partners LP after a $6 billion purchase that would create one of the biggest US.
 Access Midstream said separately it has not approved a merger and will consider a proposal.
 Mike Stice, Access Midstream’s CEO, said that “since Williams invested in ACMP in 2012, it’s been clear to me that our companies share many common values” The purchase, which isn’t contingent on the related merger, will increase Williams’ ownership of Access to 100 percent of the general partnership and 50 percent of the limited partnership, according to the statement.
 The merged company, which will use the name Williams Partners, would have 2015 adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of about $5 billion, Williams said.
 The merged company would pay investors $120 for every dollar it earns in 2015.
 After a reorganization, the company emerged from court protection in 1988.
 after Texaco’s merger with Chevron.
 LG Corp, which emerged from LG Group’s switch to a holding-company structure in 2003, has since gained more than nine-fold.
 The group split its main chemical and electronics businesses into operating and holding companies in 2001 and 2002, and merged the holding companies to form LG Corp.
 Covidien investors will own about 30 percent of the merged company, Medtronic said yesterday.
 domicile in April, Senator Carl Levin, a Michigan Democrat, submitted a bill that would raise the 20 percent threshold to 50 percent, a level that would have prevented almost all of the recent merger-based inversions from generating a tax benefit, including Medtronic’s.
 That leads us to one more scary headline, which hit before the last trading session of the quarter: It will be difficult for central banks to ensure a “smooth normalization” as they exit emergency policy measures, the Bank for International Settlements said.
 The focus of the negotiations has moved toward additional measures to bolster so-called mobile virtual network operators, which lease capacity from network carriers such as Telefonica, after it emerged that no company is interested in setting up a new system to replace E-Plus.
 ‘Emerge Stronger’ Chief Executive Officer Jean-Laurent Bonnafe said last month at the annual shareholder meeting that the transactions occurred between 2002 and 2009.
 The bank “is capable of overcoming challenges and learning the lessons to adapt and thus emerge stronger” A $10 billion fine could more than wipe out this year’s earnings for BNP Paribas, estimated at 564 billion euros ($77 billion) by analysts.
 The purpose is to see how the companies report purchase prices, goodwill and other aspects of merger and acquisition deals, the newspaper reported, without attribution.
 2 global deals adviser this year, handling $394 billion of announced mergers and acquisitions and trailing only Goldman Sachs Group Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Line will need to spend on research and development and mergers after going public, in order to create more services and maintain its value” Line hasn’t determined the size of the IPO or decided which banks will be the lead underwriters, the people said.
 The Moscow Exchange merged its two competing depositories in 2012 and in September extended the time allowed to settle transactions to two days.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- What’s greasing the wheels for the rise in mergers by US.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- To see just how much power regulators wield over mergers, look no further than T-Mobile US Inc’s shares yesterday.
 Takeovers that are scrutinized because of antitrust issues, such as US Airways Group Inc’s merger with AMR Corp, often trade at a wide discount to the offer because of the difficulty in predicting regulators’ decisions.
 “Putting all that together, shaking it up in the martini, I come out that it’s probably no better than 50/50,” Tom Burnett, director of research at Wall Street Access Corp, which specializes in mergers and event-driven research, said in a phone interview.
 Spread Wideners The deal’s timing adds an element of uncertainty for merger arbitrage traders, who seek to profit from the difference between the stock price of a target company when a deal is first announced and the price at which it will be acquired.
 When the Justice Department sued to block the merger of American Airlines parent AMR and US Airways about a year ago, it sent a chill through the market, resulting in wider spreads for other deals that were awaiting regulatory clearance.
 The chances of regulatory approval may not be as slim as critics say, according to Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 The logjam of more than $130 billion of telecommunications and cable megamergers that would require regulatory review also increases the likelihood of the Sprint-T-Mobile approval, said Steve Gerbel, founder and president of Chicago Capital Management LP, a Chicago-based hedge fund focused on merger arbitrage.
 “The regulators have to look at it this time around and say, ‘Wait a minute, everything has changed’ They’ll be the weakest one in the sandbox, but they’ll be able to be in the sandbox, where if they don’t merge and they don’t get together, will they become irrelevant?” Even if a deal with Sprint fails, T-Mobile investors will probably still get some sort of transaction, said Shah of Albert Fried.
 Tyson sees the company adding $300 million in earnings to the combined company through cost savings and other merger benefits.
 Alibaba rode China’s emergence as an economic superpower over the last 15 years to become a massive online market for everything from kangaroo meat to sex toys.
 Nabil Al Kindi, COO for the Gulf region and Shohidul Ahad-Choudhury, head of mergers and acquisitions, also left, Arabtec, the people said.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Boerse AG is fighting for its right to make future acquisitions after the European Union blocked its merger with NYSE Euronext, which would have created the world’s biggest exchange, lawyers told an EU appeals court.
 The merger would have led to a “near monopoly” in European exchange-traded derivatives, according to the regulator.
 Appealing a merger decision is an attack on the commission’s legal reasoning and doesn’t say anything about whether companies intend to resurrect a deal.
 Since then, Penguin has merged with Random House, and the new company is called Penguin Random House.
 Bankruptcy Judge Robert Gerber to declare most of the recall-related litigation barred by his 2009 order enabling the automaker to emerge from bankruptcy by shedding most of General Motors Corp’s liabilities.
 “Near-term uncertainty is causing options traders to take these short-term bearish bets,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said in a June 16 phone interview.
 ‘Capped’ Upside The ruling will likely be considered in tandem with the merger between Comcast and Time Warner, which could delay the approval process even further, according to Shah.
 If the Sunday Ticket rights aren’t renewed on the terms discussed between AT&T and DirecTV, then AT&T can call off the merger, the filing said.
 in 1972, Britt spent more than four decades at the company as it morphed through two megamergers and the decoupling of the cable unit.
 While his career took him through some of the media industry’s biggest deals, Britt took a skeptical stance on the benefits of mergers.
 The Time Warner AOL deal, valued at about $184 billion, was the largest-ever merger at the time and is now remembered as a debacle.
 “Private banks are reducing JGBs because they sense that inflation will emerge at some point, although they’re still trying to find out if that’s really the case,” said Ryutaro Kono, chief Japan economist at BNP Paribas SA in Tokyo.
 John Fund and represented by David Boies, contend that from 1999 to 2001 Halliburton falsified earnings reports, played down estimated asbestos liability and overstated the benefits of a merger.
 “April was strong and May was not as strong” Sorrell, whose WPP remains the ad world’s leader after the failed merger of peers Publicis Groupe SA and Omnicom Group Inc.
 and Havas SA, even after Publicis and Omnicom failed to merge.
 special-purpose company to merge with the Birmingham, Alabama-based insurer, the publication said.
 Rural/Metro shareholders sued over the buyout, claiming the board accepted Warburg’s lowball offer after getting advice from conflicted RBC bankers, who botched the effort to shop around the emergency services company to other bidders.
 “Experiences are forgotten quickly and life goes on with somewhat better conditions and then the willingness to solve the problem that they actually were facing subsides, and that’s a big mistake” Bank Union Sweden, a European Union member that hasn’t adopted the euro, emerged largely unscathed from Europe’s debt crisis.
 Two bankrupt lenders, Nordbanken and Gota, were merged by the state and had their bad loans dumped in so-called bad banks.
 “Actually, no we’re not” Gold merger and acquisition activity has revived this year after falling to the lowest total deal value in 10 years in 2013 as companies grappled with a sharp drop in the metal’s price.
 The mining industry is showing “signs of life” for dealmaking, William Quinn, head of mergers and acquisitions at TD Securities Inc, said at a conference in Toronto June 24.
 The disposals, while not imminent, will support potential mergers, acquisitions or other “strategic changes that may create value,” the ministry said.
 companies rallied amid merger activity.
 “The emergence of competition from China, as well as Japan, remains a possibility, as we move towards the second half of the present decade” Cruise-ship passenger numbers rose 77 percent over the last decade to 213 million by the end of 2013, exceeding the 57 percent expansion in overall tourism mainly comprised of land-based holidaymakers, according to the study.
 and the Machinists union reached tentative contracts covering more than 11,000 mechanics, airport ground workers and others at merger partner US Airways Group Inc.
 If approved, the US Airways accords will allow the start of negotiations on a single contract covering 30,000 employees represented by the International Association of Machinists and the Transport Workers Union at the merged American.
 Negotiations for a single contract to cover flight attendants at the merged carrier are under way, American said.
 A merger would help AMS and Kirchheim, Germany-based Dialog, whose chips help manage power consumption, pool resources as smartphone demand rises and devices from cars and traffic lights to vending machines become connected, boosting demand for semiconductors.
 More than $10 billion of mergers and acquisitions in the semiconductor industry have been announced this year, led by Analog Devices Inc’s takeover of Hittite Microwave Corp.
 In an interview last year, he described the investment process he put in place as “fluid” and “thought-through” at the same time, “like the layout of well-designed emergency room in a hospital, organized to minimize costly errors” No Stars The CIO office’s investment strategy is directly implemented for assets the bank manages on a discretionary basis, and passed on to other clients through their advisers.
 The 72-year-old was hospitalized last month after undergoing emergency surgery following a heart attack.
 A merger with struggling rival Mobilicity or another small competitor would help, he said.
 “The challenge we at Wind face is securing any one of these sources of spectrum at terms and value levels that the business of Wind can support, and within the timeframe that the spectrum is needed to meet LTE demand” Subscriber Growth Mobilicity would be the most attractive merger candidate because it operates in the same market as Wind and has complementary spectrum licenses, Lacavera said in an interview.
 emerged as a winner in the government auction, spending about $200 million to acquire airwaves in Quebec, Ontario, Alberta and British Columbia.
 Violent political demonstrations in Bangkok haven’t been reported since May 15, when grenade and gunshot attacks killed 3 and injured 22 anti-government protesters, according to the Bangkok Emergency Medical Service’s website.
 How Zoopla must wish it had made its IPO run three months ago” Zoopla, which was merged with London-based Daily Mail’s online property-listings division in 2012, had a record 399 million average monthly visits to its websites in the six months through March.
 “With the merger activity, I think people are trying to buy growth” Six of the 10 main S&P 500 groups advanced today, with industrial shares adding 06 percent to pace gains.
 The move may lead to a merger with Dollar General, Jefferies said.
 “There’s certainly going to be a lot of people interested, so ultimately I would think that there’s a price that allows for a deal to get done” Shire is the latest takeover target in a record wave of health-care mergers this quarter.
 Mothers may emerge as a key voting bloc as the ferry sinking stirred sympathy toward the families of the victims, Yoon said.
 The party, which emerged from the peace movement, commanded more than 10 percent of the national vote in 2009, its highest-ever showing.
 Since the business model only gained currency in the past two years, the details embedded in the fine print of the deals are only starting to emerge.
 The recent hires help Barclays replenish a team that has lost a number of veteran bankers this year, including Paul Parker, global head of mergers and acquisitions, technology banker Stu Francis, and Skip McGee, the bank’s most senior banker in the US.
 More tapes emerged during the weekend, including one that purportedly features Foreign Minister Radoslaw Sikorski and Jacek Krawiec, chief executive officer of oil refiner PKN Orlen.
 Obama acted after Congress failed to extend emergency unemployment benefits at the end of last year.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Neither South Africa’s dominant platinum union nor the top three producers it has targeted in an almost five-month pay strike will emerge as winner from the standoff, according to Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Commerzbank AG, Germany’s second-biggest lender, is moving its mergers and acquisitions operations from the UK.
 economy is really strong enough yet for the first rate increases, the re-emergence of inflation pressures could temper that view.
 Valeant used the call to review its growth goals, and its plans to find cost savings in a merger with Allergan.
 The restructuring may include a merger of Samsung Everland and Samsung Electronics, or Samsung Everland and Samsung C&T, to form a holding company structure, the Maeil said on its website, without citing anyone.
 Mediobanca and Intesa said in separate statements today that they exercised their rights to seek a demerger of Telco, the investment vehicle that owns 224 percent of Italy’s largest phone company.
 While Telecom Italia Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano is in favor of keeping Tim and expanding it through an eventual merger with Vivendi SA’s GVT unit, Telefonica and Oi SA -- the country’s No.
 After the demerger, each partner will get back Telecom Italia shares as well as its share of debt.
 The fund is the successor to the Pax World Global Women’s Equality Fund, following a shareholder-approved merger, and is the only mutual fund in the US.
 It may use the funds to expand its network as it strives to control a quarter of the Russian mobile-phone market by 2019 after a merger with state-run Rostelecom’s cellphone assets this year.
 What I really want to spend my time and energy on is the broader picture that emerged around Yahoo at Cannes.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Williams Partners LP is proposing a merger with Access Midstream Partners LP after a $6 billion purchase that would create one of the biggest US.
 Access Midstream said separately it has not approved a merger and will consider a proposal.
 Mike Stice, Access Midstream’s CEO, said that “since Williams invested in ACMP in 2012, it’s been clear to me that our companies share many common values” The purchase, which isn’t contingent on the related merger, will increase Williams’ ownership of Access to 100 percent of the general partnership and 50 percent of the limited partnership, according to the statement.
 The merged company, which will use the name Williams Partners, would have 2015 adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization of about $5 billion, Williams said.
 The merged company would pay investors $120 for every dollar it earns in 2015.
 He has been a senior executive at the bank since before the 2000 merger with Paribas SA.
 Its cash-and-stock bid will be followed by an effort to replace most of the board and force a merger with Laval, Quebec-based Valeant.
 WPP remains the ad world’s leader after the failed merger of peers Publicis Groupe SA and Omnicom Group Inc.
 Turkish authorities can “entirely” suspend the right to privacy in communication in emergency situations, according to the document.
 Before this deal, Shenzhen-based Tencent had racked up at least $2585 million in mergers and acquisition deals in the second quarter of this year, trailing Alibaba Group’s $248 billion, according to Bloomberg Industries analyst Tim Craighead.
 A snap vote will be needed if more recordings emerge and other government members “are discredited,” Janusz Piechocinski, head of the Polish Peasants Party, which governs with Tusk’s Civic Platform, said in a separate Gazeta interview.
 MGM emerged from bankruptcy in December 2010 and in July 2012 filed for a possible initial public offering after spurning a takeover bid from Lions Gate Entertainment Corp.
 Monetary Policy Russia’s central bank will “continue increasing the key rate” if “existing inflation risks materialize, and threats to medium-term inflation targets emerge,” the bank said in a statement today.
 “The merger agreement also provides for a so-called ‘window-shop’ period during which PetroLogistics may consider other proposals,” Reint added.
 The first Model S sedans emerged in June 2012.
 Inditex, which has increased profit every year since its 2001 initial public offering, said in March that it planned to open as many as 500 new stores this year and merge up to 100 small stores into nearby ones.
 One bright spot for Canadian equities is the potential for mergers and acquisitions activity to increase as companies make use of the cash they’ve hoarded on the sidelines, Adatia said.
 The company is seeking to tap growing demand for chips that power advanced functions in daily life, such as blind-spot detection and automatic emergency braking in autos.
 Telefonica’s $12 billion deal to merge its German business with E-Plus has to overcome concerns at the European Commission that reducing the number of German wireless operators could harm competition and increase prices.
 The operator won’t explain its strategy before the commission acts on the Telefonica merger with E-Plus, he said.
 The MVNO will reach the 20 percent mark over a period of five years and has the option to acquire an additional 10 percent of the merged company’s capacity, according to the statement.
 “By means of the agreement certain remedies shall be implemented, which Telefonica Deutschland offered during merger control proceedings in order to remove competition concerns of the European Commission,” Telefonica said.
 investor who seeks to block a merger that would take the company private.
 The merger, which Charm accepted, is expected to close before the third quarter.
 “The merger is the product of a hopelessly flawed sales process that was designed to ensure the sale of Charm to the buyout group, on terms preferential to the consortium at the expense of plaintiff’s and the company’s other public ADS holders,” Pappas, who lives in Connecticut, said in the complaint.
 Buying Cigarettes For a patient with asthma, the hospital would be able to score how likely they are to arrive at the emergency room by looking at whether they’ve refilled their asthma medication at the pharmacy, been buying cigarettes at the grocery store and live in an area with a high pollen count, Dulin said.
 The UPMC Insurance Services Division, the health system’s insurance provider, has acquired demographic and household data, such as whether someone owns a car and how many people live in their home, on more than 2 million of its members to make predictions about which individuals are most likely to use the emergency room or an urgent care center, said Pamela Peele, the system’s chief analytics officer.
 Emergency Rooms Studies show that people with no children in the home who make less than $50,000 a year are more likely to use the emergency room, rather than a private doctor, Peele said.
 Being able to predict which patients are likely to get sick or end up at the emergency room has become particularly valuable for hospitals that also insure their patients, a new phenomenon that’s growing in popularity.
 UPMC, which offers this option, would be able to save money by keeping patients out of the emergency room.
 Son’s possible argument that a merged company will be better able to compete with AT&T and Verizon is “dubious,” First said.
 and Time Warner Cable Inc, which also plan to merge.
 Madrid-based Telefonica’s $12 billion deal to merge its German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus has to overcome EU concerns that reducing the number of German mobile operators could harm competition and increase prices.
 The companies are looking to complete the merger this year and will dispose of assets to meet regulators’ concerns about competition.
 Solvay will look to exit the business after three years, and may receive a targeted 250 million euro payment on top of an upfront payment of 175 million euros when the merger is completed.
 BNP Paribas, created by the 2000 merger of Banque Nationale de Paris and Paribas SA, expanded its sponsoring to other tennis events.
 BNP Paribas, suspected of hiding about $30 billion in transactions, will probably plead guilty to conspiring to violate the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, a person familiar with the discussions said last week.
 Popular Protest Goldman became the target of a popular protest in Denmark after it emerged in December that the investment bank will receive some veto rights over how Dong is managed in exchange for its capital injection.
 The Mini has emerged as a status symbol among many Chinese women who like its looks and see its BMW connection as conferring luxury, according to Munling Cheong, market research director at Shanghai-based Labbrand Enterprise Management Consulting (Shanghai) Co.
 Jacobs Douwe Egberts is raising the debt to back the merger of Mondelez International Inc’s coffee business with Amsterdam-based DE Master Blenders 1753 NV.
 hired banks to sell as much as 5 billion euros ($7 billion) in assets as they try to secure antitrust approval for their planned merger, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Emergent Biosolutions Inc.
 joined the Washington office, where he will be co-leader of the energy, project finance and technology team and a member of the mergers and acquisitions, securities and corporate governance practice group.
 “Cyber-enabled theft of trade secrets by state actors in China has emerged as a major threat to our economic and thus national security,” Max Baucus, who took up the post of US.
 Intesa Sanpaolo SpA, which also holds a stake in Telco, will soon announce its support for a demerger of the investment vehicle, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Bitcoins emerged in 2009 out of a paper authored under the pseudonym Satoshi Nakamoto.
 Marco Patuano, chief executive officer of Telecom Italia SpA, which owns 67 percent of Tim, is in favor of keeping Tim and expanding it through an eventual merger with GVT, the people said.
 GVT hasn’t participated in talks involving Rio de Janeiro-based Tim over a merger or any other type of corporate restructuring, according to GVT’s statement.
 GVT, which emerged in 1999 during the privatization of Brazil’s telecommunications industry, had 12 percent of the country’s broadband market and about 9 percent of its landline market in 2013, according to Vivendi’s annual report.
 Oi raised 825 billion reais in a capital increase last month as part of its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Still, a merger with GVT would make more sense because it would allow Tim to add TV offers, he said.
 The fervor to reduce expenditure may drive merger and acquisition activity, with companies seeking to share capital expenditure and infrastructure, PwC said.
 Barrick Gold Corp, the world’s biggest producer, last month failed to buy its largest competitor, Newmont Mining Corp, a merger that was partly driven by cost savings.
 Health-care companies climbed 21 percent as a group, rallying amid merger activity.
 “If a trend emerges that the new focus is to go after airports, airlines and international airlines, then obviously companies will have to review the situation,” said Huma Yusuf, senior Pakistan analyst at Control Risks in London.
 “It gives it a bit more flexibility if it were interested in picking up any brands that could come up for sale after a Reynolds/Lorillard merger,” Bloomquist said.
 Logista is the fifth company to announce plans to sell shares this year in Spain as the country’s economy emerges from three years of economic contraction.
 In addition to overseeing the electric grid and policing energy markets, the FERC’s duties include reviewing utility mergers and regulating the transport of oil and natural gas on inter-state pipelines.
 While the companies said they would elaborate on their proposal once the union had responded, details emerged at the AMCU mass meeting at Impala.
 For safety reasons, a lot of people channeled their investments towards Germany” Merkel’s Mission Merkel emerged as a continental leader during the euro-area crisis that sent the DAX from 7,253 on July 27, 2011, to 5,072 by Sept.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat SpA’s board authorized the carmaker to raise as much as 4 billion euros ($54 billion) by issuing new bonds, giving the company flexibility to refinance debt as it implements its merger with Chrysler.
 Fiat’s board also formally signed off on the merger of the Italian and US.
 Fiat bought full control of Chrysler in January, and the merger is part of Marchionne’s decade-long effort to turn the Turin-based company into a carmaker big enough to challenge General Motors Co, Volkswagen AG and Toyota Motor Corp.
 Extremely Sorry Cameron apologized yesterday for hiring Coulson as a media adviser shortly after the editor stepped down from his post at the News of the World when the phone-hacking controversy first emerged in 2007.
 “B2Gold’s track record of successful mine development and operation, coupled with its balance sheet, cash flows and funding capacity will de-risk the development of Fekola” Merger Market The acquisition is the latest in a heating up merger market for gold mining companies.
 First, it merged its phone unit with Sony to create Sony Ericsson Mobile Communications Ltd, and eventually sold its stake in the venture to Sony in 2012 after its devices failed to win over users.
 The largest purchase by a European acquirer in the quarter highlights just how desirable shares can be: Holcim Ltd’s $40 billion merger with cement peer Lafarge SA was paid for entirely in stock.
 “You have to be pretty optimistic about the market and the synergies the merger will produce,” said Erik Gordon, professor at the University of Michigan’s Ross School of Business in Ann Arbor.
 Two versions of Charney’s removal emerged from interviews with people close to the situation.
 While Patuano is in favor of keeping Tim and expanding it through an eventual merger with Vivendi SA’s GVT unit, Telefonica and Oi SA -- the country’s No.
 Agency’s Troubles The agency’s troubles emerged after an investigation from the VA’s inspector general, an internal agency review and the White House’s own evaluation found systemic mismanagement at veterans’ hospitals and clinics, such as keeping secret lists of patients seeking care in order to hide months-long waits.
 Senate Democrats propose using emergency funds that wouldn’t need to be offset.
 Emergency workers at the scene today found the airplane’s two black-box recorders, Peter Knudson, a spokesman at the NTSB, said in a Twitter post.
 Among the risks that remain are the split-second decisions that pilots must make if they are faced with an emergency as they accelerate past 100 miles (161 kilometers) an hour toward takeoff, Haueter and Cox said.
 Even if an engine catches fire or another emergency occurs above that speed, pilots must take off and deal with the emergency in the air or risk crashing into the ground.
 787 Dreamliner at London’s Heathrow Airport last year to faulty wiring in the plane’s emergency locator transmitter.
 “This condition in isolation should not have caused a battery thermal event, if the battery short-circuit protection features had effectively limited the current to a safe level” Beacon’s Role The locator transmitter is used to notify authorities of an aircraft’s location in the event of an emergency.
 ‘Frustrated’ Investors CIT reversed a 2012 loss of $5886 million and posted a profit of $6816 million last year, the most since the company emerged from bankruptcy.
 “It’s going to be messy for a while, and the thing that’s most likely to happen is there is going to be curtailment of oil shipments” Deal Activity Speculation around mergers and acquisitions is boosting stock prices too.
 ’Remain Vigilant’ “We need to remain vigilant for any risks that might emerge in the housing market,” Osborne told a news conference in London to mark the report’s publication.
 Spending Cut They emerged on June 6 with an agreement to cut defense spending by 400 million euros ($546 million) as part of Merkel’s effort to balance the federal budget, a pledge she made during her re-election campaign last year.
 Theoharis’s Record The easier access to markets and funds has made Greece less reliant on the 240 billion euros of emergency loans from its euro-area peers and the International Monetary Fund, which had made stringent demands on the country to put its house in order.
 Rural/Metro shareholders sued over the buyout, claiming the board accepted a lowball offer from Warburg after getting advice from conflicted RBC bankers, who botched the effort to shop around the emergency services company to other bidders.
 Acquisition Spree Activist investor Marcato Capital Management LP earlier this month asked American Realty Capital to curb its merger and acquisition spree, and complained that a recent stock sale hurt existing shareholders.
 “Rather than focus on corporate mergers, we will concentrate on the deliberate execution of our organic acquisition strategy,” Schorsch said in today’s letter.
 Standard Chartered in January said it would merge its consumer and corporate-banking business to cut costs as Mike Rees, the head of corporate banking, was named deputy CEO and Finance Director Richard Meddings said he planned to leave.
 Company Chief Executive Officer Richard Anderson told the committee yesterday that previous efforts to reform the bank were “totally ignored” In the House, at least two renewal proposals have emerged.
 shareholder ValueAct Capital Management LLC said it’s not selling the falling stock and backs the company’s efforts to merge with Allergan Inc.
 College graduates these days don’t emerge into the most ideal conditions.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Lafarge SA, the French cement maker that plans to merge with Holcim Ltd.
 The Senate Veterans’ Affairs Committee canceled a meeting scheduled for tomorrow to consider a measure introduced by panel chairman Bernie Sanders that would authorize $2 billion in emergency funds to hire doctors and nurses and open 27 new medical facilities.
 agreed to pay $6 billion for control of Access Midstream Partners LP, with plans to eventually merge the company with its subsidiary, Williams Partners LP.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Hillshire Brands Co, the maker of Jimmy Dean sausages, withdrew support for a merger with Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Hillshire said it doesn’t yet have the right to terminate its merger agreement with Pinnacle, which was agreed upon less than three weeks before Tyson and Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 The transcript on Wprost’s website shows Belka allegedlydiscussing options for the central bank to buy government bondsin an emergency situation by providing liquidity to state-ownedlender BGK and state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA.
 “He’s the one who has dealt with the thorniest issues” Hancock sought to expand in less capital-intensive lines of insurance after AIG was burned by higher-than-expected costs in commercial segments including workers’ compensation, where claims emerge years after policies are sold.
 4 amid increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 While the companies said they would elaborate on their proposal once the union had responded, details emerged at the AMCU mass meeting at Impala.
 Paris-based BNP Paribas will probably plead guilty in early July to a criminal charge of conspiring to violate the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, the person said.
 The European Commission’s probe “found that the merged entity will continue to face competition from a number of competitors,” the regulator said today in an e-mailed statement.
 More tapes emerged during the weekend, including one that purportedly features Foreign Minister Radoslaw Sikorski and Jacek Krawiec, chief executive officer of oil refiner PKN Orlen.
 Violent political demonstrations in Bangkok haven’t been reported since May 15, when grenade and gunshot attacks killed 3 and injured 22 anti-government protesters, according to the Bangkok Emergency Medical Service’s website.
 Russia merged its two competing depositories in 2012 to bring settlement procedures into line with international norms.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Bouygues SA plans to eliminate 17 percent of the jobs at its telecommunications unit after merger talks with Orange SA and separately with Iliad SA failed.
 Bouygues’s discussions with Orange, the largest French phone company, got stuck at an early stage, though Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg backed the idea of a merger.
 While the merger allowed Tower to redomicile in Bermuda, which doesn’t have a corporate income tax, Tower has faced reserve shortfalls.
 As the bureaucracy swelled during that period, Russia emerged as the world’s most corrupt major economy.
 Iraq, whose Shiite-dominated and Iranian-backed government is led by Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki, is seeking emergency US.
 Cordesman and Pillar said any emergency military involvement should be conditioned on Maliki taking steps toward a political deal with legitimate Sunni leaders.
 Rostan’s New York-based firm teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Two American tobacco giants that have been involved in on-and-off merger talks may get some help an ocean away in Spain.
 A deal would rank as the biggest-ever tobacco merger, creating a company with more than $13 billion in annual sales, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Reynolds’ largest shareholder, British American Tobacco Plc, has been involved in the merger talks, the people with knowledge of the situation said last month, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 Jane Seccombe, a spokeswoman for Winston Salem, North Carolina-based Reynolds, and Robert Bannon, director of investor relations at Greensboro, North Carolina-based Lorillard, said their companies don’t comment on merger speculation.
 While it may make sense for Imperial to buy brands that might be sold after a Reynolds-Lorillard merger, it could depend on which brands end up for sale and the company’s finances.
 She sees a 90 percent chance that the merger gets done.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Most of billionaire John Paulson’s hedge funds rose in May as stocks climbed to records and bets on mergers and credit paid off, according to a person briefed on the returns.
 The Paulson Partners Enhanced fund, a merger-arbitrage strategy that uses leverage to amplify gains, rose 19 percent last month and 48 percent year to date, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The firm’s Paulson Partners fund, a similar strategy to the levered merger pool, rose 09 percent in May and 33 percent this year, helped by gains in telecommunications, health care, energy and post-reorganization equities, the person said.
 Shareholders of both Westfield Group and Westfield Retail Trust over the past four weeks approved billionaire Frank Lowy’s plan to merge the group’s Australian and New Zealand operations with the retail trust to create the self-managed Scentre.
 “The supply surplus appears to be biting much faster than many assumed now that it’s finally emerged” Futures on the Singapore Exchange traded below $90 for the first time since the contract started in April last year.
 Companies tied to mergers were active today.
 Altice is raising its stake in Numericable after agreeing in April to merge the French cable provider with Vivendi SA’s phone unit SFR, a transaction valued at more than 17 billion euros.
 Emergency response systems were activated to contain it, shoreline restoration has begun and relevant authorities and community leaders notified, according to the statement.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Greenberg Traurig LLP made two high-profile hires, snagging practice heads from Dentons and Patton Boggs LLP, both of which have recently undergone mergers.
 Dentons, which has 2,600 lawyers in 75 locations, was formed last year through a merger of three firms.
 Patton Boggs recently merged with Squire Sanders to create Squire Sanders Boggs, which has 1,500 lawyers in 44 offices.
 and T-Mobile US Inc, through their proposed merger, gain a chance to ditch baggage associated with Sprint’s past stumbles while conveying the message that they’re focused on growth.
 For BMW, which claims to make the “ultimate driving machine,” Tesla’s emergence threatens to make the German brand’s refined muscle cars appear antiquated, putting at risk a business model that depends on its ability to command premium prices.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, the top merger adviser this year, is combining its health-care and retail investment-banking groups amid a boom in deals involving pharmaceutical companies.
 Some of Tesla’s more recent publicly available patent applications relate to computer-user interfaces and a port to allow for emergency maintenance of a high-energy battery pack.
 No Debris A search spanning 850 square kilometers of the ocean floor where sounds similar to black box emergency beacons were heard by an Australian search vessel in early April turned up no evidence of aircraft debris.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Gambling executive Mark Scheinberg, whose father is under indictment in the US, emerged as one of the world’s youngest billionaires yesterday after agreeing to sell PokerStars for $49 billion in cash.
 “Without question there are mergers and acquisitions in the pipeline for the company” Mayorga has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock and a target price of 6030 pesos.
 named Rohit Chatterji to lead mergers and acquisitions for Asia excluding Japan as Rob Sivitilli resigned from the post after 18 years at the biggest US.
 Sivitilli, a 41-year-old native of Canada, joined JPMorgan in New York in 1996 and moved to Singapore in 2010 when he was named head of Southeast Asian corporate finance and mergers and acquisitions.
 M&A Projection In November, Sivitilli forecast a 30 percent increase in the value of mergers that JPMorgan expected to handle in Asia for 2014.
 As China’s thirst for crude grows with the expansion of its emergency stockpiles and refining, the International Energy Agency estimates the nation is poised to surpass the US.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- James Tomilson Hill, the Blackstone Group LP vice chairman who runs the company’s $58 billion hedge-fund business, has emerged as a billionaire as the world’s largest private-equity firm and his art collection have surged in value.
 Jonathan Gray, the 44-year-old who runs the company’s real-estate business, emerged as a billionaire last year.
 After graduating from Harvard Business School in 1973, Hill worked in mergers and acquisitions, rising to co-chief executive officer of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 He’d also been an architect of some of the most iconic friendly mergers of the age: Bendix Corp’s $18 billion merger with Allied Corp.
 in 1983, American Stores’ $25 billion takeover of Lucky Stores in 1988, and Time Inc’s $14 billion merger with Warner Communications in 1989.
 Other suitors are unlikely to emerge for Pinnacle, at least right now, according to Shea of Bloomberg Industries, which said industry buyers have been more attracted to pure-play companies.
 In a Reverse Morris Trust, the seller spins off a unit, which is then merged with the acquiring company by swapping stock.
 The Boeing 777-200 jet went missing while on a routine flight to Beijing from Kuala Lumpur, baffling authorities as contact was lost less than an hour into the journey with no emergency warnings.
 He joins managers such as Carl Icahn, Warren Buffett and John Paulson in benefiting from $12 trillion in pending or completed mergers and acquisitions so far this year, a 61 percent increase from the same period in 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Paulson Partners Enhanced fund, a merger-arbitrage strategy that uses leverage to amplify gains, rose 48 percent this year through May, according to a person familiar with the matter said last week.
 The disappearance of the Boeing 777-200 jet with 239 passengers and crew on board while on a routine flight to Beijing from Kuala Lumpur has baffled the authorities as contact was lost less than an hour into the journey with no emergency warnings.
 The offering came as accounting irregularities emerged at the Espirito Santo International holding company.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- A 3 billion-euro ($4 billion) price gap is standing in the way of a possible merger of France’s third- and fourth-largest mobile carriers.
 The French state, which owns about 27 percent of Orange, has asked the former phone monopoly to seek European alliances and mergers at home, Montebourg has said.
 The CEO appointed a taskforce to consider merger options in 2010, identifying 12 candidate airlines.
 The brand’s emergence as a viable upscale alternative has prompted luxury-car leader Bayerische Motoren Werke AG to hone its environmental image.
 Record Debt Finance Minister Joe Oliver has said he is studying ways to further scale back CMHC, which in the last few years has discontinued some other services and set higher skills requirements for top executives as risks from a building boom emerged.
 global health-care conference that the drugmaker, which was created through a series of mergers and acquisitions, would consider more deals given the right opportunity.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Arabtec Holding Co’s head of mergers and acquisitions, Shohidul Ahad-Choudhury, has been dismissed following the resignation of Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik, a person familiar with the situation said.
 “The return of a multi-loan deal is something different for investors” Deutsche Bank is marketing the notes as Europe’s 100 billion-euro CMBS market re-emerges from a collapse in real estate values that left thousands of properties worth less than their outstanding debt.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Poland will shuffle management of Warsaw Stock Exchange SA to speed up preparations for a merger with Wiener Boerse AG and help the country’s sole equity market operator cement its position as the largest in central Europe.
 “I expect the new CEO to lead the process of a potential merger of the Warsaw and Vienna bourses to the point where I’ll be able to make a final decision on it,” Treasury Minister Wlodzimierz Karpinski said in e-mailed responses to Bloomberg News questions today.
 Tamborski started negotiations with the Vienna bourse and is “a credible partner for the Austrian side” Warsaw and Vienna bourse operators started merger talks in April 2013, seeking to protect their market positions in central and eastern Europe amid growing consolidation of stock markets worldwide and increased competition of alternative trading platforms.
 Polish Interest The planned merger is “a very difficult process for technical and procedural reasons as well as due to cultural differences” between the two bourses, Karpinski said.
 “There are apparent risks connected to the valuation of Vienna and organizational issues arising from the merger,” Jaromir Szortyka, a Warsaw-based analyst at PKO Bank Polski SA, said by phone today.
 In the House, at least two renewal proposals have emerged.
 Citic will also be able to merge overlapping businesses that currently compete with each other in areas such as real estate and steel.
 “Now we’re becoming one company and it will generate value through mergers, integration and carve outs” The shift also provides Citic the ability to raise cash and to make acquisitions abroad, giving it freer rein to act commercially even as its mandate remains intertwined with politics.
 “We want to promote the emergence of green debt,” Pierre Ducret, head of the lender’s environmental unit CDC Climat, told a conference on energy and finance today in Paris.
 At issue was whether the bank had breached the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, which allows the US.
 “If you believe the long-term growth prospects and fundamental value of the company, then maybe now is the time to talk to them,” Rostan, whose New York-based firm teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions, said by phone.
 With an almost 30 percent stake, Wilson can influence or control strategic changes, including approving a merger, Lululemon said in its most recent annual filing.
 Business centers in Hyderabad city, Nawabshah and Mirpurkhas, all in southern Sindh province also shut down after reports of Hussain’s arrest emerged, Ary News reported yesterday.
 Israeli billionaire Beny Steinmetz’s BSG Resources Ltd, operator of a diamond mine in Sierra Leone, is making efforts to minimize the risk of people moving to and from infected areas, and has updated rules for emergency evacuation of expatriate staff.
 The group, established from the merger of four state-owned companies in 2006, has begun preparing to list its Australian unit Manassen Foods overseas and it hasn’t decided on the IPO size of the maker of Albatros bread and Harringtons chocolates, Lv said.
 SNC doesn’t foresee a bidding war emerging for Kentz, though it would be ready to react should a rival suitor emerge, Card said.
 The unit has been looking for joint-venture partners after merger talks with Phoenix Group Holdings failed in November.
 D’Amelio also said Pfizer’s attempt at a mega-merger doesn’t rule out the possibility the company will instead break up into smaller parts.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Kraton Performance Polymers Inc, which plans to merge with a unit of LCY Chemical Corp, fell the most in more than two years after saying the combination will add to earnings later than originally forecast.
 The imbalance may not fully end for two years, and the merger won’t boost earnings per share in the first year as originally forecast, he said.
 The merger should close in the fourth quarter, Kraton said in a regulatory filing today.
 ‘Entice Me’ To encourage the company to sell, Priceline needed to bid high, according to Scott Rostan, founder of New York-based Training The Street, which teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions.
 have emerged as key players in local services with smartphone software that ties customers directly to nearby businesses, helping fuel a surge in app popularity.
 Higher Price OpenTable shares closed at $10448 yesterday, $148 above the offer price, which Lehmann said may be a sign that some investors are betting competing bidders could emerge.
 The company merged with Comparex Africa in 2004 and was renamed Business Connexion, which Mophatlane led starting in 2007.
 Drillers and regulators misunderstand the limits of blowout preventers, or BOPs, which are supposed to pinch pipes and prevent oil and natural gas from escaping a well in an emergency, the US Chemical Safety and Hazard Investigation Board said in a report made public today.
 Mike Mayo, an analyst at CLSA Ltd, said in February that the 2007 merger creating BNY Mellon has failed to deliver higher profits as the company lags behind its biggest competitors.
 have seen three main network operators emerge in both the US.
 It’s only available to public safety agencies until the Governor’s Office of Emergency Services determines whether it’s confidential.
 Federal regulators imposed rules for crude-by-rail shipments following a series of derailments and explosions and issued an order last month that required railroads to report such traffic to state emergency responders.
 It recommends more state rail inspectors, emergency response program improvements and real-time data from railroads.
 BNSF’s 14-page correspondence to the state includes one page that’s blacked out and says the information is “pending legal review” The rest of the letter consists of general emergency response and hazardous materials information from the Association of American Railroads, a Washington-based trade group.
 The redacted copy of the document was e-mailed to Bloomberg News by the Governor’s Office of Emergency Services.
 Security Reasons “We can’t just release it to the general public,” Kelly Huston, a spokesman for the state emergency services office based in Mather, California, said by telephone yesterday.
 “Officials requesting the information are asked to agree to use the information solely for emergency response planning purposes and not to make the information public for security reasons,” Lena Kent, a California-based BNSF spokeswoman, said in an e-mail.
 The ruling addresses an issue that arose after Congress passed the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008, which, among other things, curtailed the ability of hedge funds to defer taxes on billions of dollars in incentive fees.
 Whether the central bank is going to do that is another matter” Emergency Hike The bank increased its one-week repurchase rate by 55 percentage points to 10 percent following an emergency rate meeting Jan.
 ‘Intense Negotiations’ “The agreement, which is the result of intense negotiations in recent months between the ABI and Punch Taverns’s other key creditors, will see Punch Taverns emerge with a sustainable capital structure,” Robert Hingley, director of investment affairs at the ABI Special Committee of Punch’s bondholders, said in an e-mailed statement yesterday.
 Different Reasons “We’ve had a lot of utility mergers for slightly different reasons,” Kit Konolige, a New York-based analyst for BGC Partners LP, said today in an interview.
 This rail emerged from an ET-Plus with one of its edges folded over: Something was restricting it.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Philips NV will merge some lighting units into a 14 billion-euro ($19 billion) standalone company to share research and development costs with outside investors, echoing a move by German rival Siemens AG.
 Efficiency Drive Philips predicts that the units will merge in the first half of 2015, and will book an initial 30 million euros in costs this year.
 The firms are part of the shadow banking system because they lack the regulatory oversight and emergency funding tools of traditional banks.
 We have a belief that we can buy, build or borrow” The big beer companies also could see more consolidation, though Swinburn doesn’t expect the kind of merger mania that created Anheuser-Busch InBev NV and SABMiller Plc in the first decade of the 2000s.
 and Morgan Stanley to help prevent a repeat of the 2008 financial crisis, when similar firms became heavy users of the Federal Reserve’s emergency-lending facilities, Stein said.
 data outweighed increased mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Dialog Semiconductor Plc climbed 2 percent after saying it is exploring a merger with AMS AG.
 His administration has enforced emergency rule in Borno, Yobe and Adamawa, the three states where Boko Haram is most active, since May 2013.
 Policy makers’ commitment to avoid tweaking policy is being challenged as the threat of deflation emerges and data suggests economic expansion may be receding from its fastest pace in two years.
 The Skadden Arps team includes New York-based partner David Hepp, mergers and acquisitions.
 Patton Boggs recently merged with Squire Sanders to create Squire Sanders Boggs, which has 1,500 lawyers in 44 offices.
 “As announced on May 4, 2014, the company is exploring strategic alternatives which could include, amongst others, a possible spinoff or other separation of selected businesses within the company, a merger, or other strategic transactions involving the company or its businesses,” B/E said.
 Marcato recently targeted Sotheby’s in a campaign alongside fellow activist Third Point LLC, and called on InterContinental Hotels Group Plc to consider a merger with a bigger company.
 Nabil Al Kindi, COO for the Gulf region and Shohidul Ahad-Choudhury, head of mergers and acquisitions also left following CEO Hasan Ismaik’s departure last week, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they’re not authorized to discuss the matter.
 Weill, known for leading the 1998 merger of Travelers Group Inc.
 tax domicile through a merger with AstraZeneca Plc spurred Democrats including Carl Levin, a Michigan Democrat, to propose eliminating the tax benefits of some of these transactions.
 bank merger.
 Among advisers on mergers, the firm rose to sixth this year from ninth in 2013, the data show.
 Fee income from underwriting equities and bonds, as well as advising on mergers and acquisitions, fell 23 percent in the region from 2011 to 2013, according to New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
 Some of its more recent publicly available patent applications relate to computer-user interfaces and a port to allow for emergency maintenance of a high-energy battery pack.
 The new leaders emerged from a closed-door session with a show of unity evidenced in the succession of quick votes.
 Future mergers “will without question result in fewer firms and may harm consumers by limiting choices and raising prices” ‘Competitive Harm’ AT&T is the second-biggest US.
 “The proposed merger would remove a pay-TV competitor from many local TV markets —- a direct competitive harm,” John Bergmayer, senior staff attorney with the Washington-based policy group Public Knowledge, told lawmakers.
 Issa, a California Republican, had asked whether media companies need mergers to be viable competitors.
 The AT&T deal, like Comcast’s merger, needs approval from US.
 Congress doesn’t have a vote on the mergers.
 The termination of the Pinnacle merger agreement allows Tyson to complete its $77 billion takeover of Hillshire.
 Hillshire withdrew its support for the Pinnacle merger on June 16, and yesterday’s announcement by Pinnacle means the deal is officially dead.
Gambling executive Mark Scheinberg,whose father is under indictment in the US, has emerged as abillionaire after PokerStars’ agreement to be acquired for $49billion in cash.
 It is a country of continental dimensions with a single language and large masses of consumers” Itau ranked second in merger advising in Brazil this year through yesterday, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “It’s very tough to see how Pilgrim’s Pride, even with JBS’s support, would be able to acquire a firm of Hormel’s size, unless it was a merger of equals,” Feng said in a phone interview.
 “This is a very, very large price being paid,” Scott Rostan, founder of New York-based Training The Street, which teaches new hires at investment banks how to structure mergers and acquisitions, said in a phone interview.
 Event-driven offerings led all hedge-fund strategies in growth last year as mergers and acquisitions and activist campaigns attracted investors, according to an April report by Chicago-based Hedge Fund Research Inc.
 Before Harvard Management, McKenna worked for six years at Caxton Associates LLC, and prior to that was a vice president in mergers and acquisitions at Citigroup Inc.
 Maserati, the maker of the $66,900 Ghibli sedan, may receive orders for 40,000 cars this year, and the brand is “on pace for 75,000 deliveries in 2018” Fiat bought full control of Chrysler in January, and the planned merger is part of Marchionne’s decade-long effort to turn the Turin-based company into a carmaker big enough to challenge General Motors Co, Volkswagen AG and Toyota Motor Corp.
 Today’s ruling addresses an issue that arose after Congress passed the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008, which, among other things, curtailed the ability of hedge funds to defer taxes on billions of dollars in incentive fees.
 Emergency workers at the scene found the airplane’s two black-box recorders, Peter Knudson, a spokesman at the NTSB, said in a Twitter post yesterday.
 Among the risks that remain are the split-second decisions that pilots must make if they are faced with an emergency as they accelerate past 100 miles (161 kilometers) an hour toward takeoff, Haueter and Cox said.
 Even if an engine catches fire or another emergency occurs above that speed, pilots must take off and deal with the emergency in the air or risk crashing into the ground.
 The component crisis at Iranian carriers has encouraged the emergence of a home-grown maintenance industry as a byproduct, the CEO said.
 Son’s possible argument that a merged company will be better able to compete with AT&T and Verizon is “dubious,” First said.
 The order was issued after an emergency at Eglin Air Force Base in Florida on June 23, when a fire in the rear of one plane forced the pilot to abort a takeoff.
 That order, issued June 13, came in response to an “in-flight emergency” on June 10, when a Marine Corps F-35 had to return to base at Air Station Yuma, Arizona, after its engine lost oil.
 EFG-Hermes’ planned merger with Qatari investment bank QInvest LLC collapsed in May last year.
 and then in 2004 engineered the merger with Travelers.
 stocks rose, sending the Dow Jones Industrial Average to a record, as drugmakers rallied on merger activity and investors speculated economic growth will accelerate.
 Drug companies rallied amid merger activity.
 Monsanto, the world’s largest seed producer, and Syngenta, a $35 billion competitor, recently explored the idea of a merger in discussions with their advisers, people familiar with the matter told Bloomberg News June 23.
 In fact, Ralcorp provided an example of how un-doing a merger could unlock value when it was a stand-alone, he said.
 “Maybe people are more optimistic than they used to be” Irish pubs in April had the biggest annual increase in sales since 2006 as drinkers began to emerge from five years of austerity after the near-collapse of the country’s banking system forced Ireland to seek an international bailout.
 Hackers would have “an unfair competitive position” by being able “to understand the value of trades and the value of mergers and acquisitions before they would happen,” Rogers said.
 Wynnefield Capital Inc’s Nelson Obus defeated the agency last month in a Manhattan court in a suit claiming he relied on an illegal merger tip to make $13 million in 2001.
 Disappointment over stalled merger talks between the PSE and the nation’s bond exchange has also weighed on the stock, PCCI’s Lago said.
 Confirmation of Russia’s partial withdrawal emerged hours after separatist rebels downed a military helicopter in eastern Ukraine, killing a general and 13 troops.
 “But selling it now during the low point in the cycle is very questionable and would be admitting that it was a bad acquisition” Global Ambitions While Deutsche Boerse had intended for ISE to be part of a larger platform in the US, its stateside expansion plans were hobbled when European regulators blocked its proposed $95 billion merger with NYSE Euronext in 2012.
 (BLK), the world’s largest money manager, has emerged as one of the biggest winners from Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s plans to revive the country’s economic expansion.
 Paris-based BNP Paribas will probably plead guilty in early July to a criminal charge of conspiring to violate the International Emergency Economic Powers Act, the person said.
 “Soon machine learning will help to drastically reduce wait times in emergency rooms, predict disease outbreaks and predict and prevent crime,” Sirosh wrote in a blog post.
 The survey examined the median pay of 719 bankers and traders working in areas including mergers, trading, debt and equity markets at banks such as UBS AG, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “We feel confident that we would be able to submit a competitive bid to buy the company” Rising property taxes and utilities costs are squeezing operating margins at real estate investment trusts that own apartments, putting pressure on them to merge and sell assets.
 -AT&T Inc-DirecTV merger.
 AT&T Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson and DirecTV CEO Michael White testify before the House Subcommittee on Regulatory Reform, Commercial and Antitrust Law on their proposed $485 billion merger.
 The transcript on Wprost’s website shows Belka allegedly discussing options for the central bank to buy government bonds in an emergency situation by providing liquidity to state-owned lender BGK and state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA.
 In all, eight Italian banks are raising more than 10 billion euros this year, benefiting from renewed confidence as Italy emerges from the deepest recession since World War II.
 “It’s also a crucial step for the bank to become more attractive” Some analysts and fund managers, including Girola and Romano, expect Profumo’s next step will be to find a foreign bank with which to merge.
 From Weil representing Oracle are mergers and acquisitions partners Keith Flaum, Richard Climan and James Griffin, all in Silicon Valley; employment partners Amy Rubin and Jeffrey Klein, both in New York; and tax partner Helyn Goldstein, also in New York.
 Bouygues SA rose 52 percent after a report that Orange SA is studying a cash offer for its telecommunications unit and Iliad SA advanced 63 percent after France said it’ll push for a merger among phone companies.
 Les Echos reported that Orange is studying a cash offer for Bouygues Telecom even after Bouygues said their merger talks have failed.
 Separately, Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg said France will use all means to push for a merger among the country’s phone companies to help reduce price wars and make job cuts unnecessary.
 Unexpected Move Policy makers unexpectedly raised the key policy rate by 50 basis points to 75 percent in April after an emergency move to 7 percent from 55 percent in March, which they at the time said was temporary.
 El Nino Monsoon rainfall this year will be 7 percent below average in India because of increasing chances of emergence of an El Nino, the meteorological department predicts.
 The monsoon will be 7 percent below normal this year as an El Nino emerges, the nation’s weather department said June 9.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- France will use all means to help the country’s phone companies merge, a day after Bouygues SA said separate talks to combine with two rivals failed to result in a deal, according to Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg.
 KCG Holdings was formed last year by the merger of two dominant high-frequency traders, Getco LLC and Knight Capital Group Inc.
 In this case, Icahn may seek to merge Family Dollar with another discount chain, Dollar General Corp, BB&T’s Chukumba said.
 “We will be active on mergers and acquisitions for both casualty and life insurance businesses” The Tokyo-based insurer will target countries in the 10-member Association of Southeast Asian Nations, or Asean, which includes Indonesia, Thailand, Malaysia, Singapore, Brunei, the Philippines, Cambodia, Laos, Myanmar and Vietnam, Karasawa said.
 The target figure doesn’t include benefits from potential mergers and acquisitions, Karasawa said.
 Beyond Asia, MS&AD wants to be in the top 10 premium income earners in Lloyd’s of London’s insurance market through mergers and acquisitions, Karasawa said.
 The company came under the spotlight a year ago when it ousted its president and said it scrapped merger talks with Mitsui Engineering & Shipbuilding Co.
 Murakami said the company won’t reject a merger that can create synergies but that growing bigger in its domestic market isn’t the only goal.
 Creative Labs Slingshot emerged from an initiative at Facebook called Creative Labs, which will release a handful of apps this year that are branded as experimental startups within the company.
 Slingshot was born out of a hackathon in December during which about 40 ideas emerged.
 District Judge Richard Leon takes place one hour before French bank BNP Paribas SA is scheduled to enter a guilty plea in Manhattan federal court as part of an $897 billion settlement of charges that it violated the same law broken by Fokker, the International Emergency Economic Powers Act.
 The measure climbed less than 01 percent yesterday after erasing an earlier loss, as merger activity and optimism over corporate earnings offset concern over crises abroad before a Federal Reserve policy decision tomorrow.
 The SEC said in its guidance that the proxy advisory firm must provide notice to the recipient of a significant relationship or a material interest, and this can’t be done with “boilerplate language” Compliance Action Telefonica German Merger Approval Augurs More Europe Phone Deals The European Union approval of the merger of two national wireless carriers in its biggest economy will give the struggling $230 billion industry a reprieve while setting the stage for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 It may also set a precedent for future mergers and acquisitions with the elimination of a major European wireless discounter.
 I don’t really know enough about it” Inversion Wave The controversy over inversions has emerged from obscurity in little over a year, as the number and size of the deals have grown.
 However, there were several exceptions, including if they had “substantial” business in their new home, or if they merged with a foreign company whose shareholders ended up owning at least 20 percent of the combined firm.
 Minneapolis-based Medtronic has reached a merger plan with Dublin-incorporated Covidien Plc, which has a clause allowing the companies to walk away if Congress changes the tax law.
 satellite-TV operator, disclosed today that it had been in merger discussions with a competitor up until six days before agreeing to be bought by AT&T Inc.
 DirecTV had been in talks to merge with an unnamed Company A at the same time the El Segundo, California-based company was discussing a transaction with AT&T, according to detailed merger documents that AT&T filed with the US.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen had contacted DirecTV Chief Executive Officer Mike White to discuss a merger of the two satellite companies, citing people with knowledge of the matter.
 Dish and DirecTV had tried to merge in 2002 and were blocked by regulators.
 Talks started up again with Dallas-based AT&T in mid-March, and shortly after that, Company A contacted DirecTV to discuss a merger of equals.
 White stands to receive a severance payment of $221 million in cash, equity and benefits after the merger closes and, in most cases, if he’s removed from his job, according to the filing.
 The company hasn’t disclosed White’s role after the merger.
 Jones Day Threatens Infringement Action Against Detroit Website Law firm Jones Day LLP threatened the operator of a website critical of Detroit’s emergency manager with a trademark-infringement lawsuit.
 The website, wwwkevynorrcom, is named for the former Jones Day partner who serves as emergency financial manager for Michigan’s biggest city, which filed for bankruptcy last year.
 and Time Warner Cable Inc, which are in the process of their own merger.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Hitachi Ltd’s chief executive officer said he’s open to deeper ties, which could include merger talks, with Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd, after the equipment makers failed in their bid for Alstom SA’s power business.
 “The possibility of merger discussions shouldn’t be denied” While the companies are in talks about possible ties outside their thermal-power equipment businesses, they’ve yet to come up with candidates among their other operations, he said.
 In 2012, the two agreed to merge their energy-equipment businesses, described by Nakanishi at the time as a step toward becoming the world’s biggest provider of thermal-power equipment.
 Considers M&A Hitachi President Toshiaki Higashihara said in January that his company would consider mergers and acquisitions of various kinds.
 If Fox’s offer puts the company in play, other suitors may emerge anyway, said Matthew Harrigan, a Denver-based analyst at Wunderlich.
 “There’s obviously a case to be made as well as to why both companies could be very good merger partners” The same wasn’t true for Time Warner and AOL Inc.
 The two merged in 2001 in a deal valued at more than $100 billion that triggered record losses, driving the shares down 68 percent.
 regulators punished BNP Paribas after it admitted to violating the International Emergency Economic Powers Act and the Trading with the Enemy Act by processing banned transactions involving Sudan, Iran and Cuba.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA won European Union approval to merge its German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus after it pledged to bolster smaller rivals and divest spectrum, the European Commission said.
 Telefonica must sell as much as 30 percent of the merged carrier’s network capacity to one or several virtual operators before it can close the takeover, EU regulators said in a statement today.
 The merged company must also offer to sell spectrum and assets to a potential new entrant to the market or to help virtual operators expand.
 The merged company will extend existing wholesale agreements until 2025, Telefonica Deutschland said in a statement.
 Drillisch will have the option to buy an extra 10 percent of the merged company’s capacity.
 The opinion of the merger advisory committee isn’t binding on the European Commission.
 Austrian prices rose after two phone companies merged, Austrian regulators said.
 Chief Executive Officer Peter Swinburn may be bad news for investors betting on a merger between Anheuser-Busch InBev NV and SABMiller Plc.
 Molson Coors would be integral to a potential tie-up between AB InBev and SABMiller because the merged company would probably need to sell off its half of the MillerCoors LLC partnership to appease regulators.
 SABMiller CEO Alan Clark told Bloomberg News in January that the case could be made for a merger, even though it would probably require divesting some US.
 Colin Wheeler, a spokesman for Molson Coors, declined to comment on merger speculation.
 “He’s an experienced manager, but he’s not experienced in M&A” The management transition itself may also hinder a potential negotiation, though bringing in a new CEO just before a merger isn’t unprecedented, Gorham said.
 She also integrated the $3 billion merger between RJ.
 Swinburn, 61, said last month that big beer companies may see more consolidation, though he didn’t expect the kind of merger mania that created AB InBev and SABMiller in the first decade of the 2000s.
 As listening moves online, and new companies such as Spotify have emerged to deliver music in new formats, the record labels are using copyrights and the threat of legal action to gain pieces of the young businesses.
 There were 5,500 people with exchange plans admitted to HCA hospitals in the second quarter, and 19,000 visited the company’s emergency departments.
 Lopez also predicted more mergers among cinema chains.
 The Federal Emergency Management Agency has been tapped to coordinate the government’s response.
 The White House has asked Congress for $37 billion in emergency funds, including $18 billion to care for the newly arrived children and $879 million to pay for detention, prosecution, and what is officially referred to as “removal” Much of that would go to private companies and contractors -- a list that runs from American Airlines to medical practitioners and shelter providers.
 The Department of Defense has stepped in to help the ORR by opening emergency shelters on military bases in Oxnard, California, Fort Sill, Oklahoma, and San Antonio.
 “It’s just been politically untenable to even improve services for these kids we were seeing, let alone prepare for emergency situations,” she says.
 and Time Warner Cable Inc, which are in the process of their own merger.
 York Risk has “unbelievably strong organic growth prospects” and a great deal of mergers and acquisitions opportunity, Robert Le Blanc, a senior managing director at Onex, said in a phone interview.
 Televisa, which acquired its 50 percent stake in Iusacell in 2012, said this month it would like to use mergers to make the wireless company bigger and more competitive in Mexico.
 Massachusett’s Governor Deval Patrick imposed restrictions on Zohydro prescriptions after a federal judge struck down an emergency ban.
 Shares of Japan Exchange, operator of the bourse created when the Tokyo and Osaka venues merged last year, tumbled 20 percent in 2014 through yesterday.
 Shelly Sterling and Ballmer yesterday filed an emergency application in federal court to immediately send the case back to Superior Court in Los Angeles.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Fitch Ratings downgraded Brazil’s Oi SA and Portugal Telecom SPGS SA to junk after a unit of Espirito Santo International defaulted on debt payments to the European carrier, which plans to merge with the South American company.
 “The downgrade primarily reflects the financial profile of the post-merger entity between Oi and PT that is not able to initially support an investment-grade rating,” Fitch said in the statement.
 “Further, any material or immediate improvement in the financial profiles of the pro forma merged entity may prove challenging despite the management’s intention to delever” The proposed merger is expected to proceed after the companies’ revised some of the financial terms of the transaction, according to Fitch.
 Portugal Telecom hasn’t said why Oi wouldn’t have been informed despite the impact it would have on debt ratios after a merger.
 At least a dozen more chipmakers have had merger discussions this year, according to people familiar with the companies’ plans.
 “We’re going to see more mergers of equals,” Doug Freedman, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets, a unit of Royal Bank of Canada, said in a phone interview.
 As ship owners face pressure to put more fuel-efficient vessels into service to get better charter prices, they will need to team up with peers in alliances or mergers to tap financing sources, according to Claus Brandt, a shipping analyst at the accounting and consulting firm.
 George Soros, Apollo Global Management LLC and Goldman Sachs are among investors trying to snap up financial assets in Spain as the economy emerges from a six-year economic slump.
 The transaction also enables a potential merger of its two largest life companies.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG and UBS AG are benefiting from surging global share sales and a recovery in mergers and acquisitions after a jump in second-quarter investment-banking revenue.
 Deutsche Bank’s revenue from share sales and mergers advice climbed 23 percent to 395 million euros ($529 million) in the second quarter, Europe’s largest lender said in a statement today.
 European securities firms, which have seen stagnant investment-banking fees since the financial crisis, are benefiting from strengthening regional economies despite political concerns in places such as Ukraine, said Anna Faelten, deputy director of the mergers and acquisition research center at the Cass Business School in London.
 European mergers climbed to $7374 billion in the year’s first seven months, the strongest performance since 2007, data show.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA shares surged the most in more than a year and its bonds rose as the Brazilian phone company’s merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA was rescued after being threatened by a crisis at the Espirito Santo group.
 When the merger was announced last October, Portugal Telecom would own as much as 396 percent of the combined entity.
 Portugal Telecom hasn’t said why Oi wouldn’t have been informed despite the impact it would have on debt ratios after a merger.
 Cost Savings Oi is scheduled to complete the transatlantic merger with Lisbon-based Portugal Telecom before the end of the year.
 Under the agreement announced today, the companies will extend deadlines to complete their merger, according to the statements, which didn’t provide new dates.
 He said he hopes to sell at about $110 after the merger is “satisfactorily renegotiated” The ADRs closed at 68 cents yesterday.
 “While General Motors’ legal department came under withering attack from the Senate committee investigating the ignition switch debacle, GM CEO Mary Barra emerged largely unscathed in the questioning, and I’m certain that is seen as a win by the top executive team at GM,” Jack Nerad, executive editorial director and senior analyst for Kelley Blue Book’s KBBcom said in an e-mail.
 China Contracts The company can afford “not to attract emergency loans” to continue to finance its projects, Chief Executive Officer Igor Sechin told reporters yesterday in Brasilia.
 Handling Deals Goldman Sachs was the top-ranked adviser on mergers and acquisitions each of the last four years, and generated $2 billion from advisory work in 2013, 50 percent more than its closest competitor.
 As the finance chief of Allianz, he oversaw mergers and acquisitions and investments for 12 years before joining Frankfurt-based Deutsche Bank, where he’s chairman of the supervisory board.
 His frequent-flier status with Delta usually lets him snag a roomier Economy Comfort seat, which offers up to 4 extra inches of legroom, or at least an emergency-exit row.
 Mazzeo said a buyer could emerge to rescue Trump Plaza and save jobs.
 Trump Entertainment emerged from bankruptcy in 2010 with Donald Trump as a minority investor and no management role.
 The value of announced mergers and acquisitions worldwide climbed 95 percent to $13 trillion in the second quarter from a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 have revived talks to merge their wireless assets in Italy, according to people familiar with the negotiations.
 La Repubblica newspaper reported yesterday that Wind and 3 Italia are in advanced talks to merge.
 The merger discussions are intensifying as carriers across Europe struggle to maintain prices for their services amid stiff competition.
 The European Union’s approval this month of a merger of two national wireless carriers in Germany gave the struggling $230 billion industry a reprieve while clearing the way for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 Telecom Italia The carriers have held merger discussions in the last 12 months after 3 Italia and Telecom Italia SpA -- the country’s biggest phone company -- broke off negotiations for a combination.
 The pound and government bond yields jumped after the figures as traders added to bets the Bank of England could take the first step toward exiting emergency stimulus by the end of 2014.
 With the economy on course for its best year since 2007, divisions on the nine-member Monetary Policy Committee are expected to emerge as early as next month, economists say.
 Fox committed to selling CNN in a letter to Time Warner CEO Jeff Bewkes to address his concerns over regulatory scrutiny of a potential merger, the person said.
 and Lafarge SA, seeking antitrust backing for a planned $40 billion merger, outlined an initial list of assets for sale to cut the importance of Europe to 20 percent of combined revenue and win regulatory backing.
 “It’s the first time in the history of the industry that such a large number of assets is for sale to anticipate the requirements of the regulatory authorities” The French and Swiss companies plan to complete the merger in the first half of 2015, with Europe accounting for the bulk of the divestments as the region has the biggest overlap.
 Announcing a list of planned European sales helps to ease the merger‘s evaluation process with regulators, Fontana said.
 Previously he was a partner at Fish & Neave, which merged with Ropes & Gray LLP in 2004.
 Other irregularities emerged.
 In a growing number of cities, they’ve become more like boa constrictors, restraining officials as they try to emerge from the recession that ended five years ago.
 Prime Minister David Cameron said the government will push emergency legislation through Parliament inside a week to ensure communications companies keep records of e-mails, texts and phone calls for a year.
 “We are told this is a pedophile and jihadi emergency, but the court judgment they seek to ignore was handed down over three months ago and this isn’t snooping on suspects but on everyone” In the UK, Clegg’s Liberal Democrats blocked a plan by Cameron’s Conservatives to introduce what Clegg called a “snooper’s charter,” which would have required Internet service providers to store every website visited by customers for a year.
 The ECB’s assessment on any shortfalls that emerge will also include an appraisal of what the bank in question has done to improve its position since the beginning of the year.
 Gtech itself is the product of a merger with Lottomatica, operator of Italy’s state lottery, in 2006.
 The case may help clarify powers of tax authorities over bitcoins as central bankers who regulate supplies of traditional currencies from the euro to the pound grapple with their emergence as an alternative means of payment.
 The miner said in September it hired BMO Capital Markets to advise on a potential sale or merger.
 Adds company comment in fourth paragraph) July 1 (Bloomberg) -- Ratan Tata, who steered India’s biggest industrial group for two decades, will discuss everything from mergers to his private life in stories based on interviews with the industrialist, according to a Japanese newspaper.
 Upcoming segments over the next month would reveal details about “mergers and acquisitions, new vehicle developments, labor disputes, assassination, terrorism, organizational reforms, power politics, fraud and selection of a successor,” according to the Nikkei.
 for about $78 billion after the target company scrapped another merger pact.
 Springdale, Arkansas-based Tyson will pay a $163 million fee related to the termination of Hillshire’s merger accord with Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 On June 16, Hillshire withdrew its support for the Pinnacle deal -- a merger agreed on before it became a target of competing takeover bids -- and said the Tyson proposal is a better deal for its shareholders.
 The company, which was stymied in its joint bid for Alstom SA’s power business in June, will be aggressive in seeking out merger and acquisition opportunities, Chief Financial Officer Tatsuhiko Nojima told reporters in Tokyo after the earnings release.
 “Signs of excesses that could lead to higher future defaults and losses have emerged in some sectors, including for speculative-grade corporate bonds and leveraged loans,” according to a report published today by the central bank as part of Chair Janet Yellen’s semi-annual testimony to the Senate Banking Committee.
 While borrowing rules remain strict, “we are seeing signs of loosening among the mortgage companies, and in our served markets, we are beginning to see evidence of the re-emergence of the first-time homebuyer,” Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Mezger said in a June 27 conference call.
 for a deal in the event of a merger between them.
 BAT, based in London, owns 42 percent of Reynolds and would have to approve of any merger.
 BAT’s agreement keeping it from increasing its stake in Reynolds dates back to the merger of RJ.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA said it wasn’t aware that merger partner Portugal Telecom SGPS SA had purchased debt issued by Rioforte, a holding company that’s selling assets amid speculation it may be unable to pay its bills.
 If the merger closes later this year as expected, the combined company would inherit the consequences of the Rioforte debt investment.
 Portugal Telecom hasn’t said why Oi wouldn’t have been informed of the Rioforte debt despite the impact it would have on debt leverage after a merger.
 Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava, who is also CEO of Portugal Telecom’s PT Portugal unit, is aiming to close the merger to streamline the ownership structure of Oi and become more competitive by sharing costs between the companies.
 President Barack Obama requested this week that Congress pass $37 billion in emergency spending to deal with s urge in recent months of children entering the US.
 While Telefonica has pressured Telecom Italia to sell its Brazilian unit, Tim Participacoes SA, Patuano favors keeping and expanding it through an eventual merger with Vivendi SA’s GVT division, people familiar with the matter said in May, asking not to be named because the deliberations are private.
 benchmark index yesterday added less than 01 percent amid optimism over corporate earnings and merger activities.
 Emergency officials received a call at about 1:50 pm.
 “When the explosion occurred, employees were evacuated and fire department and other emergency personnel responded quickly,” Grotz said.
 Defense Department officials acted after an emergency at Eglin Air Force Base in Florida on June 23, when a fire in the rear of one plane forced the pilot to abort a takeoff.
 peers amid expectations the Bank of England will be the first major central bank to begin exiting emergency stimulus.
 Culver previously issued debt and stock to help the insurer emerge from the financial crisis that felled rivals and led to the call for tighter capital rules.
 “I wouldn’t expect more mergers or anything like that” Legg Mason managed $7043 billion as of June 30, up 93 percent from a year earlier.
 mergers and acquisitions and global technology dealmaking at Jefferies Group LLC, is leaving the investment bank to join a technology startup.
 Its rank among advisers on mergers and acquisitions in Japan slipped to sixth for the six months ended June 30 from fourth for all of 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- London’s most successful law firms saw revenue increase in the last year as banking regulation and mergers fueled some of the strongest growth since the 2008 financial crisis.
 “From the beginning of January there has been strong growth in mergers and acquisitions,” Matthew Layton, London-based Clifford Chance’s managing partner said last week.
 Clifford Chance advised on 77 announced mergers and acquisitions worth $603 billion in the financial year that ended April 30, according to Bloomberg data.
 Looking at the history of bank mergers in Hong Kong, it’s a fair deal” Hong Kong regulations allow OCBC to delist Wing Hang once it owns 90 percent of the shares.
 The bill would be financed with about $12 billion in emergency funds and $5 billion in offsets elsewhere in the VA budget, said Miller and Senator Bernie Sanders, a Vermont independent and chairman of the Senate Veterans Affairs Committee.
 During the second quarter, American sold its remaining fuel-hedging contracts, adopting the strategy of merger partner US Airways Group Inc.
 American also will report $250 million to $300 million in special charges primarily related to its bankruptcy and merger.
 would help the companies build their case for regulators to approve their potential merger.
 By pooling their resources in the auction, the companies would be able to pay more to the federal government to acquire wireless spectrum -- demonstrating that a full merger would help the companies make bigger investments in their networks, benefiting consumers.
 “This seems to have less to do with a spectrum ownership strategy than it has to do with a negotiating strategy of two companies that want to merge,” said Craig Moffett, an analyst with MoffettNathanson LLC in New York.
 While the companies have agreed on the broad outlines of a merger in which Sprint would buy T-Mobile for about $32 billion, the agreement isn’t likely to be announced until August, the people familiar with the matter have said.
 Close Timing That means regulators could be preparing their rulings on a merger proposal just when the spectrum auction gets under way.
 The joint bid by Sprint and T-Mobile could move forward on its own if a merger is scrapped, the people familiar with the matter said.
 Sprint is asking banks for about $20 billion in funding for the T-Mobile merger, while SoftBank is seeking a similar amount, one of the people said.
 This echoes the argument both companies have made about the need to use mergers to get bigger to have a better chance against the two largest wireless carriers.
 The FCC also said it will consider further changes to auction rules in relation to joint bidding in the auction, and warned that “potential bidders will need to file well before the normal deadlines some of the information currently required in auction and license application forms” Spectrum Caps While Sprint and T-Mobile are trying to make long-range plans to have the best spectrum available for a time down the road when they ultimately combine, their current airwave holdings would exceed new limits if they were to merge.
 If the companies were allowed to merge on the condition they divest some of their excess spectrum, a sale of those airwaves could end up coinciding with the FCC’s auction.
 “From a policy perspective, a merger would be a nightmare,” Moffett said.
 So why aren’t they being rushed into emergency use? Until the medicines are shown to be safe for humans, they can’t ethically be used, researchers and drugmakers say.
 Emergency Use The Vancouver-based company began a safety study in January of its Ebola therapy after it showed success in animals, and the US.
 The FDA hasn’t received any requests for emergency use of experimental Ebola treatments, Tara Goodin, a spokeswoman for the agency, said by e-mail.
 companies from completing tax-reducing offshore mergers should be part of a revamp of US.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Job vacancies in London’s main financial district, known as the City, rose 15 percent last month amid an increase in initial public offerings and mergers, according to a recruitment survey.
 stocks declined the most in a week, after three successive days of gains, as investors weighed earnings reports and mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 Chairman Tulsi Tanti said his top priority was to see the Suzlon group emerge more competitive from debt restructuring as it seeks by March to re-list its offshore turbine unit, Senvion SE, on the London Stock Exchange.
 Thirty-five people have been killed since Israel expanded military offensive in Gaza yesterday, according to Ashraf al-Qedra, a Gaza emergency spokesman.
 Fitch cut Oi’s ratings after a unit of Espirito Santo International defaulted on debt payments to Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, which plans to merge with the Brazilian company.
 China’s emergence as an aviation superpower will help drive the market expansion, as will airlines’ quest for more efficient aircraft and continued growth in the budget carrier sector, Tinseth said.
 BOE officials have to decide whether consumer sensitivity to price changes is a signal of weak demand or whether they would have been generated by the emergence of discounters, regardless of the strength of the economy.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Quinn Emanuel Urquhart & Sullivan LLP opened an office in Houston led by white collar criminal trial lawyer David Gerger, whose litigation boutique, Gerger & Clarke, merged with the firm.
 The Cravath team advising Mylan was led by mergers and acquisitions partners Mark I.
 Emergency officials received a call at about 1:50 pm.
 “When the explosion occurred, employees were evacuated and fire department and other emergency personnel responded quickly,” Grotz said.
 More than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave after the allegations emerged last year.
 The Bank of England has also become embroiled in the scandal after it emerged bank officials allegedly condoned practices that could have resulted in market-rigging.
 Even with that track record, he’ll have to persuade investors that his ability to expand sales outweighs the cost savings and greater scale they could get through a merger with Murdoch’s media powerhouse.
 and finally decoupled AOL Inc, part of a disastrous 2001 merger undertaken by his predecessors that Bewkes once called “the biggest mistake in corporate history” This year, he spun off magazine publisher Time Inc, leaving him with the valuable cable networks as well as the Warner Bros.
 Hong Kong’s de facto central bank bought $133 billion this week to maintain the city’s 31-year-old currency peg to the greenback as merger activity boosted demand for the local dollar.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- India’s government challenged the merger of Vedanta Resources Plc’s local units in court on the grounds the deal by the flagship company of billionaire Anil Agarwal was aimed at avoiding taxes.
 The merger is a “device” for tax evasion, according to the petition filed today by the Ministry of Corporate Affairs, citing the income tax department.
 Sesa Sterlite Ltd, India’s biggest aluminum maker, emerged from the combination of Vedanta’s iron-ore mining unit Sesa Goa Ltd.
 “I don’t think this petition will have any impact on the merged entity as it was carried out after court’s approval,” Ashish Kejriwal, analyst at Elara Securities India Pvt.
 Still, Baigorri’s remarks come amid speculation in Brazil of potential mergers and consolidation in the phone industry.
 Telecom Italia Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano said yesterday that he could see advantages to a merger with yet another phone company, Vivendi SA’s GVT unit.
 After a planned merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA this year, the company’s net debt will be four times bigger than its annual earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, according to Standard & Poor’s.
 As the only major phone carrier controlled by Brazilians, Oi’s attempts to use mergers to grow, such as the acquisition of Brasil Telecom SA in 2010, have long been backed by the government, leading Barclays Plc to once describe the company as the "national champion" “There’s only so much the government can do to maintain the national champion,” Walt Piecyk, a telecom and tech analyst at BTIG LLC, said by phone from New York.
 In addition to Klingsberg, the Cleary partners representing Family Dollar were Paul Tiger, mergers and acquisitions; Amy Shapiro, financing; Nick Grabar, securities; and Brian Byrne, antitrust.
 ECB President Mario Draghi reiterated today that he’ll keep interest rates low as officials try to revive the region’s economy with a new round of emergency measures.
 The 10-cents-a-share quarterly payout at American came as the 2013 merger with US Airways delivers financial benefits faster than the company expected.
 American’s pre-merger parent, AMR Corp.
 “We hope to uncover additional investment opportunities in Argentina as it emerges from its long malaise” More than a decade after its record $95 billion default, the South American country is seeking to resolve the legal battle with holdout creditors including hedge fund Elliott Management Corp.
 Barrick Gold Corp, the world’s biggest gold miner, Newcrest and rivals racked up at least $26 billion in writedowns last year, the aftermath of a mergers and acquisitions spree and the metal’s steepest annual slump in a quarter of a century.
 That compares with a median multiple of 87 percent among 21 mergers and acquisitions in the global household appliance industry in the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Drought Odds The monsoon, which provides more than 70 percent of annual rainfall, will be 93 percent of a 50-year average from June to September as an El Nino emerges, the India Meteorological Department said on June 9.
 with pending mergers that would move their legal addresses outside the US.
 companies are racing to complete tax-reducing offshore mergers before a credible threat to stop them emerges from Congress.
 Mazzeo said a buyer could emerge for Trump Plaza to rescue the property and save jobs.
 and Lafarge SA, are selling units representing 20 percent of their combined revenue in Europe as they seek regulatory approval for a $40 billion merger.
 and Time Warner Cable Inc, which are in the process of their own merger.
 He said he wouldn’t rule out doing a tax inversion of his own if the right deal emerged, though nothing is imminent, he said.
 The hint of an early treatment benefit emerged in tests for cognitive decline, not day-to-day tasks.
 The country plans to merge its three official foreign exchange rates, Ramirez told investors in London in June.
 The company, formed by the merger of Nippon Steel Corp.
 Options traders are buying up protection against a potential drop in Time Warner stock, wary of risks that include the board’s resistance to a merger and potential antitrust issues.
 construction company whose chief quit in May after predicting a profit drop, is in merger talks with rival Carillion Plc to form the country’s biggest builder with a market valuation of about 3 billion pounds ($5 billion).
 A merged company would benefit from Carillion’s booming services business as the Wolverhampton, England-based builder expands its maintenance offerings for the rail, oil and telecommunication industries.
 Cutting Costs No final decision has been reached regarding the structure of any merger, the companies said.
 A decline of construction work and rising energy prices in Europe also prompted other builders in the region to merge and cut costs.
 French cement company Lafarge SA this year agreed a $40 billion merger with rival Holcim Ltd.
 Parsons Brinckerhoff Balfour’s plan to sell Parsons Brinckerhoff, the New York-based infrastructure consulting company it bought for $626 million in 2009, will proceed and isn’t affected by the potential merger with Carillion, the companies said.
 “We don’t rule out acquisitions in the future, but it would have to bring a lot of value to our portfolio in order for us to consider them” Long-term Positive The growing number of mills facing financial constraints may create merger and acquisition opportunities for big producers once sugar and ethanol prices start to recover, Alexandre Figliolino, Itau BBA’s director for sugar and ethanol, said in a phone interview last month.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian mergers and acquisitions are set to keep rolling amid cheap financing and rising economic confidence after record energy activity drove the value of deals up 30 percent in the first half of 2014 over a year ago.
 “We continue to have a pretty robust pipeline,” said Daniel Barclay, head of Canadian mergers and acquisitions group at Bank of Montreal’s BMO Capital Markets unit.
 “Calgary’s back in favor” Barclays Capital Inc, a unit of Barclays Plc, led the rankings of advisers of mergers and acquisitions in the first half, followed by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Gold deals are still the gold standard in terms of M&A in the sector, said Mike Boyd, head of mergers and acquisitions at Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce’s CIBC World Markets.
 in 2005 in a merger with a Canadian company.
 Signs that the worst may be over for PetroChina emerged last night when China’s ruling Communist Party announced that former Politburo Standing Committee member Zhou, who hasn’t been seen in public since October, was under investigation, according to a Xinhua News Agency report.
 The company last month unveiled plans to eliminate 17 percent of its workforce after merger talks with Orange and separately with Iliad SA failed.
 A merger of Bouygues Telecom and Iliad is the most realistic scenario of consolidation because of fewer regulatory hurdles and potential synergies, according to Societe Generale analysts.
 Across Europe, phone and cable carriers are pursuing a flurry of mergers and acquisitions to stem a decline in landline and wireless service revenue.
 Competition Commissioner Joaquin Almunia is scheduled to announce a merger decision at midday today in Brussels.
 They’re fitter and more playful, and they often emerge from a social scene where impetuousness brought delight and moral strictures were diluted by a modern mindset.
 “For a man who vows to fight to preserve his dignity, Donald is showing very little of it with such a blatant underhanded tactic” Adam Streisand, a lawyer representing Ballmer, said in an e-mail that he will file an emergency request in federal court to have the case sent back to state court.
 Missed debt payments by a company linked to the Iberian nation’s second-largest lender fueled concern yesterday that the euro region remains vulnerable to shocks as it emerges from a sovereign debt crisis.
 The work gained support because VA doctors were able to summon computerized records in seconds, vital for treating vets hustled into an emergency room, according to Ragon’s 2006 testimony before the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science and Transportation.
 “It’s one of the things they should do now given we’re seeing consolidations arise in the aftermath of Telefonica’s acquisition of E-Plus” To counter a fall in revenue, phone and cable carriers across Europe are pursuing a series of mergers and acquisitions.
 The tepid market reaction to the buyout offer suggests investors are concerned about the risk of a deal not being completed, according to Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 Looking at the history of bank mergers in Hong Kong, it’s a fair deal” Hong Kong regulations allow OCBC to delist Wing Hang once it owns 90 percent of the shares.
 The refiner successfully merged units that designed and built chemical plants into Sinopec Engineering Group Co.
 Lafarge wants to avoid competing with itself in Mexico after agreeing in April to a $40 billion merger with Holcim Ltd, which already operates in the Latin American nation, two people said.
 Lingering Weakness Clouding the picture are data pointing to lingering Greek economic weaknesses, after a 240 billion-euro bailout backed by emergency loans from the euro area and the International Monetary Fund.
 That was partly driven by “commercial activities, including merger and acquisition activities and dividend distribution,” it said.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Lafarge SA Chief Executive Officer Bruno Lafont said a recovery in European cement markets will help an asset-sale program needed to get its planned $40 billion merger with Holcim Ltd.
 The French and Swiss cement makers this month detailed a list of assets for sale to obtain antitrust approvals for their merger that will create a company that dwarfs their next nearest competitor HeidelbergCement AG.
 “Certainty of execution is very important because we want to be on time and we don’t want to delay the merger, and value is also important” Rating Repairs Net debt shrank to 101 billion euros at the end of June from 112 billion euros a year earlier, and the CEO reiterated a pledge to cut debt to below 9 billion euros by the end of 2014 to repair a credit rating that has fallen one level below investment grade.
 Eurobank, whose merger with National Bank of Greece SA had been nixed, was taken over by the HFSF, which named a new management team led by Megalou.
 Gilts advanced along with German bunds amid concern that banks remain vulnerable as the euro region emerges from the sovereign-debt crisis.
 “Signs of excesses that could lead to higher future defaults and losses have emerged in some sectors, including for speculative-grade corporate bonds and leveraged loans,” according to a report published this week by the central bank as part of Chair Janet Yellen’s semi-annual testimony to the Senate Banking Committee.
 magazine in 2010 and became a publicly held business the following year through a merger with 57th Street General Acquisition Corp.
 Bitcoins, which emerged last year as an alternative to currencies, can be used to buy everything from gummy bears to computers and hotel stays.
 earlier this year during merger talks between Newmont and its largest rival, according to people familiar with the situation.
 Talks between Barrick and Newmont about a merger broke down in April.
 “The vast majority of non-binding approaches end in failure” Representatives for Horizon and Roc declined to comment on the prospects of the merger proceeding.
 “There’s a certain element of risk the merger deal won’t go through and so that’s being priced in,” said Whiteman.
 One Bidder Not everyone says the merger is certain to go ahead.
 magazine in 2010 and became a publicly held business the following year through a merger with 57th Street General Acquisition Corp.
 work out the details of their merger, British American Tobacco Plc may be wise to keep its focus on the other side of the ocean.
 Since reports of the possible tie-up first emerged in early March, about $78 billion of value has been created for BAT shareholders, even as the company reported disappointing sales growth, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 While there’s been speculation that BAT could eventually acquire the merged Reynolds-Lorillard entity, analysts from Oriel Securities Ltd.
 Lengthy Talks Reynolds and Lorillard confirmed the merger discussions July 11.
 Before the Reynolds-Lorillard speculation emerged, BAT traded at about 16 times earnings, 16 percent lower than the average valuation for global tobacco stocks larger than $5 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Still, reports about the Dallas-based company’s interest triggered British stock-market regulations, designed to limit merger speculation, and compelled AT&T to make a statement denying plans to make an offer in the next six months.
 BNP, France’s largest bank, admitted it violated the International Emergency Economic Powers Act and the Trading with the Enemy Act by processing almost $9 billion in banned transactions from 2004 to 2012 involving Sudan, Iran and Cuba.
 Mallinckrodt “is setting itself up to be a very attractive short-sale candidate if the merger is completed,” Greenlight wrote.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP agreed in March to merge Safeway with its Albertsons chain at the industry’s lowest valuation in almost a decade.
 European industrial deals have risen more than 75 percent so far this year, led by the Holcim Ltd-Lafarge SA cement merger and General Electric Co’s purchase of Alstom SA’s energy assets.
 “Fiat states that they have not held discussions with Volkswagen regarding a potential merger,” the Turin-based manufacturer said today in a statement.
 Fiat is in the midst of completing its merger with Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler that would involve a listing on the New York Stock Exchange.
 “In light of the significant dilutive effect of the proposed merger on shareholders’ ownership interests and the potential impact on the value of their investments, we believe Roc shareholders should be afforded the opportunity to consider the merits of the merger,” Glass Lewis said in its report.
 Allan Gray’s proposal would place additional restrictions on Roc that other companies don’t face and breach the merger agreement, Roc said in a letter sent to investors yesterday.
 “If the merger fails, Roc may not be able to find other growth opportunities at a better price,” according to the company, which received a takeover bid last month from an unidentified suitor.
 SapuraKencana emerged as the world’s largest operator of tender rigs last year after buying part of Seadrill Ltd’s business for $29 billion.
 Lufthansa already has similar arrangements -- the closest cooperation available to carriers from different regulatory jurisdictions given bars on mergers -- with United Continental Holdings Inc.
 was weighing a bid for the Swedish maker of Absolut vodka in 2008, the company sought advice from Kilsby, then a mergers and acquisitions banker with Credit Suisse AG.
 “Her M&A skills have to be part of the reason why AbbVie has made five bids and they’re still talking,” said Scott Lindsay, who heads mergers and acquisitions at Credit Suisse in New York, in a telephone interview.
 Keurig’s is the fourth board, including Shire’s, that Kilsby has joined since 2011 after a banking career that culminated in her becoming the head of Credit Suisse’s mergers and acquisitions team for Europe, the Middle East and Africa.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- Italy’s 10-year government bonds fell relative to German bunds as a rift emerged over the pace of fiscal reform within the European Union.
 Chief Executive Officer Susan Cameron, who returned from retirement this year to negotiate the largest tobacco merger in decades, is building her company into a bigger challenger to market leader Altria Group Inc.
 Salix, of Raleigh, North Carolina, will merge with an Irish unit of Lainate, Italy-based Cosmo, the companies said yesterday in a statement.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Lafarge SA held profit steady in the second quarter as costs cuts helped offset a stronger euro, helping keep the French cement company on track to complete a $40 billion merger with rival Holcim Ltd.
 Lafarge and Holcim this month detailed a list of assets for sale to obtain antitrust approvals for their merger, and have received “marks of interest,” Lafont said.
 Bonds of Europe’s most-indebted nations slumped as speculation resurfaced that the euro region remains vulnerable to shocks as it emerges from the sovereign debt crisis.
 Gaza emergency services chief Ashraf al-Qedra said 16 people, including five children, were killed today as Israel’s offensive expanded.
 No injuries were reported from any of the approximately 200 rockets fired during the day, according to emergency services director Eli Bin.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC-backed Verso Paper Corp’s bonds have soared on a sweetened debt exchange offer that could give noteholders almost 20 percent of the company’s equity after its merger with NewPage Holdings Inc.
 They stand to receive almost 20 percent of the stock post-merger, he said.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi reiterated that he’ll keep interest rates low as officials try to revive the region’s economy with a new round of emergency measures.
 Traders are buying up protection against a potential drop in Time Warner stock, wary of risks including the board’s resistance to a merger and potential antitrust issues.
 ‘Considerable’ Risks Time Warner said it’s better off without Rupert Murdoch and that a merger would face “considerable strategic, operational, and regulatory risks,” according to a statement on July 16.
 Wagner, who co-founded the world’s biggest money manager in 1988, brings key experience in mergers and acquisitions, Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook said yesterday in a statement.
 ‘Watch History’ “Over the past 17 years, it’s been exciting to watch history unfold as Apple emerged as the premier technology company in the world,” Campbell said in the statement.
 A liens covenant has a “massive loophole that is completely inappropriate for long-dated bonds and could allow for tremendous structural and lien subordination for mergers and acquisitions, future discounted exchange offers, or any other purpose,” according to the report.
 It emerged from protection in 2008.
 Gottfried, a mergers and acquisitions and shareholder activism defense lawyer, joined Morgan Lewis & Bockius LLP as a partner from Alston & Bird LLP in the business and finance practice in Washington.
 He also advises clients on mergers and acquisitions, corporate governance, securities regulation and New York Stock Exchange and Nasdaq Stock Market compliance, the firm said.
 He has experience in mergers and acquisitions, reorganizations and capital markets transactions, with a focus on transactions involving master limited partnerships, the firm said.
 AbbVie’s bid for Shire is the latest merger in a period of increased acquisition activity in the drug and medical device industry.
 The selloff is reawakening concern that the financial system remains vulnerable to shocks as the euro region emerges from the sovereign debt crisis.
 Emergency Call According to the request for proposals, the provider chosen by the city can charge for phone service, except for 911 emergency and 311 hotline calls, though they can’t require a fee for Internet access.
 The firm led by Chief Executive Officer Koji Nagai is also grappling with increased competition in investment banking, leading to a slip in rankings for mergers and acquisitions advisers and debt underwriters.
 Its rank among advisers on mergers and acquisitions in Japan slipped to sixth for the six months ended June 30 from fourth for all of 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 for $13,000 in 1970 and merged it with his audiology shop.
 Since 2003, when Broz founded Political Development Group, the firm he merged into Angerholzer Broz, he has had about 50 clients in Congress, according to federal records.
 in Kenya if competition regulators allow its planned merger with Lafarge SA.
 Holcim, based in Switzerland and Paris-based Lafarge SA are seeking antitrust backing for a planned $40 billion merger they want to complete by the first half of 2015.
 They will focus on sectors including energy and resources, infrastructure, corporate/mergers and acquisitions, construction, agribusiness, property and government.
 Daniels is known for her competition advice on megamergers, the firm said.
 Declining Dynasties The sale marks the continued decline of American media dynasties, a once-thriving and elite group that had included the Chandlers, who owned the Los Angeles Times until a 2000 merger with Tribune Co; the Bancrofts, who sold the Wall Street Journal to Rupert Murdoch; and the Graham family, which landed a new owner for the Washington Post in Amazoncom Inc.
 Spain’s emergence from the worst of its recent crisis when economic growth resumed in the third quarter of last year “will help limit further declines in credit quality as employment and domestic demand recover,” Moody’s said.
 Portugal Telecom shares have dropped on concern the Rioforte debt could impede its merger with Brazil's Oi SA.
 They aren’t prepared for a normal monsoon” El Nino Seasonal showers will be 7 percent below average in India this year because of the potential emergence of an El Nino, the India Meteorological Department predicts.
 “This is going to damage Skymark’s financial situation,” said Senri Sasahara, an individual investor and chief executive officer of Innovative Advisor Corp, which advises on takeovers and mergers.
 “Unemployment is low and while there could be a slight increase of the number of people out of work in the coming months we don’t expect a significant deterioration of the labor market in general” ECB Action Dusseldorf-based EON SE, the country’s biggest utility, is considering cutting at least 500 jobs when it merges its conventional and renewables generation units.
 More Bins Topflight Grain Cooperative Inc, based in Bement, Illinois is adding 15 million bushels of storage capacity and will probably have to tap emergency bins, said Scott Docherty, the general manager.
 The company’s bankers worked on $166 billion of merger deals in Southeast Asia in the first half, allowing DBS to top the list of advisers in the region for the first time in its history, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The company’s merger with Applied Materials received strong opposition from China’s Ministry of Industry, DealReporter said.
 Italian ‘Thatcher’ “Eni’s new CEO may emerge as a male Italian version of Margaret Thatcher by going up against the unions,” analysts at Sanford C.
 The numbers aren’t comparable with the year-earlier period as the merger of copper producer Sterlite Industries (India) Ltd.
 India’s Ministry of Corporate Affairs has challenged the merger of Vedanta’s local units in court, the company said.
 Bender and Derek Wallbank July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Congress, facing twin emergencies over military veterans’ health care and the surge of children at the US-Mexico border, plans to act on one and leave the other unresolved before taking a five-week break.
 Emergency Spending The plan includes about $12 billion in emergency spending and $5 billion in offsets within the VA’s budget, said Senator Bernie Sanders, a Vermont independent, and Representative Jeff Miller, a Florida Republican.
 The compromise still faces a tougher sell in the Republican-led House, where lawmakers aligned with the small-government Tea Party wing have opposed attempts to spend emergency money.
 “Emergency funds are code for deficit spending,” Representative Phil Roe, a Tennessee Republican, said in an interview, describing his party’s hesitation to approve such funds.
 Rosneft can afford “not to attract emergency loans” to finance projects, according to Sechin.
 An American Well doctor diagnosed them with a pulmonary embolism, sending that person for emergency care and possibly saving his life.
July 1 (Bloomberg) -- The authority that oversees Australia’s Port Hedland, the world’s biggest bulk-export port, merged with nearby Dampier in the country’s energy and iron ore-producing northwest.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Orange SA Chief Executive Officer Stephane Richard says his rivals’ low-tariff tactics are no longer enough to steal market share in France, and he won’t be a leader in mergers and acquisitions meant to end a three-year price war.
 To stem a decline in landline and wireless service revenue, phone and cable carriers across Europe are pursuing a flurry of mergers and acquisitions.
 Telefonica SA last week got clearance for its 855 billion-euro ($116 billion) acquisition of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany, a regulatory decision that may provide impulse for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 Impairments will be recognized on the Skandi Aker and Aker Wayfarer vessels and on goodwill at the Aker Oilfield Services unit of Akastor, one of the companies that will emerge after the split, Oslo-based Aker Solutions said in a statement today.
 construction company ended talks to merge with rival British builder Carillion Plc after refusing to include its New York-based infrastructure consulting business in the deal.
 Those rules can be waived if there’s a major change in ITV’s business or if the board consents to merger talks.
 Swinburn said last month that big beer companies may see more consolidation, though he didn’t expect the kind of merger mania that created Anheuser-Busch InBev NV and SABMiller Plc in the first decade of the 2000s.
 “The positive trends that emerged in the second quarter of 2014 may only be visible at second glance, but they do exist and provide reason for some optimism,” Chief Executive Officer Andreas Treichl said in the quarterly report.
 The value of announced mergers and acquisitions worldwide was up 71 percent through June 30 compared with a year earlier, while the number of completed deals dropped 59 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Private-equity owners are lining up to sell stakes acquired over the last few years as deal-making returns to pre-crisis levels for both mergers and equity capital markets in Europe, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 More than 39,000 people have left the area of fighting for other regions of Ukraine, including 14,000 children, the State Service for Emergency Situations said on its website yesterday.
 Justice Department that allowed it to merge with US Airways Group Inc.
 Europe Concern More than $1 trillion has been wiped from the value of global stocks since a peak reached July 3, as analysts brought forward estimates for Federal Reserve interest-rate increases and a parent of Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo SA missed a bond payment, reigniting concerns over Europe’s financial stability as it emerges from its sovereign-debt crisis.
 Preferred shares of Brazil’s Oi SA sank to the lowest since its 1994 debut on concern its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA will be undermined by the latter’s holding of debt from a unit of Espirito Santo International.
 Espirito Santo International missed payments on some of its short-term securities, according to a July 8 statement, rekindling concern that the global economy is vulnerable to shocks as the euro region emerges from the sovereign debt crisis.
 “Having regard to the on-going listings, mergers and acquisitions, and dividend distributions in the market, we expect that the Hong Kong dollar exchange rate would remain strong in the near-term,” Peter Pang, deputy chief executive of the Hong Kong Monetary Authority, said in a posting on its website on July 26.
 Bank of America Merrill Lynch said in a July 16 note that Hong Kong’s funding may remain tighter than normal as banks try to get more cash to prepare for possible disruptions from the Occupy Central movement, in addition to demand from mergers.
 “However, the large amount of funds involved in these merger and acquisition deals still posed upward pressure on the Hong Kong dollar exchange rate” The Shanghai-Hong Kong Stock Connect program, due to start six months after its April announcement, isn’t a reason for an increase in Hong Kong dollar demand, Pang said.
 With the merger, Actavis will have around $4 billion in annual free cash flow, according to the company.
 Phone carrier Oi SA rallied after giving more details of the terms of its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 “Trian is fully supportive of this combination and has entered into voting agreement in support of the merger” Icahn didn’t return a phone call seeking comment on his gains.
 “There do not appear to be any conditions that would remedy the harms that would result from the merger,” Jeffrey Blum, senior vice president and deputy general counsel for the company said in a filing today with the Federal Communications Commission.
 After the merger, Philadelphia-based Comcast would connect 33 percent of US.
 Deal Opponents Dish and any other opponents of the deal will need to back up their arguments to regulators with data showing the merger is bad for the public, said Paul Gallant, managing director, Guggenheim Securities LLC.
 The Justice Department has reached out to the companies as it investigates whether the cable-industry merger is anticompetitive, said the people, who asked not to be named because the review isn’t public.
 to ensure that Comcast won’t favor its own programming over their content if the merger is approved.
 The Justice Department is using the interviews with the media companies to understand the issues in the merger and guide the investigation, said one of the people.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Indonesian stocks fell the most in six weeks and the rupiah snapped a four-day rally on concern investments will be delayed until a clear winner emerges from the nation’s disputed presidential election.
 Air Force has put off work on CF6-series engines, while American Airlines has delayed maintenance of V2500-model powerplants as the company merges with US Airways and the two companies streamline their fleets.
 Changes to fleet planning from mega-mergers such as American and US Airways, and defense-budget cuts are leading to fluctuations for suppliers.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Three mergers and acquisitions powerhouses -- Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz and Sullivan & Cromwell LLP -- worked on CIT Group Inc’s proposed $34 billion acquisition of OneWest Bank parent IMB Holdco LLC.
 Previously with Boies, Schiller & Flexner LLP, Birns is a corporate lawyer who focuses on mergers and acquisitions, joint ventures and private-equity transactions.
 If the merger closes later this year as expected, the combined company would inherit the consequences of the Rioforte debt investment, prompting Standard & Poor’s to say on July 4 that it may cut Oi’s credit rating.
 -- a closely held medical lab company that would be merged with Fleury -- have sought a greater role in the combined company, three people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 At the time, the economy was struggling to emerge from the worst recession on record, as massive bank losses helped drive Ireland into an international bailout.
 That can be the difference in surviving and perishing in an emergency situation, said Clarence Ditlow, executive director of the Washington-based research group Center for Auto Safety.
 for a lower-tax jurisdiction overseas, one of the goals for a merger with London-based AstraZeneca.
 Losses linked to real estate at BFA-Bankia, a banking group forged from a merger of savings banks led by Caja Madrid, pushed Spain into taking a 41 billion-euro European bailout to prop up lenders in 2012.
 A believer in free trade and the private and public sectors working alongside for the development of infrastructure, Slim often promotes Latin America as a good place to invest as middle classes emerge and speed up the economic growth.
 Monopoly Criticism? By ranking among the world’s richest, Slim has been a source of pride for many Mexicans, who see him as a symbol of the nation’s emergence as an economic power.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- A protein discovered less than a decade ago appears to play a role in whether symptoms of Alzheimer’s disease emerge, suggesting another avenue for exploration in efforts to find a treatment.
 judge for an emergency ruling to help them recover money from a payment he blocked on June 30 To contact the reporter on this story: Pablo Gonzalez in Buenos Aires at pgonzalez49@bloombergnet.
 Eircom, which emerged from bankruptcy protection in 2012 after 18 billion euros ($25 billion), or 40 percent, of its debt was written off, hasn’t made any decision on its options, said two other people.
 Prime Minister Antonis Samaras’s government is seeking to emerge from an economic contraction after triggering the euro-area financial crisis and undergoing the biggest-ever writedown of privately held debt.
 The newly merged company would be left to rely on Vuse, an e-cig line created by Reynolds that’s only now being widely distributed.
 Citigroup lifted its rating on the Glasgow-based company to buy from neutral, citing its exposure to positive trends in the oil and gas market, and possible merger and acquisition activity.
 saw their combined revenue from investment banking rise 67 percent to $917 billion in the first half of 2014, led by gains in equity underwriting and advising on mergers.
 The value of announced mergers and acquisitions last quarter soared to the highest since 2007, meaning banks are likely to have increases in advisory revenue as those deals are completed later this year, Hintz said.
 Those became evident during the crisis, when emergency loans by the Fed to the US.
 Libor Fine Jones, who joined Lloyds Bank in 1977, was appointed global director of money markets following the merger with HBOS Plc in 2008, according to the lender’s website.
 The companies will next perform due diligence, and the merger is set for completion in early 2015, pending regulatory approval, they said.
 “The alliance of KMW and Nexter creates a group with the momentum and innovative force required to succeed and prosper in international competition” Ministry Favors A merger “makes sense” because it would help preserve the capabilities of Europe’s defense industry, the German Economic Ministry said in an e-mail.
 German export controls of arms wouldn’t be undermined by a merger, as current rules would apply to shipping defense parts and components, the Economic Ministry said.
 Reorganization Costs Pearson said in February that it wouldn’t emerge from a difficult transition period until 2015 after earnings plunged on weak demand in US.
 companies from using cross-border mergers to escape the country’s tax system, the latest trend in corporate deal-making.
 “We should not be providing support for corporations that seek to shift their profits overseas to avoid paying their fair share of taxes” The mergers used to legally avoid taxes, known as inversion transactions, have become increasingly popular over the past year, particularly in the pharmaceutical industry.
 More recent deals, including Medtronic’s merger with Dublin-based Covidien Plc, include clauses that allow the companies to walk away if Congress changes the tax law.
 companies are treated as domestic unless they undergo a merger in which shareholders of the foreign company end up with at least 20 percent of the combined company’s stock.
 6, the same day it announced its plan to merge with NewPage.
 When Governor Jerry Brown declared a state of emergency in January, he called for a voluntary 20 percent cut in water usage.
 Investors are cheering a merger of the No.
 To gauge just how beneficial a tie-up of Zillow and Trulia might be for shareholders, Telsey Advisory Group says to look to last year’s merger of GrubHub Inc.
 Unlike recent Internet takeovers that helped buyers branch into new services, this merger would mimic the GrubHub deal by bringing together two very similar businesses -- and reduce marketing and overhead expenses so significantly that CRT Capital Group LLC sees the combined entity getting close to turning a profit.
 To stem a decline in landline and wireless service revenue, phone and cable carriers across Europe are pursuing a flurry of mergers and acquisitions.
 Telefonica SA last week got clearance for its 855 billion-euro ($116 billion) acquisition of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany, a regulatory decision that may provide impulse for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 Biggest Ever Combining Reynolds and Lorillard would rank as the biggest-ever tobacco merger, creating a company with more than $13 billion in annual sales to rival Altria’s nearly $18 billion in yearly revenue, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Jane Seccombe, a spokeswoman for Winston Salem, North Carolina-based Reynolds, declined to comment on merger speculation.
 Discussions of a merger may be helped by Imperial’s plans to sell as much as 30 percent of its stock in its Madrid unit, Compania de Distribucion Integral Logista Holdings SA, next month, according to Francis Alexander, a fund manager for Alexander Capital Management and Jacob Asset Management’s Wisdom Fund.
 “That may be the catalyst that could allow the two to merge,” Alexander said by phone June 30.
 “Perhaps their aim is not a full merger but simply extended cooperation to boost efficiency,” Hayes wrote in a June 18 note.
 Low borrowing costs and strong credit among companies could also fuel mergers and acquisitions, they wrote in a June 30 note.
 Deals Boom Global acquirers made more than $913 billion of purchases last quarter, the busiest quarter for mergers and acquisitions since the third quarter of 2007, data compiled through June 27 show.
 “People are getting bullish because they’re looking at the landscape and wondering what the next big deal is,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone June 27.
 Mobile Internet Flipkart and Myntracom had a combined 9 percent share ofthe 170 billion rupees ($28 billion) worth of Internetretailing transactions in India in 2013 before they merged inMay, according to data from Euromonitor International publishedin May.
 After several mergers in recent years, including American Airlines with US Airways, and Delta with Northwest, there are fewer airlines operating today and they’re also pulling out of smaller hubs, further reducing options or forcing passengers to take multiple flights to a destination.
 While production ramps up in the Middle East and North Africa, and Gazprom works towards starting a new helium site in eastern Siberia, Iran could emerge as a fourth major source within the next 10 years, according to IHS’s Gubler.
 Private-equity firms are seeking deals in the euro region’s fourth-largest economy after it emerged from its second recession since 2008.
 The expansion of total-return swaps indexes follows the rapid rise of corporate-debt exchange-traded funds, and builds on the more-commonly used credit-default swap indexes that emerged before the financial crisis.
 The largest purchase by a European acquirer in the quarter highlights just how desirable shares can be: Holcim Ltd’s $40 billion merger with cement peer Lafarge SA was paid for entirely in stock.
 “You have to be pretty optimistic about the market and the synergies the merger will produce,” said Erik Gordon, professor at the University of Michigan’s Ross School of Business in Ann Arbor.
 Mothercare Plc jumped 84 percent after rejecting two merger bids from Destination Maternity Corp.
 The company will file for merger approvals next week, Klappa said.
 Where swaps had been one-on-one deals before, now they would be backstopped by third parties in clearinghouses that ensure everyone can pay, with the aim of avoiding emergency bailouts and panic.
 However, a bigger payout could come from a merger with Petco Animal Supplies Inc.
 Potential Gains There are three main options for PetSmart: a leveraged buyout, a merger with Petco or returning cash to shareholders through more stock repurchases, said Daniel Johnson, of River Road Asset Management LLC, which oversees about $10 billion and owns PetSmart shares.
 A merger with closely held Petco, either as the buyer or seller could boost the stock into the $80 range, while a leveraged buyout could take place in the mid to high $70s, he said.
 Seth Sigman, a New York-based analyst at Credit Suisse, agrees that PetSmart shareholders have the most to gain from a merger with its largest competitor.
 Whether the activism leads to an LBO, merger or buybacks, as long as it boosts PetSmart’s valuation it may be all the same to shareholders.
 A merger would represent the latest in a series of cross-border transactions proposed by US.
 “To fend off their competitors, Line would need to further increase their value and services via mergers and acquisitions after they go public” Fumiko Hayashi, a Tokyo-based spokeswoman for Line, declined to comment, as did Mary Claire Delaney, a spokeswoman at Morgan Stanley.
 companies going through corporate events such as mergers and divestments.
 Asian companies also rely on mergers to create value less than their US.
 Balfour Beatty Plc rallied 91 percent to 2531 pence, and Carillion Plc added 72 percent to 3628 pence, after saying they are in preliminary merger talks to form the UK’s biggest builder.
 In April, Bloomberg reported Ctrip and Qunar were discussing the possibility of a merger, citing two people with direct knowledge of the talks.
 Morgan Stanley Infrastructure Partners, which owns MRDG, is speaking with advisers about a merger or initial public offering in Spain as early as this year, said the people, who asked not to be named as the details aren’t public.
 None of the fatalities involved electric or plug-in hybrid vehicles, said Casey Grant, who studies automotive fires for the Quincy, Massachusetts-based non-profit that helps firefighters and emergency crews improve safety techniques, in a phone interview.
 “Accordingly, the board is in detailed discussions with AbbVie in relation to these terms” Inversion Deals AbbVie’s potential purchase of Shire, which comes at a time of increased merger and acquisition activity in the industry, would be a so-called inversion deal, allowing AbbVie to cut its tax rate to 13 percent from 22 percent by moving its legal address to the UK.
 AbbVie’s bid for Shire is the latest merger in a period of increased acquisition activity in the drug and medical device industry.
 earlier this year during merger talks between Newmont and Barrick, people familiar with the situation said July 18.
 “Quick product development, global expansion, strong presence in a broad array of economic sectors and flexible product lines enable 3M to identify, target and seize dynamic growth opportunities as they emerge,” Matt Arnold, a St.
 In practice, the measure cuts off UK-based clearinghouses from emergency support and other facilities from euro-area central banks, the UK.
 benchmark index yesterday added less than 01 percent amid optimism over corporate earnings and merger activities.
 In addition, research doesn’t indicate menthol brands are any more dangerous than other types, the company said, while conceding that “all cigarettes are dangerous” Attractive to Youths The merger presents new threats to public health because it puts Newport and Reynolds’s Camel -- the two brands most often criticized for appealing to young people -- under one roof, said Matthew Myers, president of the Campaign for Tobacco-Free Kids, an advocacy group in Washington, DC.
 Jennifer Haliski, a spokeswoman for the FDA, said the agency didn’t have any role in regulating how the merger came together.
 gained 29 percent after announcing executive changes less than three months after a breakdown in merger talks with its largest rival.
 Televisa is interested in mergers in the mobile industry to better compete, though it’s awaiting the outcome of the telecommunications bill to make investment plans, executives said on the conference call today.
 “Investors know that and it will likely cap bond yields from going significantly higher” Rioforte’s failure to pay threatened a merger of Portugal Telecom SPGS SA, to which it owes the money, and Oi SA of Brazil.
 The Telecom merger has gone through, and it’s very easy to draw a parallel between the two” The yield on Germany’s 10-year bunds was at 120 percent.
 Dutch rival Royal Philips NV in June said it will merge some lighting units into a 14 billion-euro standalone company to share research and development costs with outside investors, echoing the move by Siemens to spin off Osram.
 FIFA has to be happy, not just because it all came off OK, or that scoring was up (at least in the first round), but because this was the year when, shall we say, an emerging market really emerged onto the World Cup scene in earnest -- the US.
 Tony Gallopin of the Lotto-Belisol team emerged from the group chasing stage winner Tony Martin of Omega Pharma-Quick Step to overtake race leader Vincenzo Nibali of Astana and put 1 minute and 34 seconds between them.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- The European Union approval of a merger of two national wireless carriers in its biggest economy will give the struggling $230 billion industry a reprieve while setting the stage for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 It may also set a precedent for future mergers and acquisitions with the elimination of a major European wireless discounter.
 The last time two national operators of comparable sizes won approval to merge was in 2010, after Deutsche Telekom AG and France Telecom SA pooled their UK.
 “It seems clear to me that after Hutchison/O2 in Ireland and now Telefonica/E-Plus in Germany, there certainly will not be a presumption against a merger from four to three mobile operators, even in large countries such as Germany,” said Emanuela Lecchi, a lawyer at Watson, Farley & Williams LLP in London.
 “It’s clearer now than it was then that you have to mitigate the bottom line” Network Investments Bouygues Chief Financial Officer Philippe Marien told analysts today the company remains open to merger offers for Bouygues Telecom.
 Roaming Fees As Europe emerges from the debt crisis that crimped demand for expensive phone contracts, a European Union ruling to cut mobile roaming charges across the 28-nation bloc took effect yesterday, further threatening what was once a very profitable business for carriers.
 A wave of mergers to follow “will improve profitability and support valuations,” said Boris Boehm, who helps manage 22 billion euros including Telefonica shares at Aramea Asset Management AG in Hamburg.
 “What I’d now need to see is how the industry can actually generate growth” While the European Commission is right to encourage domestic mergers in Europe, one possible undesired result could be that high share prices and low interest rates will tempt companies to spend on acquisitions rather than on network improvements, Boehm said.
 of Japan, have been making the case that a merger would benefit consumers by putting pressure on market leaders Verizon Communications Inc.
 Bernd Meyring, a Brussels-based partner at Linklaters LLP, said the European Commission will base its future decisions on similar mergers on whether the remedies in Germany could help establish Drillisch as a “serious contender” “The main question is this: Does effective competition need a number of independent networks, or can it work when several competitors use the same infrastructure?” Meyring said.
 “Besides industrial logic, we also see the opportunity to create efficiencies from aligning Nobel Biocare and Straumann’s cost structures as supportive of a potential merger,” according to a July 1 report from Credit Suisse Group AG analysts led by Christoph Gretler, who explored the dental industry in light of M&A activity in medical devices.
 “IMC believes the merger is a compelling proposition,” the Singapore-based investor said today in a statement provided to Bloomberg News.
 7 on the Roc deal that would merge assets stretching from China to Malaysia.
 and Cnooc Ltd, has received two approaches from potential buyers it didn’t name, potentially complicating the merger proposal.
 Horizon’s assets in Papua New Guinea, an emerging liquefied natural gas hub, add to the merged company’s appeal, said Chye, whose company has been a shareholder for more than eight years.
 “Should the merger not proceed, it would not change IMC’s view of the long-term value of the Horizon asset portfolio,” Chye said in the e-mail.
 The agencies recommended “a mechanism allowing for swift response in the event of an actual or threatened emergency to California’s electricity grid or supplies,” according to the letter, which was signed yesterday and e-mailed to Bloomberg today.
 The state water board is considering emergency regulations to establish a quicker and more effective way of imposing water curtailments.
 The ministry will make a final decision on the bourse’s merger with Wiener Boerse “in several months” The stock market operators started merger talks in April 2013.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA’s credit rating was cut to junk by Standard & Poor’s, which cited merger partner Portugal Telecom SGPS SA’s potential losses from defaulted debt.
 Because of the default, merger terms were changed this week so that the Portuguese carrier will reduce its stake in the combined entity, the companies said in statements released July 16.
 It ranked first in advising on announced mergers and acquisitions and fifth in underwriting US.
 The company hired Guggenheim Securities LLC to advise it on strategic options including “a possible merger, restructuring or sale of the company,” according to a filing with the US.
 The merger will allow Vantiv, based in Symmes Township, Ohio, to help merchants integrate payments information with accounting and customer data the retailers have on file, the company said.
 The lack of a CEO also may leave the door open for the resumption of merger talks with Newmont Mining Corp, Barrick’s biggest rival, Barnes said in a note.
 Under the merger plan considered by both companies earlier this year, Sokalsky would have led a company to be spun out from the combined Barrick-Newmont.
 tobacco companies in the event of a merger between them.
 “To the detriment of the company’s shareholders, the terms of the merger agreement substantially favor Reynolds and are calculated to unreasonably dissuade potential suitors from making competing offers,” the investor, Vincent Valentino, said in the complaint.
 “Things are looking better” Ontario emergency management officials earlier ordered the evacuation of about one square kilometer around the plant which processes vegetables for customers including General Mills Inc’s Green Giant brand.
 The Oxford-educated Bulkin, 37, spent 15 years cutting deals as a mergers & acquisitions banker for Merrill Lynch and Lazard Ltd.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Hong Kong’s de facto central bank bought $163 billion this week to maintain the city’s 31-year-old currency peg to the greenback as merger activity boosted demand for the local dollar.
 The Hong Kong Monetary Authority made purchases on July 1 for the first time since December 2012 and said demand for the local currency “increased lately,” partly driven by “commercial activities, including merger and acquisition activities and dividend distribution” The authority, known as the HKMA, said today it has no further comments to add to last week’s statement.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, posted second-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates on record revenue from advising on takeovers and asset management.
 The value of announced mergers and acquisitions worldwide jumped about 75 percent to $21 trillion this year through June 30, the most in seven years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and Moelis & Co, both independent merger-advisory companies, are scheduled to report results next week.
 “Creating large firms through mergers and acquisitions will give these Chinese brokerages an edge when facing foreign competitors as China further liberalizes its capital markets” Total assets of the nation’s 115 securities firms -- led in revenue by Citic Securities Co.
 The merger plan was part of Huijin’s strategy to integrate its holdings in the companies, Shenyin & Wanguo Chairman Li Jiange said in April.
 announced their own merger in February to create a stronghold against phone and satellite companies.
 Because sports programming draws the highest fees from TV distributors, it’s been one of the main drivers behind a spate of major media mergers this year that so far has topped $134 billion.
 The merger of Comcast and Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Fox Merger While losing the NBA would put Time Warner in an weaker position, “another way to look at this is to see if there could be an opportunity for Time Warner to merge with someone who has leverage with sports,” Wible said, citing the benefits if Time Warner merged with Fox.
 “School buses run up and down these streets -- ambulances, fire trucks, emergency vehicles,” Lonnie Hunt, Austin-based spokesman for the Texas Association of Counties, said by phone July 8.
 “You’d have to see a sustained period of selling, back-to-back losses of 1 to 15 percent into next week, before people will start piling on the protection” Equities slumped and bonds of Europe’s most-indebted nations declined with speculation resurfacing that the euro region remains vulnerable to shocks as it emerges from the sovereign debt crisis.
 property website and operator of the National Association of Realtors’ Realtorcom, sees the merger as an opportunity to build its brand with consumers, CEO Steve Berkowitz said in an interview yesterday after the San Jose, California-based company reported a wider-than-estimated second-quarter loss.
 It’s just different” Agents still have a key role in the transaction that won’t be diminished by the proposed merger, according to the National Association of Realtors, the industry trade group that dominates real estate listings and sales.
 Dave Liniger, chairman and co-founder of Re/Max Holdings Inc, said he wouldn’t be surprised if Zillow and Trulia raise ad prices after a merger.
 Merger Monday “It looks like this is another merger Monday, which could be adding to optimism we’re seeing today,” Jeffrey Saut, chief investment strategist at Raymond James & Associates Inc, said by phone.
 “You had all these mergers and takeover announcements over the weekend.
 “We’re having to spend more money now fighting fires than we ever have” Funds Shifted As emergencies sap funds, less-immediate needs for long-term prevention have suffered.
 Instead of raiding programs, extra spending would come from the same reserve as other disasters through the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
 “They think this year is going to be better than last year and this favors spending by people who have money” As Spain emerges from a six-year economic slump and a 41 billion-euro ($56 billion) European banking bailout, financiers and businessmen are feeling more comfortable spending money on luxury goods and services.
 As a few holders continued selling the Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac securities without an immediate emergence of investor demand, most of the dealers active in trading the debt “disappeared,” said Vishal Khanduja, a money manager at Bethesda, Maryland-based Calvert, which oversees about $13 billion.
 Private-equity owners are lining up to sell stakes acquired over the last few years as deal-making volumes return to pre-crisis levels for both mergers and equity capital markets in Europe, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 BAT’s agreement keeping it from increasing its stake in Reynolds dates back to the merger of RJ.
 Hard Look The Federal Trade Commission is likely to take a hard look at the latest proposed transaction, according to David Balto, a Washington attorney and former policy director for the FTC who litigated BAT’s merger with Reynolds in 2004.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Verso Paper Corp’s bonds rose after the struggling coated-paper said it’s getting closer to completing a debt swap needed for its merger with NewPage Holdings Inc.
 “Completion of the tender offers for both issues is the biggest hurdle to consummating the merger of Verso with NewPage,” Bogart said in the note.
 Republicans want to offset costs with changes elsewhere in the budget, while Democrats say the situation warrants emergency funding without offsets.
 Miller today proposed using about $10 billion in emergency funding, while putting the remaining costs through the normal budget process.
 The merged company will have premium volume of about 9 billion francs and have a profit potential of more than 500 million francs, Helvetia said.
 sanctions jeopardize funding for Russian companies, which have tapped international capital markets for more than $600 billion in debt and equity since the country emerged from its 1998 default.
 The 33-year-old German artist emerged this week as the latest “it” boy on the art-flipping circuit, appearing at each of the three evening sales with multiple bidders in pursuit.
 Stonex said he supports a merger between BSkyB, Sky Deutschland and Sky Italia as a joint pay-TV empire could more cheaply acquire rights for series and movies, purchase technology and reap other benefits from serving a market exceeding 200 million people.
 THS, also an investor in BSkyB, has been a long-term shareholder in Sky Deutschland and plans to remain an owner whether the German company remains independent or is part of a merger, Stonex said.
 The bank and its rivals had the busiest first half since 2006 on merger-and-acquisition advisory as companies globally tap more than $4 trillion of cash and low interest rates to fund purchases.
 Now it’s M&A” Companies in Southeast Asia were involved in $756 billion of mergers in the six months ended June 30, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Its strategic advisory unit, which is headed by Choe Tse Wei, advises clients on mergers.
 We aim to work within that ecosystem” The surge in Southeast Asian deals came amid $16 trillion of global mergers announced in the busiest six months since the second half of 2007, the data show.
 In 2011, billionaire Zygmunt Solorz-Zak took over Polish mobile-phone company Polkomtel for 181 billion zloty and later merged it with his media group Cyfrowy Polsat SA.
 has emerged as a likely candidate to consolidate the other smaller players in the Canadian wireless market, after CEO Pierre Dion said he was prepared to push ahead to try to become the fourth carrier with its Videotron brand.
 “It’s important to see whether they are genuine bidders, so we’ll do what we need to do to capture maximum value, whether that’s through a merger or a takeover” Roc, which rose the most in two weeks in Sydney trading today, said yesterday it had received a second acquisition proposal following a separate approach last month.
 The two takeover bids from the unidentified companies may complicate the April agreement between Horizon and Roc to merge oil and gas operations stretching from China to Malaysia.
 What we do know is the merger will continue,” he said.
 He joined Goldman Sachs’s mergers and acquisitions department in 1992 after graduating from the University of Chicago, where he was written up in the New York Times for disarming a gang member as part of a student patrol group.
 It “would expand the list of potential merger partners quite a lot if you just did it with a piece of the company.
 “Then you’ve got these big issues of trying to merge their operations and executives getting their nose out of joint” A spinversion would allow conglomerates to sidestep those issues and still provide a benefit to their investors, said Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 No Megamerger It’s a way to “do something that they wouldn’t otherwise be able to do without doing something massive,” Shah said by phone.
 The recovery has been patchy since the euro zone emerged from recession more than a year ago, with aerospace, energy and railway brighter spots compared with heavy industry, cars and trucks, SKF said.
 companies use mergers to move their addresses outside the country and reduce their tax bills.
 said it received central bank approval to begin merger discussions with RHB Capital Bhd.
 The companies, which have a combined market value of about $28 billion, entered into a 90-day exclusive agreement to negotiate and finalize the price and structure of the merger, according to a joint statement from the lenders yesterday.
 “We believe there is inherent value and that there will be many opportunities which will arise from this proposed merger,” Kellee Kam, group managing director of RHB Capital, said in the statement.
 “Malaysia has always been an intensely competitive market” Lenders in the Southeast Asian nation are required to obtain the central bank’s approval before any merger negotiations can proceed.
 companies, frustrated by the country’s high tax rate and attracted by opportunities overseas, are continuing to explore mergers that locate their tax addresses outside the US.
 There’s no obvious other contender beside Dollar General that’s going to come and break this merger up.
 The deal would paid for by about $12 billion in emergency spending and $5 billion in offsets from elsewhere in the VA budget, said Sanders and Representative Jeff Miller.
 Since Dimon became CEO, JPMorgan has emerged as the largest US.
 MLPs, which first emerged in the US.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, gained the most since May after reporting profit that beat analysts’ estimates on record revenue from asset management and advising.
 The value of announced mergers and acquisitions worldwide jumped about 75 percent to $21 trillion this year through June 30, the most in seven years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and Moelis & Co, both independent merger-advisory companies, are scheduled to report results next week.
 in New York, erasing a 06 percent drop earlier, as merger activity and optimism over corporate earnings offset concern over crises abroad before a Fed policy decision.
 Alfa executives said July 15 that after they “analyze the situation” of the law that emerges they will “assemble the right structure to pursue those opportunities.
 Grupo Financiero Santander Mexico SAB Chief Executive Officer Marcos Martinez, 60, said the dismantling of America Movil SAB will fuel mergers and acquisitions, underwriting and advising work for financial institutions.
 Senate Minority Leader Mitch McConnell, a Kentucky Republican, is waiting to see what measure emerges and what types of changes it recommends before he commits, said Don Stewart, his spokesman.
 The stock gained amid speculation Portugal Telecom SGPS SA may have to agree to a less favorable share swap ratio to win regulatory approval for its merger with the Brazilian company.
 The Jakarta Composite Index tumbled 13 percent on concern investments will be delayed until a clear winner emerges from the nation’s disputed presidential election.
 Time Warner Cable and DirecTV helped fuel demand for media bonds with their proposed mergers.
 Reynolds Tobacco Co’s founder bought a stake in Crumbs Bake Shop Inc, betting that he and other shareholders will receive a piece of the cupcake chain once it emerges from bankruptcy.
 State of Emergency In Sierra Leone, which had 8 new cases and 9 deaths in the last week, President Ernest Bai Koroma declared a state of emergency that included quarantines for areas where the disease is found and a ban on public gatherings.
 Elliott plans to push Interpublic to try and sell itself to another advertising company after earlier rebuffing merger approaches from competitors, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 After the $35 billion merger of Omnicom and Publicis to create the world’s largest advertising company fell apart earlier this year, WPP’s CEO Martin Sorrell said consolidation won’t slow down.
 No M&A? Following last year’s announcement that Publicis and Omnicom planned to merge, Roth said in an internal memo to employees that “as this weekend’s surprising news shows, there’s no telling what might take place, but we don’t see the need for major M&A to keep delivering on our plan to move Interpublic forward” The advertising company is the latest target for New York-based Elliott, which has been pressing for a breakup of EMC Corp, a sale of Riverbed Technology Inc, and earlier this year pushed through changes at Juniper Networks Inc, including cost cuts and a buyback.
 Tribune, based in Chicago, emerged from bankruptcy in 2012 after an $83 billion takeover by billionaire Sam Zell.
 He sent her to a nearby emergency room and told her to refuse to leave until she was seen by a liver disease expert.
 Hours earlier, CAA deputy director-general Lee Wan-lee told reporters in televised comments that there were thunderstorms in the area at the time while weather at the airport was within “standards” Right outside Ni and Putri’s homes, workers, investigators and emergency responders were still collecting debris and remains from the accident.
 cable subscribers, is awaiting regulatory approval for the merger, a deal the companies have pledged will boost returns for investors.
 While the offer was rejected, major TV programmers are still evaluating how to respond to mergers on the TV distribution side that could affect negotiations of sales of licensing rights to the cable and satellite operators.
 Fewer Customers Should Fox and Time Warner merge, the combined company could reap an additional $1 billion in licensing fees from the pay-TV companies that carry its shows, according to Marci Ryvicker, an analyst with Wells Fargo & Co.
 The urge to merge among both pay-TV companies and programmers is becoming more apparent as the number of Americans paying for television fell for the first time last year.
 “The MTA has been issuing all these statements: ‘Use the shuttle bus as a last resort’” They’re basically making it sound like it’s for emergency workers only.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Bombardier Inc’s CSeries jet has emerged as a frontrunner to form the basis of a new fleet at CityJet Ltd, the biggest carrier at London’s business-focused City Airport where a short runway limits aircraft options.
 The housing market has been slow to emerge from a lull induced last year as rising interest rates, tight lending standards and higher home prices combined to make it difficult for some buyers to enter the market.
 The government will retain official cars for emergencies, special purposes and front-line law enforcement, according to Xinhua.
 agreed to a merger that will combine their broadcasting operations and spin off their newspaper businesses in a new, publicly traded company.
 “We’ve seen market share gains in corporate finance, in mergers and acquisitions, in debt capital markets, none of which would have much to do with balance sheet areas,” Jain said on a conference call with analysts.
 are using mergers to move their legal addresses outside the US.
 KWL ‘Appalled’ “KWL is totally appalled at the picture that has emerged, in the course of the evidence, of UBS’s conduct in relation to its selling of these complex credit derivative transactions to the water authority,” KWL’s lawyer Michael Barnett said in an e-mail today.
 Baloise, which will now become Switzlerand’s fourth largest insurer after Zurich Insurance Group AG, Swiss Life Holding AG and Helvetia, said it sees no negative affect from the merger.
 The merger is scheduled to take place by the end of the year.
 2 adviser on global announced mergers and acquisitions this year, said investment-banking revenue jumped 33 percent in the second quarter, the biggest increase among its peers.
 each reported second-quarter earnings last week that beat analysts’ estimates as advisory fees increased along with an acceleration of announced mergers and acquisitions in the first six months of the year.
 Closed Bridge A $35 million emergency project is under way to make repairs and officials are aiming to at least partially reopen the bridge by Labor Day.
 “At the end of the day, Zillow and Trulia have to make money, and neither do,” Garver, whose company advises mergers in the $25 million to $200 million range, said in an e-mail.
 magazine in 2010 and became a publicly held business the following year through a merger with 57th Street General Acquisition Corp.
 2 at Fox, approached Bewkes about a merger of the two media companies on June 9 in New York, people familiar with the matter said.
 That offer was turned down and no other bidders emerged at the time.
 Icahn said on his blog today that there were “a handful of potential buyers” that could benefit from a merger with Family Dollar.
 The merged companies would have about the same amount of revenue as that competitor -- Dollar General had sales of $175 billion last year -- and far more stores.
 Annual Savings The merger will save Dollar Tree about $300 million annually after three years, the Chesapeake, Virginia-based company said.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Portugal Telecom SGPS SA and Brazil’s Oi SA tumbled in trading today on concern that their merger will be undermined by its purchase of short-term debt from the troubled Espirito Santo group.
 “The merger is the biggest worry,” said Mark Chapman, an analyst at CreditSights Inc.
 “The broader issue is that existing differences of opinion about whether the merger was the right thing to do at the right price come to the fore when events create this sort of uncertainty” Espirito Santo International missed payments on some of its short-term securities, according to a July 8 statement.
 The merger partners’ bonds recovered from earlier losses.
 “Despite these troubles, given the advanced state of the merger between PT and Oi, scheduled for the third quarter of this year, we expect it to still go through,” said Antonio Roldan, an analyst at Eurasia Group, in an e-mailed note.
 In practice, the measure cuts off UK-based clearinghouses from emergency support and other facilities from euro-area central banks, the UK.
 The NRA’s rules, finalized in June 2013, require nuclear power plants to build secondary control centers at least 100 meters (328 feet) from reactor buildings to manage emergency cooling systems and demand that tsunami defenses be based on the largest estimated waves from the most recent scientific assessments.
 Pursuing a merger with CBS Corp.
 “It’s my view that Time Warner is in play and will not emerge independent,” Martin said.
 and Time Inc, making it a ripe target as content owners such as Fox weigh mergers in response to the consolidation that’s taking place among cable-TV providers.
 Another reason to wait is to see how regulators will evaluate the pay-TV deals currently under review, and to see if there’s willingness to allow for large-scale mergers.
 While a merger between CBS and Time Warner would be attractive, it’s unlikely as long as 91-year-old Sumner Redstone is in control of CBS, according to Martin and James Dix, an analyst at Wedbush.
 broadcast networks” Fox Stock The Federal Communications Commission forbids a single company from owning two of the four major broadcasters, meaning that if Time Warner and CBS merged, it would create a hurdle for Murdoch because he owns Fox.
 The region is protected by the Peshmerga, a well-armed military force that emerged from Kurdish resistance to Saddam Hussein’s regime, limiting the bombings and sectarian violence that have scarred other parts of Iraq since the US.
 That’s leading to better-than-forecast earnings for economically sensitive companies, he said, while increased merger activity is “emblematic of a corporate sector that has more comfort in the next couple of years” Fourteen companies in the S&P 500 including EBay Inc.
 stocks were little changed, after erasing an earlier loss, as merger activity and optimism over corporate earnings offset concern over crises abroad before a Federal Reserve policy decision.
 You’ve got the earnings that have been coming in fairly well, and you’ve got the mergers and acquisitions” Overseas Crises Outside the US, international pressure mounted on Israel to end its three-week offensive in the Hamas-controlled Gaza Strip, with President Barack Obama and the United Nations Security Council demanding an immediate truce.
 and international tax matters, including mergers, acquisitions, divestitures, tax-free spinoffs, leveraged buyouts, initial public offerings and fund formation, the firm said.
 The two proposals may complicate the April accord between Horizon and Roc to merge operations stretching from China to Malaysia.
 said earlier this month it backs an attempt by Allan Gray to give Roc investors a vote on the merger.
 The Roundtable is going to push “very hard” for the Senate bill, said Engler, who said he expects a similar measure to emerge in the House soon.
 “I was surprised anyone survived this thing,” said Casey Grant, who studies automotive fires for the National Fire Protection Association, a Quincy, Massachusetts-based non-profit that helps firefighters and emergency crews improve safety techniques, in a phone interview.
 The two companies have refiled their merger notification “to allow additional time to engage in constructive dialogue with the Ministry of Commerce People’s Republic of China,” Applied Materials said in a US.
 More than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave after the allegations emerged last year.
 Italy isn’t the only European country seeking to intervene in company mergers and acquisitions.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc, the UK’s second-largest lender, named Gary Posternack global head of mergers and acquisitions, said a person briefed on the matter.
 He is also a former natural-resources mergers chief.
 The possibility that the brewer could sell its holding increased after SABMiller merged Tsogo Sun with Gold Reef Resorts Ltd.
 The termination of the Pinnacle merger agreement allows Tyson to complete its $77 billion takeover of Hillshire.
 Hillshire withdrew its support for the Pinnacle merger on June 16, and yesterday’s announcement by Pinnacle means the deal is officially dead.
 Oi SA fell the most on the gauge after the phone company said it wasn’t aware that merger partner Portugal Telecom SGPS SA had purchased debt issued by a holding company that’s selling assets amid speculation it may be unable to pay its bills.
 The emergence of Iliad, founded by billionaire Xavier Niel, puts pressure on Son to push ahead with his plan to merge the third- and fourth-largest US.
 It probably forces them to act faster and could raise the price they were willing to pay” The boards for Deutsche Telekom and T-Mobile still see significant hurdles to a merger with Sprint that need to be addressed before a deal is announced, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Obama taped the interview earlier today in California, where he called on Congress, during remarks at Los Angeles Trade-Technical College, to curb the corporate inversions loophole that allows companies to use cross-border mergers to escape US.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- California regulators approved emergency statewide rules that allow fines against wasting water for the first time after a call for voluntary cuts failed to curb use enough as a three-year drought worsens.
 The California State Water Resources Control Board passed an emergency measure yesterday that sets fines of as much as $500 a day on residential and business property owners if they overwater lawns to the point that runoff flows onto streets or sidewalks.
 Oregon Governor John Kitzhaber has declared drought emergencies in nine counties.
 Water use in California rose 1 percent since Governor Jerry Brown declared an emergency in January and called for a voluntary across-the-board cut of 20 percent, the water board said.
 health insurer, raised its profit forecast for the year and reported second-quarter earnings that beat analyst estimates on an increased number of customers and cost savings from a merger.
 companies in the event of a merger between them.
 “It looks like this is another merger Monday, which could be adding to optimism we’re seeing today,” Jeffrey Saut, chief investment strategist at Raymond James & Associates Inc, said by phone.
 “You had all these mergers and takeover announcements over the weekend.
 “But most economic sectors continue to operate as usual” Rick Mann, head of the mergers and acquisitions department at GKH Law Offices in Tel Aviv, said the pace of transactions in technology is likely to be unaffected by the fighting in Gaza.
 We’ll note separately that unless they got a free ride, they’re going to emerge into an absurd amount of debt that could lead them to financial ruin before their adult lives got much traction, as Kasia Klimasinska and Janet Lorin write today.
 - Forty-eight are dead after a twin-engine turboprop crashed during an emergency landing on an island off Taiwan.
 Retailers also now require approval by the commissioner of the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection to sell long guns.
 “It’s true that in the three years after 1990, the German economy grew very strongly, but the reason was reunification,” said Boellhoff, referring to the merger of East and West Germany on Oct.
 “This can improve even more when its neighbors gradually emerge from the crisis, and this will happen in the next few years” German economic growth accelerated more than forecast in the first quarter, propelled by domestic demand and a construction boom.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said he’ll keep interest rates low as officials try to revive the economy with their latest emergency measures.
 The refiner has successfully merged units that designed and built chemical plants into Sinopec Engineering Group Co.
 Merger Blueprint Bausch & Lomb is a “blueprint” for a merger with Allergan, Pearson said on a call with analysts today.
 The 18-member euro area’s emergence from a two-year recession is proving sluggish, with inflation about a quarter of the ECB target and unemployment above 20 percent in Spain and Greece.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Espirito Santo SA bonds plunged to record lows after a parent company delayed payments on short-term notes, reawakening concern that banks remain vulnerable as the euro region emerges from the sovereign debt crisis.
 “Over the past 20 years, three banks have emerged as the big Canadian banks,” Peter Routledge, an analyst with National Bank Financial, said.
 During that period, the companies contemplated domestic mergers, with two sets of combinations -- Royal Bank with Bank of Montreal, and Toronto-Dominion joining CIBC.
 “Even if some shortfall of capital will emerge, thanks to the favorable environment in the financial markets this shortfall could be repleted by market operations without major problems,” Giovanni Sabatini, general manager of the Italian Banking Association, said in a Bloomberg Television interview in Rome.
 Eight of the lenders are raising a total of more than 10 billion euros ($136 billion) this year through rights offers, benefiting from renewed confidence as Italy emerges from the deepest recession since World War II.
 They have increased their provisioning, they have reviewed their credit portfolios, and also increased their capital” No Major Gap “I don’t expect a major shortfall of capital will emerge from the asset quality review,” or from the stress tests, Sabatini said.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch appointed Akihiko Manaka to lead its mergers and acquisitions advisory business in Japan.
 He joined Merrill Lynch as a mergers advisory banker in 2006.
 Hagedorn, who merged his family’s Miracle-Gro into Scotts in 1995 and took over as CEO in 2001, has often used spicy language, such as this, from a Feb.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- The deadly crash of a Malaysia Airlines passenger jet in Ukraine makes it harder for businesses to argue against sanctions on Russia as evidence emerges that Russian-backed separatists probably downed the plane, analysts studying the conflict said.
 and the failed Shanxi Zhenfu Energy Group emerged earlier this year amid slowing growth in Asia’s biggest economy.
 “We’ve seen compelling new companies emerge from places like London, Paris, Berlin, the Nordic region and beyond -- SoundCloud, Spotify, Supercell and many others,” Bill Maris, managing partner of Google Ventures, said in a blog post.
 The Jones Day deal team is led by Randi Lesnick and Jere Thomson, mergers and acquisitions.
 The Simpson Thacher team includes Robert Spatt, Eric Swedenburg, Adam Signy and Derek Baird, mergers and acquisitions; Brian Steinhardt and Stephen Short, credit; Kevin Arquit and Matt Reilly, regulatory; David Rubinsky, executive compensation and employee benefits; and Gary Mandel and Lori Lesser, IP.
 Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP represented BAT with a team led by mergers and acquisitions partners Philip A.
 His practice focuses primarily on equity capital markets in Saudi Arabia and other Middle Eastern markets and on cross-border mergers and acquisitions.
 Carrier Sales Juniper said merger activity among US.
 have been in merger talks, and AT&T Inc.
 Phone and cable carriers across Europe are seeking mergers and acquisitions to help ease competitive pressure on prices -- a pursuit made more likely after the European Commission this month approved a reduction in the number of wireless-network providers in Germany.
 stock markets has emerged because of regulations intended to promote competition among the exchanges, Wall Street executives will tell a Senate committee.
 “From the beginning of January there has been strong growth in mergers and acquisitions,” Layton said.
 Residential real estate has been slow to emerge from an early-year, winter-driven slump -- a development not lost on Yellen.
 Oi SA surged as Portugal Telecom agreed to change the terms of the merger with the Brazilian phone company after a crisis at the Espirito Santo group roiled global markets.
 Portugal Telecom will transfer to Oi shares in the company that will be created with the merger, in exchange for defaulted debt owed by Rioforte Investments SA.
 When the merger was announced last October, Portugal Telecom was to own as much as 396 percent of the new entity.
 With the multifamily industry, it took many years for leaders to emerge.
 Capital raising and mergers and acquisitions are picking up, said Van Coller, whose team is advising Steinhoff International Holdings Ltd.
 “Trian is fully supportive of this combination and has entered into voting agreement in support of the merger” Icahn didn’t immediately return a phone call seeking comment on his gains.
 Khazanah yesterday reiterated a July 3 statement, saying a “comprehensive review of all restructuring options is being undertaken and evaluated” Reports about a possible merger with AirAsia X Bhd.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- President Barack Obama attacked companies that use cross-border mergers to escape US.
 The curbs would be retroactive to May of this year, a proposal the administration says will encourage companies to reevaluate pending mergers.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Balfour Beatty Plc ended merger talks with rival British builder Carillion Plc after disagreeing on the terms of a deal that would have formed the country’s biggest construction company with a market valuation of more than 3 billion pounds ($5 billion).
 A merged company would have benefited from Carillion’s booming services business as the Wolverhampton, England-based builder expands its maintenance offerings for the rail, oil and telecommunication industries.
 A decline of construction work and rising energy prices in Europe prompted other builders in the region to merge and cut costs.
 French cement company Lafarge SA this year agreed a $40 billion merger with rival Holcim Ltd.
 So what happened? After the mediator, Daniel Pollack, emerged to say it was over, that there was no deal and default had occurred, Economy Minister Axel Kicillof “told reporters that the holdouts rebuffed all settlement offers and refused requests for a stay of the court ruling,” according to our crew, Katia Porzecanski, Camila Russo and Daniel Cancel.
 - Liberia is closing schools and quarantining communities, and Sierra Leone has declared a state of emergency in the fight against Ebola.
 Wait, what? *** If there’s a defect in a certain model of automobile, chances are it’s going to emerge in a fleet of rental cars first.
 The controlling Agnelli family and other investors, holding their final shareholders meeting in Turin today, sealed the end of Fiat as an Italian company with a vote approving a merger with Chrysler.
 Even before the Chrysler combination is finalized, Fiat has been linked to mergers or deals with Volkswagen as well as France’s PSA Peugeot Citroen in recent weeks.
 Still, Enders has endured his own brush with political opposition, with German Chancellor Angela Merkel dealing him a major defeat when she blocked his planned merger with BAE Systems Plc two years ago to create a European defense giant.
 Phone company Oi SA led declines on concern its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA will be undermined by the Lisbon-based company’s holding of commercial paper from a unit of Espirito Santo International, which failed to make payments on some of its short-term debt.
 “While outlook comments are unchanged, consensus downgrades are likely with the stock under pressure today” The $40 billion merger will couple Lafarge’s African cement plants with Holcim’s Asian assets, two regions where building is expected to boom over the next decades.
 Fontana will help to integrate the two companies before Lafarge chief Bruno Lafont becomes head of the merged entity next year.
 sank 27 percent amid concern its merger with Applied Materials Inc.
 A merger filing for the chip-equipment maker and Applied Materials to China’s Ministry of Commerce was withdrawn, according to an article by DealReporter.
 The merger received strong opposition from China’s Ministry of Industry and Information Technology, the same publication said last week.
 Chemical maker Evonik, sporting-goods company Puma SE and insurer Signal Iduna are among the team’s backers as it tries to emerge from the shadow of Bayern, Germany’s most successful soccer club.
 The two companies have refiled their merger notification “to allow additional time to engage in constructive dialogue with the Ministry of Commerce People’s Republic of China,” Applied Materials said in a US.
 “Only in a real emergency situation, for example in the case of imminent deflation, could in my view such an instrument be considered.
 After many quarters of disappointing debt-trading revenues for Wall Street’s biggest banks, some bright spots emerged in the three months ended June 30.
 The money -- which would be included in an emergency spending bill directed mostly at child-migration issues on the US-Mexico border -- would be in addition to the $351 million that’s already under discussion for Iron Dome in fiscal 2015.
 Senate Appropriations Committee Chairwoman Barbara Mikulski, a Maryland Democrat who also received a copy of the request, said yesterday that the Senate would include the funding in its version of the planned emergency supplemental.
 companies, frustrated by the high corporate tax rate and attracted by opportunities overseas, are continuing to explore mergers that locate their tax addresses outside the US.
 Combes, trying to revive Alcatel-Lucent after the 2006 merger of Alcatel SA and Lucent Technologies Inc.
 Deutsche Bank’s efforts to build equity have been slowed by legal bills related to industrywide investigations of alleged past misconduct as well as costs to fire staff and merge units.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Verso Paper Corp, the struggling paper maker controlled by Apollo Global Management LLC, convinced enough bondholders to accept a debt exchange needed for its merger with NewPage Holdings Inc.
 “Comps declined 25 percent in the initial aftermath of that incident, suggesting that comps may have declined a similar magnitude in the days following the emergence of the news” Yum Brands, just recovering from a supply chain investigation in China that started in 2012, earlier this month was hit by another food scare in the country.
 After introducing its first handsets three decades ago, Nokia emerged as Finland’s first major global corporation and symbolized the country’s transformation into a technology-driven economy.
 “We insist that high real interest rates have an absolute impact on cost inflation” Central bank Governor Erdem Basci said in a presentation to Erdogan’s government in June that the inflation rate would fall after a 550 basis-point emergency rate increase in January, and that interest rates could then be brought down.
 And as of last month, at least a dozen more chipmakers had held merger discussions this year, people familiar with the companies’ plans said at the time.
 The San Francisco-based hedge fund said it intends to engage in direct dialogue with InterContinental regarding its proposals, as well as hold “broad discussions” with shareholders and “industry participants” InterContinental Chief Executive Officer Richard Solomons said in a June interview that the Denham, England-based hotel company can grow without a merger or takeover and it has served investors well.
 Car sales in the US, led by trucks and smaller SUVs, are booming, helping fuel a spike in mergers.
 after it merged with Procter & Gamble Co.
 Sprint pulled out of a plan to merge with T-Mobile after concluding that regulators would block a deal, people familiar with the matter said yesterday.
 A year and a half later, with his stake in the merged company worth $200 million, Kirk retired at the age of 36.
 The queries included whether Comcast slows or hinders programming by rivals, has studies about how consumers view the company’s services and how the merger would effect its carriage of local sports broadcasts.
 The merger would bring largest US.
 Yesterday, Consumers Union and Common Cause urged the agency to block the deal, saying the merger would give Comcast power to raise prices, limit choices and stifle competition.
 Share listings, dividends and mergers and acquisitions are driving demand, the Hong Kong Monetary Authority said July 26.
 AbitibiBowater was formed in the October 2007 merger of Montreal-based Abitibi-Consolidated and Greenville, South Carolina-based Bowater Inc.
 Loeb focuses on event-driven investing, buying and selling stocks or bonds of companies going through changes like spinoffs or mergers.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Carillion Plc made a new merger bid for Balfour Beatty Plc, valuing the UK’s biggest builder at 21 billion pounds ($35 billion).
 Chairman Steve Marshall has said he sees “no logic” in retaining the New York-based business and that calling off the sale is too risky should a merger with Carillion ultimately fail.
 Carillion said today that should the merger proceed, it would “expect the disposal of Parsons Brinckerhoff not to be completed” Merging with Balfour would generate annual cost-savings of at least 175 million pounds, Carillion reiterated today “It’s a considerable premium to where it’s trading at the moment,” Olivia Peters, a London-based analyst at RBC Capital Markets, said by telephone, adding that a deal would benefit all parties.
 “If I include synergies I get a premium of about 60 percent” A merger would combine Carillion’s extensive services business with Balfour’s building operations, which have struggled with a slowdown in construction activity, to form a builder with a market value of about 3 billion pounds.
 Russia’s Emergencies Ministry said 280 trucks carrying 2,000 metric tons of donated food, medicine and water left Moscow for rebel-held regions in Ukraine today.
 “I can’t say from a strategic point of view if a takeover would be good, but in the shorter term they rarely work well for shareholders, which is our chief concern for our clients” Double-Whammy A Bloomberg News analysis last year found that about two-thirds of company takeovers exceeding $20 billion since 1996 -- including Pfizer’s merger with Pharmacia Corp.
 for control of Time Warner Cable Inc, Charter agreed in April to take control of 39 million cable-TV customers from its two larger rivals to help them get regulatory approval for their merger.
 Still, bubbles can emerge if banks ease lending conditions after a “sustained” period of value increases, he said.
 rallied on merger activity.
 The number of mining mergers and acquisitions declined 41 percent to 112 in the quarter from a year earlier, E&Y said in a report today.
 companies can become foreign for tax purposes -- a technique known as inversion -- if they merge with a foreign company whose shareholders end up owning at least 20 percent of the combined enterprise.
 Asked whether he would buy some of the assets for sale amid the planned merger of the world’s two largest building companies, Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd, Manifold said that “there are many opportunities” Holcim and Lafarge, seeking antitrust backing for their planned $40 billion deal, this year outlined an initial list of assets for sale to cut the importance of Europe to 20 percent of combined revenue and win regulatory backing.
 rallied on merger activity.
 rallied on merger activity.
 Raiffeisen, a cooperative with 305 independent member banks and total assets of 183 billion Swiss francs ($202 billion), is at an advantage in planning for an emergency because it’s more transparent than a large company, Chief Executive Officer Pierin Vincenz said on a conference call today.
 Emergency Planning Raiffeisen is the leading retail bank in the country, with 37 million customers, according to its website.
 Raiffeisen will have to prepare an emergency plan to keep systemically relevant functions running and is working with with Finma to implement the requirements, it said.
 The restructuring law, passed under threat of a “fiscal emergency,” would allow public utilities to negotiate with bondholders to cut their debt loads, potentially forcing investors to accept unfavorable terms, according to the investment funds, which hold about $16 billion in Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority bonds.
 DOCTOR: Now, I see there is a treatment for this that’s recently emerged from a specialty lab in San Diego.
 The island will mark 49 years of nationhood today with an annual parade where likely guests include 90-year-old Lee Kuan Yew, who guided Singapore from independence to its emergence as Southeast Asia’s only advanced economy.
 JPMorgan raised its rating on the shares to overweight from neutral, saying potential mergers and acquisitions may increase investor returns in the near term.
 companies that have sought cross-border mergers for tax reasons, are considering doing so or are targets of such deals have been pressuring lawmakers since April on legislation to stop the practice, federal disclosure reports show.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat SpA fell to a seven-month low amid investor speculation that the Italian carmaker’s merger with its Chrysler unit is at risk as stake sales by shareholders opposing the deal may exceed what the company is willing to pay.
 1 approved the merger of Fiat with Chrysler to create a new entity, Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, based in London and with its main stock trading in New York.
 “We believe the selloff is based on a misunderstanding regarding the merger,” including an assumption that all investors opposing the transaction will seek a buyout and put the cost cap in range, George Galliers, an analyst at International Strategy & Investment in London, said in an e-mail.
 “Just because a voter has voted against the merger, it does not mean that they will execute their cash exit rights” Fiat is “aware of certain market rumors suggesting that it has received a significant volume of notices to exercise the cash exit rights,” tied to the merger, the carmaker said in a statement.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Thomas Sandell, a hedge-fund manager who makes merger-related bets and once worked alongside the late Ace Greenberg at Bear Stearns Cos, is preparing to invest for smaller investors.
 is setting up the Castlerigg Equity Event and Arbitrage Fund, a mutual fund that will invest in companies undergoing “extraordinary events” including mergers, takeover bids, spinoffs and restructurings, the firm said in a filing last week with the US.
 Sandell, 53, who has run his own hedge funds for more than 16 years, focuses on activist investments as well as those driven by events such as mergers and acquisitions.
 The number of takeovers has surged this year, with some $19 trillion of mergers and acquisitions announced globally, a 65 percent increase from the same period in 2013.
 The goal is to profit when the target company’s shares trade at a discount to the announced price, reflecting the possibility that a deal might fall through, and when competing, higher bids emerge.
 5, the day after two proposed mergers unraveled and the tax treatment for a third was reassessed.
 The investment-banking unit will help the lender expand its transactional-service presence in debt and equity markets, mergers and acquisitions, the lender said.
 Refitting Begins While plans for upgrades to American’s international fleet first were announced in May 2012 -- when the airline was in bankruptcy and before the 2013 merger with US Airways Group -- the first of the 777-200s is only now being refitted.
 The WHO yesterday designated the outbreak as an international public health emergency, eight months after it began.
 Business Merger In inversions, US-based companies merge with a smaller foreign business and take a non-US.
 “It’s likely to be an industry-wide phenomenon, and some funds will be more affected than others” African Bank, known as Abil, got emergency support from the Reserve Bank after the Johannesburg-based provider of unsecured loans lost most of its market value over three days last week.
 The contrast illustrates the challenge facing Bewkes as he seeks to prove Time Warner’s value without a mega-merger like the $85-a-share takeover bid Fox withdrew on Aug.
 M&A Risks Some of Murdoch’s mergers have turned out poorly for shareholders.
 Tax inversions entered the spotlight in July as President Barack Obama urged Congress to act against companies using cross-border mergers to escape US.
 Ukraine sent its own aid to the country’s war-torn east as a Russian convoy with emergency supplies neared the border in defiance of conditions set by the government in Kiev.
 the day after two proposed mergers unraveled and the tax treatment of a third was reassessed.
 held Sprint and T-Mobile shares, according to first-quarter filings, which dropped 19 percent and 84 percent respectively after a deal to merge collapsed.
 The legal wrangling ultimately scuttled the planned merger and led Porsche’s holding company, in a deal completed Aug.
 Voorhees Transportation Center at Rutgers University in New Brunswick, New Jersey, said at an April meeting of a special oversight committee of Port Authority commissioners that a merger between PATH and NJ Transit could make sense.
 He cautioned that a merger would have “substantial” financial consequences for NJ Transit, which had a $16 billion operating loss last year that was offset by federal and state aid.
 The company’s merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA is leaving it with a debt level that would make it difficult to bid on airwaves in the near future, analysts including Kevin Smithen of Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Remain Difficult Global mergers and acquisitions have accelerated in the first part of the year with almost $19 trillion worth of deals announced year to date, up 66 percent from a year ago, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The APC was formed when the four biggest opposition parties merged last year.
 In his first year as CEO, India-born Kapoor merged Europe and North America into one reporting unit, ousted the finance chief, and shifted more brand-building resources into emerging markets like Brazil and Russia.
 The company is likely to focus merger and acquisition activity on its regional associates, it said.
 12 it will give $180 million for emergency food aid to the country, which is “facing the worst food security situation in the world” In May, Finance Minister Aggrey Tisa Sabuni said South Sudan had borrowed $200 million from oil operators and postponed repayments on domestic loans.
 “It was about teaming up with this very entrepreneurial, small startup in the automobile business” Pawl Conflict It didn’t take long before conflicts began to emerge, people familiar with the project said.
 Emergency aid of as much as $260 million is being prepared by the World Bank and the African Development Bank to limit the economic fallout of the virus on Sierra Leone, Guinea and Liberia, the lenders said this month.
 The unraveling of proposed mergers and a reassessment of the tax treatment of a third sent shares of Time Warner, Sprint Corp.
 Hering led the advance, rallying 6 percent after a columnist for Veja magazine reported that rivals Lojas Renner SA and Marisa Lojas SA and discussing a merger.
 The mergers-and-acquisitions pipeline is “solid,” he said.
 Leukert, responsible for 18,000 developers worldwide, said he plans to gradually merge the Business Suite with cloud applications.
 The company named Peltz to its board in January after Trian abandoned a proposal for Mondelez to merge with PepsiCo Inc.
 “There is nothing illegal, unethical, or improper in taking a toehold position before a merger is proposed, even if it is not wanted by the target’s management,” the New York hedge-fund firm said today in an e-mailed statement, referring to a stake it took in the Botox maker before the bid.
 A merger with a major competitor is not being discussed, and Waste Management doesn’t see synergies that would justify a deal with Veolia Environnement SA or Suez Environnement Co, both of France.
 To counter a fall in revenue, phone and cable carriers across Europe are pursuing a series of mergers and acquisitions.
 Tim gained 38 percent in the 12 months through yesterday on wagers it was a takeover target for Telefonica, which controls Vivo, Brazil’s biggest phone carrier by market share, or would merge with Vivendi SA’s Brazilian Internet-provider unit, GVT, according to Alex Pardellas, an analyst at CGD Securities.
 The restructuring law, passed under threat of a “fiscal emergency,” would allow public utilities to negotiate their debt with bondholders, potentially forcing investors to accept unfavorable terms, according to the investment funds, which hold about $16 billion in Puerto Rico Electric Power Authority bonds.
 data -- as emerged of late -- may keep the pound on a sluggish tone” The pound fell 03 percent to $16836 at 4:37 pm.
 The hedge fund doesn’t plan to acquire a controlling stake or push for a merger with MSG, which is majority owned by the Dolans, the family that also runs Cablevision Systems Corp.
 Humanitarian Situation The humanitarian situation in Ukraine is steadily worsening, John Ging, director of humanitarian operations for the United Nations, said at an emergency meeting of the Security Council yesterday in New York.
 Russian Ambassador to the UN Vitaly Churkin told the Security Council that the situation in Ukraine, particularly in Donetsk and Luhansk, is “disastrous” and called on “the international community to take emergency measures to improve the humanitarian measures” in the area.
 Brazilian telecommunications regulator Anatel would have to analyze any merger or change in company structure before a deal can go through, said a press official for the agency who asked not to be named.
 Brazil has been wary of telecommunications mergers.
 He represents clients in merger reviews and litigation as well as advertising and consumer protection claims before the Federal Trade Commission, the firm said in a statement.
 “A demerger of a selection of assets is our preferred option” A spinoff that included nickel, manganese and aluminum operations that take in Australia, South Africa and Colombia, a South African coal unit and the Cannington lead and silver mine in Queensland may be worth as much as $12 billion, according to a valuation from CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets.
 A demerged company will probably be based mainly around former Billiton assets, Glyn Lawcock, an analyst at UBS AG in Sydney, said in a July 14 note to clients.
 BHP spokeswoman Eleanor Nichols declined to comment on which assets may be included in any demerger.
 “There is no Plan B” to a merger with TUI Travel, Joussen said in a Bloomberg Television interview.
 Sud Americana de Vapores SA completes a merger with the line later this year.
 is seeking to add more investment bankers on secondment from its partner Morgan Stanley to help cement its spot as Japan’s top adviser on mergers and acquisitions.
 1 adviser on mergers in the Asian nation this year, after topping the rankings for the first time in 2013.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Carillion Plc has met with Balfour Beatty Plc’s major shareholders in an effort to resurrect a merger that Britain’s largest builder rejected this week.
 Chairman Steve Marshall has said he sees “no logic” in retaining the New York-based business and that calling off the sale is too risky should a merger with Carillion ultimately fail.
 “Carillion continues to believe in the powerful strategic logic and financial benefits of a merger with Balfour Beatty,” it said, adding that there’s no certainty it will make a renewed offer.
 “To benchmark a series of theoretical cost reduction opportunities, represent them all as synergies, and further, to represent them as incremental value creation directly arising from the merger proposal is incorrect,” the company said.
 A merger would combine Carillion’s extensive services business with Balfour’s building operations, which have struggled with a slowdown in construction activity, to form a builder with a market value of about 3 billion pounds.
 A decline of construction work and rising energy prices in Europe has prompted builders in the region to merge and cut costs.
 French cement company Lafarge SA agreed this year to a $40 billion merger with Swiss rival Holcim Ltd.
 Hyman, 69, will stay on as a vice chairman of Evercore and as chairman of the merged business, to be called Evercore ISI Institutional Equities.
 The deal is the latest in a wave of mergers and partnerships shaking up the Internet art market even as profit in the nascent industry remains elusive.
 New Buyers Auctionata, an online-only auctioneer based in Berlin, held merger negotiations with Artspace, but those talks fell apart last week, according to two people familiar with the matter who asked not to be named because the information was private.
 and the companies would merge the IPRS unit with S&P Dow Jones Indices LLC, one person said.
 dropped 19 percent after a deal to merge with T-Mobile US Inc.
 The decision to drop the merger plan ends a nine-month effort by Japanese billionaire Masayoshi Son, whose SoftBank Corp.
 The new plan also merges two lower tiers into one that pays 65 basis points rather than 48 or 58.
 “There will be a big market for leisure activities and AVIC can’t be left out as new leisure products emerge and aviation becomes a way of life for many,” Lin Zuoming, who heads AVIC, said in the statement.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Ageas SA, the insurer that emerged from the collapse of Fortis, will return more cash to shareholders through buybacks after being found liable to compensate Fortis investors as insurance profit beat estimates.
 Cases involving pricing fall under NDRC jurisdiction, the Ministry of Commerce assesses the legality of mergers and acquisitions, and other anti-competition cases fall under the State Administration for Industry and Commerce.
 More than three decades after a merger that tethered newspapers with television broadcasters, Gannett Co.
 agreed to merge in order to combine their broadcasting operations and spin off their newspapers.
 “Shareholders would probably like the company to be auctioned -- I think that would yield the best result,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co, said in a phone interview.
 “They found a good merger partner in Fyffes and now the applecart is being upset,” Kim Noland, a bond analyst at Gimme Credit in New York, said by phone.
 “Comparing the Fyffes merger and the Cutrale bid is like comparing apples and oranges,” Hundley wrote in a report yesterday.
 The emergence of more bidders could help push up the price.
 and no specific restructuring plan emerged from the gathering, according to Wang Xuejun, an investor in attendance.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Carillion Plc stopped pursuing a merger with Balfour Beatty Plc to form Britain’s biggest builder after its increased offer was rejected.
 “Carillion therefore today announces that it is no longer pursuing such a merger” Balfour Beatty shares dropped as much as 88 percent in London trading, while Carillion declined as much as 33 percent.
 A merger would combine Carillion’s extensive services business with Balfour Beatty’s building operations, which have struggled with a slowdown in construction activity.
 Carillion yesterday made a new merger bid for Balfour Beatty, valuing it at 21 billion pounds.
 construction business when it is poised to benefit from a recovery in the market” ‘No Logic’ Balfour Beatty Chairman Steve Marshall has said he sees “no logic” in retaining New York-based Parsons Brinckerhoff and that calling off the planned sale is too risky should a merger with Carillion ultimately fail.
 Portugal, which a year ago emerged from its longest recession in at least 25 years, recorded economic growth of 06 percent in the second quarter, the National Statistics Institute in Lisbon said today.
 Record Backlog “We have the highest backlog in the history of this company, so we are really in a position of strength for this demerger,” he said.
 in Helsinki, 10 percent below its level before news of the possible ban emerged.
 “A demerger of a selection of assets is our preferred option” Shares Gain BHP advanced as much as 37 percent in London trading, the biggest intraday gain in seven months, and was 28 percent higher at 2,0825 pence at 9:31 am.
 A demerged company will probably be based mainly around former Billiton assets, Glyn Lawcock, an analyst at UBS AG in Sydney, said in a July 14 note to clients.
 BHP spokeswoman Eleanor Nichols declined to comment on which assets may be included in any demerger.
 After Pfizer’s initial cash-and-stock offer became public in April, AstraZeneca CEO Pascal Soriot’s defense was to promise investors their shares will eventually be worth more than what Pfizer offered, without the risks of the disruption caused by a merger or regulators blocking the deal.
 Mining companies should retain their focus on giving back excess cash to shareholders and shy away from mergers and acquisitions, two of the industry’s largest investors said.
 Telecom Italia will offer to merge Tim and GVT, giving Vivendi an unspecified stake in the combined business plus a 20 percent stake in Telecom Italia, a deal valued at as much as 7 billion euros, the Brazilian newspaper Folha de SPaulo reported today, without saying how it got the information.
 Eventually, entire airliners including the engines may emerge from 3-D printers, according to the McKinsey Global Institute.
 issued conflicting statements on merger talks with a competitor.
 Zalando SE, an online retailer that emerged from Rocket’s incubator, is also preparing for an IPO as early as this year, people have said.
 Two decades, a name change and a whole lot of caffeine later, the partners have emerged as billionaires as their company, Monster Beverage Corp, agreed to sell a 17 percent stake to Coca-Cola Co.
 The non-profit publication, which buys all the cars it tests, said the problems mostly emerged after the sedan had been driven more than 10,000 miles (16,090 kilometers).
 Sprint slid 19 percent after a deal to merge with T-Mobile US Inc.
 Regulatory concerns outweighed the potential benefits of a merger with T-Mobile US that would combine the third and fourth-largest US.
 A total $908 billion of mergers and acquisitions have been announced by US.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- President Barack Obama won’t return campaign donations to executives, advisers and directors who have profited from offshore mergers that reduce corporate taxes using a technique he has called “unpatriotic” Responding to a Bloomberg News report that described connections between more than 20 Obama donors and the tax-cutting transactions, White House Deputy Press Secretary Eric Schultz said the president will keep the cash.
 In inversions, US-based companies merge with a smaller foreign business and take a non-US.
 that have advised companies on the mergers.
 emerge from bankruptcy as a UK.
 “Those who have given up the comforts of home to serve the suffering and the less fortunate are in many ways just beginning this battle” The World Health Organization has declared Ebola an international public health emergency.
 A handful of experimental drugs have emerged as candidates for emergency use in addition to the Mapp drug, which doesn’t have capabilities yet to scale up production.
 “While the announced de-merger is a catalyst for BHP, we are not convinced that this plan creates long-term value for shareholders,” Chris LaFemina, an analyst at Jefferies LLC, wrote today in a note to clients.
 David Crawford, a BHP director since 1994, will lead the demerged entity’s board and step down from BHP in November.
 Gleb Fetisov, who sold about $14 billion of assets to go into politics full time last year and merged his party with an opposition group, was arrested at Domodedovo Airport on Feb.
 In January, before My Bank lost its license and Yanukovych fled Ukraine for Russia, Fetisov agreed to merge his Green Alliance with the Social Democrats of Russia, an opposition group whose leader, Gennady Gudkov, helped organize a wave of street protests against Putin at the end of 2011 after disputed parliamentary elections.
 Driving Demand Share listings, dividends, and mergers and acquisitions are driving demand, the HKMA said July 26.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- As a truce between Israel and Gaza Strip militants stretched into a third day, details of a peace proposal that includes the opening of border crossings emerged during talks in Cairo to find a lasting settlement.
 Congress also approved $225 million in emergency spending for Israel’s Iron Dome missile-defense system.
 “There is still non-trivial uncertainty for both mergers,” with much of the review process yet to unfold, Gallant said.
 “This is the first effort to have a long-overdue, transparent, public discussion about how to distribute life-saving medicines in an emergency,” said Arthur Caplan, director of the division of medical ethics at NYU Langone Medical Center, in a telephone interview.
 Food and Drug Administration said it could potentially be used in an emergency situation.
 8, the WHO designated the outbreak as an international public health emergency, eight months after it began.
 The look re-emerged in the 1990s, when women’s magazines began looking more to the boyishly slim Kate Moss than curvy Cindy Crawford.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- “Consumers Win,” shouted the subject line of the e-mail that rushed into reporters’ inboxes soon after the news emerged that Sprint Corp.
 Even so, the merger’s collapse isn’t an unqualified boon for consumers.
 The company’s bankers worked on $166 billion of merger deals in Southeast Asia in the first half, allowing DBS to top the list of advisers in the region for the first time in its history, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Terra Firma bought Awas from Morgan Stanley in 2006 for $25 billion and later merged it with Pegasus Aviation Finance Co, which it took over for $52 billion in 2007.
 Balfour Beatty Plc climbed 25 percent after rejecting a renewed merger proposal from Carillion Plc.
 The builder rejected Carillion’s latest merger proposal, saying it could undermine the company’s aim to sell its New York-based Parsons Brinckerhoff division.
 Russia, which has massed troops on its border with Ukraine, called for an emergency meeting of the United Nations Security Council.
 Qunar held talks to merge with competitor Ctripcom International Ltd.
 secured emergency support from South Africa’s central bank in a plan calling for the company to raise 10 billion rand ($938 million) in capital and break off a so-called bad bank for soured loans.
 Equities with valuations triple the rest of Europe have come too far to be justified by an economy that is poised to emerge from a six-year recession, says Peter Garnry, head of equity strategy at Saxo Bank A/S.
 Yamaguchi, who comes from Hoge Fenton Jones & Appel, specializes in cross-border mergers and acquisitions.
 The WHO also said today it put together a committee to assess whether the Ebola outbreak should be declared an international public-health emergency, spurring further action.
 The board meets next week to debate a demerger of some of its other assets.
 Rio won’t be studying any major mergers or acquisitions, Walsh said today.
 18 activated emergency support of 125 million euros through November for fruit and vegetable producers.
 Inox Wind expects to emerge among the top three suppliers of turbines in India this financial year, he said.
 MB Financial merged Cole Taylor into MB Financial Bank, the Chicago-based buyer said today in a statement.
 Carillion Plc jumped 84 percent to 3468 pence after saying it has met with Balfour Beatty Plc’s major shareholders in an effort to resurrect a merger that Britain’s largest builder rejected this week.
 Regulators are proving resistant to the idea of mergers.
 Son has argued that a merger would help him gain the capital he needs to invest in the faster wireless Internet speeds that consumers crave.
 While Chinese Internet company shares have done “tremendously well,” the prices may not reflect the risk that more and more mergers and acquisitions make differentiation more difficult, according to Devan Kaloo, head of global emerging markets at Aberdeen Asset Management Plc.
 Sprint Corp’s decision last week to shelve its plans to combine with T-Mobile has thrust Dish from a sideline observer to a potential participant in the industry’s wave of mergers.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Balfour Beatty Plc rejected a renewed merger proposal by Carillion Plc to form the UK’s biggest builder with a market valuation of about 3 billion pounds ($5 billion) because of a dispute over whether to dispose of the Parsons Brinckerhoff division.
 Carillion had approached London-based rival Balfour to revive merger talks that collapsed in late July, two people familiar with the situation said yesterday.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Israel and Gaza Strip militants observed a second day of a truce as reports of a peace proposal that would include the opening of border crossings emerged during talks in Cairo to find a lasting settlement.
 Congress also approved $225 million in emergency spending for Israel’s Iron Dome missile-defense system.
 Montag, 57, and Darnell emerged as co-COOs during a shakeup three years ago that included the ouster of Sallie L.
 Hobbyists were assured protection by Congress in a 2012 law that directed the FAA to begin crafting regulations to safely merge drones into traditional airways by August 2015.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, this year’s top-ranked takeover adviser, hired Paul Parker to be a co-chairman of its mergers and acquisitions group less than three months after he left Barclays Plc.
 Parker, 51, served as global head of finance at London-based Barclays before being named to run the worldwide mergers and acquisitions in October.
 saw their combined revenue from investment banking rise 67 percent to $917 billion in the first half of 2014, led by gains in equity underwriting and advising on mergers.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Carillion Plc has approached rival construction firm Balfour Beatty Plc to revive merger talks that collapsed in late July, according to two people familiar with the situation.
 A merger would combine Carillion’s extensive services business with Balfour’s building operations, which have struggled with a slowdown in construction activity.
 has spurred reorganizations across the retail industry, including the merger of stationery suppliers Office Depot Inc.
 dropped for a second day after buying International Strategy & Investment Group LLC in an all-stock deal that dilutes the value of existing shares and moves the merger-advisory firm deeper into the equities business.
 ISI specializes in equity research and trading, which isn’t as profitable as Evercore’s main business of advising on mergers and acquisitions, according to Jeff Harte, an analyst at Sandler O’Neill & Partners LP.
 ‘Value Destructive’ “In some stock deals, you do see some slippage initially but not as big a drop as this stock has seen since Friday,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 Balfour Beatty Plc gained 25 percent after the British construction company rejected a revised merger proposal from Carillion Plc.
 got emergency support from South Africa’s central bank in a plan calling for the company to raise 10 billion rand ($938 million) in capital and break off a so-called bad bank for soured loans.
 megamerger.
 He expects the court to issue a ruling in the case, handled under emergency proceedings, in September.
 Stock markets yesterday punished companies pursuing inversions and investors have genuine reason for concern about the prospects for cross-border mergers that limit US.
 possesses regulatory tools that could unwind the mergers or make them less attractive.
 Roc Chairman Mike Harding said Fosun’s offer is superior to an agreement to merge with Horizon Oil Ltd, while Horizon said it expects Roc to terminate their A$800 million accord.
 and Cnooc Ltd, received two approaches from potential buyers it didn’t name after announcing the Horizon merger in April.
 Horizon has sufficient funds and wasn’t depending on the Roc merger, Emmett said.
 Terra Firma bought Awas from Morgan Stanley in 2006 for $25 billion and later merged it with Pegasus Aviation Finance Co, which it took over for $52 billion in 2007.
 also revived talks to merge wireless assets in Italy with Vimpelcom Ltd, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Shippers also say they want more rail choices after mergers cut the number of large carriers operating in the US.
 “We don’t know how genuine this threat is but it is absolutely vital we deal with the situation as a full emergency,” Greater Manchester Police Chief Superintendent John O’Hare said in the release.
 The companies, based in Dublin and London, have emerged as acquisition targets for US.
 companies that seek mergers with foreign firms to circumvent taxes are “unpatriotic,” and the Treasury Department yesterday said it’s reviewing a “range of options” to discourage tax inversions.
 “Ask yourself why they waited a year after a merger which was vetted by hundreds of HP employees and agents, before and after, before claiming fraud (to support an almost $9 billion writedown) and then ask yourself why, if they are so concerned about fraud, HP has been scared to sue anywhere for three years,” John Keker, a lawyer for Hussain, said in an e-mail.
 CEO Marcelo Claure to replace Hesse, 60, after abandoning talks for a merger with T-Mobile US Inc.
 Hesse has led the third-largest wireless carrier since 2007 and starred in a series of black-and-white TV commercials to help the company restore its image, which was tarnished by service problems after a merger with Nextel Communications Inc.
 The government’s opacity is also damping cross-border mergers and acquisitions, said Hall, who advised Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP in its successful proxy battle to oust the CEO of Canadian Pacific Railway Ltd.
 Ottawa’s unpredictable stance hasn’t prevented foreign mergers and acquisitions or activism altogether, Hall said.
 is selling almost $4 billion in bonds to help finance future investment even after the company scrapped a merger of its Sprint Corp.
 The interest from offshore buyers is putting 2014 on course to be the biggest for merger activity in Australia in seven years.
 Whether Australian companies are the buyers or the targets, merger activity is likely to keep going strong, according to Nicholson at Ernst & Young.
 Telecom Italia may be interested in GVT itself, with Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano in favor of expanding Tim through an eventual merger, people familiar with the plan said in May.
 Police have disregarded hit lists of union members that have emerged after labor figures were mentioned during testimony at the Marikana Commission of Inquiry, Mathunjwa said.
 ArcelorMittal has shuttered plants and fired workers as it seeks to emerge from an industry trough after dwindling demand and excess capacity shrunk profit margins.
 In 2008, Wendy’s and Arby’s merged after Triarc Cos, owner of the Arby’s brand, bought Wendy’s International Inc.
 Justice Department, Poling handles complex export control and sanctions matters, trade-related due diligence, integration issues in mergers and acquisitions, audits, and corporate compliance issues, according to a statement from the firm.
 Saving Car Industry “We weren’t involved in that decision regarding the tax implications in their emergence from bankruptcy,” he said, adding that he got his information from the former Treasury officials who worked on the bailout.
 On July 10, 2009, it emerged under the formal control of the Treasury Department, which had swapped some of its debt for stock and now held 61 percent of the shares.
 After it emerged from bankruptcy, GM ended up with $16 billion of Treasury Department funds in a special escrow account that could be tapped only with the government’s blessing.
 Phone and cable carriers across Europe are seeking mergers and acquisitions to help ease competitive pressure on prices -- a pursuit made more likely after the European Commission this month approved a reduction in the number of wireless-network providers in Germany.
 More than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave since the allegations emerged last year.
 and its competitors that has left Los Angeles Dodgers games blacked out for most fans is threatening to undermine the merger of the nation’s two largest cable-television companies.
 Concern that the combined company’s heft would be wielded in a way that hurts competitors could lead regulators to block or impose conditions on the $425 billion merger.
 “Eliminating competition can, but because cable companies don’t usually compete in the same areas the merger doesn’t eliminate very much head-to-head competition” Comcast has told Congress that having more regional sports doesn’t give it more leverage over rivals.
 In March, NII hired UBS AG as a financial adviser for advice on potential strategic opportunities, including partnerships, a merger or a sale of the company or its assets.
 “For any geopolitical situation, when it first emerges it has a big market impact, and even if the situation doesn’t improve, we go along through time and the market becomes comfortable with it,” Greg Anderson, head of global foreign-exchange strategy at Bank of Montreal, said in a phone interview.
 clearance to combine service after their December merger formed parent American Airlines Group Inc.
 carrier serving free meals for economy travelers was Continental Airlines, which began charging for food for coach fliers on most domestic and Canadian flights in 2010 ahead of its merger with United.
 emerges as an LNG exporter.
 The aluminum company plans to merge the two loans totaling $515 billion, taken in 2011 and 2013, and restructure them simultaneously.
 “Intesa Sanpaolo is very well positioned to emerge from the Asset Quality Review and Stress Test exercise as a winner amongst European banks” Messina expects provisioning for bad loans will decline in the second-half from a year earlier, when the bank set aside 46 billion euros to shore up its balance sheet before the asset review.
 The facility opened in April 2012 and emerged from a prior bankruptcy reorganization in May 2013, reducing debt by 82 percent, from $152 billion to $272 million.
 The plan incorporates a global settlement among the official committee of unsecured creditors, Gerszberg’s Suchman LLC, and MEE that “paved the way” for the sale and MEE’s emergence from Chapter 11, according to the disclosure statement.
 The aircraft vanished from civil radar with no emergency warnings, leaving investigators to analyze satellite and plane data to define a search area in the remote ocean off the west coast of Australia.
 Hanergy will use Alta’s solar cells in applications including emergency charging of mobile phones and cars, the Chinese acquirer said in a statement today.
 “The business is labor-intensive” After backing off this month on a plan to merge Sprint with T-Mobile US Inc, Sprint Chairman Masayoshi Son brought in Claure, who founded phone distributor Brightstar Corp, to reinvigorate the ailing wireless carrier.
 While he didn’t mention T-Mobile by name, he alluded to the scrapped merger plan.
 Pessina will remain as executive vice chairman responsible for strategy and mergers and acquisitions.
 Starwood Waypoint was spun off from Starwood Property Trust Inc, a Greenwich, Connecticut-based commercial real estate investment and finance company, earlier this year following a merger between Beasley’s Waypoint Homes and an affiliate of Barry Sternlicht’s Starwood Capital Group LLC.
 Family Dollar’s shares have soared past the current deal price, signaling that investors expect a higher bid to emerge.
 Brooke Buchanan, a spokeswoman for Bentonville, Arkansas-based Wal-Mart, declined to comment on merger speculation.
 African Bank, known as Abil, got emergency support from the Reserve Bank after the Johannesburg-based provider of unsecured loans lost most of its market value in three days.
 and Morgan Stanley, earned $54 million in fees from advising on mergers and underwriting in the year to July 27, down 56 percent from a year earlier, according to data compiled by Freeman & Co, a New York-based consulting firm.
 this week at the same time Japanese tycoon Masayoshi Son abandoned his plans to merge T-Mobile US Inc.
 Even so, that’s barely put a dent in merger volume, which is still up 61 percent from a year ago to almost $2 trillion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “I don’t see anything that’s flashing even a yellow light for M&A,” Tom Burnett, director of research at Wall Street Access Corp, which specializes in mergers and event-driven analysis, said in a phone interview.
 There have been $18 trillion of mergers and acquisitions announced globally this year, and about two-thirds of those more than 12,000 deals have already closed.
 M&A Runway “The market is maybe focusing on the here and now, and not focusing on what Ergen has been doing and what he needs to do in light of the fact that there could be some deal,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co, said in a phone interview.
 or pursue a merger with CBS Corp.
 The last of Dynegy’s subsidiaries emerged from bankruptcy protection in November 2013, after a collapse in wholesale electricity prices drove several years of losses.
 By then, the effects of the health emergency will have spread further, into oil prices -- the three countries import all their oil -- food costs and lost iron-ore production.
 According to Family Dollar, Icahn called Levine later that day asking to discuss the company’s future, including possible mergers.
 Falling Sales Brazilian telecommunications regulator Anatel would have to analyze any merger or change in company structure before a deal can go through, said a press official for the agency who asked not to be named.
 Brazil has been wary of telecommunications mergers.
 named Marcelo Claure, the founder of mobile-phone distributor Brightstar Corp, as its new chief executive officer and president, replacing Dan Hesse after a scuttled plan to merge with T-Mobile US Inc.
 Balfour Beatty Plc tumbled 67 percent after Carillion Plc stopped pursuing a merger with the British builder.
 They are now seeking to add junior staff for investment banking, including mergers advice, he said.
 Morgan Stanley was the top adviser of Japanese mergers and acquisitions.
 - The WHO will announce tomorrow whether it’s declaring an international public-health emergency over the spread of Ebola.
 Roc Oil will likely terminate its merger agreement with Horizon after Roc’s board unanimously recommended a rival takeover offer from Fosun International Ltd, Horizon said.
 A 31 year-old male was found dead beneath some rubble after a wall fell on him, Luyanda Majija, spokeswoman for emergency services ER24, said by phone from Johannesburg.
 Ensuring a calm transfer of power is crucial for Indonesia as it seeks to assure investors the nation’s closest election since its emergence from decades of dictatorship in 1998 won’t erode economic progress.
 Bioplan is postponing until September $520 million of loans for its merger with Arcade Marketing because of the weak market, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified citing lack of authorization to speak publicly.
 A merger between its two rivals would have created a new market leader, escalating competition at a time when Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 The company’s $600 million in annual cost savings from the merger is twice what Dollar Tree estimated in its deal to buy Family Dollar.
 If Dollar General and Family Dollar merge, one vendor -- Orchids Paper Products Co, which sells toilet paper and napkins -- will rely on the company for almost 60 percent of revenue, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 filed for bankruptcy after an $83 billion takeover by billionaire Sam Zell, and emerged in 2012.
 4 accident at Imperial Metals Corp’s Mount Polley copper-and-gold mine led the local district authority to declare a state of emergency amid concerns about drinking water and the fate of millions of migrating salmon.
 “The commission requires compliance with the premerger notification rules and will not hesitate to seek civil penalties against companies or individuals that fall short of their filing responsibilities,” Deborah Feinstein, the director of the FTC’s bureau of competition, said in a statement.
 Benitez said the idea for an additional set of locks emerged as a way to attract increasing shipments of iron ore and coal from Brazil and Colombia and oil from Venezuela to the canal.
 EU ministers gathered for an emergency meeting to discuss developments in Ukraine, Iraq and Gaza.
 5, when news of Russia’s airspace deliberations first emerged.
 The Department of Transportation and its Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration can’t enact anything tougher than current ICAO standards unless “credible reports” emerge of on-board fires.
 agreed to merge its Xpedx distribution business with closely held Unisource Worldwide Inc.
 Asset Sales Larger competitor Lafarge SA is buying out Anglo American Plc’s share in a Solihull, England-based tarmac and aggregates joint venture for at least 885 million pounds -- to sell the whole business at a later point -- as the French company seeks to satisfy antitrust concerns ahead of a $40 billion merger with Holcim Ltd.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Chiquita Brands International Inc, owner of the namesake banana label, received an unsolicited $611 million takeover proposal that envisages the company scrapping its pending merger with Irish competitor Fyffes Plc.
 The proposed bid jeopardizes the Fyffes merger that would lower Chiquita’s tax bill by moving its headquarters from the US.
 the day after two proposed mergers unraveled and the tax treatment of a third was reassessed.
 “If you’re an investor trying to make money doing merger arbitrage, this is the risk you run” 21st Century Fox Inc.
 “Given that spreads and returns in the area have generally been difficult to generate, these developments are particularly painful” Options that were poised to profit had the mergers closed were in freefall.
 The firm’s merger arbitrage index has climbed 03 percent in 2014.
 Four of the plant’s generators, which are deployed during periods of high demand or emergencies, burn No.
 One would involve creating higher barriers to prevent companies from changing their legal addresses through mergers.
 ‘Valid Case’ The risk that funds won’t be able to sell when they need to the most has also emerged as regulations designed to curb risk-taking made dealers less willing to hold bonds.
 As Facebook finds new ways to analyze the behavior of its more than 1 billion users, controversy has emerged regarding its methods.
 “Certainly these megamergers will come under political scrutiny.
 Sulzer AG, the Swiss pumpmaker, also previously discussed a potential merger with Dresser-Rand, the people said.
 “Shareholders normally go for the higher bid, but for Dresser-Rand management a Sulzer merger could be more attractive as it creates a leading and focused rotating equipment player,” said Fabian Haecki, an industrials analyst at Bank Vontobel AG in Zurich.
 Falling Sales Brazilian telecommunications regulator Anatel would have toanalyze any merger or change in company structure before a dealcan go through, said a press official for the agency who askednot to be named.
 Brazil has been wary of telecommunications mergers.
 Siga’s Rose, also an executive of Perelman’s MacAndrews & Forbes holding company, testified that the licensing talks were never completed and documents outlining proposed terms were marked as “non-binding” ‘Guaranteed’ Rights PharmAthene executives have alleged that their Siga counterparts, including former Perelman lieutenant Donald Drapkin, “guaranteed” the company’s rights to a merger or a share of the drug’s profits.
 The state high court also noted “Drapkin apparently took no active role in the post-September 2006 licensing negotiations” after a proposed merger collapsed.
 In March, NII hired UBS AG as a financial adviser for advice on potential strategic opportunities, including partnerships, a merger or a sale of the company or its assets.
 Worst Outbreak The world’s worst Ebola outbreak comes at a time when promising treatments are finally starting to emerge from the laboratory, many of which are the products of years of research funded by the US.
 “A future proposal for a study or emergency use in a different population, for example in patients with disease, might have an acceptable risk-benefit balance,” she said.
 The firm, known for its multistrategy hedge funds that bet on everything from rising and falling stock prices to mergers and bankruptcies, managed $457 billion as of Aug.
 China’s emergence as an aviation superpower will help drive the market expansion, said Randy Tinseth, vice president of marketing at Boeing’s commercial airplane unit.
 Salix, which is in the middle of its own merger with a unit of Italian drugmaker Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA, is up 75 percent this year.
 The deal, which has not closed, was structured to allow Salix to merge with the Irish unit of Cosmo and move its tax domicile there.
 “Cross-border mergers like this produce little in the way of opportunities to cut costs,” the analyst wrote in an e-mail.
 “The FCC and DOJ will now point to Iliad to demonstrate that that’s simply not true” The boards of Deutsche Telekom and T-Mobile still see significant hurdles to a merger with Sprint that need to be addressed before a deal is announced, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 “A future proposal for a study or emergency use in a different population, for example in patients with disease, might have an acceptable risk-benefit balance,” she said.
 aircraft made an emergency landing on Hainan Island.
 There have been a flurry of mergers and acquisitions in the health-care industry this year, driven by growth-hungry acquirers seeking to take advantage of low interest rates and also reduce their taxes.
 Congress’ Protection Hobbyists were assured protection by Congress in a 2012 law that directed the FAA to begin crafting regulations to safely merge drones into traditional airways by August 2015.
 are embarking on a price brawl to take each others’ subscribers after a deal to merge the wireless carriers collapsed.
 After Sprint abandoned a plan to merge with T-Mobile, Sprint’s new Chief Executive Officer Marcelo Claure has reduced prices at a company that had largely sought to stay above the fray of price cuts that have been led by T-Mobile.
 It’s unclear what those reforms will look like, how inclusive they will be and whether the Thailand that emerges from them resembles the “happiness-filled” democracy that Prayuth, 60, has said his tactics will produce.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Lanxess AG will merge four divisions as Chief Executive Officer Matthias Zachert forges ahead with simplifying the German maker of synthetic rubber to cut costs and accelerate decision making.
 The changes will align meal policies at American and merger partner US Airways Group Inc, which are operating separately as they await regulatory clearance to combine service.
 The deals represented legitimate practices of the mergers-and-acquisitions business, they said.
 Pursuing a merger with CBS Corp.
 “It’s my view that Time Warner is in play and will not emerge independent,” Martin said.
 and Time Inc, making it a ripe target as content owners such as Fox weigh mergers in response to the consolidation that’s taking place among cable-TV providers.
 Another reason to wait is to see how regulators will evaluate the pay-TV deals currently under review, and to see if there’s willingness to allow for large-scale mergers.
 While a merger between CBS and Time Warner would be attractive, it’s unlikely as long as 91-year-old Sumner Redstone is in control of CBS, according to Martin and James Dix, an analyst at Wedbush.
 broadcast networks” Fox Stock The Federal Communications Commission forbids a single company from owning two of the four major broadcasters, meaning that if Time Warner and CBS merged, it would create a hurdle for Murdoch because he owns Fox.
 House and Senate approved $225 million in emergency spending for Israel’s Iron Dome missile-defense system, sending a message of support for Israel as fighting surged in the Hamas-controlled Gaza Strip.
 on merger news offset gains in consumer shares.
 The company’s sales volume growth and valuations are no longer supported by mergers as in the past five years because of fewer available targets, Daiwa analysts Anson Chan and Alison Law wrote in a note dated Aug.
 Claure is stepping into a company that Hesse, an experienced hand with decades in the phone business, had helped stabilize after a disastrous merger with Nextel Communications Inc.
 Errors emerged when Hertz was preparing first-quarter accounts, including in capitalization and depreciation timing for “certain non-fleet assets” It also found mistakes in accounting for money it couldn’t collect from customers who damaged vehicles or equipment.
 Once a municipality is formed, however small, it’s exceedingly difficult to merge it away.
 Louis city and county agreed to stop competing and merge efforts.
 ‘Sweep Away’ Whites often oppose consolidation because they fear their tax bills will go up, while blacks who have managed to obtain positions of authority fear that a merger “could easily sweep away those gains,” says Lang, the Kansas historian.
 Ask questions to understand first,” counsels Chris Schlanger, an emergency-room physician who teaches at Washington University’s Olin School of Business.
 Time Warner’s merger with AOL Inc.
 ‘First Shot’ “This car is Geely and Volvo’s first shot after the merger so it has to be loud and heard widely,” said Han Weiqi, a Shanghai-based analyst at CSC International Holdings.
 The security company was then merged with another brokerage to become Maybank Kim Eng Securities (Thailand) Pcl, the country’s biggest equity trading company.
 The merger will make it easier and more profitable for Kinder “to pursue expansion and acquisitions in a target-rich environment,” the company said in a slide presentation published on its website yesterday.
 The merger is expected to be completed by the end of this year.
 “It’s certainly a hint that they are predisposed against a merger,” Craig Moffett, an analyst at MoffettNathanson in New York, said in an interview.
 Pooling Resources By pooling resources the companies would be able to pay more to the federal government, demonstrating that a full merger would help them make bigger investments in their networks.
 “You’re not going to allow them to merge without a hearing and merger analysis,” Moffett said.
 “So the idea that they said they would bid jointly and that the FCC would say that’s OK was improbable from day one” While the companies have agreed on the broad outlines of a merger in which Sprint would buy T-Mobile for about $32 billion, the agreement isn’t likely to be announced until August, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Chief Executive Officer Gary Loveman said no qualified bidders have emerged for the bankrupt Revel hotel and casino in Atlantic City, after an auction was postponed last week.
 The so-called floatel is housing hundreds of workers sent to fix the new unit that’s already months behind schedule after a fire and emergency maintenance.
 The merger of the Kinder siblings, expected to be finished by the end of this year, will create the largest energy infrastructure company in North America with an 80,000-mile network of pipes that together would be long enough to circle the Earth three times.
 Revenue from arranging mergers, stock and bond sales and loans in Europe, the Middle East and Africa climbed 30 percent to $173 billion for the seven months ended in July, compared with the year-earlier period, according to data compiled by New York-based research firm Freeman & Co.
 Fees are on pace to rise as much as 35 percent this year and may surpass $30 billion, Freeman estimates, the most since $396 billion was collected in 2007, as mergers and acquisitions pick up.
 are the top-ranked merger advisers in Europe this year.
 Fees for arranging mergers have climbed as the value of deals grew 75 percent to $832 billion in the year to date, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “High cash levels in the corporate sector, the low cost of bond financing and a bubble in stock markets have encouraged mergers,” said Ismail Erturk, a senior lecturer on banking at Manchester Business School.
 They are betting demand for pension, health and other protection products will increase with higher per capita income, rising average life expectancy, the emergence of nuclear families as well as a reduction in the average size of households, Charles Graham, an analyst with Bloomberg Intelligence, wrote in a research note dated July 14.
 It emerged after a reorganization in December 2012.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Options traders who were trying to profit off three proposed mergers saw the value of their bets vanish yesterday.
 “Any time you see a big drop in share price or mergers falling apart, calls that were trading before are worthless,” Tim Biggam, chief options strategist at TradingBlock, a brokerage firm at the Chicago Board Options Exchange, said by phone.
 The firm’s merger arbitrage index has climbed 04 percent in 2014.
 Earnings from car navigation devices -- the hit product that emerged as JVC sales of camcorders and audiovisual systems slumped in the smartphone revolution -- are under pressure.
 Their fall is pushing Japan’s entire electrical machinery industry, which regularly generated trade surpluses of 7 trillion yen ($67 billion) until 2007, toward deficits that may emerge as soon as next year, UBS AG estimates.
 “We want to be building up a little cash” The company forecasts a profit for the 12 months through March after reporting losses in four of the six years since JVC and Kenwood merged and separated from Panasonic Corp.
 JVC has slumped 64 percent since the merger with Kenwood and split from Panasonic.
 merged their thermal power generation businesses this year to tap growing demand in Asia.
 In Germany, which accounts for more than a third of sales, Deutsche Telekom is set to face an enlarged competitor following regulatory approval of the merger of Telefonica’s and Royal KPN NV’s operations in the country.
 8 for an emergency hearing after Argentina published full-page ads in the New York Times and the Wall Street Journal accusing the court of forcing it to miss debt payments.
 TUI, which has revived merger talks with parent TUI AG, introduced the 787 last year, becoming an early European customer.
 The merger talks revived in June after breaking down last year are aimed at agreeing an all-share, nil-premium deal that would create the world’s largest tourism business.
 “We are at the emergent stage of the problem of our age,” Hickton said.
 Investors are betting that management teams will describe the sun rising again” While the turnaround in money flow is only a week old, positive earnings surprises and expectations for mergers among consumer companies may keep investors engaged, S&P Capital IQ’s Rosenbluth said.
 The board rejected the Dollar General proposal and reaffirmed last month’s pact to merge with Dollar Tree, according to a statement today from the Matthews, North Carolina-based company.
 The Dollar General offer, made this week, would merge the two largest dollar-store chains in the US, creating a fleet of almost 20,000 stores.
 Family Dollar’s rejection of the Dollar General offer follows growing tensions between the two companies, which have had fruitless talks in the past about a potential merger.
 A merger between Family Dollar and Dollar Tree would combine the No.
 A Dollar Tree-led merger would still involve divesting stores to pacify regulators, though the company doesn’t expect to have to get rid of more than 500.
 “It seems obvious that in a Dollar General/Family Dollar merger, Levine would not have any future role,” Icahn said.
 “We remain firmly committed to pursuing a merger of Valeant and Allergan and are greatly appreciative of the shareholder support received to call the meeting,” Michael Pearson, Valeant’s CEO, said in the statement.
 That difference put the companies at odds and slowed their merger, said one person who was directly involved in the discussions at the time.
 Zalando SE, an online retailer that emerged from Rocket’s incubator, is also preparing for an IPO as early as this year, people have said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- SoftBank Corp, the Japanese wireless carrier led by billionaire Masayoshi Son, plans to sell bonds for the first time after it abandoned talks to merge Sprint Corp.
 The cash raising isn’t to finance specific mergers and acquisitions, she said.
 The cost and war-fighting benefits of developing common armored vehicles for the region could also spur consolidation beyond the pending merger of Germany’s Krauss-Maffei Wegmann GmbH and France’s Nexter Systems SA, said Frank Haun, chief executive officer at KMW, maker of the 62-ton Leopard 2.
 The 50:50 merger, announced July 1, will create a business with revenue of almost 2 billion euros ($27 billion) and more than 6,000 staff.
 The Nexter merger, first mulled more than eight years ago, will seek to replicate the success of pan-European aerospace and defense tie-ups including Airbus Group NV and Eurofighter GmbH.
 Errors emerged when Hertz was preparing first-quarter accounts, including in capitalization and depreciation timing for “certain non-fleet assets” It also found mistakes in accounting for money it couldn’t collect from customers who damaged vehicles or equipment.
 report earnings tomorrow, and investors are likely to push for more clarity on their competing visions: go it alone or merge.
 If not Murdoch, Bewkes needs to show who might be a better merger partner -- whether it’s CBS Corp, Discovery Communications Inc, or another company -- and why.
 While Fox, owner of Fox News, has said it would sell CNN, a merger of two major movie and television studios would also attract scrutiny.
 Vringo was a company that sold telephone ring tones before it merged with Innovate/Protect, which owned the Lycos patents.
 The company was one of hundreds to adopt such bylaws in an attempt to rein in the proliferation of investor lawsuits in multiple jurisdictions that often follow a merger announcement.
 While some companies have adopted the bylaws on “a clear day,” Allen said, “a good number have adopted them concurrently with signing a merger agreement” These companies know, she said, “that as night follows day, there will be multiforum litigation following a merger announcement” Allen, a corporate governance expert who tracks these provisions, expects the provisions to be upheld even when adopted as part of merger strategy so long as a majority of a corporate board is independent.
 The firms argued that the deals represented legitimate practices of the mergers-and-acquisitions business.
 Global communication and technology companies have been involved in $711 billion of mergers and acquisitions this year, more than double the value a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The appetite is being driven by themes such as industry growth expectations, high operating leverage businesses and, more conspicuously in 2014, a global spike in merger and acquisition activity,” Ben Williams, regional head of financing sales at Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit.
 Azentus sold the shares in both companies in the first half of July after Sprint’s share price decline made it too costly to complete the merger, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 The wireless carrier and Hutchison Whampoa Ltd, controlled by Asia’s richest man Li Ka-shing, revived talks to merge their wireless assets in Italy.
 “New scientific studies continue to emerge on a monthly basis showing that this is a chemical that is hazardous at very low levels of exposure,” Schade, whose group lobbies to ban toxic chemicals from household products, said in an interview.
 Although repeating the merger process could hurt the stock, Marchionne can have another go if this attempt fails, according to Barclays Plc’s Kristina Church.
 “Nothing changes, Fiat and Chrysler are still operationally two merged businesses, so it’s just a delay to the issue” Fiat Industrial SpA, a truck and tractor manufacturer that Fiat spun off in 2011, completed a merger with CNH Global NV last year in a deal that was subject to a 250 million-euro cap on Fiat Industrial shareholders’ withdrawal rights.
 “They’re trying to get out of Italy and would strengthen their Brazilian business through a merger with GVT” Telefonica shares fell 17 percent to 1179 euros at the close in Madrid today, valuing the company at 536 billion euros.
 Other companies interested in GVT could include Telecom Italia, whose Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano was in favor of expanding its Brazilian unit, Tim Participacoes SA, through an eventual merger with GVT, people familiar with the plan said in May.
 GVT, which emerged in 1999 during the privatization of Brazil’s telecommunications industry, had 12 percent of the country’s broadband market and about 9 percent of its landline market in 2013, according to Vivendi’s annual report.
 Balfour Beatty Plc added 25 percent after rejecting a revised merger proposal from Carillion Plc.
 construction company rejected Carillion’s revised offer, saying a merger between the two could undermine its sale of Parsons Brinckerhoff, a New York-based engineering consultancy.
 Balfour Beatty had abandoned a previous round of merger talks in late July because Carillion wanted to include the unit in the deal.
 Evercore’s equities business, which is partially owned by employees, will be merged with ISI into a new unit, to be called Evercore ISI Institutional Equities, one of the people said.
 electricity producer, agreed to buy Goal Zero to add portable and emergency solar-power systems to its retail energy offerings.
 after it merged with Procter & Gamble Co.
 They would also block the merger between cable giants Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Artspacecom’s board of directors had been in talks for several weeks about a merger with Auctionata, a Berlin-based online-only auctioneer of fine art and collectibles, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 He rose to chairman of Price Waterhouse and when the firm merged with Coopers & Lybrand in 1998, he served as CEO of New York-based PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, one of the world’s four biggest accounting firms.
 In a statement today to the Mexican stock exchange, the company said that while it may grow through acquisitions or mergers and is considering strategic options, no deal has been completed.
 Air raid sirens alerting Israelis to rocket attacks continued to sound after news of a truce emerged.
 The controlling Agnelli family and other investors, holding their final shareholders meeting in Turin today, sealed the end of Fiat as an Italian company with a vote approving a merger with Chrysler.
 Even before the Chrysler combination is finalized, Fiat has been linked to mergers or deals with Volkswagen as well as France’s PSA Peugeot Citroen in recent weeks.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- A spill that dumped billions of gallons of mining wastewater into creeks and lakes this week has led local officials in British Columbia to declare a state of emergency and raised concern for migrating sockeye salmon.
 The Cariboo Regional District said the declaration will help it get access to needed resources to protect private property and government infrastructure in the nearby town of Likely, about 400 kilometers (248 miles) northeast of Vancouver, according to a notice posted today on its emergency operations center Facebook page.
 retailer, said in October it would pay about $558 million to merge its more than 130 stores in China into a joint venture with Hong Kong-listed China Resources Enterprise.
 will pursue more mergers and acquisitions after unveiling plans to pay $13 billion for Wisconsin-based Waupaca Foundry Inc, the largest-ever purchase for the Japanese specialty metals producer.
 The Ministry of Commerce assesses the legality of mergers and acquisitions, while other anti-competition cases fall under the State Administration for Industry and Commerce.
 Kinder’s reversal suggests that inside each huge master limited partnership “behemoth” is a corporation wanting to emerge, Bank of America Merrill Lynch analyst Gabe Moreen wrote in a note to clients.
 Cases fall under NDRC jurisdiction when involving prices, the Ministry of Commerce assesses the legality of mergers and acquisitions, and other anti-competition cases fall under the SAIC.
 The Jones Day team was led by partners Bob Profusek and Andy Levine, both mergers and acquisitions, and included partners David Wales, antitrust, and Ed Kennedy, tax.
 The Skadden team representing Coca-Cola included partners Martha McGarry, Thomas Greenberg and Peter Serating, mergers and acquisitions; Bruce Goldner, intellectual property and technology; and David Rievman, tax.
 Ukraine sent aid yesterday to the country’s war-torn east as hundreds of Russian trucks carrying what the government in Moscow says is emergency supplies neared the border.
 - The WHO begins a two-day emergency meeting on the Ebola epidemic, which has now claimed almost 900 lives.
 Following the emergence of an audio clip revealing a Comcast customer-service representative haranguing a customer attempting to disconnect his service, the company’s entire playbook may have been revealed, and it’s nothing short of unctuous.
 The capital flows also allowed Turkey to cut its interest rates in kind, with the central bank slashing the main rate to a record 45 percent until a rapid decline in the lira forced it to make an emergency increase in January.
 What’s harder to determine is the risk associated with the emergence of these vehicles.
 The company said it’s in merger talks with CF Industries Holdings Inc.
 More than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave after the allegations emerged last year.
 (FDO), seeking to merge in a $85 billion deal, received arequest from the Federal Trade Commission for more informationon the transaction.
 The DollarTree merger, he said, offers “closing certainty” To contact the reporter on this story:Nick Turner in New York at nturner7@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Nick Turner at nturner7@bloombergnetNiamh Ring Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 Cases fall under the National Development and Reform Commission’s jurisdiction when involving prices, the Ministry of Commerce assesses the legality of mergers and acquisitions, and other anti-competition cases fall under the State Administration for Industry and Commerce.
 At the commerce ministry, two out of 875 merger reviews conducted have been rejected, according to the statement.
 “The biggest thing was coming up with a visual identity that expresses all of that without making it look like we weren’t being true to our past” Southwest, the largest domestic airline, began service to the Caribbean and Mexico this year, taking over routes from merger partner AirTran in a change from its long-held model of flying only in the 48 contiguous states.
 Credit Suisse this year ranks eighth among stock sale underwriters in Europe, Middle East and Africa, unchanged from 2013, and eighth among merger advisers in the region, up from 13th in 2013, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- The rally in global stocks is set to continue as increased corporate activity including mergers, acquisitions and spinoffs improves prospects for earnings, Fidelity Investments said.
 “There is normally a delay before merged companies and spinoffs go into indices,” Edgley said.
 are seeking foreign addresses through mergers, though their executives and operations are changing little if at all.
 That clashed with Marchionne’s goal of having Ferrari bolster a shift by the group into upscale cars as part of Fiat’s merger with US.
 The Ferrari chief wasn’t appointed to the new board of the merged entity, Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV.
 Fiat’s merger with its US.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Law firm mergers just keep on coming.
 Yesterday, Locke Lord LLP and Edwards Wildman Palmer LLP said they are planning to merge.
 Levin said the merger talks began during the summer, shortly after he became managing partner of Edwards Wildman.
 It was clear, he said by telephone yesterday, that “we’re in a consolidating industry, and we needed to think about what our strategic options are” He approached Sam Roberts, the National Senior Executive Director for Mestel & Company, a consulting firm specializing in attorney recruitment and law firm mergers.
 And we satisfied ourselves that it was present at Edwards Wildman” The letter of intent to merge was signed yesterday.
 Both firms are themselves products of mergers.
 Locke Lord resulted from the merger of Lord Bissell & Brook and Locke Liddell & Sapp in 2007.
 Edwards Wildman resulted from the merger of Edwards Angell Palmer & Dodge LLP -- itself a combination of Boston’s Palmer & Dodge and Edwards & Angell of Providence, Rhode Island, and Chicago’s Wildman, Harrold, Allen & Dixon LLP in 2011.
 The merger is expected to be completed in early 2015.
 Clements noted that when Lord Bissell and Locke Liddell merged in 2007, the announcement was eclipsed by the Dewey Ballantine and LeBoeuf, Lamb, Greene & MacRae merger announced one day earlier.
 “At the time, we felt overshadowed, but of course, we took two different paths after the merger” That Locke Lord had gone through mergers successfully was important to Levin, who said that “we knew how well they had integrated other mergers and we were excited by that” Deals Proskauer, Pittsburgh’s Sherrard Work on Buffalo Bills Sale Buffalo Sabres owner Terry Pegula reached an agreement to purchase the National Football League’s Buffalo Bills, the team said.
 Robert Bashaw, mergers and acquisitions; Susan Messer, employee benefits; James Hankle, litigation; Timothy Stock, tax; Edward Rice, corporate; Suzanne DeWalt, employment; and John Tedder, construction.
 Working with Pegula, Lowe said, “has been a great ride” Lateral Moves Jenner & Block, Davis Polk Add Lawyers in Chicago, Washington Jason Osborn joined the private-equity and mergers-and-acquisitions practices of Jenner & Block LLP as a corporate partner in the Chicago office He will focus on representing private-equity funds and public and private company clients in complex transactions, including mergers and acquisitions, leveraged buyouts, going-private transactions and joint ventures, and in related corporate-governance, executive-compensation and general corporate matters Osborn was previously a partner in the Chicago office of Kirkland & Ellis LLP.
 Paridon will focus on providing bank regulatory advice on matters including bank mergers and acquisitions and capital-markets transactions, enforcement actions and financial regulatory reform.
 to seek foreign addresses through mergers, though their executives and operations are changing little if at all.
 Last week, running back Ray Rice was released by theBaltimore Ravens and banned indefinitely by the NFL after videoemerged of him knocking out his fiancee with a punch inside ahotel casino elevator in Atlantic City, New Jersey.
 Emergency Power The government will probably fail to meet revenue projections outlined in a draft budget for the 2014-15 fiscal year that’s awaiting approval, Konneh said.
 President Ellen Johnson-Sirleaf has requested “emergency spending power,” with $20 million planned to contain the epidemic, he said.
 It also wants to ask for a further easingof repayment terms on the emergency loans it received from theeuro-area crisis fund.
 Low investment yields and cheap borrowing rates are spurring the flurry of mergers and acquisitions activity.
 Daimler AG’s $43 billion merger with Chrysler Corp.
 In March, Confinity merges with Xcom and takes on its name.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Detroit’s City Council approved a measure to keep Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr in charge of the city’s bankruptcy case while the mayor and council regain much of their authority to run the government.
 “We are determined to do what’s in the best interest of the city and remove the emergency manager quickly and responsibly” Duggan said the agreement allows him to take immediate control of city finances and the police.
 The mayor said outright removal of the emergency manager would have constituted an event of default on $275 million in financing under an indenture with Barclays Plc.
 As emergency manager, the former Washington lawyer was empowered by a 2012 state law to bypass Detroit’s elected officials and reorganize city government.
 “If you’re just buying and potentially selling and harvesting different kinds of performing loan books in different geographies it’s very difficult to have visibility into that business” Credigy’s longer-term outlook will depend on how big the business becomes and what kind of risks emerge, Sedran said.
 Even though Lorillard’s shares could drop about 20 percent if its merger gets scuttled, the risk-reward is compelling and losses could be minimized by Lorillard repurchasing shares in the absence of a deal, the analysts said.
 The companies said in a statement last month that they still expect the merger to close in the first half of 2015.
 The merger would leave the US.
 It’s wider than that of other pending megamergers such as AT&T-DirecTV at 10 percent, Medtronic Inc-Covidien Plc at 77 percent and Comcast-Time Warner Cable at 75 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “If you’re a menthol smoker, you’re probably not going to switch to non-menthol cigarettes in response to a small change in price” Pricing Issues The merger may even benefit cigarette consumers, according to Gorham.
 Taxing Tobacco Given that the tax on cigarettes partially determines their cost, it would be contradictory for one set of regulators to say a deal will cost consumers, while another branch of government drives up the price, according to Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 “How can the government complain that the deal isn’t in the best interest of consumers when you are charging the consumer a high tax to try to stop them from smoking?” If the FTC does push back on the merger, Reynolds could always offer to sell off more brands, such as Natural American Spirit, Gorham said.
 The draft law proposes rules that allow the FMA regulatorto wipe out junior debtholders in case a bank needs emergencystate aid, according to the text.
 will complete their mergers.
 “It potentially changes in a meaningful way the financial calculus that merger partners are going to undergo as they look at inversion,” Neil Barr, co-head of the tax department at Davis, Polk & Wardwell LLP in New York, said in an interview today.
 companies that invert through a merger are still treated as domestic for tax purposes if the former US.
 They also would restrict use of a technique known as skinnying down, in which companies make special dividends to reduce their size before a merger to meet the current law’s requirements.
 companies wouldn’t be as able to seek so-called old and cold foreign companies with cash and other passive assets as merger partners to meet the rules.
 Some “seem to believe wrongly that investing in climate change or environmental areas is less important than their national policies boosting economic growth” While no agreement will emerge from the summit, it is the largest gathering of heads of state focusing on climate issues, according to the UN.
 Following US West’s agreement to be purchased by Qwest Communications International Inc, Trujillo in 2000 quit the merged company, citing differences with Qwest’s CEO and over management and operations.
 merger reviews may undermine confidence in the regulatory process, the UK’s top antitrust regulator said, citing the possible “adverse implications” of political involvement in approving transactions.
 “Reintroducing political involvement in the assessment of mergers may encourage a belief that decisions on mergers are open to influence by interested parties,” Chisholm said yesterday in a speech at the Fordham Competition Law Institute Annual Conference in New York.
 The regulator will form an emergency team led by its vice chairman and dispatch officials to supervise operations at KB and Kookmin Bank amid the leadership void, FSC Chairman Shin Je Yoon said in an e-mailed statement.
 He said a provision shielding Hewlett-Packard managers from blame for an $88 billion writedown connected to the merger is “staggering in its breadth” Most settlements between shareholders and companies win court approval, said Stephen Diamond, a professor at Santa Clara University School of Law.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- In the year of the megamerger, even a $60 billion toothpaste giant isn’t too big to wind up on someone’s shopping list.
 Megamergers -- deals of more than $20 billion -- have hit a record $788 billion this year.
 “So if you have great categories for emerging markets but don’t have the distribution, Colgate would be a fantastic candidate” to merge with, he said, adding that its size is the challenge.
 The firm was behind the 2008 merger that created Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, the world’s largest brewer, and helped boost the company’s operating margin to more than 30 percent from about 25 percent.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- More than 300 years ago, when the Act of Union between England and Scotland created Great Britain, most public and political powers were merged.
 McGrigors LLP merged with Pinsent Masons in 2012 and more recently Dundas & Wilson LLP, which has roots dating back to 1759, became part of CMS.
 equity gauge declined 06 percent yesterday as health-care shares slid amid a government crackdown on tax-saving mergers and the US-led airstrikes.
 to seek foreign addresses through mergers, even though their executives and major operations aren’t moving.
 There are eight pending inversions, including Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned merger with Tim Hortons Inc, which would put the combined company’s headquarters in Canada.
 While the CEO doesn’t forecast a “fantastic business cycle” in Europe, he’s “expecting it to be fairly flat and grow from where we are today, in line with GDP” Rising demand makes it less likely that SSAB will achieve the full 14 billion kronor ($194 million) of possible savings from its merger this year with Finland’s Rautaruukki Oyj as markets would have to weaken for the company to idle more production capacity.
 So it has bottomed out -- on much lower levels than we saw before the Lehman crash but still, it’s not trending downwards” While the Stockholm-based company won’t close any of its five major production sites in the Nordic region, it still expects to shed some 900 employees after the Rautaruukki merger.
 United Trade The English Premier League banned third-party financing in2008 after it emerged West Ham ceded total control of forwardCarlos Tevez to investors.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- John Paulson, whose namesake hedge-fund firm oversees $228 billion, posted mixed results in his hedge funds in August as stocks and credit markets advanced while proposed mergers unraveled.
 the day after two proposed mergers unraveled and the tax treatment of a third was reassessed.
 The firm’s leveraged version of its merger strategy is up 83 percent in 2014.
 In a deal, Tim, the second-largest mobile-phone company in the country, would gain Oi’s fixed-line network to sell broadband services after losing out to Telefonica of Spain in a bid to merge with another local landline provider, GVT.
 Japanese asset managers are seeking customers who are looking to shift from cash deposits to higher-yielding investments as inflation emerges in the world’s third-largest economy.
 “If this is a merger of equals, then you may not have a premium on EMC shares.
 As well as taking the lead in reviving Europe’s market for emission permits, Germany could introduce a national minimum price for the securities as an emergency measure, he said by phone from Berlin on Aug.
 Uber seeks a ruling to halt the taxi association from enforcing an emergency order that bans the use of the app and imposes penalties while the case is pending.
 Uber drivers don’t have the necessary permits to carry passengers under German law, a Frankfurt court said in the emergency ruling dated Aug.
 Department of Homeland Security’s Computer Emergency Readiness Team said in a statement on its website.
 I haven’t lost faith in the industry and I think it will emerge stronger.
 Among the eight pending inversions is Burger King Worldwide Inc’s planned merger with Tim Hortons Inc, which would put the combined company’s headquarters in Canada.
 companies that invert through a merger are still treated as domestic for tax purposes if the former US.
 It also would restrict the use of a technique known as skinnying down, in which companies make special dividends to reduce their size before a merger to meet the current law’s requirements.
 companies would be less able to seek out so-called old and cold foreign companies with cash and other passive assets as merger partners to meet the rules.
 They also agreed to increase the fee Fyffes would receive if the merger is scrapped.
 The moves underscore Yang’s re-emergence after he stepped back from Internet pioneer Yahoo in 2012.
 Changes to the executive team come after Publicis’s planned $35 billion merger with peer Omnicom Group Plc was abandoned in May when Levy and Omnicom CEO John Wren clashed over how to run the combined entity.
 “They’ve got to reinstate their story to the investment community and to their own staff and clients” Publicis’s planned merger with Omnicom, which would have created the world’s largest advertising company, was seen as Levy’s legacy to the company.
 Disputes over key management roles as well as tax and regulatory hurdles caused the merger to collapse almost a year after it was toasted with champagne on the Champs Elysees.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- When one of Orange SA’s mobile phone towers in Iraq runs out of fuel, workers have no more than 24 hours to get there before the emergency battery runs out.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Following the departure of 22 partners in London, Frankfurt and Hong Kong last week for Akin Gump Strauss Hauer & Feld LLP, Bingham McCutchen LLP may be heading for a merger with Morgan Lewis & Bockius LLP.
 For some, the merger might mean a homecoming of sorts.
 15 announced that it had hired Peter Lyons, a mergers-and-acquisitions partner whose entire career had been, until last week, with Shearman & Sterling LLP.
 From Jones Day representing Walldorf, Germany-based SAP are partners Daniel Mitz and Jonn Beeson, both mergers and acquisitions, and Steve Gillette, private equity.
 According to a statement from the firm, McMahon has more than 20 years of experience counseling domestic and international clients on issues related to mergers and acquisitions, financings and joint ventures, securities disclosure and compliance, and corporate governance.
 “In Iraq they’ve already shifted tactics, for example, by moving in smaller groups to avoid attack, and they will probably also do so in Syria” Workers Evacuate Brent, a benchmark used to price more than half the world’s oil, surged to a nine-month high in June after the militants emerged from Syria, where they had seized land and oil fields, to capture large parts of northern Iraq.
 Outside of work, Catz has raised money for immigration reform and co-teaches a mergers and acquisitions course at Stanford University’s Graduate School of Business with Ron Kasznik, a management professor.
 They and the five others gained control of public shell companies with available shares and merged them with new, private entities, according to prosecutors.
 company had a bigger market capitalization before the businesses announced they were in merger talks.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- AOL Inc, once on the verge of becoming an Internet relic, has reinvented itself as a competitor in the digital-advertising industry and a potential merger target for Yahoo! Inc.
 Now an activist shareholder, Starboard Value LP, is pushing Yahoo to pursue that merger, even if it means AOL is put in charge of the combined company.
 The AOL that Armstrong inherited in the Time Warner spinoff was a shadow of the company whose $124 billion combination triggered record losses, becoming a business-school case study in mergers gone bad.
 Standard General, RadioShack’s largest investor, emerged as a potential savior for the retailer in August, when Bloomberg News reported that the hedge fund was in financing talks.
 stocks fell, with the Standard & Poor’s Index sinking a third day, as health-care shares slid amid a government crackdown on tax-saving mergers and as the Middle East conflict escalated.
 Both seek to capitalize by betting on companies in transition, dealing with management changes or mergers.
 The SEC in 2012 obtained an emergency court order to freeze the assets of Waldyr Da Silva Prado Neto, the Wells Fargo employee, claiming he made illicit trades ahead of 3G Capital Partners Ltd’s 2010 purchase of Burger King.
 Inditex said in March that it planned to open as many as 500 new stores this year and merge up to 100 small stores into neighboring ones.
 The FAA has ordered reviews of emergency procedures and facility security.
 The county also is investing more than $830 million, including support from the Federal Emergency Management Agency, to repair a wastewater plant damaged by Hurricane Sandy.
 Electrolux and Quirky Inc, a New York-based startup specializing in crowd-sourced product development, emerged as potential purchasers for the GE unit last month, when Bloomberg News reported that talks were under way with GE.
 “There’s a younger generation of chefs that could go past some of the more-established chefs” She didn’t name names but went on to praise McHale, a chef who emerged from a group of friends called the Young Turks to open Clove Club.
 “The market just wasn’t looking at it asever being a potential competitor again” Cusick reiterated his overweight rating on T-Mobile sharesin August 2013 following the May 1 completion of a mergerbetween the Deutsche Telekom AG subsidiary and MetroPCSCommunications Inc.
 “We have been pleased by the support for the de-merger and the level of interest investors have shown in the new company,” Chairman Jacques Nasser wrote in a letter to investors.
 The Jones Day deal team representing Eastman was led by partners William Rowland and Sterling Spainhour, mergers and acquisitions, and also included partners Bill Zawrotny and Bryan Davis, mergers and acquisitions; Mark Hanson, capital markets; Bob Graves, banking and finance; David Wales and Alexandre Verheyden, antitrust; and Rory Lyons and Travis DeHaven, employee benefits and executive compensation.
 are mired in a dispute over a confidentiality agreement that is keeping them from starting formal merger talks, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “Based on what’s emerged until now, it seems likely that the deal won’t go through as it stands today,” Robert Andre Jensen, an analyst at Sparebank 1 Markets AS, said by phone.
 UniCredit and Santander plan to merge their asset-management divisions and will each keep one third of the new entity, Ghizzoni told reporters in Milan today.
 The company, to be named Pioneer and based in London, may later merge with an asset manager in Asia or the US, said one of the people, adding that UniCredit will receive stock and some cash as part of the transaction.
 Murdoch and other Fox senior executives ruled out any large merger or acquisition plans in the wake of the bid collapse.
 “These noises emerge repeatedly because: on one hand, they are not seeing the New Normal in China’s economy, and on the other hand, they are showing distrust in China’s reforms” Before the latest action, the central bank had made two targeted reductions in reserve ratios after instructions from the State Council, China’s cabinet.
 This is reality, not rhetoric,” Cochrane said about the emergency provisions by the Scotland-based banks.
 Last month, Lanxess said it will merge four divisions to reduce costs and accelerate decision making, cutting the number of business units to 10 from 14.
 Alibaba, whose rise has mirrored China’s economic emergence, became one of the most valuable companies traded in the US.
 Drugmakers with pending cross-border mergers tumbled yesterday after the US.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- BNSF Railway Co, the largest unit at Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, should improve fire-and-disaster preparedness as it ships more oil through a century-old tunnel in Seattle, emergency officials said.
 In an eight-page report released yesterday, Seattle’s Fire Department and Office of Emergency Management called on the railroad to install communications, ventilation and fire-and-vapor suppression systems in the King Street Tunnel that runs underneath downtown.
 The railroad is also providing hazmat training to first responders and working with emergency officials to have a response plan should there be an incident in the tunnel.
 “We want to be good partners with the Fire Department and Office of Emergency Management” The railroad has offered to have a dedicated firefighting foam trailer staged near the tunnel and is also in discussions to improve communications there, Wallace said in a follow-up e-mail yesterday.
 Department of Transportation issued an order for railroads to notify state emergency management agencies when they haul Bakken crude through communities.
 merger reviews may undermine confidence in the regulatory process, the UK’s top antitrust regulator said, citing the possible “adverse implications” of political involvement in approving transactions.
 “Reintroducing political involvement in the assessment of mergers may encourage a belief that decisions on mergers are open to influence by interested parties,” Chisholm said today in a speech at the Fordham Competition Law Institute Annual Conference in New York.
 Pfizer’s attempted takeover of AstraZeneca and General Electric Co’s proposed acquisition this year of Alstom SA’s power business spurred debate about widening public-interest tests in merger control.
 The CMA, which was formed earlier this year, uses an economics-based competition assessment of mergers, Chisholm said.
 In the case of Pfizer and AstraZeneca, he said it was wrong to assume that the proposed merger’s implications for development and scientific research wouldn’t be considered in an economics-based competition assessment.
 The competition commission, which describes the talks on its website as a possible merger, is examining the proposals, spokesman Mava Scott said by phone yesterday.
 He said it seemed unfair to exclude injured cleanup workers from automatic compensation “because they weren’t formally diagnosed and didn’t have all the right tests at the right time” Kevin Hodges, another BP lawyer, told Barbier it was implausible to think thousands of injured workers would wait more than two years to see a doctor for painful exposure symptoms, many of which would require treatment at an emergency room.
 787 Dreamliner at London’s Heathrow Airport last year to faulty wiring in the plane’s emergency locator transmitter.
 Delivered Requests Allergan directors were prepared to testify about the importance for shareholders to consider the Valeant business model issues in advance of a special meeting “as roughly 60 percent of the proposed merger” is in the form of Valeant stock, according to the letter.
 Chicago-based Getco agreed to the merger at a time when dwindling equity volume was pressuring its own business, prompting a 90 percent drop in 2012 net income.
 Since the companies completed the merger in mid-2013, KCG’s stock price has dropped 38 percent, lagging behind the S&P 500’s 26 percent rally.
 The merged firm has failed to win the backing of most Wall Street analysts, with five of the eight who cover the company rating the stock as a hold.
 “Positively, the lower staff size should result in less compensation expense going forward” When Getco and Knight Capital closed their merger on July 1, the firms’ joint headcount was about 1,600 people, Coleman said.
 “It’s a significant headcount reduction over two years,” he said, adding that the firm has hired about 170 staff since the merger.
 A bill submitted in the House by Representative Sander Levin, a Michigan Democrat, would deny the tax benefit ofinversions after May 8 to companies that merge with a foreigncompany, unless the foreign company’s shareholders end up withmore than 50 percent of the combined company.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- A computer systems engineer at the Silicon Valley law firm Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati was charged with trading on inside information about potential mergers and acquisitions he learned on the job.
 Policy makers have cut the benchmark repurchase rate three times since May after more than doubling it to 10 percent at an emergency increase in January to stem a slide in the lira.
 “Referendums are difficult for polling companies, but I’m increasingly of the view that it will be a tight win by No” Emergency Visits That may offer reassurance to Prime Minister David Cameron and fellow UK.
 party leaders after they made emergency trips to Scotland yesterday to urge Scots to recoil from seeking independence in the Sept.
 “The Red Cross in Manila was absolutely overflowing” after Typhoon Haiyan struck the country, said Andrew McCalla, Direct Relief’s director of international programs and emergency response, in a telephone interview.
 It wasn’t like this in other emergencies” Border Restrictions The difference in response may be because Ebola is perceived as a public-health issue, which isn’t as riveting as a natural disaster, Tighe said by telephone.
 The United Nations this week announced the creation of a special emergency mission to respond to the crisis, saying the effort needs to increase greatly.
 The Bankruptcy Code provides that the cost of goods supplied within 20 days before bankruptcy has the status of a debt incurred during bankruptcy and therefore must be paid in full if the company is to emerge from Chapter 11.
 The proposed plan would have bondholders exchange their $14 million in existing debt for $75 million in new bonds, unless a buyer emerges who is willing to pay cash of at least $6 million plus specified costs.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Ronald Hermance, Hudson City Bancorp’s chairman and chief executive officer who led the lender in its planned $37 billion merger with M&T Bank Corp, has died.
 “He was a mentor to so many people both within and outside of the bank” Hudson City agreed to merge with Buffalo, New York-based M&T in 2012, a deal that has been held up by regulatory reviews for two years.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Sulzer AG, the Swiss pumpmaker, is considering expanding its energy industry equipment business through a potential merger with Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 A merger would combine US-based Dresser-Rand’s compressors and turbines with Sulzer’s industrial pumps to serve oil and gas customers, creating a company with $65 billion in sales.
 Blaise Derrico, a spokesman for Dresser-Rand, declined to comment on merger and acquisition matters.
 Sulzer’s statement was in response to a report by Swiss newspaper Handelszeitung yesterday, which said the two companies could announce a merger as soon as next month.
 That clashes with Marchionne’s goal of having Ferrari bolster a shift by the group into upscale cars as part of Fiat’s merger with US.
 He wasn’t appointed to the new board of the merged entity, Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV.
 companies seeking foreign mergers to circumvent taxes “unpatriotic” and Treasury Department officials said they are considering options to crack down on such transactions.
 Thecompany, which rejected a merger proposal from Carillion Plc (CLLN) inAugust, has struggled since the global recession, with a lack ofbuilding work in the UK.
 have said they will merge before the end of the year in a deal valued at about 25 trillion won.
 won the reversal of a nationwide ban of the company’s ride-hailing app after judges said a group of taxi dispatchers improperly used emergency procedures to obtain the initial court order.
 “But after reviewing the arguments in this emergency case we have to reverse the ruling since this isn’t an urgent case.
 Only for that reason we lift the ban” Uber drivers don’t have the necessary permits to carry passengers under German law, the Frankfurt court said in its emergency ruling dated Aug.
 The ball is in the Belgian company’s court to move forward with the long-speculated merger -- unless SABMiller can persuade Heineken’s family to sell.
 That’s “helping keep a cap on Treasuries” While inflation hasn’t yet emerged as a problem, investors need to be more vigilant of the possibility the Fed is getting it all wrong, according to John Brynjolfsson, the chief investment officer at Irvine, California-based hedge fund Armored Wolf LLC, which manages $670 million.
 The SEC inquiry emerged last week.
 Asia Opportunity Messages left with Sneh Seetal, a spokeswoman with Suncor Energy Inc, which merged with Petro-Canada in 2009, weren’t immediately returned.
 “When new technologies emerge in consumer markets they inevitably lead to new questions, including questions about privacy,” Jepsen said.
 Tamayo said Metro, 40, stole data about mergers and acquisitions or tender offers from computers at Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP in New York.
 AbbVie is still committed to completing the $55 billion merger, the people said.
 in an inversion merger, has said the deal will proceed despite the restrictions.
 But if it’s in line with the market, obviously I’d invest because management and the opportunities that could emerge in Mexico are very interesting” Cementos Fortaleza CEO Antonio Taracena said on the Sept.
 The purchase of Central Hispano was the first major bank merger after the creation of the euro.
 unit helped set the pace for earnings growth at Santander, while Spain emerged from a recession.
 “Walgreen has been conservative in the buyback area, but it’s impossible to know which direction the board will go post-Jana, post-merger” Calls betting on a 10 percent rally in Walgreen cost 1 point more than puts betting on a decline of that size on Sept.
 Philips will merge its health-care and consumer goods assets into one operation called HealthTech with 15 billion euros ($19 billion) in sales, the Amsterdam-based company said today in a statement.
 Under Rousseffand Lula, 36 million Brazilians emerged from extreme poverty,according to her campaign.
 “When other choices start appearing, there’s not the same urgency” The building’s West 57th Street neighborhood, fringing Central Park, has emerged as a billionaires district, where developers are racing to build skyscrapers of record-setting heights aimed at buyers seeking an investment haven.
 from having to continue paying for smooth display of “House of Cards” and “Orange Is the New Black” Regulators weighing the merger asked Comcast about its February agreement with Netflix that requires it to pay for fast delivery over the cable provider’s service.
 “I don’t think there’s any question about it -- the big winner in the Comcast merger is Netflix,” Moffett said.
 They’ve also pushed fair terms so rival programming such as the Tennis Channel can get onto Comcast systems that would pipe video into 29 million homes post-merger.
 Kim Hart, an FCC spokeswoman, and Emily Pierce, a spokeswoman for the Justice Department also reviewing the merger, declined to comment.
 Conditions set with the merger would affect 355 percent or more of the US.
 Faster Speeds Since agreeing to pay Comcast for interconnection, Netflix also paid Time Warner Cable, AT&T and Verizon, the company said in its filing asking the FCC to block the merger.
 The group, formed by the merger in 2004 of Air France and Dutch carrier KLM, is Europe’s largest airline by revenue-passenger kilometers.
 In 2001, Vivendi reached a deal to merge Telepiu with News Corp’s pay-TV division Stream SpA.
 carrier, abandoned a plan to merge with T-Mobile.
 tourists to India will be issued a visa on arrival andidentification documents for non-resident Indians will be mergedinto a single category, Modi said at an event at Madison SquareGarden in New York city yesterday.
 A CF spokesman didn’t immediately return calls seeking further comment on the merger talks.
 Both companies said yesterday they’re discussing a “merger of equals” and that there’s no guarantee of a deal.
 The merger may lead to more capital being returned to investors via higher dividends and stock buybacks, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the details haven’t been made public.
 The Brazilian company acquired Africatel this year as one of the steps in its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, the entity that will be created from Fiat’s merger with US.
 The merger is set to be finalized next month, with shares to start trading on the New York Stock Exchange on Oct.
 corporate balance sheets is held abroad, and companies are directing more money toward mergers and acquisitions or betting on overseas markets, said Zentner.
 Brown backs a November ballot initiative intended to cushion against revenue swings by directing taxes on capital gains to a rainy-day fund that could be tapped only during fiscal emergencies.
 Investors have been curious about the company’s ability to expand through mergers and acquisitions beyond China, according to two of them who attended the roadshow earlier this week at the Waldorf Astoria in New York.
 sold 3201 million shares for $68 each,according to a statement, after offering them for $66 to $68The e-commerce company, started in 1999 with $60,000 cobbledtogether by Jack Ma, has cemented its status as a symbol ofChina’s economic emergence.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Investors are wagering that India’s biggest bank and its largest mortgage lender will pursue a megamerger that would deliver returns unmatched by any peer worldwide.
 A merger “seems inevitable,” according to research firm Ambit Capital Pvt, after India issued new rules that will allow Housing Development to maintain a lucrative exemption from reserve requirements.
 A merger would allow HDFC Bank to offer financial services to 48 million home-loan customers gained from the combination, while deposits at its 3,500 branches could help fund rising demand for mortgages.
 HDFC Comments HDFC Bank Deputy Managing Director Paresh Sukthankar said in July that the bank would reassess a merger in light of the new rules.
 A merger with HDFC Bank under the old rules would have created a larger bank that was subject to the regulation, which would have eroded Housing Development’s profitability “significantly,” Morgan Stanley said in a report last month.
 In a merger, the two Mumbai-based companies could feed off each other’s customers and the combined balance sheet would more easily meet rising demand for credit, said Pritesh Bumb, a Mumbai-based analyst at Prabhudas Lilladher Pvt.
 A merger would create India’s second-largest bank by assets, behind State Bank of India.
 While that reflects both their earnings and broader investor appetite for Indian shares, speculation about a merger has also driven the stocks higher, Adrian Lim, a fund manager in Singapore at Aberdeen Asset Management Asia Ltd, said by phone.
 Existing Links For HDFC Bank, the merger probably would help it attract deposits from Housing Development’s mortgage clients, Morgan Stanley said.
 That’s good news for HDFC Bank, which would still have to meet that obligation in the event of a merger, said Agarwalla, the analyst at Phillip Capital.
 A merger also would wipe at least 263 billion rupees from the companies’ combined market value, Agarwal said.
 According to Bumb at Prabhudas Lilladher, a merger would bring greater borrowing flexibility, higher capital and more scope for loan growth.
 announcing plans to merge with smaller foreign businesses and take a non-US.
 Turkey’s two-year government notes have fallen198 basis points since Central Bank Governor Erdem Basci’semergency rate rise on Jan.
 Vestager will also be responsible for policing illegal state subsidies and reviewing mergers.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, hired James Conniff and John Bresnahan as the firm seeks to expand its dealmaking presence in the energy industry.
 Ferrari, based in Maranello, Italy, is 90 percent-owned by Fiat and a key component of Marchionne’s plans to expand in luxury cars following the merger to create Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV.
 Marchionne will take the top job at the unit the same day that shares of the merged entity FCA are set to start trading in New York.
 The company said it had opened an emergency activation center in Irwindale, California, that will remain open for the next few days to coordinate communications on power failures, monitor weather patterns and respond to trouble spots.
 More than 350,000 people in the northeastern states, where the violence is fiercest, fled their homes in the first seven months this year, according to the National Emergency Management Agency.
 may be thedeciding factor in whether two of its discount rivals can merge.
 That deal would merge the market’s No.
 The DreamWorks Animationboard held an emergency meeting last week to weigh the $34billion bid, the publication said.
 The Semiconductor Industry Development Fund was set up in December last year to help finance China’s chip industry growth and assist with mergers and acquisitions.
 “We would expect the stock to rally today given recent pressure” New Leadership As Walgreen completes its merger with the Bern, Switzerland-based Alliance Boots, about half of the top executive roles are being filled by Alliance Boot managers.
 “And it would be a win for shareholders if they went out and sold themselves” Starboard is proposing that AOL, which has reinvented itself as a competitor in the digital-advertising industry, merge with Yahoo to save as much as $1 billion of expenses.
 Riley’s Sinha says there’s a way for Yahoo to both merge with AOL and sell its Alibaba stake without the tax penalty: SoftBank could first buy AOL, then exchange it with Yahoo for the Alibaba shares.
 “That’s not to say we would exclude an acquisition” Switzerland’s wealth management industry is braced for more mergers and acquisitions after concerns over the viability of Swiss offshore units already prompted foreign lenders such as Bank of America Corp, Morgan Stanley and Lloyds Banking Group Plc to sell their Swiss operations.
 777’s voice recorder revealed no warning tones in the cockpit, and no emergency was declared by the experienced crew before the flight “ended abruptly,” today’s report said.
 Auxilium hasn’t agreed to talks yet, though said it would review the proposal, and also implement the shareholder rights plan and declare a dividend, saying it needed “sufficient time to make informed judgments” Auxilium also plans to go ahead with a merger with biotechnology firm QLT Inc, in a $345 million stock deal that would move its tax address to Canada.
 A deal with Endo presents an opportunity for Auxilium shareholders to profit more quickly than to wait to see how the QLT merger works out, said Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 “It’s not going to be a sudden turnaround as soon as we get elected, but we need to invest in serious long-term infrastructure that’s going to grow our economy” Trudeau, the son of former Prime Minister Pierre Trudeau, has emerged as the most serious challenger to the nine-year reign of Conservative Prime Minister Stephen Harper.
 and Lafarge SA, which are selling units to get approval for their $40 billion cement merger, nominated two managers that could head the divested plants in a move that may entice private-equity bidders.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- The UK’s takeover regulator has proposed giving itself powers to enforce commitments by buyers to retain jobs or factories in a merger.
 Policy makers have cut the benchmark repurchase rate three times since May after more than doubling it to 10 percent in an emergency increase in January to stem a slide in the lira.
 “In Iraq they’ve already shifted tactics, for example, by moving in smaller groups to avoid attack, and they will probably also do so in Syria” Southern Exports Brent, a benchmark used to price more than half the world’s oil, surged to a nine-month high in June after the militants emerged from Syria, where they had seized land and oil fields, to capture large parts of northern Iraq.
 Chen said today that he plans to double software revenue next year, driven by new features like BlackBerry Blend, which helps consumers merge their work and personal information -- like calendars and e-mail -- on their devices.
 Katz focuses on broker-dealerregulation and advises on asset management, capital markets,mergers and acquisitions and cross-border arrangements andactivities, among other matters.
 The Sidley Austin partners include Brian Fahrney and Seth Katz, corporate; Paul Adams and Christopher Barbuto, corporate-mergers and acquisitions; Suresh Advani, tax; Ram Burshtine,global finance; Laura Leonard, environmental law; Elizabeth McCloy, real estate; and Benjamin Rosemergy, employee benefits.
 The company will do so through a merger with Sichuan Gaojin Foods, a pork and meat processor, which is already publicly traded in Shenzhen.
 Munger pushed back against the assertion that the merger was motivated by tax savings.
 “If inflation expectations remain at an elevated level and the threat of inflation exceeding the target in the medium-term emerge, the Bank of Russia may continue raising the key rate,” it said in the statement.
 Aabar, the Malaysian bank’s second-largest shareholder with a 212 percent stake, is seeking to protect the value of its investment as the lender negotiates a three-way, $27 billion merger with CIMB Group Holdings Bhd.
 EPF’s Vote CIMB, RHB and Malaysia Building Society in July announced plans for a three-way merger that would create the country’s largest banking group by assets.
 The companies, which have a combined market value of about $27 billion, entered into a 90-day exclusive agreement to negotiate and finalize the price and structure of the merger, according to a July 10 joint statement from the lenders.
 26, saying it should be given a waiver allowing the fund to vote on the proposed merger, Malaysian newspaper The Star reported Sept.
 CIMB and RHB are discussing making the merger proposal conditional on EPF being allowed to vote, three people familiar with the talks said.
 The exclusivity period for the merger talks expires Oct.
 Morgan Stanley ranked second in advising on mergers involving a Chinese company this year while Bank of America was 12th, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 If a huge corporate fraud emerged today, she said, there would be no need for a new version of the Enron Task Force.
 coal market in decades is driving the Russian steelmaker and other big mine owners for the exit, and a new class of buyers has emerged.
 market for coal mergers and acquisitions is “very active,” said Ted O’Brien, CEO of Doyle Trading Consultants LLC in New York.
 Morgan Stanley upgraded the shares to overweight from equal weight and added the stock to its best ideas list, citing an expected 12 percent compound annual earnings growth rate from 2014 to 2017, as well as savings after its all-share merger with TUI AG.
 “It’s not the most difficult merger that we have dealt with” The proposed cash-and-stock acquisition would be the biggest by Facebook, the world’s largest social network, and gives WhatsApp roughly the same valuation as Gap Inc.
 The EU merger investigation won’t handle privacy concerns, Almunia said.
 While privacy “is a very important issue,” it is not dealt with by antitrust or merger rules in the EU, he said.
 The lockmaker, formed in a 1994 merger of Sweden’s Assa and Finland’s Abloy, is betting the digital push will boost business at a time of subdued overall growth.
 The British business has been driving the bank’s return to earnings growth as Santander’s home market emerges from an economic slump.
 “This is certainly a political statement” Schumer’s plan, which faces high hurdles in a deadlocked Congress, may become part of Democrats’ attempts to penalize companies that cut their tax bills with cross-border mergers and get added to their political strategy to blame Republicans.
 “Putin overplayed his hand and now needs a permanent state of emergency in Ukraine to ensure support of the Russian public and establishment,” said Joerg Forbrig, senior program officer for central and eastern Europe at the Berlin bureau of the German Marshall Fund of the US.
 He said one emergency services worker was killed and three soldiers were wounded.
 Internet company Yandex NV slid 27 percent ona report that the government may seek ways to take the countryoff the global Internet in an emergency.
 Yandex Declining Search engine provider Yandex fell after Vedomosti reportedthe government will meet Internet companies next week to discussinternet security, citing unidentified officials and excutivesThe government is seeking ways to switch the country off theglobal Internet in cases of emergency, the paper reported.
 This year, disagreements between Publicis CEOMaurice Levy and Omnicom Group Inc’s John Wren on how to sharethe top job scuttled the proposed $35 billion merger of theiradvertising companies.
 “We were not totally in agreement, to put it mildly, onhow to share the responsibility,” Levy said in May as theyended their merger plans.
 It’s absolutely important that the number of jobs and employers in Italy are increasing” Fiat’s merger with its US.
 ‘Solve Properly’ The International Monetary Fund, in its annual assessment of the Austrian economy released today, warned Volksbanken may need more capital because of the ECB test and urged “speedy asset disposal, including of its Romanian subsidiary” and mergers of the Austrian local cooperative banks.
 Marine Harvest, which produced almost a quarter of the world’s salmon in the second quarter and is already Chile’s largest salmon exporter, may participate in new deals as it seeks to raise production through mergers and acquisitions both in Norway and Chile, he said.
 Alrosa said in an e-mailed statement today it plans to merge three cutting units into one and will consider seeking international jewelry companies as partners.
 “Increasingly there’s a sense ofdesperation at the criminal bar” As a result, barristers are consolidating their officesthrough defections and mergers.
 Grossman also hasexperience advising clients on IP strategies in connection withtransactions such as mergers and joint ventures, the firm saidin a statement.
 He said a provision shieldingHewlett-Packard managers from blame for the $88 billionwritedown in 2012 connected to the merger is “staggering in itsbreadth” The lawyers said the accord, which would require corporategovernance reforms at Hewlett-Packard and targets lawsuits atex-Autonomy executives, would provide peace of mind for thecompany.
 The Maranello-based company, which is 90 percent-owned by Fiat, is a key component of Marchionne’s plans to expand in luxury cars following the merger with US.
 The merger with Chrysler “will open up a new and different phase which I feel should be spearheaded by the CEO of the group” ‘Unacceptable’ Performance Montezemolo wanted to cap sales at about 7,000 cars a year to preserve Ferrari’s exclusive allure, and Marchionne said today that any expansion would be carefully evaluated.
 “These are clear signs of a very serious investigation,” said Gene Kimmelman, president of the policy group Public Knowledge that opposes the merger, and former chief counsel for competition policy at the Justice Department’s antitrust division.
 The Justice Department, which is jointly investigating the acquisition with the Federal Communications Commission, is seeking information about Comcast’s ability after the merger to gain leverage in negotiating program distribution deals, according to one person.
 ‘Market Picture’ “They’re trying to understand what effect the proposed merger of these two companies will have on the market,” said Amanda Wait, an antitrust attorney at Hunton & Williams LLP in Washington, who isn’t involved in the deal.
 Regulators can also set conditions on the merger or approve it without changes.
 Much of it has helped finance the $21 trillion of mergers and acquisitions announced by companies this year, the most since $34 trillion of deals in 2007, Bloomberg data show.
 Health-care stocks in the S&P 500 lost 08 percent for the week amid a government crackdown on tax-driven mergers.
 Barclays is pursuing growth in emerging markets such as the Middle East and Africa as accelerating economies revive investor demand for share sales and mergers and acquisitions.
 Since then, Detroit Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr has cut deals with city unions, retired workers and some bondholders to pay them less than they are owed.
 “There is no provision in the agreement between the city and Syncora that is contingent upon approval of a third party,” Bill Nowling, a spokesman for the emergency manager, said yesterday in an e-mail.
 government put out rules designed at blocking cross-border, tax-reducing deals that have helped drive a record period of industry mergers and rewarded investors.
 An Allergan deal would end Salix’s planned merger with Cosmo, according to the Wall Street Journal.
 “Some people are calling these companies corporate deserters” Valeant, with ValueAct’s backing, helped kick off the current inversion trend in its 2010 merger with Canada-based Biovail Corp.
 As Stewart prepared to emerge from five months in prison, Ubben shed his stake.
 “We continue to believe that the Fyffes/Chiquita combination is highly attractive and would require a bid of in excess of $16 from Cutrale-Safra to match the economics of the merger,” David Holohan, an analyst at Merrion Capital in Dublin, who has a buy rating on the stock, said today.
 Family Dollar said it’s sticking with the Dollar Tree deal because there’s “material risk” that a merger with Dollar General would fail.
 For those merger-arbitrage traders who can stomach the risk, MKM Partners LLC’s Keith Moore says the bidding war has a chance of reaching $84 a share.
 Pessina, 73, built Bern, Switzerland-based Alliance Boots GmbH through more than three decades of mergers before selling it to Walgreen last month.
 Investors say Pessina’s growing influence, with Alliance Boots lieutenants filling four of the merged company’s top nine positions, will push Walgreen from its neighborhood pharmacy role to the more stylish retail vision of Boots Alliance, which controls about 40 percent of the high-margin market for beauty products in the UK.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Greece may merge its two largest water utilities, Athens Water Supply & Sewage Co.
 Thessaloniki Water said in a bourse filing today that the company has no information about a potential cooperation or merger with Athens Water other than the news reports.
 At about 5:45 am, emergency personnel were notified of a fire at the control center, according to the complaint charging Howard.
 Takeovers in the cement industry have picked up this year, led by the $40 billion merger between Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd.
 She is also a lecturer in accounting at Stanford University’s Graduate School of Business, where she co-teaches a course on mergers and acquisitions.
 “Usually, one firm buys another and they merge or something like that -- but in this particular case Yahoo was acting a little bit more like a partner or a venture capital firm” Jay Ritter, a professor of finance at the University of Florida, expects shares of the Web portal to follow Alibaba’s while Yahoo owns the stake in the Chinese company.
 Still, rising markets and an increased number of mergers have boosted its three other units, which all had revenue increases in the first six months.
 JDS Uniphase was created in 1999 through the $705 billion merger of two companies, Uniphase Corp.
 “Sony is clearly beefing up content offerings for its growth plans for its Entertainment Network division, recently merged with its gaming unit,” Amir Anvarzadeh, a manager of Japanese equity sales at BGC Partners Inc.
 “The emergence of a strong and capable India will alter the Asian strategic framework in a manner that is conducive both for India and US.
 (700), which is also competingwith Alibaba, rose 14 percent to $12470 at the midday break inHong Kong, set for the highest close in more than a weekAlibaba’s Ma emerged as the richest person in China last month,overtaking Tencent Chairman Ma Huateng and Baidu’s Li.
 It also increased the amount of government bonds that banks can hold as High Quality Liquid Assets, which can be used to borrow emergency funds.
 “There isno influence on clubs” The English Premier League banned third-party financing in2008 after it emerged West Ham ceded total control of forwardCarlos Tevez to investors.
 The companies have been engaged in a price fight since an effort to merge them collapsed last month.
 Rice’s Suspension Running back Ray Rice, 27, was released by the Baltimore Ravens and suspended indefinitely by the NFL after video emerged of him knocking out his fiancee in February with a punch inside a hotel casino elevator in Atlantic City, New Jersey.
 Final Resting Place A search spanning 850 square kilometers in an area where sounds similar to those of black box emergency beacons were heard by an Australian search vessel in early April turned up no evidence of aircraft debris.
 Without a buy-in from those creditors, the company would have trouble securing enough allies to quickly emerge from a bankruptcy.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Lafarge SA, in the midst of a $40 billion merger with Swiss cementmaker Holcim Ltd, plans to sell a cement plant in Russia to Buzzi Unicem SpA for 104 million euros ($134 million) to help lower debt.
 It reminded me of going to see the movie “Zulu” as a child and watching as thousands of warriors emerged from the grassland.
 In 2010, they merged the businesses and Kauffman put Carroll in charge of RK Motors, with the freedom and funding to develop it into the best shop in the business.
 They described him getting so excited about mergers and derivatives that they’d have to pull him away from conversations with executives to keep him on schedule.
 Vestager will also be responsible for policing illegal state subsidies and reviewing mergers.
 A proposed merger between Dresser-Rand and Sulzer would have combined the US.
 Sulzer has a market capitalization of $43 billion -- less than 5 percent of Siemens’ $107 billion valuation -- and the Swiss company could only offer to merge with Dresser-Rand while the German rival made an all-cash offer.
 “It’s always hard for management to justify accepting a merger over a cash offer to shareholders,” said Guenther Hollfelder, an analyst at Baader Bank in Munich who recommends buying Siemens stock.
 Toappease the regulator, Telefonica Deutschland agreed to sell asmuch as 30 percent of the merged carrier’s network capacity tosmaller operator Drillisch AG.
 have emerged as global players in recent years, Africa’s most populous nation has lacked a major carrier since the demise of Nigeria Airways a decade ago.
 Expansion Target By contrast, Ethiopian Airlines emerged from decades of turmoil in its home country to establish itself as sub-Saharan Africa’s second-biggest carrier after South African Airways, building a modern fleet including Boeing Co’s latest 787 Dreamliners.
 The refiner merged units that design and build chemical plants into Sinopec Engineering Group Co.
 The trial is to continue tomorrow with testimony from Kevyn Orr, the emergency financial manager who helped shepherd the city through bankruptcy.
 15 incident, which occurred at a casino in Atlantic City, New Jersey, emerged in July.
 If they are all driving cars, gridlock could block the path of food, water and emergency medical treatment in cities, said PwC.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- The gold industry, recovering from the worst slump in prices in 30 years, needs more mergers to help improve investor returns and eliminate unprofitable mines, Fidelity Investments said.
 and Newmont Mining Corp, the two largest producers by sales, also discussed a merger this year before breaking off talks in April.
 With the help of its main offices in London and Paris, the South African team caters to clients across the continent offering services including corporate finance, mergers and acquisitions advisory and capital raising in both debt and equity markets.
 The PlayStation 4 game console has emerged as the leader in the newest generation of such devices.
 Fiat plans to combine with Chrysler later this year in areorganization that will shift the corporate headquarters toLondon and move the main stock listing to New York, with themerged company focusing on higher-end cars.
 “The payments industry, of which PayPal is an important part, must be consolidated -- either through acquisitions made by PayPal or a merger between PayPal and another strong player in the industry” Icahn himself didn’t respond to requests for comment.
 United Biscuits, based in Hayes, England, was created in 1948 from the merger of two Scottish companies, McVitie & Price and MacFarlane Lang.
 Gaming remains a bright spot for Sony, which yesterday widened its full-year loss forecast because of tepid smartphone sales, as it begins to merge online services offering movies, TV shows and software titles and prepares to start console sales in China.
 A merger of Vodafone and Liberty would be the next logical step, according to Bank of America Corp.
 While European Union regulators are encouraging companies to create networks that span the continent, they haven’t been as accepting of bids that merge networks within countries, leaving acquirers such as Vodafone with fewer places to go, Marsch said.
 United still has separate collective bargaining units for its two camps of flight attendants, those who originally worked for United and those who worked for Continental Airlines before the merger.
 United, based in Chicago, has generally underperformed its US-based airline rivals since completing its merger with Continental Airlines in 2010.
 At this point, theyhave a very rare and meaningful distinction” Chief Executive Officer Doug Parker and his top lieutenantsinitially were skeptical of the A321T, the brainchild of formerCEO Tom Horton and Virasb Vahidi, his chief marketing officerFort Worth, Texas-based American had the plan in the works whenParker moved over from running US Airways as the companiesmerged in December.
 “They certainly are not ignoring it” For American, a first-class cabin can act as a lure toregain corporate contracts lost during the carrier’s two-yearbankruptcy and merger negotiations.
 While the pricing study was limited to one area, it adds to concerns that a merger of Family Dollar and Dollar General would encounter a long regulatory review.
 “Therefore, if this merger is allowed to proceed, in those areas, competition will be reduced or eliminated and consumers will pay higher prices” Times may have changed since then, though.
 Back then, AAA rated Denmark emerged as an investor haven from the bond market turmoil raging further south.
 Debevoise will continue to focus on fund formation,mergers, insurance, anti-corruption and regulatory matters andinternational arbitration, Ostrognai said.
 Iranian Oil Minister Bijan Zanganeh said there’s no need for an emergency meeting, according to comments cited by state-run news agency Mehr yesterday.
 Florida Attorney General Pam Bondi is part of a group of states reviewing the AT&T-DirecTV merger, according to her office.
 “We look forward to discussions with these state attorneys general on the significant consumer benefits created by this merger,” said Michael Balmoris, a spokesman for Dallas-based AT&T.
 Conditions for an emergency ruling that would increase the power rates “weren’t met,” the country’s highest administrative court, the Conseil d’Etat, said in a decision published today on its website.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Newmont Mining Corp, the second-largest gold producer, said it’s moved on from an aborted attempt this year to merge with its biggest competitor.
 When the companies first disclosed that they were in merger talks on Aug.
Lesetja Kganyago and Daniel Mmineleemerged as the frontrunners to succeed South African centralbank Governor Gill Marcus, who yesterday said she will step downfrom her post in November after one term.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA’s second-largest investor, Marco Fossati, supports a merger of the carrier’s Brazilian unit Tim Participacoes SA with Oi SA to help boost revenue in the biggest Latin American market.
 “From a industrial perspective Tim Brasil-Oi’s merger makes a lot of sense,” Fossati said yesterday in a telephone interview.
 rejected a merger with Sinosteel because its assets were “excessively poor,” the 21st Century Business Herald reported Jan.
 Since then, Emergency Manager Kevyn Orr has cut deals with city unions, retired workers and some bondholders to pay them less than they are owed.
 Both companies service casino floors, so you’ll have a network of service” Casino Mergers GCA’s offer follows a wave of mergers in the casino industry, including Gtech SpA’s agreement to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in July.
 She is also a lecturer in accounting at StanfordUniversity’s Graduate School of Business, where she co-teaches acourse on mergers and acquisitions.
 Clark told investors at a conference in September 2013 that mergers and acquisitions would be “less important on our agenda” than organic growth.
 Global brewing mergers and acquisitions have totaled $90 billion since 2008 and slowed to $55 billion last year, according to Bloomberg Intelligence.
 The ruling comes as Goodlettsville, Tennessee-based Dollar General announced today that it was taking its buyout offer directly to Family Dollar shareholders and that it could overcome antitrust concerns about the merger, which would create a discount retail chain with 20,000 locations.
 That deal would merge the discount retail market’s No.
 Pizza Merger In 1996, Telepizza held its initial public offering in Madrid and three years later, Pujals -- now a resident of the Bahamas -- sold his 30 percent stake in the company for 300 million euros as part a merger with TeleChef SA.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- TUI AG and TUI Travel Plc will reap more benefits than they expected from an all-share merger and build more hotels than previously predicted, the companies said today as their boards asked investors to bless the combination.
 “The main purpose of this merger is future-proofing the business,” Joussen said on a conference call.
 The merger will also allow TUI to add more cruise ships, it said.
 The stimulus weakened the yen and set Japan on course to emerge from deflation.
 The FAA has ordered reviews of emergency procedures andfacility security.
 Salix, which is in the middle of its own merger with a unit of Italian drugmaker Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA, is up 78 percent this year.
 A deal between Salix and Allergan would probably halt the Cosmo unit’s merger plan, the Wall Street Journal said.
 Salix’s planned merger with the Cosmo unit “would be a nice opportunity if it happens, if it doesn’t then we’re certainly unfazed” The Wall Street Journal reported earlier that Allergan and Salix are in advanced talks and that Actavis made an unsuccessful offer for Allergan.
 He plans to double software revenue next year, driven by new features like BlackBerry Blend, which helps consumers merge their work and personal information -- like calendars and e-mail -- on their devices.
 (TWC)are delaying a decision on the merger for more than a month.
 The merger, which will affect 22 million cable customersin the third-most-populous US.
 Theproposals would require a post-merger Comcast to keep jobs inthe Empire State, offer faster broadband, improve customerservice, expand in rural areas and ease enrollment standards fora program that offers cheap, high-speed Internet service to poorfamilies.
 The beer industry has been increasingly discussing deals,potentially setting off a merger wave that could spill over intosoft drinks.
 Chief Executive Officer Marissa Mayer is facing more pressure to sell the company or change how it manages cash, following a call from Starboard Value LP for Yahoo to merge with AOL Inc.
 Alternative Investment Management & Research SA, a Geneva-based investment advisory firm, sent a letter yesterday to Mayer and Masayoshi Son, Chairman of Japan’s SoftBank Corp, proposing a merger between Yahoo and SoftBank.
 Earlier in her career, Gonzalez was a partner at Morgan, Lewis & Bockius LLP, where she focused on corporate finance, mergers & acquisitions, SEC compliance and corporate governance.
 Partners Michael Stanchfield, Jonathan Nygren and Alissa Raddatz led the team at Faegre Baker, while Louis Lambert of General Mills was the lead in-house mergers and acquisitions counsel on the deal.
 The Proskauer team was led by capital markets group co-head and partner Julie Allen and included partners Daniel Ganitsky, mergers and acquisitions, Amanda Nussbaum, tax, Andrea Rattner, employee benefits, and Daryn Grossman, intellectual property.
 Kelly’s show, “The Kelly File,” has emerged in its first year as the network’s second-most-popular program.
 Event-drivenfunds seek to profit from securities whose value is affected bycorporate actions such as mergers and acquisitions,reorganization.
 Therehave been $856 billion worth of mergers and acquisitionsinvolving an Asian company this year, a 6 percent increase froma year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Most insurance apps, including those from Allianz, merely provide general information, tariff calculators and emergency contacts.
 The price gap has emerged asdirectional drilling and hydraulic fracturing have almostdoubled Permian production in the past five years, overwhelmingpipeline capacity.
 Thiebaud was most recently a director at Credit Suisse’s investment banking division in Switzerland, where he focused on capital markets funding and mergers and acquisitions transactions for Swiss companies, according to an internal memo seen by Bloomberg News.
 M&A activity involving Swiss companies has more than tripled this year compared to the same period in 2013, with 1245 billion euros ($1611 billion) of deals agreed, including the 375 billion euro merger of Lafarge SA with Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim Ltd, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Samsung Heavy Industries Co, the world’s third-largest shipbuilder, plans to set up its first overseas facility as it revamps manufacturing after the biggest merger within the Samsung Group.
 The revamp comes after Samsung Heavy said this month it will merge with Samsung Engineering Co.
 Merger Benefits The 25 trillion-won merger will help combine Samsung Heavy’s offshore expertise and Samsung Engineering’s project management knowhow to minimize risks of cost overruns, Chun said.
 “The merger is a win-win for both Samsung Heavy and Samsung Engineering in the long run,” said Lee Jae Won, an analyst at Tongyang Securities Inc.
 The sale of its holding in CxG Aviva followed a decision bythe Arbitration Tribunal in Madrid that NCG had broken anagreement to sell Aviva’s products after the merger of CaixaGalicia and Caixa Nova in 2010, according to a statement todayThe deal increases Aviva’s surplus capital by about 200 millionpounds ($327 million), it said.
 Paulson, whose hedge funds invest in companies undergoing mergers, is also a passive shareholder in Dollar General.
 Yet the SEC has never clearly defined the standards for being a passive investor, leading some shareholders to take a more aggressive stance than others in discussions with management, said Scott Kimpel, a partner in the corporate finance and merger and acquisitions group at Hunton & Williams LLP who specializes in securities compliance and transactional issues.
 Levine had met with two Dollar General executives, CEO Rick Dreiling and Director Michael Calbert, a few days earlier to explore the potential for a merger.
 The SEC alleged that Perry bought the stock in order to vote in favor of a merger that would have given it a profit on an arbitrage position in Mylan, and thus could not claim that the shares were bought “in the ordinary course of business,” one of the requirements for filing on Schedule 13G.
 India this year has emerged as the world’s fastest growing smartphone market, driving Internet penetration.
 Family Dollar, meanwhile, has said that Dollar General hasn’t sufficiently dealt with antitrust concerns for a merger that would create a massive retail chain with almost 20,000 locations.
 That deal would merge the market’s No.
 The Chesapeake, Virginia-based company has said it’s ready to divest as many stores as necessary to complete a merger with Family Dollar.
 companies use mergers to get an overseas address to cut their tax bills.
 The terms were changed to avoid regulatory requirements that have would have delayed the merger.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Yara International ASA is in merger talks with CF Industries Holdings Inc.
 First Out The Reveal Linq is the first product to emerge from the program.
 “You do the work during the winter” The adjustment isn’t necessarily easy, Compton said, noting that training facilities were already strained by the large numbers of pilots shifting to different aircraft types after pre-merger United and Continental pilots were melded into a single workforce at United Continental Holdings Inc.
 As a near-full moon rises, a relief crew dressed in fire-retardant jumpsuits emerges, already sweating, from bunkhouses at the edge of the clearing.
 His office used to belong to executives of once-bankrupt electricity wholesaler Dynegy Inc, which emerged from Chapter 11 in 2012.
 While the 2011 Budget Control act mandated about $500 billion in cuts from proposed Pentagon spending over a decade, this year’s rally in arms stocks predates the emergence of the Islamic State in the US.
 Horizon Pharma holds a special meeting on its planned merger with Vidara Therapeutics.
 While few details have emerged about the Home Depot breach -- and it’s not clear that the deactivated safeguard would have stopped it -- a person familiar with the investigation says the attack did hit the stores’ registers.
 BNP also pleaded guilty in Manhattan federal court, admitting it violated the International Emergency Economic Powers Act and the Trading with the Enemy Act by processing almost $9 billion in banned transactions between 2004 and 2012.
 bonds due in 2016 and 2019, said it is has “taken the lead among bondholders” in supporting a reorganization plan that would have allowed the company to “emerge from Chapter 11 swiftly” and said it was ready last week to enter into a binding support agreement for the plan.
 “However, with more energy likely being used in the evenings, especially air conditioning, the extra demand can strain SCE’s equipment when it’s not given the opportunity to cool off” Edison opened an emergency activation center in Irwindale, California, that will remain open for the next few days to coordinate communications on power failures, monitor weather patterns and respond to trouble spots, the company said.
 Volksbanken-Verbund’s primary banks will continue to merge with each other to cut costs and improve capital market access, Liebscher said in the statement.
 (DRC) as Europe’slargest engineering company looks to scupper a competing plan bySulzer AG (SUN) to merge with the US.
 Sulzer said thisweek it is in talks with Dresser-Rand about a potential merger.
 Holcim and Lafarge are aiming to iron out possible EU concerns over the merged company’s market power before filing for approval of the deal, a step which kick starts the EU’s official review, said the two people who asked not to be named because the talks aren’t public.
 Under the EU’s merger-review process, most deals are cleared at the first hurdle.
 Chiquita Brands holds a special shareholder meeting on its plan to merge/invert with Fyffes.
 rallied on reports it may merge its TV business with AT&T Corp’s.
 shares have almost recovered from a failed attempt to merge with T-Mobile US Inc, thanks to its new chief executive officer’s aggressive iPhone promotions designed to lure subscribers.
 Floor Trading Softs and agricultural commodities were added following amerger with the London Commodity Exchange in 1996.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Yara International ASA began again hunting for a new chief as Svein Richard Brandtzaeg went back on his decision to take the job after the company unveiled talks on a merger to create the world’s largest fertilizer supplier.
 leveraged loan market since 2011 is taking place justas a flurry of mergers and acquisitions needs to get funded withnon-investment grade debt.
 to Germanchemicals company Styrolution Group GmbH to postpone mergerfinancings has continued in September with investors pulling$435 million from funds that buy the debt last week, bringingnet withdrawals for the year to $43 billion.
 Through those roles, two prior terms as chief executive and a tenure as secretary of state, the 76-year-old Democrat has emerged as the nation’s most experienced governor.
 “However, I built a relationship” Brown has enlisted Republicans to help approve emergency prison spending and an overhaul of school financing that was opposed by members of his own party.
 The dispute at Usiminas also emerges as steel sales in Brazil drop with the economy slipping into recession in the second quarter.
 Doubts Emerge Doubts over whether the offshore-rig contracts would be incompliance with existing sanctions appeared as details becameavailable last month, Lundetrae said in an interview yesterdayThe EU sanctions, which have been followed by Norway, putrestrictions on the export of technology for Arctic, deepwaterand shale-oil exploration and production in Russia.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Kvaerner ASA surged as much as 12 percent in Oslo trading after the Norwegian maker of oil platforms, which is controlled by billionaire Kjell Inge Roekke, said it may seek a merger or a takeover.
 The deal marks a return to mergers and acquisitions for Whitman after a dry spell following Hewlett-Packard’s $88 billion writedown of Autonomy Corp.
 Last week, running back Ray Rice was released by the Baltimore Ravens and banned indefinitely by the NFL after seven-month-old video emerged of him knocking out his then-fiancee with a punch inside an elevator in Atlantic City, New Jersey.
 Beer industry stocks, stoked by merger speculation, are trading at their most expensive levels in ten years, based on forward price-earnings ratios, according to analysts at Nomura.
 “Taminco’s stock is trading above the bid price, which could mean that Eastman may have to raise its bid if another bidder emerges,” Carol Levenson, research director at Gimme Credit, said in a note today.
 Discovery told the FCC the merger could result in fewer independent voices among programmers.
 ‘Onerous Terms’ “We stand by our concerns that Comcast could use its enhanced leverage from the proposed merger to impose onerous terms,” said David Leavy, a spokesman for Discovery, based in Silver Spring, Maryland, which provides Discovery Channel and 12 other US.
 also has opposed the merger.
 Netflix is recycling claims that predate the merger announced in February, Comcast said.
 “It is extortion when Comcast fails to provide its own customers the broadband speed they’ve paid for unless Netflix also pays a ransom” Companies that asked Comcast to strike deals with the understanding they’d not oppose the merger sought concessions worth $5 billion or more, according to the filing.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Aecio Neves, who came from far behind to make the second round of Brazil’s presidential election, emerged largely unscathed as the campaign cannon fire landed elsewhere.
 TUI Travel Plc rose to 25 percent to 3747 pence before tomorrow’s shareholder vote on a merger with TUI AG, which gained 22 percent to 1135 euros.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- More than $90 billion of pay-television mergers are on pause as US.
 ‘Ultimately Approved’ “While political opposition to the merger may be tough, we think the deal will ultimately be approved with concessions that Comcast can live with,” Jonathan Chaplin, an analyst with New Street Research, said in a note today.
 The FCC earlier said its reviews of the mergers would limit access to proprietary material.
 The 180-day period is a goal for completing merger reviews, and exceeding that timetable doesn’t indicate a deal’s fate, the FCC said on its website.
 Critics’ Concerns “The fact that the FCC is willing to pause them both shows it’s taking the concerns of people who are objecting to the mergers very seriously,” said John Bergmayer, senior staff attorney for the Washington-based policy group Public Knowledge, which opposes the Comcast merger.
 sweetened a proposal to merge two pipeline partnerships it controls as the company expands its natural gas pipeline and processing network to handle booming North American output.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, posted third-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates as financial-advisory revenue increased.
 Lazard, which derives about half its revenue from advising on mergers and restructurings, has benefited as deals increased this year.
 The New York-based cable company, which is awaiting regulatory approval to merge with Comcast Corp, today lowered its revenue forecast for the year after more video subscribers canceled service and programming costs increased.
 The police said reinforced barricades are dangerous and will hinder the movement of emergency vehicles, Scholarism said in a Facebook post, citing a statement from police.
 “The bond overweights that emerged after the Lehman crisis have been eroded,” JPMorgan strategists led by the London-based Nikolaos Panigirtzoglou wrote in a report dated Oct.
 It will make it easier for people to dial 911 in an emergency, he said.
 Plastic Money Before the Austrian proceedings began, another money-printing bribery case emerged, in Australia.
 Respecting Freedom The protests are snarling traffic, delaying emergency response services and have led to a drop in the business of retailers in occupied areas by as much as 80 percent, Secretary for Security Lai Tung-kwok said in response to questions in the Legislative Council yesterday.
 Previously, Vander Haar was a partner at Faegre Baker Daniels LLP He represents public and private companies in mergers and acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic alliances, and restructurings and reorganizations.
 “Most international firms in Asia are trying to work out how to diversify their practices” from mergers and acquisitions and initial public offerings.
 A merger of the two companies will ensure efficient administration and satisfactory settlement of rights and liabilities of stakeholders and creditors of the exchange, the Ministry of Corporate Affairs said in an e-mailed statement.
 The members of the two companies and its creditors can respond to the draft merger order within 60 days, the ministry said.
 Using Cash “The merger is going to play a very major role in taking care of the liabilities toward the investors, who are suffering,” Deven Choksey, managing director of KR.
 Financial Technologies will take appropriate steps on the merger in consultation with its legal counsel, the company said in a filing to the BSE Ltd.
 “All this adds further uncertainty to the future of Portugal Telecom” Besides the Rioforte debt, Portugal Telecom’s main asset is a minority stake in a company being formed by a merger of the Lisbon-based phone operator and Brazilian carrier Oi SA.
 A successful bid by Altice would unravel a merger between Portugal Telecom SA and Oi.
 Oi and Portugal Telecom agreed on the merger a year ago to create a carrier with 100 million customers to compete against Telefonica SA and Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB.
 Rioforte Paper In July, the carriers renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined company after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding 897 million euros ($11 billion) in short-term debt defaulted by Espirito Santo International SA’s Rioforte Investments SA.
 Portuguese shareholders in the holding Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, which now owns the Rioforte debt and the Oi stake, include Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the breakup from of Banco Espirito Santo SA, Ongoing Strategy Investments and Grupo Visabeira SGPS SA.
 He has served as the CEO since 2005, leading Deutsche Boerse’s unsuccessful bid to merge with NYSE Euronext in 2012 and create the world’s largest trading powerhouse.
 The company, which is seeking to combat declining trading volumes at home, is focusing on Asia after a failed attempt to merge with NYSE Euronext in 2012.
 ‘Black Day’ In an endorsement of his strategy, Francioni was reappointed as CEO by Deutsche Boerse’s supervisory board, who renewed his contract after the commission overruled the merger plan in what the executive called a “black day for Europe” at the time.
 Precautionary Program In a speech before a confidence vote in parliament last week, Samaras said his government is negotiating a precautionary program that would see Greece seeking emergency loans from its euro-area partners or the IMF only as a last resort.
 Rio, which last week said it rejected a merger offer from Glencore Plc made in July, is seeking to raise output even as the steelmaking commodity has tumbled 38 percent this year.
 Without identifying potential partners, he said he sees the possibility of a merger that would create a company larger than Toyota Motor Corp, the world’s biggest carmaker.
 Greenhill has benefited from an increase in mergers and acquisitions as almost all of its revenue comes from advising on deals.
 Global merger transactions climbed 29 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier to about $886 billion, driven in part by European companies buying US.
 Lazard Ltd, the largest independent merger-advisory firm, earlier today said third-quarter net income rose 47 percent to $889 million as financial-advisory revenue increased.
 merger.
 Morgan Stanley is second to Goldman Sachs in advising on global mergers this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The asset manager is spinning off units that advise on mergers and acquisitions, restructuring and fund services.
 More than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave since the allegations emerged last year.
 If you squint hard enough, Hastings’ body merges with the grayness behind him, giving the spooky vibe that you’re looking at a floating head.
 The purchases will increase Dynegy’s generating capacity almost twofold, as part of the company emerges from a 2011 bankruptcy.
 6 and triggering a 93 percent drop in shares, signs of trouble began to emerge in August.
 With the emergence of Islamic State, Australia sent 400 air force personnel and 200 special forces soldiers to a US.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- The European Union expanded its crackdown on illegal tax breaks, ordering Spain to recover money from companies that benefited from rules that encouraged merger activity outside of the country.
 A $35 billion merger between Omincom Group Inc.
 Cheil’s listing is probably aimed at increasing its value to make it easier to merge other key affiliates, according to Park Ju Gun, president of corporate watchdog CEOSCORE.
 1 they will merge before the end of the year in a deal valued at about 25 trillion won.
 Some experimental drugs have already been used on an emergency basis.
 Fauci’s View “It is important to balance the urgency to deploy investigational medical countermeasures in an emergency such as the current Ebola outbreak with the need to ensure the maximal safety and to determine the efficacy of candidate drugs and vaccines for Ebola,” Anthony Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, said in prepared testimony for a congressional hearing today.
 Losses linked to real estate at BFA-Bankia, a banking group forged from a merger of savings banks led by Caja Madrid, pushed Spain into taking a 41 billion-euro European bailout to prop up lenders in 2012.
 Hewlett-Packard’s reference to no longer having the non-public information “we believe refers to EMC merger talks that have now officially concluded” Dave Farmer, a spokesman for EMC, declined to comment.
 The possibility of a deal between Hewlett-Packard Enterprise and EMC was mentioned by analysts at the time the split was announced, with Joe Wittine, an analyst for Longbow Research, saying such a merger may not be “truly dead” EMC had been exploring strategic options that could include a full or partial sale, said the people familiar with the talks last month.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Plc is laying the groundwork for a potential merger with Rio Tinto Group in the next year that would create the world’s largest mining company, worth about $160 billion, according to people familiar with the situation.
 Glencore made the merger proposal in July, Rio said.
 Largest Mining Group A merger would catapult the combined company past BHP Billiton Ltd.
 A merger proposal would face several additional obstacles.
 They’re also eager to ensure Rio executives would remain in key roles in a merger that would probably be billed as a combination of equals, especially after Glasenberg largely ejected Xstrata Plc managers after Glencore agreed to buy that company in 2012, one of the people said.
 Four commuter rail stations are without power and mobile phone networks have been affected as some celltowers have exhausted their back-up batteries, Auckland City’s emergency coordination center said in a statement.
 Fyffes said in a separate statement today that its merger with Chiquita remains “superior” to Cutrale-Saffra’s takeover of Chiquita.
 revived talks this year to merge their Italian assets, people familiar with the negotiations said in July.
 Italian Target VimpelCom said in its statement that it will continue to “explore value-adding transactions” While telecommunications mergers and acquisitions have taken place in Germany, Spain and France this year, the Italian market has yet to pull off a major transaction.
 Since 72-year-old patriarch Lee Kun Hee was hospitalized in May, Samsung Group has announced the merger of shipbuilding and engineering affiliates and applied to take its network technology business Samsung SDS Co.
 He oversaw Statoil’s merger with Norsk Hydro ASA’s oil and gas assets, reinforcing the company’s domination of Norway’s petroleum industry.
 ‘No Concern’ “KKR’s less than 1 percent position in KFN obviously would create no concern in the mind of KFN’s directors that KKR possessed sufficient voting power to remove them from their positions if they rejected the merger proposal or took any other action KKR did not like,” Bouchard said.
 According to his biography on the winery’s website, his career has included stints as a mergers analyst at Lazard in New York and as finance director of an Italian subsidiary of Compagnie Generale des Eaux, the forerunner of Vivendi SA.
 One of the violations cited by Finra occurred in 2008 during the financial crisis, when Merrill Lynch allowed some short-sellers to dump bank stocks without first arranging to borrow them, breaking SEC emergency orders intended to prevent manipulation.
 Standard General Standard General emerged as a potential savior for the retailer in August, when Bloomberg reported that the hedge fund was in financing talks.
 has spurred reorganizations across the retail industry, including the merger of Office Depot Inc.
 That’s after Iliad had lost 24 percent since Niel announced his interest in T-Mobile on July 31, cutting his company’s market value by almost $4 billion -- an amount that was said to be the valuation gap that stymied negotiations with Bouygues SA to merge France’s third- and fourth-largest wireless carriers earlier this year.
 They can change supervisory ratings on banks, which could limit mergers.
 The prospect of writedowns stoked speculation that shippinglenders were at risk of failing the stress test as loans to theindustry, which is struggling to emerge from a six-year slump inthe container vessel market, soured.
 With merger talks between Lutnick’s BGC Partners Inc.
 Even if most of GFI’s shareholders accept BGC’s offer, Gooch may still be able to prevent a merger, according to Alexander.
 An investment company Gooch controls owns more than a third of GFI and the company’s bylaws require “supermajority” approval for “extraordinary transactions such as mergers,” according to a March regulatory filing.
 “Closing a merger might be challenging, unless they come to terms with BGC and everyone works together,” she said.
 For the third quarter of the year, global mergers and acquisitions deal volume was $8889 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Fiat is a crossover, and “the Jeep is a Jeep” With the merged entity’s shares to start trading on the New York Stock Exchange on Oct.
 Fiat’s merger with its US.
 company’s value to about 495 percent of the merged enterprise.
 Food and Drug Administration will allow its emergency use in Ebola patients, the Durham, North Carolina-based company said today.
 Morgan Stanley is the top-ranked adviser on announcedmergers involving Latin American companies this year, accordingto data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Federal Communications Commission, the Justice Department and some state agencies, that the merger won’t harm competition or consumers.
 are among at least four companies that received demands for information about the merger from the Justice Department to help determine whether the acquisition is anticompetitive, Bloomberg News reported last month, citing people familiar with the matter.
 State regulators are also probing the merger, with the New York Public Service Commission, which has the power to reject the deal, set to vote on the matter Nov.
 Lard Scandal “Signs of distortion might have re-emerged in the trade data,” Xu Gao, chief economist at Everbright Securities, said in a note yesterday.
 “We took a very conservative approach and didn’t order too many” In his attempt to return the company to profitability by 2016, Chen is focusing on products such as the BlackBerry Blend feature that appeals to corporate customers because it helps them merge work and personal information.
 When asked at an investor conference last month if the DirecTV deal precluded other mergers and acquisitions, Stankey said the company’s balance sheet gives it financial flexibility to take advantage of opportunities, even if the timing isn’t perfect.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- The European Union expanded its crackdown on illegal tax breaks, ordering Spain to recover money from companies that benefited from rules encouraging merger activity outside of the country.
 is making it harder for some of its most loyal customers to reach top status, while sidestepping a total revamp as it prepares to combine its travel awards plan with that of merger partner US Airways Group Inc.
 The airlines merged in December to create the world’s biggest carrier.
 American began allowing program members to earn and redeem miles on either airline in January, a month after the close of their merger.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Time Warner Cable Inc, the cable company awaiting approval to merge with Comcast Corp, reported profit that trailed analysts’ estimates and cut its sales forecast as it continues to lose video subscribers.
 Santander, which took over Zachodni in 2011 and later merged it with competitor Kredyt Bank SA, is cutting its stake to comply with the Polish financial supervisor’s requirements.
 The amendments, which were passed in June 2013 and took effect in March, make brokerages and insurers eligible for emergency capital from the state-run deposit insurance agency.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- China’s State Council has ordered the merger of trainmakers China Northern Locomotive & Rolling Stock Industry Group Corp.
 The merger of the listed units will create a company with $336 billion of sales and $144 billion net income in the past 12 months, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The merger will create a Chinese trainmaker that can better compete against Japanese companies overseas.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Patrick Drahi is seeking to acquire PT Portugal SGPS SA, which would lead to a breakup of a merger of the nation’s biggest phone company with Brazilian carrier Oi SA, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Any deal would need the backing of Oi, which controls the merged entity, and to address how much of the debt defaulted by Rioforte Investments would ultimately be retained by Portugal Telecom, the person said.
 Drahi, with a net worth of $81 billion according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index, is swooping in as the Portuguese company’s trans-Atlantic merger partner prepares to take part in phone-industry consolidation in Brazil.
 Market Share While Portugal Telecom’s merger with Oi hasn’t been completed, the Portuguese carrier has transferred its local assets to its Brazilian partner.
 Even with that decline and Sprint calling off merger talks in August, T-Mobile shares had risen 63 percent since Legere took the stock public in May 2013 through a merger with MetroPCS Communications Inc.
 unit abandoned a merger plan with T-Mobile.
 EMC Corp, a maker of storage computers, is exploring strategic options that could include a full or partial sale, or a spinoff of VMware Inc, and has also held merger talks with Hewlett-Packard, people familiar with the matter have said.
 An earlier scan of 850 square kilometers (330 square miles) of seafloor in April and May, prompted by what were at first believed to be signals from the aircraft’s black box emergency beacon, found no debris in what is the world’s longest search for a missing plane in modern aviation history.
 The party emerged last year on a platform of opposing the single European currency and bailouts to indebted euro-area member states, and has won seats in three state parliaments in the past two months.
 The two companies, which agreed this year to merge in a $25 billion deal, will divest Lorillard’s market-leading Blu e-cig brand and instead market Reynolds’s new Vuse device.
 Ethos said today that the initiative, which was proposed by Thomas Minder to eliminate sign-on bonuses, severance packages, and extra incentives for merger transactions, has had some impact, causing companies to become more transparent regarding remuneration.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Ace Ltd’s Evan Greenberg, who has pursued expansion with takeovers in Mexico, Thailand and the US, said he expects an increase of insurance industry mergers and acquisitions as competition squeezes profit margins.
 cable company with more than 8 million customers counting GreatLand’s and subscribers it gets in purchases and swaps with Comcast after the merger is completed.
 “On the other hand they seem to be pretty reliable and they do have quite an array of services” Answers ‘Inadequate’ The whiff of nostalgia for Comcast, amid service complaints that prompted New York Mayor Bill de Blasio to ask that improvements be a condition of approving the merger, highlights the uncertainty for prospective GreatLand communities.
 The centers were created in 2012 to help produce treatments quickly in the event of public health emergencies, BARDA director Robin Robinson said an e-mail.
 Since the terrorist group emerged as a powerful military force, its adherents have proven skilled at using secure communication channels to plan operations and recruit new fighters via the Web.
 Salix, whose top selling drug is Xifaxan, a treatment for travelers’ diarrhea, today ended a $27 billion merger agreement with Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA, blaming tougher US.
 unit abandoned a merger plan with T-Mobile.
 Infection Control The nursing assistant had been in contact with other people and they will have to be followed, Fernando Simon, coordinator of the center of alerts and emergencies at Spain’s health ministry, told Cadena Ser radio today.
 “We expect further clarity on the new pricing policy and the premiums for future developments to emerge in due course” Output from the KG-D6 block has slid since 2010 as the reserves have proved difficult to access.
 Moreover, aside from mergers and acquisitions, which are normal for an international market, the company is showing powerful organic growth.
 The company also was in merger talks this year with its Canadian rival Barrick Gold Corp.
 The family cited his initial release from a hospital emergency room, which put him on the streets of Dallas for two days until he returned in an ambulance.
 Duncan was sent home with antibiotics by physicians at Texas Health Presbyterian Hospital Dallas after visiting the emergency room on Sept.
 Dallas lawyer Michael Sawicki, a plaintiff’s attorney who takes medical malpractice cases, said a lawsuit against the hospital or doctor in the Duncan case is likely to fail because Texas law makes specific exemptions for emergency care.
 Quoting a 2003 Texas legal rule, he said a person who in good faith administers emergency care is not liable for civil damages for an act performed during the emergency unless the act is willfully or wantonly negligent.
 “The law is written so in emergency care you’re not responsible for anything,” he said.
 “India is in a bull market, but for the time being it’s full stop” The Sensex climbed as much as 04 percent early in the session as Brent crude slid to a four-year low and exit polls released yesterday showed the ruling Bharatiya Janata Party will come to power in the state of Haryana and emerge as the largest party in Maharashtra, home to financial capital Mumbai.
 Global Turmoil “With oil at a four-year low and inflation under control, domestic cues are positive, but we’ll have to wait for semblance of sanity to return to the global markets before we see buying emerge in Indian equities,” Ajay Bodke, head of investment strategy and advisory with Prabhudas Lilladher Pvt, said in an interview to Bloomberg TV India today.
 20 filing, they initially tried to pressure Allergan’s board to discuss merger proposals rather than going over the board’s head directly to the shareholders.
 “Instead, they argue that each step related only to the proposal of a friendly merger and that none had any relation to the tender offer commenced only two months later.
 “The issue is mergers of mining companies generally don’t have synergies,” Calderon, a board member of Orica Ltd, told channel 9’s Financial Review Sunday.
 “In terms of a merger of equals, is it good for Glencore? It’s pretty fantastic,” Calderon said.
 This merger would not even come close to creating that value” With about $6 billion of his personal wealth tied up in Glencore stock, Chief Executive Officer Ivan Glasenberg tends to be cautious about overpaying for targets.
 Wall Street is either syndicating or has agreed to provide $52 billion of leveraged loans to back mergers and buyouts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Micro Focus, a Newbury, England-based software provider, announced the merger agreement on Sept.
 Higher rates would change market psychology, leading to more mergers and acquisitions which in turn deliver greater economic efficiency and a better allocation of capital.
 to explore all strategic options as it considers how to replenish a capital gap that emerges from the European Central Bank’s review.
 The MTA says underground wireless service will also provide the capability for 911 emergency calls.
 - Wireless providers fight efforts to improve location of emergency calls from mobile phones.
 The chairman stepped down following the emergence of accounting misstatements, one week after Warren Buffett said his eight-year investment in the company was a “huge mistake” TSCO US, meet TSCO LN.
 The region has re-emerged as the main concern of officials worldwide after its economy stalled and inflation slowed to the weakest in almost five years.
 Balfour Beatty, which rejected a merger proposal from British rival Carillion Plc in August, has struggled since the global recession slashed orders and prices.
 A merger would have combined Carillion’s extensive services business with Balfour Beatty’s building operations, which have struggled with a slowdown in construction activity.
 Carillion in August said it stopped pursuing a merger and Balfour Beatty in September agreed to sell Parsons Brinckerhoff for $124 billion to WSP Global Inc.
 of Nigeria to acquire Mainstreet Bank after it emerged as the preferred buyer for the nationalized lender.
 Thorsten Dirks, the former head of E-Plus who became chief executive officer of the merged company, is seeking to halt a slide in earnings and reduce expenses to justify the price of the acquisition.
 The companies have targeted as much as 55 billion euros ($7 billion) in additional revenue and cost savings from the merger.
 As a condition for European approval, Drillisch, a smaller carrier that doesn’t own a network, agreed to buy as much as 20 percent of the merged company’s network capacity over five years.
 “It’s all such a mess” Rajoy was already struggling to convert the economic gains Spain has made since it emerged from recession last year into political capital with voters exhausted by record unemployment, allegations of political corruption and the deepest budget cuts in a generation.
 The woman should probably have been quarantined as soon as those symptoms appeared, Fernando Simon, coordinator of emergency alerts at the Health Ministry said in a radio interview yesterday.
 Spain’s economy grew at the fastest pace in six years in the three months through June, marking three quarters of expansion since the country emerged from a two-year recession.
 Wells Fargo analyst Brian Abrahams said the emergence of a PML case should not be “a huge surprise, nor should it substantially change Tecfidera use or adoption patterns” “It could be that investors are finding better values in other names in the biotech sector, whether it’s Celgene, Amgen,” John Schroer, sector head of US.
 The two listed trainmakers may soon announce details of a merger plan, Caixin reported yesterday.
 In the 30 months since President Francois Hollande’s election, the government has publicly commented or been involved in company mergers, acquisitions or layoffs.
 Nigerian Breweries Plc, the West African nation’s largest brewer, received approval from the Securities and Exchange Commission to merge with Consolidated, the Lagos-based company said in a statement today on the Nigerian Stock Exchange newswire.
 These assets may be deemed strategic, said James Philips, head of mergers and acquisitions at law firm Minter Ellison in Sydney, potentially thwarting any bid.
 and Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA ended a $27 billion merger agreement, the first time a US.
 Treasury Department are succeeding in curbing cross-border, tax-reducing deals known as tax inversions that have helped drive a record period of industry mergers.
 in New York, Shire tumbled the most in 12 years in London, squeezing that merger arbitrage.
 canceled a planned merger with Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA.
 The merger would be the latest deal by a US.
 agreed to pay $6 billion for control of Access Midstream Partners LP, with plans to eventually merge the company with its subsidiary, Williams Partners LP.
 The departure of Bava, who led a merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS that could be completed as soon as this year, is negative for Oi, according to analysts at Banco Bradesco BBI SA and Credit Suisse Group AG.
 Oi’s debt load led Bava to cut the highest dividend yield in the global telecommunications industry last year, initiate the Portuguese merger and hire Banco BTG Pactual SA to act as a vehicle to buy Tim Participacoes SA.
 conference in New York, also said Liberty Broadband, a Malone-controlled company that’s filed to go public, could be merged with Charter Communications Inc, the cable, phone and Internet company.
 agreed to a three-way merger valued at 725 billion ringgit ($223 billion) that creates the nation’s largest bank by assets.
 The resulting Islamic bank will remain a subsidiary of the merged CIMB-RHB entity.
 CIMB and Malaysia Building Society will be delisted after the merger.
 The enlarged Islamic bank that results from the merger may raise funds to bolster its capital base, according to the statement.
 “Other banks are watching the outcome and how it might impact on their market positioning” The companies said they have applied to the central bank for the merger’s approval.
 The transaction values each CIMB share at 7267 ringgit, a 04 percent premium to CIMB’s market price on July 9, the day before the merger was proposed, according to the statement.
 The sheikdom also sent a special envoy to the Malaysian government to convey unhappiness over the merger, according to the Insider.
 “Both sides have to convince Aabar this merger is good for everybody,” Ang of Phillip Capital said.
 The bank emerged with one of the biggest markdowns in the European Central Bank’s asset review of 130 euro-area lenders this week.
 Chicago-based Getco LLC agreed to the merger at a time when dwindling equity volume was pressuring its own business.
 Suzlon, which suffered India’s biggest convertible-bond default in 2012, is seeking to emerge from a debt reorganization program by the end of the fiscal year.
 “China has quickly emerged as a large contributor to network growth in recent months,” he said.
 for mismanagement when the board of governors authorized an emergency loan to the distressed insurer at a steep interest rate and with a demand for equity in 2008.
 The AIG loan included a demand for 80 percent of the company’s equity, an unprecedented condition for an emergency Fed loan and one that Starr argues is illegal.
 Bernanke told the court that the Fed’s emergency lending authority provided “wide discretion” to set the terms of the loan and he “relied on legal counsel to confirm that” Starr argues that the Fed singled out AIG for uniquely severe terms, demanding equity so it could control the company to conduct a “back door bailout” of the insurer’s trading partners.
 Bernanke testified that the Fed made only two emergency loans tailored to individual companies: the one to AIG and another to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The FCC says the 180-day period is a goal for completing its review of mergers, and exceeding that timetable doesn’t indicate a deal’s fate.
 In the current mergers, companies including CBS Corp, Walt Disney Co.
 have asked the FCC to take more steps to limit who can review programming contracts filed with the agency as part of its media merger reviews.
 “The fact that the FCC is willing to pause them both shows it’s taking the concerns of people who are objecting to the mergers very seriously,” said John Bergmayer, senior staff attorney for the Washington-based policy group Public Knowledge, which opposes the Comcast merger.
 Their deals are part of a wave of merger activity in the telecommunications industry as companies seek to control the technology consumers use for entertainment and information.
 “The FCC stopping the clock on merger reviews is fairly common and today’s decision does not change our expectation to close our deal in the first half of 2015” AT&T fell 04 percent to $3450.
 The EU’s 28 leaders prepare to meet as echoes of the crisis that emerged in Greece in late 2009 reverberate around them, with a slump in government bonds in peripheral countries and a global stock-market decline of more than $3 trillion so far this month.
 Middle Eastern equity markets from Saudi Arabia to Dubai are surging, prompting companies to revive initial public offerings and consider mergers and acquisitions.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire John Fredriksen proposed to merge the two dry-bulk shippers he controls, Golden Ocean Group Ltd.
 This gives a merger valuation for Golden Ocean of $483 million, 11 percent below its net asset value of $545 million based on recent broker quotes, he said.
 The merger is subject to the approval of 75 percent of shareholders at Golden Ocean and Knightsbridge in general meetings to be held in December and January, respectively.
 and Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA ended a $27 billion merger agreement, the first time a US.
 Treasury Department are succeeding in curbing cross-border tax-reducing deals known as tax inversions that have helped drive a record period of industry mergers.
 abandoned an attempt to merge in May.
 23 cut its sales forecast after revenue missed estimates following the abandoned merger with New York-based Omnicom.
 “When fully completed, the project is expected to have 265 turbines submerged on the seabed, generating enough power for almost 200,000 homes in Scotland” The project is also being funded by the UK.
 tables via Savannah, Georgia, opening another shipping market in the city’s emergence as a major trade hub.
 EMC’s board has been considering strategic options, including a spinoff, and held talks about a merger with Hewlett-Packard Co.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The planned merger of the United Arab Emirates’ two main stock exchanges, home to the second-best performing share gauge in the world, will take more time to complete, according to a Dubai government official.
 We knew that when the markets started to pick up again that the merger would be put on the shelf again as everybody is busy” Dubai’s DFM General Index has gained 47 percent this year, trailing only Argentina’s gauge, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The UAE’s two biggest sheikhdoms completed due diligence on the potential merger at the end of last year, two people familiar with the matter said in February.
 Decision makers in the country are still keen on the merger, Shaibani said.
 The 51 banks that own OeVAG will merge with each other to cut costs, according to the plan, which is also designed to fill a capital gap that will open over the coming years as new rules are phased in.
 developer of geothermal power, may acquire its Tel Aviv-based parent company in an all-stock merger.
 13 following the merger of Italy’s Fiat and US.
 Delivery Target Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne merged Turin-based Fiat and Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler to better compete with auto-industry leaders such as General Motors Co, Volkswagen AG and Toyota Motor Corp.
 In the first half, the company reported 381 million euros of one-time charges, mostly stemming from the merger.
 That includes treasury shares and Fiat stock bought back during the merger process.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava stepped down, potentially paving the way for a breakup of the indebted Brazilian phone company’s year-old merger deal with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 “Bava leaving removes the main driver behind the merger between the Portuguese and Brazilian assets,” said Alexandre Iatrides, an analyst at Oddo & Cie.
 “Selling the Portuguese assets may be a good way for Oi to enable a strategic move in Brazil” Rioforte Debt Oi and Portugal Telecom agreed on the merger a year ago to create a carrier with 100 million customers to compete against Telefonica SA and Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB.
 In July, the carriers renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined company after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was a holder of debt defaulted by Espirito Santo’s Rioforte Investments SA.
 Asset Shift While the merger with Oi is scheduled to be completed as soon as the current quarter, the Portuguese carrier has transferred its local assets to Oi.
 Dollar Tree, based in Chesapeake, Virginia, has said it’s ready to divest as many stores as necessary to complete a merger with Family Dollar.
 10, its proposed merger with Family Dollar is being reviewed by the FTC as well.
 Last year the company acquired the Al Muhaidibs’ remaining 186 percent of the merged grocery business, as well as their 10 percent stake in an edible oil joint venture, in exchange for Savola stock valued at 133 billion riyals.
 American presented the meal-policy shift at the time as a step to align practices at American and merger partner US Airways Group, which must operate separately while awaiting regulatory clearance to combine operations.
 Merrill Lynch also violated the SEC’s 2008 emergency orders intended to prevent manipulation of bank stocks, Finra said.
 Ergas led merger and acquisition assignments in the technology industry while working at Morgan Stanley in London from 1997 to 2003.
 Weil first joined Swiss Bank Corp, which later merged with Union Bank of Switzerland to form UBS, in 1984.
 Nippon Steel, formed in October by the merger of Nippon Steel Corp.
 “These three businesses will now be positioned for significant long-term growth” Blackstone, the world’s largest alternative-asset manager, said today it’s spinning off its mergers, restructuring and private-equity fundraising businesses into a stand-alone company and merging them with Taubman’s advisory firm.
 Geithner also faced questions from Boies about his use of what’s known as the Doomsday Book, a private Federal Reserve Bank of New York manual describing the agency’s powers in financial emergencies.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA cut its sales forecast after third-quarter revenue missed estimates as the French advertising company coped with the fallout from a failed merger with Omnicom Group Inc.
 abandoned their $35 billion merger in May after executives disagreed over how to run the combined entity.
 “Because there are limits to what tank car design can achieve, we must take a comprehensive safety approach to prevent accidents before they happen, mitigate any that occur and enhance emergency response,” Straessle said.
 The panel said the result could be “higher failure risk through improper or insufficient testing” A commercial space industry has emerged in the US.
 “Employers want to do the right thing” to protect their employees in an emergency, he said.
 White advises companies on mergers and acquisitions and counsels private-equity firms on management buyouts and buy-ins, leveraged buyouts and public-to-private transactions.
 A pact involving Oneworld allies British Airways and Iberia of Spain -- now merged as IAG SA -- and American Airlines won EU approval in 2010 in return for the surrender of seven daily slots pairs.
 The SEC inquiry emerged last week.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Italian banks showed the largest combined capital shortfall in the European Central Bank’s review of the region’s lenders as the country struggles to emerge from its third recession in six years.
 Banca Monte dei Paschi di Siena SpA, Italy’s third-largest lender, emerged with a capital gap of 21 billion euros ($27 billion) while Banca Carige SpA must replenish 814 million euros of capital after taking into account funds raised this year, the ECB said in a statement today.
 Paschi Merger The Bank of Italy would favor a potential merger of Monte Paschi, Fabio Panetta, deputy director general at the cental bank told reporters in Rome today.
 Hastings, who was previously of counsel at Hogan Lovells LLP, specializes in equity capital markets, mergers and acquisitions and related work, and also focuses on the international mining, resources and energy sectors  Massimo Galli has joined the global corporate practice in London as a partner.
 Galli, who was previously a partner at Brown Rudnick LLP, focuses on cross-border corporate finance and mergers and acquisitions.
 carrier last week was said to rebuff merger talks with Canadian Pacific Railway Ltd.
 “I might speculate that they would be very cautious about this because” past mergers have “created disruptions and the industry is already slowed down” CSX, the biggest railroad in the eastern US, rejected an offer by Canadian Pacific to combine into a transcontinental railroad, people familiar with the matter have said.
 “That is the positive of the new energy environment we’re finding ourselves in” Eliasson said he feels “pretty bullish about where the economy is heading and also some sector trends that seem to be benefiting the railroad industry” He declined to comment about a potential merger between CSX and Canadian Pacific.
 Brandtzaeg resigned in July to join Yara International ASA, a Norwegian nitrogen-fertilizer producer, before last month deciding instead to stay on after being told that Yara was in merger talks with CF Industries Holdings Inc.
 companies use mergers to shift their legal address to a lower-tax country without moving their operations.
 “One model that has emerged is to get the oil companies to essentially dictate the specifications they want and also control the production” The NCDMB is creating a fund, which currently stands at more than $300 million, to kickstart investments, Nwapa said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Chimerix Inc’s antiviral drug improved survival in patients with adenovirus, according to initial results in a study started after a media storm over emergency use of the drug for a dying boy.
 Emergency Measures Low inflation is increasing pressure on central banks around the world to maintain emergency policy settings.
 The repo market accelerated the fall of both Bear Stearns Cos, which was taken over by JPMorgan in 2008 after an emergency bailout orchestrated by the Fed, and Lehman Brother Holdings Inc, whose collapse in September of that year plunged financial markets into their worst crisis since the Great Depression.
 More Imports In India, signs of a rebound in festival demand emerged in September.
 Asked if Fosun would be interested in purchasing Novo Banco, the lender that emerged from the breakup of Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo SA, Ding replied: “We will analyze, review all the investment opportunities” Banco Espirito Santo, once Portugal’s biggest lender by market value, was bailed out in August after regulators ordered it to raise more capital following the disclosure of potential losses on loans to some of its parent companies.
 “China has quickly emerged as a large contributor to network growth in recent months,” he said.
 And consumer and real estate are being wound down” Milestone’s clients include operators in offshore oil and gas, search-and-rescue, emergency medical services and mining, according to the statement.
 “PayPal is uniquely positioned as this landscape really begins to emerge in interesting ways” An independent PayPal would have more latitude to forge alliances with retailers and other financial firms as Google Inc.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- October was a slow month for mergers and acquisitions, but it’s too soon to assume this means 2014’s takeover boom is over.
 As part of that evaluation, the company has considered spinning off or selling VMware and held talks about a merger with Hewlett-Packard Co, a discussion that stalled over price, the people said.
 have been using debt to fund mergers, acquisitions and capital spending as they seek to benefit from an economic resurgence under President Benigno Aquino.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Plc, whose offer to merge with Rio Tinto Group was spurned, has explored a stock-exchange listing in Australia, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Rio, based in London, said this week it rejected a merger approach from Glencore, which would have created the world’s biggest miner, valued at more than $160 billion.
 The activist investor wants Yahoo to explore a breakup and merge with AOL Inc.
 Days after Starboard called for changes at Yahoo, Alternative Investment Management & Research SA, a Geneva-based investment advisory firm, wrote in a letter that SoftBank Corp, which also owns part of Yahoo Japan, should merge with Yahoo.
 TUI is selling its remaining stake in container-shipping giant Hapag-Lloyd AG, acquired in 1997, and shareholders vote today on whether to recombine the company with Crawley, England-based TUI Travel Plc, the division formed in a unit’s 2007 merger with a UK.
 Merger Focus The Castelfalfi impairment charges are outlined in the prospectus for the proposed TUI-TUI Travel merger, and the document says all goodwill associated with the project has been written off.
 “The most important date looking forward” is the shareholders’ vote on the merger, Rothenbacher said.
 Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd, based in Raleigh, North Carolina, said it would halt its merger agreement with Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA.
 7, 1980, in response to the Hunts’ position, Comex and the Chicago Board of Trade imposed emergency rules that included higher margin requirements.
 After Penske testified, Rhodes questioned Detroit’s emergency manager, Kevyn Orr, about how much power a proposed financial oversight board would have.
 Sony’s PlayStation 4 has emerged as the leader in the newest generation of video-game players.
 Justice Stephen Breyer emerged as one of Teva’s strongest backers.
 Russia’s embrace of China reflects a vulnerability that the country hasn’t experienced since the collapse of the Soviet Union, which triggered a depression that fractured society and led to the emergence of oligarchs who were often at odds with the state.
 It threatens to erase the progress Liberia has made since it emerged from civil war more than a decade ago with Finance Minister Amara Konneh forecasting zero growth this year because of the disease.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Malaysia’s stock exchange rejected a request to allow Employees Provident Fund, the nation’s biggest pension manager, to vote on a 725 billion ringgit ($222 billion) bank merger, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 EPF was denied a waiver allowing it to vote on the three-way merger of CIMB Group Holdings Bhd, RHB Capital Bhd.
 CIMB, Malaysia’s second-biggest lender, and RHB this month agreed to a merger that would create the country’s largest bank by assets.
 and Shire Plc will still take part in the drug industry’s merger spree even if they cancel plans to combine with each other.
 Should the merger with AbbVie collapse, it may open the door for Allergan, which is up against a ticking clock to come up with a defensive move for fending off hostile bidder Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 With that deal having failed and AbbVie’s now in question, a merger of $179 billion Pfizer and $87 billion AbbVie is conceivable.
 Once lesser-known drugmakers, such as Valeant and Actavis Plc, have also used mergers to bulk up and join the rankings of the industry leaders.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- In the past two years, David Scott’s online emergency-supply business had sold only one or two “Extended Infection Protection” kits.
 He was sent home from the emergency room despite telling a nurse he had recently been in Africa, and hospital officials have blamed a flaw in the electronic medical records system for Duncan’s release.
 The last time LifeSecure saw so much demand for emergency-response supplies was in 2011, when avian influenza, or bird flu, generated headlines.
 The comments “fueled panic selling focused on Greek and Italian banks, the most severely affected by the stress tests” Italian and Greek banks showed the largest combined capital shortfall in the European Central Bank’s review as the two countries struggle to emerge from the financial crisis.
 “Although we must continue to be alert to the emergence of new risks in our system and stand ready to take appropriate action, we are unlikely, over the next five years, to need to pass the same amount of new legislation again” ‘Holistic View’ Some of Europe’s best-capitalized banks are also urging regulators to review their approach.
 regulators for the largest tobacco merger in decades.
 Alternative merger partners for the enterprise business are NetApp Inc, Oracle Corp, International Business Machines Corp.
 EMC Consideration A merger between EMC and Hewlett-Packard Enterprise could be on the horizon though.
 “ The lowered oil prices could cause bidders to be less aggressive and or shy away from investing in Mexico immediately” Strained Venezuela Venezuela is showing more strain than its OPEC peers and called for an emergency meeting of the group, the country’s foreign minister said on the ministry’s Twitter account Oct.
 Saunders has told Allergan CEO David Pyott that he is open to discussing a deal that merges the two companies, said a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified discussing private information.
 Rio Tinto Group gained after saying it rejected a merger offer from Glencore Plc.
 Glencore made a merger proposal in July, which London-based Rio said its board unanimously rejected.
 In 1994, Pimco and four other asset managers owned by Pacific Life did a reverse merger with Thomson Advisory Group LP, in which a closely held company acquires a public company.
 It has become a major player in influencing the outcomes of mergers through both its investments and its market power.
 Iron Ore A merger would catapult the group past BHP to become the largest mining group, combining Glencore’s vast commodity-trading operations with Rio’s portfolio of iron-ore projects that feed demand for construction materials in China.
 “It would be even more worrying if the currency market became disorderly, but fortunately that has not been the case” Confidence is rising in the ability of the market to function normally during periods of stress even after more than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave since allegations emerged last year that dealers colluded to rig the WM/Reuters benchmark rate.
 The IMF and the EU say Greece’s economy will emerge this year from the longest recession on record.
 Samaras said last week that Greece won’t ask for new emergency loans from the euro area when the current program expires, and that it may forsake IMF disbursements scheduled for next year and 2016.
 may emerge from bankruptcy reorganization by year-end if the court approves a Chapter 11 plan at a confirmation hearing set for Dec.
 He returned the company to profit and orchestrated the emergency sale of Dresdner in August 2008, just weeks before the Lehman Brothers debacle.
 A fourth suitor could emerge in Charlie Ergen, chairman of Dish Network Corp, who contacted Deutsche Telekom to say he is interested in a future acquisition of T-Mobile, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 Valeant and Pershing can’t argue they’re shielded from insider-trading laws because they were only thinking about a friendly merger, according to Allergan, as Petterson laid it out for us.
 Level 3 holds a special shareholder meeting for a vote on its plan to merge with TW Telecom.
 “However, persistence or worsening of these delays into November could pose a yield risk, as plants may not have enough time to emerge before the ground freezes” Wheat production in Kansas, the biggest US.
 Stocks worldwide have lost about $33 trillion in value in October as concerns over global growth re-emerge just as the US.
 Shares in CSR and China CNR had surged last month after a report that China’s State-Owned Assets Supervision and Administration Commission, or SASAC, is seeking the merger of the two companies to boost exports of high-speed railway technologies.
 “Everybody is obviously expecting CNR and CSR to announce something relating to the merger between the two companies,” said Lawrence Li, a Shanghai-based analyst at UOB Kay Hian Investment Co.
 “But it remains to be seen what form any merger would take.
 Trafigura’s four board nominees include its head of mergers and acquisitions, Jesus Fernandez.
 Starr’s final witnesses will include experts on the Fed’s use of emergency powers in a financial crisis and damages for investors.
 He testified that “rate” didn’t include equity when used to describe compensation for extending emergency credit.
 He has often been indecisive and afraid he was making a mistake, especially when it came to mergers, he said.
 Valeant, which made the hostile bid along with activist investor Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP, could boost the offer sooner than December if a rival bidder for Allergan emerges, one of the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The lender passed the ECB’s asset review with a Tier 1 capital ratio of 1084 percent and emerged from the most onerous stress test with 796 percent.
 Engineers are designing reinforced bunkers for back-up power and installing emergency cooling systems to contain a meltdown.
 The country is also reinforcing the concrete bases of its oldest reactors and creating elite teams of emergency responders.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Fire departments are struggling to get the safety suits needed to protect emergency crews responding to patients who may have Ebola, their union said in a letter to US.
 In Houston, authorities bought 1,100 impermeable suits for local emergency responders, then trained them after the local union leader, Alvin White, went on television to complain that they didn’t know the how best to use the clothing.
 In August, the funds posted mixed returns as two proposed mergers unraveled, hurting the stocks of Sprint Corp.
 The firm’s credit, merger and recovery funds also lost money last month.
 Its merger and credit strategies are still up this year and an unrestricted share class of the Advantage funds that can buy new issues bucked the rest of the funds in September.
 Iran is moderating its reputation for taking a hard line on crude prices by shunning calls for OPEC to hold an emergency meeting.
 No emergency OPEC session is necessary, Shana said.
 mobile market, more feasible from a regulatory perspective than a domestic merger.
 Justice Elena Kagan emerged as the most likely vote in favor of the workers.
 Europe led a rout that has wiped more than $55 trillion from the value of equities worldwide since September as concern over the economic recovery re-emerged.
 are poised to announce details of a three-way merger that would create Malaysia’s largest banking group by assets.
 The lenders, which have a combined market value of about $27 billion, announced plans for the deal in July and entered a 90-day exclusive agreement to negotiate and finalize the price and structure of the merger.
 The stock has fallen 36 percent since the merger was first announced on July 10.
 The sheikhdom also sent a special envoy to the Malaysian government to convey unhappiness over the merger, the same people said.
 Text Campaign “Everybody’s trying to leverage technology in one way or another,” said Gisli Olafsson, emergency response director for NetHope, a Fairfax, Virginia-based coalition of 41 international organizations providing $40 billion in humanitarian assistance.
 In Nigeria, the phone app reduced reporting times for new Ebola cases by half initially, and then by 75 percent before becoming almost real-time, said Daniel Tom-Aba, senior data manager at the Ebola Emergency Operation Centre in Lagos.
 Communication Tools The Liberian government is using a system that captures the time and location of mobile phone calls made to emergency services, said Carl Kinkade, an information technology coordinator with the US.
 “People can also run and tell other people and they can take the messages and show other people who don’t have a phone” The system, known as the Trilogy Emergency Relief Application, was originally developed in response to the 2010 earthquake in Haiti and costs about $50,000 to operate in Sierra Leone, Burton said.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- An over-wing emergency slide fell from a Thomas Cook Group Plc plane over Belgium shortly after the jet had departed London’s Gatwick airport bound for Egypt, according to the UK.
 On the 757, the opening of any one of four over-wing emergency hatches -- two each side of the plane -- completes an electrical circuit and inflates an escape mechanism stowed in a separate compartment on the fuselage, according to a report from the US.
 The two companies, which agreed this year to merge in a $25 billion deal, are fighting to protect the nascent e-cig industry.
 Lorillard owns the industry-leading e-cig brand, Blu, though it will be divested to Imperial Tobacco Group Plc under the terms of the Reynolds merger.
 Weil joined Swiss Bank Corp, which later merged with Union Bank of Switzerland to form UBS, in 1984.
 Cambridge Laboratory Ubisense, which has 240 employees, emerged from the University of Cambridge Computer Laboratory in 2002.
 There was a sense early on that Comcast’s lobbying and ties to the Obama administration meant serene passage, said Christopher Pultz, head of merger arbitrage for Kellner Capital in New York.
 government will push in seeking concessions in return for allowing a merger of the two largest cable-television providers in the nation, Pultz said.
 The timing of regulatory approval is key for merger arbitrage traders, who seek to profit from the difference between the stock price of a target company when a deal is first announced and the price at which it will be acquired.
 Traders consider the FCC extension of the Comcast review “a negative,” said Kathleen Renck, New York-based head of merger arbitrage at FBN Securities.
 EMC has also held talks about a merger with Hewlett-Packard Co, which stalled over disagreements on price, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Then shareholders rejected the plan to merge with Fyffes in what would have been a tax-inversion deal.
 Hall said the handful of investor rejections of board merger plans include the initial Dollar Thrifty rebuff of the Hertz Global Holdings Inc.
 Delaware companies, following the enactment of section 251(h) of the General Corporation Law last year, need only a majority of shareholder votes in a tender offer to proceed to the merger.
 She advises on antitrust-related aspects of mergers and acquisitions, joint ventures, and sales and distribution matters, the firm said in a statement.
 and international tax matters, with a particular focus on cross-border mergers and acquisitions, joint ventures, private investment fund structures and capital markets transactions.
 Germany would not be able to fulfill its commitment to supply 60 operational Eurofighters from its fleet of 109 to North Atlantic Treaty Organization partners in the case of an emergency, Defense Minister Ursula von der Leyen said Sept.
 “A much more positive account of the value of seed treatments will emerge when a more robust body of information is considered,” Ray McAllister, CropLife’s senior director of regulatory policy, said in an e-mailed statement.
 The central bank is “providing an emergency facility to reduce risks of extreme market stress,” Dmitry Polevoy, chief economist for Russia and the Commonwealth of Independent States at ING in Moscow, said in a note.
 In 1994, Pimco and four other asset managers owned by Pacific Life did a reverse merger with Thomson Advisory Group LP, in which a closely held company acquires a public company.
 jumped 77 percent after shareholders approved a merger with Samsung Heavy Industries Co.
 “The next EU digital agenda should focus on how to make network investments happen” Members of the group, which include Deutsche Telekom AG, TeliaSonera AB and Telecom Italia SpA, will also push for more freedom in mergers and acquisitions and permission to charge content providers such as Google Inc.
 Morgan Stanley was the second-ranked adviser on global announced mergers and acquisitions in the first nine months, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Freestone will leave a company that has yet to emerge from a slowdown weighed on by declining US.
 “Most international firms in Asia are trying to work out how to diversify their practices” from mergers and acquisitions and IPOs.
 with illegally passing merger tips to a business school friend, helping him reap about $722,000 in illicit profits.
 “Zachary Zwerko was a spy in the camp of his own company who passed secret merger and acquisition information to his co-conspirator so lucrative illegal trades could be made,” Bharara said in a statement.
 The company’s ownership of Chinese affiliate Chengshan Cooper Tires, which seized control of its facility after the merger announcement and wouldn’t release financial records, was “a major obstacle” to consummating the buyout terms, Glasscock wrote.
 ‘Unanticipated’ Event The ruling “noted that what took place at our CCT joint venture after the merger was announced was unanticipated, and neither Apollo nor Cooper caused it to occur,” Anne Roman, a spokeswoman for Cooper, said in an e-mailed statement.
 “Nonetheless, the court found that it prevented Cooper from complying with its contractual obligations necessary to close the merger,” Roman said.
 coal market in decades is driving the Russian steelmaker and other big mine owners for the exit, and a new class of buyers has emerged.
 market for coal mergers and acquisitions is “very active,” said Ted O’Brien, CEO of Doyle Trading Consultants LLC in New York.
 Corbett focuses on public and private equity and debt offerings, mergers and acquisitions and venture-capital financings, as well as general corporate-governance and public company disclosure and compliance matters.
 with illegally passing merger tips to a business school friend, which helped him reap almost $580,000 in illicit profit.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Morgan Stanley named Samuel Kim vice chairman of Asia-Pacific investment banking and promoted two senior bankers to run the mergers business as it competes with Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Richard Wong and James Tam will become co-heads of mergers and acquisitions, replacing Kim, according to an internal memo obtained by Bloomberg.
 Morgan Stanley has been ranked among the top three advisers on mergers in Asia-Pacific excluding Japan since 2009, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 He also said he was unaware of any other emergency loan by the Fed conditioned on a surrender of equity.
 Bernanke told the court he didn’t think about the specifics of the Fed’s emergency lending powers.
 Bernanke, who along with other members of the Fed’s board of governors authorized the emergency loan, told the court the central bank “used its powers in an ad hoc way” because it had no other option for safely dealing with a financially troubled “systemic firm” ‘As Necessary’ He said he didn’t know how some elements of the loan -- the interest rate and the equity demand, or the form of equity -- were arrived at.
 are selling as the cement producers merge.
 Lafarge and Holcim have had 100 expressions of interest for the units for sale and “will probably have a lot of firm bids” Both companies are about to submit their merger plan and proposed antitrust remedies to the European Union competition authority, the Lafarge CEO said.
 South Africa’s antitrust regulator said yesterday that it approved the merger on condition that the combined company sell Holcim’s stake in local producer AfriSam South Africa (Pty) Ltd.
 “If the board recommends that shareholders don’t vote for the deal, there’s no way it can be resurrected” The merger would be the largest casualty yet of rules announced last month by the Treasury Department to make tax inversion deals more difficult.
 The price AbbVie agreed to pay for Shire was the highest that it was able to offer, and the loss of some tax benefits and the related prospect of having to borrow more for the merger have eroded its attractiveness, the people said.
 AbbVie began a comprehensive review of the merger after Treasury Secretary Jack Lew announced the measures, people with knowledge of the matter said last month, including the prospect of borrowing as much as $7 billion more than it initially anticipated.
 The towers were owned by Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, with which Oi agreed to merge last year.
 A successful bid by Altice would unravel the merger between Portugal Telecom and Oi.
 Earlier this month, Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava stepped down, potentially paving the way for a breakup of the merger.
 Jefferies LLC, which advises on mergers and acquisitions, estimates that a drop to $80 a barrel or lower in WTI would trigger a reduction in drilling operations, Ralph Eads, the bank’s vice chairman and global head of energy investment banking, said in an Oct.
 Pockets of Growth Europe led a rout that has wiped more than $55 trillion from the value of equities worldwide since September as concern over the economic recovery re-emerged.
 was rebuffed after approaching CSX with a merger proposal sometime in the past week, people familiar with the matter said.
 They tried emergency connections, which also went dead.
 Basement Fire Hartman, a technician at the facility, known as the Chicago En Route Traffic Control Center, was testing an emergency diesel generator in the adjacent building when the fire alarm went off at about 5:40 am.
 Holcim, Lafarge Cemex has decided not to bid for any assets that may become available from the merger of Holcim Ltd.
 The chain merged with OfficeMax Inc.
 “And we’re confident it will emerge from the shake-up even stronger.
 Monte Paschi, Italy’s third-biggest bank, emerged from the review with a capital gap of 21 billion euros while Carige must replenish about 810 million euros of capital after taking into account funds raised this year, the ECB said on Oct.
 The Bank of Italy would look favorably upon a potential merger for the bank, Fabio Panetta, deputy director general at the central bank told reporters in Rome immediately after ECB results were published.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Strategic deals such as spinoffs will keep 2014’s booming market for mergers and acquisitions going well into next year despite a recent dip in activity, according to financial advisers.
 AquaChile, controlled by Chilean entrepreneur Victor Puchi, has emerged as the biggest survivor among the Chilean-owned salmon farmers, rising 60 percent in the past 12 months as a European Union ban on exports to Russia boosted prices.
 rules governing so-called tax inversions haven’t derailed the sale as they have some other mergers.
 Sokol’s emergence underscores how oversupplied markets have become with light crude as the US.
 The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation said last month it will commit $50 million to support emergency efforts to contain the Ebola outbreak in West Africa and interrupt transmission of the virus.
 The foundation said it will release funds to United Nations agencies and international organizations involved in the response to enable them and national governments to purchase supplies and scale up emergency operations in affected countries.
 A transaction would not only unwind a beleaguered merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA -- the enlarged company’s CEO stepped down this month -- but also remove an obstacle for Oi to pursue an acquisition of local rival Tim Participacoes SA.
 Oi, Brazil’s largest landline provider, a year ago agreed to merge with Portugal Telecom to create a trans-Atlantic carrier and take on Carlos Slim’s America Movil.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the enlarged entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding 897 million euros in short-term debt defaulted by Espirito Santo International SA’s Rioforte Investments SA.
 “You could offer me a thousand times that amount being paid and I’d still say no,” said Kabongo Mlamba, a local taxi driver who was born in Kinshasa in the Democratic Republic of Congo, where Ebola emerged in 1976.
 The bank, a specialist in complicated mergers and acquisitions for itself and clients, is also integral to Putin’s brand of governance.
 currency gained 16 percent against the ruble in the first quarter alone, helping the bank repay the emergency loans while posting a profit of 65 billion rubles for the year, Kornev said.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Sulzer AG sees further opportunities to buy or merge with companies producing equipment for the oil and gas industry after a proposed merger with Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 Sulzer’s offer of a merger of equals with Dresser-Rand was beaten by Siemens AG’s $76 billion cash bid.
 “There’s not 100s of companies of a similar size for a merger, but there are a couple.
 During negotiations to merge with Dresser-Rand, Vekselberg’s Renova industrial holding company built up a 5 percent stake, worth about $300 million.
 Michael Chitwood and Thomas Greenberg, all mergers and acquisitions; Erica Schohn, executive compensation and benefits; Bruce Goldner, intellectual property and technology; John Bentivoglio, health-care enforcement and regulation; Steven Messina, banking; Laura Kaufmann Belkhayat, corporate finance; Clifford Aronson, antitrust; and Eric Sensenbrenner, tax.
 Denny recently advised on tax issues in connection with HSBC Holdings Plc’s underwritten rights issue, Iberia’s merger with British Airways and Delta Air Lines Inc’s acquisition of a stake in Virgin Atlantic.
 “The collateral damage the proposals might have are getting some air time” Drew Attention The quarter included a period when tax inversions moved from an obsession of merger advisers and tax policy experts to a political hot button that drew the attention of President Barack Obama and Treasury Secretary Jacob J.
 “We continue to believe that SABMiller could now be considered to be in play following its recent Heineken merger rebuttal and view AB InBev as a potential acquirer,” Wyn Ellis, an analyst at Numis Securities, said in a note.
 “There was at the beginning of October a big negative reaction after Mario Draghi gave unclear messages to the markets and this has weighed on stock markets” Europe led a rout that wiped more than $55 trillion from the value of equities worldwide since September as concern over the economic recovery re-emerged.
 “Central nervous system assets that are approved and have this kind of growth potential are pretty scarce” Recent Talks Avanir had been in talks last month about a merger or sale to another specialty drug company, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 He said there were irregularities in three contracts: two that were overpaid and one that was signed in an “emergency” time-frame that didn’t allow other companies to bid.
 Takeovers in the cement industry have picked up this year, led by the $40 billion merger between Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd.
 The value of mergers and acquisitions in Europe this year is almost 70 percent higher than the same period in 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 2 behind American, reiterated that it’s working to cut costs and increase revenue after struggling to sustain profits four years after the company was created in the merger between former parent UAL Corp.
 Possible merger targets AstraZeneca Plc and Smith & Nephew Plc retreated more than 3 percent.
 Armstrong reiterated that AOL isn’t going to merge with Yahoo! Inc, brushing off a campaign by Yahoo activist investor Starboard Value LP to combine the companies.
 agreed to merge with the communications unit of Danaher Corp.
 The company that was formed from the merger of Italy’s Fiat and US.
 TUI AG added 44 percent to 1214 euros after shareholders of TUI Travel Plc approved proposed merger terms for the two companies.
 probably won’t make another $50 billion-plus deal after walking away from a planned merger with Shire Plc, said Chief Executive Officer Richard Gonzalez.
 and Lafarge SA officially notified the European Union of their merger, offering to sell operations in Slovakia as they seek approval of their plan to create the world’s largest cement maker.
 A merger of the Swiss and French companies would combine cement- and crushed-rock operations with $40 billion in annual revenue.
 “We have received many marks of interest” and both companies are confident that assets sales will be completed within the merger timeframe, he said.
 Getting Clearance The notification to the EU wraps up 20 filings by Lafarge and Holcim to get clearance for their planned merger, Holcim CEO Bernard Fontana said.
 Russia, Ukraine, Turkey, Morocco, Kenya, South Africa and Singapore have already approved the merger, and talks with other regulators such as the US.
 Under the EU’s merger-review process, most deals are cleared at the first hurdle.
 18 that Holcim and Lafarge were aiming to iron out possible EU concerns over the merged company’s market power before officially notifying, in a bid to obtain speedier final approval.
 The Holcim CEO declined to say whether the EU is likely to rule on the merger through a so-called phase one review that lasts between 25 and 35 days, or through a longer, phase two, review that lasts an extra 90 to 105 days.
 He said he’s “confident in any case” that the process will allow the companies to complete the merger within the first half of next year.
 With assets in Europe that total about $12 billion in sales, the merger approval of Holcim and Lafarge will be overseen by Margrethe Vestager, Denmark’s former minister of Economics & Interior who starts as EU competition commissioner Nov.
 had downgraded it to “significantly undercapitalized” The bank must “immediately” increase capital to the minimums required in a 2012 consent order or submit a contingency plan for the sale, merger or liquidation of the bank, according to that filing.
 Italian banks showed the largest combined capital shortfall in the ECB’s review of Europe’s lenders as the country is struggling to emerge from a three-year economic slump.
 It used to include General Motor Co’s Hummer brand, until the massive SUV fell out of favor with consumers and was wiped out amid GM’s struggles to emerge from bankruptcy.
 The lender hired Deutsche Bank AG and Davy, Ireland’s largest securities firm, to explore options to fill the remaining gap that emerged in the European Central Bank’s adverse scenario, published today.
 “This constraint will effectively limit the development of key infrastructure required for the commissioning of the main shaft and the start of production ramp-up” Royal Bafokeng, or RBPlats as the company is known, is expanding at a time when other South African platinum producers are looking to sell or merge assets.
 They will merge among themselves to cut costs and improve capital-market access, planning to bring the number of institutes down to 12 -- one for each of Austria’s nine provinces and three specialized banks.
 “Monte Paschi is one of the most problematic banks at the European level and this could emerge from upcoming stress tests result,” Vincenzo Longo, a Milan-based strategist at IG Markets, said by telephone.
 FCC was formed through the 1992 merger of Construcciones & Contratas, or Conycon, and Fomento de Obras & Construcciones, which was founded in 1900, according to the company website.
 It lacks a large presence in China and its debt load could impede growth by limiting further merger options.
 left the exchange when it merged with Daimler-Benz AG in 1998.
 Under the reorganization, the bank’s European business for supranational, sovereign and government agency bond issuers will be merged with covered bond and financial institutions syndication desks and will be led by Keith Price.
 unit abandoned a merger plan with T-Mobile.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- TUI AG jumped the most in more than a year after shareholders of TUI Travel Plc, Europe’s largest tour operator, approved the terms of a proposed merger between the two companies.
 Earlier yesterday, shareholders of TUI AG had given the go-ahead for the merger to proceed.
 Investors will receive 0399 shares of the new TUI AG for each TUI Travel share they own in the nil-premium merger.
 The improvement was driven by increased merger activity and a general return to growth in the UK, PwC said.
 His work has “strong bearing on central policy questions: how should the government deal with mergers or cartels, and how should it regulate monopolies?” In an interview with Bloomberg Television, Tirole said with regard to banking, “We need strong regulations that are going to prevent banks from gambling with taxpayer money -- not only retail banks, but also investment banks.
 AB InBev and its advisers have long studied whether a merger with the $142 billion soda and snacks company makes strategic and financial sense, said people familiar with the matter However, no talks are happening now, no deal is imminent, and the scenario is among many it has looked at, one of the people added, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 A takeover of SABMiller would be “boring,” said Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried.
 “We will also find a way of using the new gas money to help with this” CCM was created when the Tanganyika African National Union and Afro-Shirazi Party merged in 1977 under former President Julius Nyerere with a socialist ideology.
 Portuguese Assets Oi has been working on a sale of its stake in Africatel after acquiring it earlier this year as part of its merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 Oi is in the midst of a dispute with the minority shareholder of Africatel, Samba Luxco Sarl, over whether the Portugal Telecom merger obligates Oi to acquire Samba Luxco’s stake.
 We appreciate this will be a difficult time for the staff affected” Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG formed EE when they merged their UK.
 Details about a Securities and Exchange Commission investigation into Goldman’s dealings with the LIA also emerged at the hearing.
 Bernanke said he didn’t recall whether there was any discussion during a September 2008 Board of Governors meeting about whether Fed emergency lending provisions allowed the terms to include taking equity.
 A note from Thomas Baxter, the general counsel of the New York Fed, to Geithner stated that “we in New York” have a more expansive view of what the central bank can do under an “incidental powers” section of the law but that some officials at the Federal Reserve Board of Governors “see our conduct as loophole lawyering” ‘Incidental Powers’ Baxter testified earlier in the trial that those “incidental powers” included the ability to authorize demands for equity as a condition of emergency lending.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Sergio Marchionne, Fiat SpA’s chief executive officer and the architect of its merger with Chrysler, plans to step down after completing a five-year strategic plan to expand the combined carmakers.
 Now, with the merger into London-based Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, his goal is to boost net income fivefold to about 5 billion euros ($63 billion) in 2018.
 The department-store chain, struggling to emerge from $3 billion in losses in the past 3 1/2 years, yesterday named Ellison its next president and chief executive officer.
 and Lafarge SA as they merge, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The two cement producers are selling units with an enterprise value of 5 billion euros ($63 billion) to 7 billion euros, two of the people said, as they seek antitrust backing for a planned $40 billion merger.
 That’s expected to peak this year at 68 percent and then decline to 61 percent by 2016 as more financing options emerge, the research company said in a June report.
 “It’s a positive development,” Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone.
 “After dismissing PwC, NQ specifically chose Marcum and its principal Drew Bernstein as its auditor because they have publicly criticized short sellers in the past, and have issued clean audit opinions on numerous questionable Chinese reverse-merger companies,” Block said.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- China’s plan to merge its two biggest trainmakers may allow the country to win more overseas orders with improved and cheaper offerings, increasing pressure on rivals including Siemens AG, Alstom SA and Bombardier Inc.
 China’s State Council has ordered the merger of China Northern Locomotive & Rolling Stock Industry Group Corp.
 Representatives for Siemens and Bombardier declined to comment on the potential market impact of a merged Chinese trainmaker.
 Merger Details Details of the Chinese merger are yet to be set, and China International Capital Corp.
 “Divergence in monetary policy is very supportive in the emergence of trends in currency markets, and that’s beginning to play out” Insight is a unit of Bank of New York Mellon that oversees about $470 billion.
 Advertising Footprint “To the extent that you can merge and put a bigger digital footprint together, that might make it more relevant for advertisers,” Paul Sweeney, an analyst with Bloomberg Intelligence, said from New York.
 The company made a merger proposal last week to CSX Corp.
 A bill submitted in the House by Levin would deny the tax benefit of inversions after May 8 to companies that merge with a foreign company, unless the foreign company’s shareholders end up with more than 50 percent of the combined company.
 canceled its merger with QLT Inc, a Vancouver-based biotechnology company, which would have shifted its legal address to Canada.
 Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd, based in Raleigh, North Carolina, also terminated a $27 billion merger agreement with Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA.
 “Signs of distortion might have re-emerged in the tradedata,” Xu Gao, chief economist at Everbright Securities, saidin a note yesterday.
 The jump in exports to Hong Kong coincided with renewedappreciation of China’s currency, triggering “concerns thatspeculative trade flows to ride on RMB appreciation could havereemerged,” economists led by Liu Li-Gang at ANZ Bank wrote.
 The re-emergence of fake invoices might be attributed tothe Shanghai-Hong Kong Stock Connect, which is set to be rolledout soon, attracting overseas capital, analysts at Bank ofCommunications led by Lian Ping said in a note yesterday.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian Pacific Railway Ltd’s megamerger ambition may whet the industry’s appetite for deals.
 Long discussed by the railroad industry, east-west mergers haven’t gone forward in the face of regulatory opposition.
 “An end-to-end merger, which essentially is what this would be, would give the rail system the ability to improve service levels dramatically,” Donald Broughton, a St.
 Each one could use a takeover of Norfolk Southern to form their own transcontinental railroads, should a merger between Canadian Pacific and CSX force them to “scramble to match the scale and pricing power of their peers,” Seidl wrote.
 That combination has similar appeal -- from both a strategic and regulatory perspective -- as a merger of Canadian Pacific and CSX.
 mergers and acquisitions, trailing only non-cyclical consumer businesses such as food and drugs, the data show.
 Shrinking Market If fewer CLOs are raised, “the loan market could shrink, new structures may emerge, or retail and institutional investors would have to increase market share,” Wells Fargo analysts Dave Preston and Jason McNeilis wrote in an Oct.
 Following it up with a large merger could be challenging, he said.
 “Typically, we see failure with these giant mergers-of-equals,” Noland said.
 Treasury announcement include Auxilium Pharmaceuticals Inc’s planned merger with Canadian biotechnology company QLT Ltd.
 Among its successes is SPOT, an emergency beacon that resulted in 3,000 rescues of lost or injured hikers and boaters in the past 7 years, according to Globalstar.
 “This is a high-end market we have been trying to get into for a very long time” Samsung Engineering will merge with Samsung Heavy Industries Co, the world’s third-largest shipyard, by December to effectively compete with companies such as Technip SA and Saipem SpA.
 Combination Benefits The merger will help combine Samsung Heavy’s offshore expertise and Samsung Engineering’s project management knowhow to minimize risks of cost overruns, Samsung Heavy’s Chief Financial Officer Chun Tae Heung said last month.
 The emergence of a 400 million-person middle class in China “is starting to make a difference” Rial said.
 “Australia is on the radar for activists,” Jonathon Mant, UBS AG’s head of mergers and acquisitions for Australia, said in an interview.
 The companies partially offset that with a combined 9 percent rise in revenue from investment banking in the first half, led by gains in equity underwriting and advising on mergers.
 Mestrallet took the helm at GDF Suez after the utility was created in July 2008 from a merger between Suez SA and state-controlled Gaz de France SA.
 Standard General emerged as a potential savior for the retailer in August, when Bloomberg reported that the hedge fund was in financing talks.
 EMC’s board has been considering strategic options, including a spinoff, and held talks about a merger with Hewlett-Packard Co.
 “The radical, and ultimately positive, solution would be to de-merge the investment bank” Chief Executive Officer Antony Jenkins, 53, has set up a bad bank to sell off assets, including some complex derivatives from the investment bank, and has cut jobs from the securities unit to make the lender more profitable.
 Deal Uncertainty “The merger has strong odds of approval, although negative headlines will likely persist for a while and concessions might be more costly than some initially hoped,” Jonathan Chaplin, an analyst at New Street Research, said today in a note to clients.
 “It’s been a big factor on why the shares have been underperformers this year” Cord Cutting For Comcast, the merger is, in part, being motivated by the falling number of Americans paying for TV.
 “We continue to work towards completion of the demerger in the first half of the 2015 calendar year” BHP said last month it was considering the listing in London following meetings with UK.
 A final board decision on the demerger will only be made once the necessary approvals are secured on satisfactory terms, BHP said today.
 The bank must “immediately” increase capital to the minimums required in a 2012 consent order or submit a contingency plan for the sale, merger or liquidation of the bank, according to the filing.
 The figures raised expectations in Greece that the country would be able to use its bank recapitalization fund to support the government’s efforts to emerge from its own bailout.
 The merged company will be the leader in the medication management sector, offering a “one-stop-shop” option for hospitals looking to improve efficiency, said Vijay Kumar, an analyst with ISI Group LLC in New York, in a note to clients.
 Deal Boom “There has never been so much merger and acquisition activity in the medical technology industry,” said Jason McGorman, an analyst at Bloomberg Intelligence in Princeton, New Jersey, in a text message.
 Activist shareholder Starboard Value LP, is seeking to break up the company and explore a possible merger with AOL Inc.
 A person familiar with the talks has said the idea to spin off Hewlett-Packard’s printers and PCs businesses came up in those merger discussions with EMC.
 About half of the companies on the list have had a “significant liquidity event,” including 40 that held initial public offerings and 23 were involved in mergers and acquisitions, Atomico.
 maker of bone implants, will merge with Tornier NV, creating a new company valued at $33 billion in the latest proposed tax inversion since tighter rules were announced last month.
 and AT&T Inc’s acquisition of DirecTV are the two largest US-based mergers and acquisitions this year, totaling more than $130 billion including debt.
 Another, called random forests, invented in 2001 by Leo Breiman at the University of California, Berkeley, and Adele Cutler at Utah State University, places borrowers in groups with no preset characteristics and looks for patterns to emerge.
 The findings of the algorithms are merged into a score from zero to 100.
 He was initially sent home from Texas Health Presbyterian Hospital Dallas’s emergency room on Sept.
 Kinder’s consolidation push doesn’t amount to an “amendment of the partnership agreement by merger,” Joseph Allerhand, one of the company’s lawyers, told Laster at the hearing today.
 Once the merger of the partnerships with the parent is completed, the resulting firm will be the largest energy infrastructure company in North America with an 80,000-mile (129,000 kilometer) network of pipes that together would be long enough to circle the Earth three times.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA’s second-largest investor, Marco Fossati, supports a merger of the carrier’s Brazilian unit Tim Participacoes SA with Oi SA to help boost revenue in the biggest Latin American market.
 “From a industrial perspective Tim Brasil-Oi’s merger makes a lot of sense,” Fossati said yesterday in a telephone interview.
 said exploratory talks have ended on a possible merger with CSX Corp.
 Chief Executive Officer Hunter Harrison scheduled a conference call tomorrow after the company’s third-quarter earnings report to discuss mergers and acquisitions.
 In floating the idea of a merger with CSX, Harrison upended the long-held view in the industry that it was fruitless to even discuss another merger because regulators would object.
 regulators would be “very concerned” by the merger.
 rules for cross-border deals will kill Burger King Worldwide Inc’s merger with Tim Hortons Inc.
 Treasury’s September notice about tightening rules to make such mergers more difficult.
 “When you’re putting on the spread, and you can’t find that short, because of the float or the cost of that short, your alternative is basically to be short via options,” Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co, said by telephone.
 and resumed trading after completing a merger with a company co-founded by Bill Ackman.
 A rival bidder for PanAust may yet emerge, though they might have to offer as much as A$3 a share to convince Guangdong Rising to part with its stake, according to Trivett at Patersons.
 EMC has also held talks about a merger with Hewlett-Packard Co, which stalled over disagreements on price, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Barrick Gold Corp, which attempted to merge with a rival this year, says it’s likely to become “boring” as it seeks to improve its performance amid a faltering gold price.
 Chief Executive Officer Hunter Harrison, having scrapped one attempt at a merger, renewed his plea for a final round of consolidation in an industry shrunk by three decades of deal making.
 Long discussed by the railroad industry, east-west mergers haven’t gone forward in the face of regulatory opposition.
 regulators would have blocked a merger with CSX.
 The figures raised expectations in Greece that the country would be able to use its bank recapitalization fund to support the government’s efforts to emerge from its own bailout.
 Standard General Standard General emerged as a potential savior for the retailer in August, when Bloomberg reported that the hedge fund was in financing talks.
 dropped the 29-year-old American after the pipe smoking picture emerged.
 Based in Singapore, Sitohang has been with Credit Suisse for 16 years and has been involved in around $150 billion of mergers and acquisitions and capital raisings across the globe, according to the bank.
 Some advisers started encouraging investors earlier this year to diversify away from Pimco, after the first signals of management upheaval emerged.
 The merger plan is comprised of $40 billion in parent-company equity, $4 billion in cash and $27 billion in assumed debt, according to a presentation posted on Kinder’s website in August.
 employee, Clive Goodman, went to prison in 2007 after pleading guilty to phone hacking when the practice first emerged.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Italy paid the most since May to sell six-month debt at a bill auction today amid concerns a fall in bank lending will make it difficult for the country to emerge from its longest slump since World War II.
 In the year since the ECB began its assessment, some bank crises have emerged precipitously, such as at Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo SA.
 His center-right government is in the midst of an unprecedented push to build public infrastructure -- and to finance the program, regional authorities are busy selling off state assets, creating a boon for bankers just as Australian corporate mergers and acquisitions slow.
 mergers may be coming to a shopping mall near you.
 Rio Tinto added 08 percent after rejecting a merger approach from Glencore Plc, paring earlier gains of as much as 62 percent after Glencore said it is no longer considering the bid.
 Glencore Approach Rio, which said last week it had rejected a merger approach from Glencore Plc, rose 04 percent to A$6099 in Sydney trading, trimming its decline this year to 11 percent.
 South African-born Davis, 56, is looking to repeat his success at Xstrata, where he led the management team that took the coal producer from a company with a $500 million market capitalization to one valued at $50 billion through a decade of mergers, acquisitions and expansion.
 District Judge Alvin Hellerstein in Manhattan today that he got information about biotechnology mergers and acquisitions from the ex-classmate at Rutgers Business School during a two-year scheme.
 14 with illegally passing merger information to a business school friend, helping him reap about $722,000 in illicit profits.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer and architect of the merger that created Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, rang the closing bell on the New York Stock Exchange last week to mark the company’s debut.
 That includes treasury shares and Fiat stock bought back during the merger process.
 The company wants to sell more products from smallerAmerican producers into China, and it’s too early to think ofbuying other companies or considering mergers, Ma said.
 Apple’s emergence in the payment space with Apple Pay is likely to mean Gemalto will face more competition to secure mobile payments, analysts at Morgan Stanley and Exane said this month.
 “Tesla has emerged as a serious competitor with the Model S outselling the old S-Class in the US.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Kevin Counihan, the new chief executive officer of healthcaregov, expects Obamacare will become so user-friendly that “raving fans” will emerge for the US.
 Earnings before interest and taxes rose to 926 million euros ($118 billion) from 862 million euros a year earlier, the company that was formed from the merger of Italy’s Fiat and US.
 Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne merged Fiat and Chrysler into the world’s seventh-largest carmaker to better compete with auto-industry leaders such as General Motors Co, Volkswagen AG and Toyota Motor Corp.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA will look at Novo Banco SA after more information about the bank that emerged from the breakup of Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo SA is made available, Chief Executive Officer Javier Marin said.
 to Europe, the increase means “cross-border deals have become the norm rather than the exception,” said Gilberto Pozzi, head of mergers and acquisitions at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 The pickup could also find itself cut short if borrowing costs rise, or by the emergence of weaker-than-expected economic growth.
 The merger would lessen competition for broadcast television spot advertising without the divestitures, the Justice Department’s antitrust division said in a statement today.
 Ergen might irk Son by pursuing T-Mobile because Japan’s SoftBank owns 80 percent of wireless carrier Sprint Corp, which Son tried to merge with T-Mobile.
 Glasenberg approached Rio in July about a merger, and the London-based company rejected the idea a month later.
 The $160 billion entity created by the merger would usurp BHP Billiton Ltd.
 The merged entity’s net debt, including Glencore’s trading inventories, to trailing 12-month Ebitda ratio is 23 compared with 5 for the Swiss company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “There is a chance that a merger between Rio Tinto and Glencore may go ahead in the long term, given just how much sense it makes,” Investec Plc analysts led by Marc Elliott wrote Oct.
 “A merger would strengthen Glencore’s balance sheet and deliver greater diversification to Rio Tinto’s shareholders from what has become a largely iron ore miner” Through a series of deals over the last decade, South African-born Glasenberg has transformed Glencore from a little-known commodity-trading firm into a diversified global mining group.
 “In terms of a merger of equals, is it good for Glencore? It’s pretty fantastic.
 The Ebitda of the merged group would be $31 billion, almost triple that of Glencore.
 That such a merger would even be attempted speaks to the pressure the industry is under to cut costs and increase shareholder value amid declining prices for commodities.
 In the past, “we have had that kind of one action precipitate a whole cascade of events that puts a number of other guys in play” Glencore approached Rio in July about a merger, and Rio rejected the idea a month later.
 Elephants in Bed Still, Rio CEO Sam Walsh has said there are difficulties to a merger between his company and Glencore.
 “Rio shareholders are not going to stomach a nil-premium merger, or even a reverse takeover with a significant premium.
 Weakening global growth has also emerged as a threat.
 Lenders in the region have also booked rising fee income from a pick up in mergers and acquisitions and share sales.
 The agreement to cooperate with Pemex is “a positive first step in clinching possible development opportunities” that emerge from changes in Mexico’s energy laws, Jared Dziuba, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets, wrote in a research report.
 Companies also struck $23 trillion of mergers and acquisitions worldwide, a seven-year high.
 Analysts also say that either of Hewlett-Packard’s divisions may find merger partners.
 “The demerged entities often are attractive acquisition candidates or consolidation vehicles in their own right” Coffee, Sausages This year marked the second anniversary of the Sara Lee Corp.
 They may spur additional deals, according to Roger Barron, a London-based partner at law firm Linklaters LLP who advises on mergers and acquisitions.
 Any of those potential scenarios would extend this year’s merger boom, which has engulfed drugmakers, cable providers, food producers and tobacco companies alike.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA, the Italian drugmaker that ended a pact to merge with Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 Under Cosmo’s abandoned merger pact with Salix, the US.
 The SFO is under pressure after a series of failed cases led some politicians to call for the agency to be merged with other investigators.
 “We may see the emergence of a new breed of zombie refineries” as trader involvement in the industry increases, Halff said.
 While Portugal emerged from recession in 2013, Prime Minister Pedro Passos Coelho still has to cut spending to meet budget targets after relying mostly on tax increases last year.
 Kindred said it will cut $1 billion in costs from the merged business, which it expects to have about $71 billion in annual revenue.
 agreed to a three-way merger valued at 725 billion ringgit ($223 billion) that creates the nation’s largest bank by assets.
 Intro had planned to keep VLM and also looked at adding two 100-seat jets before the management-buyout plan emerged, he said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Tinto Group fell in Sydney after Glencore Plc abandoned a merger bid to create the world’s largest miner.
 Eleven websites of Hong Kong businesses were defaced yesterday by hackers who injected the the logo “OpHongKong hosted by Anonymous,” the Hong Kong Computer Emergency Response Team Coordination Centre said in an e-mailed statement.
 “The brokerage will probably expand its equity capital markets and mergers and acquisition advisory operations considerably, depending on market conditions” Revenue rose 52 percent last quarter from a year earlier to 4508 billion yen, Tokyo-based Nomura said.
 The firm is fourth among financial advisers for mergers and acquisitions in Japan, the same spot it held last year, the data show.
 “If all augurs well, Reliance will again emerge as a leader after several years” Group profit rose to 597 billion rupees in the three months ended Sept.
 The merger, announced in February, is still under review by the US.
 Regulators are trying to ensure that the merger won’t harm competition or consumers, including giving the combined company too much leverage in programming negotiations or allowing it to interfere with Internet traffic.
 are among at least four companies that received demands for information about the merger from the Justice Department to help determine whether the acquisition is anticompetitive, Bloomberg News reported last month, citing people familiar with the matter.
 State regulators are also probing the merger, with the New York Public Service Commission, which has the power to reject the deal, set to vote on the matter Nov.
 slipped 15 percent after ending merger talks with CSX Corp.
 Sweden’s banks have emerged as the best capitalized major lenders in Europe, measured by core Tier 1 ratios, amid stricter local requirements.
 It merged with Provident New York Bancorp last year.
 Investors Trust The supervisory board accepted Libicki’s resignation and “acknowledged the fact the group’s goals and strategy remain unchanged, while the differences emerged over the ways of their implementation,” Cyfrowy said in a statement late yesterday.
 The resignation wasn’t linked to any acquisition or merger transaction and “one shouldn’t read more into it,” Solorz-Zak said in an e-mailed response to Bloomberg News questions today.
 The value of announced mergers and acquisitions worldwide climbed 19 percent to $6594 billion in the third quarter from a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Future inversions will probably involve mergers in which tax savings play a much smaller role, said Edward Tanenbaum, a partner at Alston & Bird LLP in New York.
 “This fight requires a commitment from every nation that has the capacity to help –- whether that is with emergency funds, medical supplies or clinical expertise,” Johnson-Sirleaf said.
 A merger would have created a producer with leading positions in coal, iron ore and copper worth $160 billion, usurping BHP Billiton Ltd.
 “It’s not entirely clear that there are ready-made successors to them amongst the next level of management” Rio said this month it had rejected a merger approach from Glencore.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Two regional Danish lenders were forced to announce their merger plans before completing all the details after a thief stole a briefcase that contained documents outlining the plans.
 The banks had consulted the Danish Supervisory Authority for guidelines after the documents were stolen yesterday from a car owned by one of the people involved in the merger talks.
 “There has been a dramatic wave of consolidation in the industry and not always on a happy background, but this merger is definitely a happy one,” Hvolby said.
 The banks will hire an outside consultant to evaluate the pricing of the lenders to be used in the merger.
 Regulators are working to complete a plan to merge the Ho Chi Minh City and Hanoi Stock Exchanges, according to Son.
 The argument matters because opponents say the $452 billion merger would result in a company with so large a market share it could squelch competition.
 “The merger becomes intolerable if you understand that” The merger would combine the nation’s biggest and second biggest cable providers and the Federal Communications Commission is reviewing whether it is in the public interest.
 Although monopolies aren’t illegal in the US, the Justice Department could block the merger or require conditions if it finds the deal is likely to lessen competition.
 Investors are increasingly are uncertain about the merger’s prospects, and “that concern is directionally correct,” Paul Gallant, Washington-based managing director for Guggenheim Securities, said in an Oct.
 “We continue to give the edge to merger approval” in part because the FCC may want to use the deal to impose conditions, such as open-Internet requirements to treat Web traffic fairly, Gallant wrote.
 Applying the higher speed to the merger review may be unfair because the idea hasn’t been processed through normal channels, said Lawrence Spiwak, president of the Phoenix Center, a Washington-based group that says it provides independent assessments of regulatory policy.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Evercore Partners Inc, the merger-advisory firm founded by Roger Altman, reported profit that beat analysts’ estimates as investment-banking revenue increased.
 Global merger transactions increased 29 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier to about $886 billion, driven in part by European companies buying US.
 JDS Uniphase was created in 1999 through the $705 billion merger of two companies, Uniphase Corp.
 More than 25 traders, including Citigroup’s Rohan Ramchandani, have been fired, suspended or put on leave since allegations of currency-benchmark manipulation emerged last year.
 “It would be a classic kind of defensive move by the board” Speculation about mining deals has intensified this week after Rio and Glencore, two of the industry’s biggest companies, confirmed Glencore’s informal approach about a possible merger.
 While Glencore could turn to alternative targets in the industry, a merger with Rio would create the world’s largest mining company, with a market value of about $160 billion.
 A Rio-Freeport merger may face antitrust scrutiny.
 In October 2013, San Carlos declared a state of emergency after discovering e-mails from PG&E inspectors who had raised concerns about the safety of the pipeline.
 By contrast, Morgan Stanley probably had the biggest increase in revenue from advising on mergers and underwriting stock and bond deals, the estimates show.
 While markets lulled by Federal Reserve intervention have crimped trading, investment bankers have fared better amid a surge in mergers and issuance of debt and stock.
 Investment bankers working on mergers and acquisitions made $350,000 to $500,000 at the vice-president level, with outliers pulling in at least $750,000.
 Ligi, 55, who steered Estonia’s public finances as the country emerged from a record recession in 2009 and enforced austerity to meet terms for euro entry in 2011, is “a professional” and “set the bar very high as finance minister,” Roivas said on public television yesterday.
 Bernanke said he didn’t recall whether there was any discussion during a September 2008 Board of Governors meeting about whether Fed emergency lending provisions allowed the terms to include taking equity.
 ‘Loophole Lawyering’ A note from Thomas Baxter, the general counsel of the New York Fed, to Geithner stated that “we in New York” have a more expansive view of what the central bank can do under an “incidental powers” section of the law but that some officials at the Federal Reserve Board of Governors “see our conduct as loophole lawyering” Baxter testified earlier in the trial that those “incidental powers” included the ability to authorize demands for equity as a condition of emergency lending.
 Court of Federal Claims Judge Thomas Wheeler, who is trying the case without a jury, said he was inclined to grant Starr broad access to opinions about emergency lending that might bear on demands for equity, even those generated decades ago.
 When Valeant in April announced it wanted to negotiate a merger with Allergan, the value of Pershing Square’s Allergan investment increased by a billion dollars, according to the Aug.
 The severity of market swings this month also boosts the risk that banks will incur losses while facilitating client bets, and it may slow mergers and acquisitions.
 A jump in mergers and acquisitions, which generates fees for banks providing financial advice, “has probably peaked,” he said.
 Pilots want to retain the ability to troubleshoot electrical devices in the cockpit so they can better manage emergencies occasionally leading to airborne fires, Sean Cassidy, vice president of ALPA, said in an interview.
 is working on systems capable of sending bursts of data in emergencies, so investigators won’t have to wait until locating an aircraft’s crash-proof recorders, according to Mark Smith, an accident investigator at the Chicago-based manufacturer.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Glenview Capital Management LLC, the $98 billion hedge-fund firm run by Larry Robbins, acquired a stake in Actavis Plc, according to a person familiar with the matter, betting on a merger with other large pharmaceutical companies such as Allergan Inc.
 Blackstone is separating the division, which advises on mergers and corporate restructurings, and also includes fund-services business Park Hill Group, to reduce conflicts of interest with its money-management business.
 Miller, who joins as a shareholder, represents health-care providers in corporate and regulatory matters, including joint ventures, mergers and acquisitions, entity formation and private-placement securities offerings.
 The price AbbVie agreed to pay for Shire was the highest that it was able to offer, and the loss of some tax benefits and the related prospect of having to borrow more for the merger have eroded its attractiveness, the people said.
 Treasury Rules The merger would be the largest casualty yet of rules announced last month by the Treasury Department to make tax inversion deals more difficult.
 AbbVie began a comprehensive review of the merger after Treasury Secretary Jack Lew announced the measures, people with knowledge of the matter said last month, including the prospect of borrowing as much as $7 billion more than it initially anticipated.
 “I’m shaking” As it emerged, it was one man, identified as Michael Zehaf-Bibeau, who was able to shoot Corporal Nathan Cirillo to death at the war memorial in the Canadian capital and then get inside a parliament building, where he fired several times before he was himself shot to death.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- South Africa’s gold miners are ready for mergers and acquisitions as the falling price of bullion forces companies to cut costs and repay debt.
 Dollar Tree, based in Chesapeake, Virginia, has said it’s ready to divest as many stores as necessary to complete a merger with Family Dollar.
 10, its proposed merger with Family Dollar is being reviewed by the FTC as well.
 The firm’s credit, merger and recovery funds also lost money last month as markets were rattled by concerns that global economic growth was slowing.
 The merger funds, which bet on companies involved in takeovers, posted smaller losses, with the Paulson Partners fund down 02 percent last month, as telecommunications and energy positions detracted from gains in health care, to pare gains to 49 percent this year.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Sergio Marchionne, Fiat SpA’s chief executive officer and the architect of its merger with Chrysler, sees potential to create a new No.
 Marchionne, who plans to retire after implementing a strategic plan due to run through 2018, is one of the few executives to pull off a recent merger in the auto industry.
 Shares Gain The level of competition, capital needs and cyclical nature of the auto industry should force more mergers and acquisitions, said Richard Hilgert, a Morningstar Inc.
 Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, the entity being created from the merger with its US.
 Not Selling “There is always talk of mergers in this industry and obviously given the research and development costs that are being faced to meet new regulations, it certainly would make sense to some degree,” said Ian Fletcher, an IHS analyst in London.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian Pacific Railway Ltd, spurned in a bid to merge with CSX Corp, reported its most-efficient operations ever last quarter while working to untangle lingering track congestion.
 Calgary-based Canadian Pacific said yesterday exploratory talks on a possible merger with CSX to form a transcontinental railroad have ended, while signaling it will keep pushing for consolidation.
 Railroad mergers would also help improve industry efficiency in bottlenecked rail junctions such as Chicago, Harrison has said.
 28, after being initially sent home two days earlier from the emergency room with antibiotics.
 Craig Spencer, a 33-year-old New York City emergency-room doctor, tested positive for Ebola Oct.
 The phone app helped reduce reporting times that would normally take 12 hours by half initially, then 75 percent, before becoming almost real time, according to Daniel Tom-Aba, senior data manager at the Ebola Emergency Operation Centre in Lagos.
 “We’re managing about $14 million of private foundation funds to support emergency operations” The main lessons in Nigeria were the importance of fast communication and instant tracking.
 Tablet Scans Laboratory technicians conducting tests were given tablets to scan and upload results to the emergency center data base.
 Triebel said the company can avoid the controversy that’s surrounded other so-called payday lenders, which offer short-term emergency cash to customers at higher interest rates, because they provide loans only to small businesses and not individuals.
 The company, formed from the merger of Italy’s Fiat and US.
 or merge with similar-sized peer Actavis Plc.
 Chain Reaction Allergan’s fate has implications for some $600 billion of companies with deals in the works across the pharmaceutical industry because all of the pending mergers have become entangled.
 carrier last week was said to rebuff merger talks with Canadian Pacific Railway Ltd.
 “I might speculate that they would be very cautious about this because” past mergers have “created disruptions and the industry is already slowed down” CSX, the biggest railroad in the eastern US, rejected an offer by Canadian Pacific to combine into a transcontinental railroad, people familiar with the matter have said.
 “That is the positive of the new energy environment we’re finding ourselves in” Eliasson said he feels “pretty bullish about where the economy is heading and also some sector trends that seem to be benefiting the railroad industry” He declined to comment about a potential merger between CSX and Canadian Pacific.
 Harris said the California governor’s Office of Emergency Services and the state Transportation Department determined that information about the specific characteristics of the crude moved by rail “are not protected trade secrets and should be publicly released” The attorney general said these issues “must be addressed and corrected” before the City Council of Benecia takes action on the draft environmental impact report.
 The emergence of a PML case is not “a huge surprise nor should it substantially change Tecfidera use or adoption patterns,” Abrahams wrote.
 The travel company is seeking to gain investor approval for an all-share merger with parent TUI AG.
 Shareholders are “very positive” about the merger plans, Long said.
 “They sought emergency powers from Congress at the earliest time they thought Congress would approve them, recognizing how devastating it would be to the market if Congress voted it down, which the House did the first time,” Claire Buchan Parker, a spokeswoman for Paulson, said in a statement.
 “We have strong experience and capabilities in mergers and acquisitions,” he said, declining to identify markets or industries in which it’s seeking targets.
 He said a provision shielding Hewlett-Packard managers from blame for an $88 billion writedown connected to the merger was “staggering in its breadth” The company said in a filing yesterday it had narrowed the scope of that release and argued that the judge should now approve the settlement.
 terminated their talks to merge and create the world’s largest maker of nitrogen-based fertilizer.
 Yara last week ousted Chief Executive Officer Joergen Ole Haslestad for not being the “right person” to lead the merger negotiations.
 The Treasury Department announced its crackdown on tax inversions the day before CF and Yara said they were in talks about a “merger of equals” The CF-Yara deal “was a head-scratcher from the get-go,” Gulley, who recommends buying CF and doesn’t have a rating on Yara, said by phone yesterday.
 Political parties representing a majority of the country’s parliament supported the idea of spending state money to keep the stake in the merged company at more than 34 percent.
 Self-driving vehicles will start to emerge over the next six years and will evolve to become increasingly smarter and more autonomous, research firm Gartner Inc.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Hedge funds bruised by wrong-way bets on AbbVie Inc’s failed merger with Shire Plc are showing few signs the trauma was permanent.
 taxes would turn around and bet on a similar transaction shows how competitive merger arbitragers have become in seeking big paydays.
 The fear that went around is starting to go away” The AbbVie-Shire merger was the biggest casualty of rules announced by the Treasury Department to limit inversions, where US.
 The shares fell as much as 17 percent, the most since a merger with T-Mobile US Inc.
 Claure, who was named CEO after SoftBank’s failed attempt to merge Sprint with T-Mobile, has since set out to dramatically reduce expenses and offer competitive plan prices.
 “Schibsted and Naspers will merge their classified sites in several geographies with each party taking control in different markets,” Andrew Ross, an analyst at Barclays, said in a note today.
 (BZGDQOQ%) The country’s economy in the third quarter may haveemerged from its first recession in five years.
 Those who left included the chief operating officer, chief information officer, chief risk officer and mergers and acquisitions head, people with knowledge of the situation said at the time.
 Their $40 billion merger will couple Lafarge’s African cement plants with Holcim’s Asian assets, two regions where building is expected to boom over the next decades.
 Holcim and Lafarge will sell units to make sure regulators approve the planned merger.
 Mexican competitor Cemex SAB already said it won’t submit an offer for any assets that may become available from the merger.
 They have pledged to complete the merger in the first half of next year.
 AstraZeneca, which rejected a $117 billion bid from Pfizer in May, is relying on revenue from its best-selling products Crestor and Nexium as it waits for new blockbuster drugs to emerge from its pipeline.
 The billionaire investor has called for the replacement of Allergan board members opposed to a merger.
 The company, whose history dates back more than 200 years, merged in 2010 with a cigar and pipe tobacco business of Swedish Match, and is the world’s largest manufacturer of cigars and pipe tobacco, according to its website.
 1 ranked Russian merger adviser last year, is among banks that are taking the EU to court over sanctions.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank assuming supervision of the euro area’s biggest lenders paves the way for mergers and acquisitions within the industry, Deutsche Bank AG co-Chief Executive Officer Anshu Jain said.
 scrapped their $35 billion merger in May, Omnicom shareholders are coming out ahead.
 Different Directions The companies agreed to a merger in July 2013.
 Levy responded by saying the Publicis staff was committed to the merger, while Omnicom probably “didn’t believe very much in the merger” This week, Publicis announced the Sapient purchase, saying it will help the company reach a target of generating half of its sales from digital offerings three years ahead of schedule.
 They’ve done some of the biggest, splashiest acquisitions over the past six years” When asked in May whether Omnicom was looking at doing any other large deals, CEO John Wren said it would be a “very long time” before he tries to do a merger-of-equals again.
 As part of that evaluation, the company has considered spinning off or selling VMware and held talks about a merger with Hewlett-Packard Co, a discussion that stalled over price, the people said.
 Sessions said in a statement the “immediate emergency”facing Republicans is Obama’s “disastrous planned actions” onimmigration.
 The company’s $15 billion of notes due 2022 tumbled by the most in five weeks yesterday after interim Chief Executive Office Bayard Gontijo said Oi is evaluating whether to make a takeover bid for Tim Participacoes SA and that it’s also open to a possible merger.
 “This is definitely not good from the credit perspective” In an e-mailed statement, Oi’s press office declined to comment on the performance of the company’s bonds or its merger and acquisition plans.
 “My objective is to create shareholder value, so I don’t have and won’t have any prejudice in how we’re going to do that,” he said during a conference call with analysts yesterday when asked whether Oi could merge with Tim.
 The other action filed last month is for recalled vehiclesthat were purchased before GM emerged from bankruptcy.
 Morethan 90 percent of those were built before the company emergedfrom bankruptcy.
 Hotspot Animal nutrition is a current hotspot for mergers and acquisitions, drawing on growing global needs for foods amid limited resources such as water.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- OPEC’s refusal yesterday to cut output and slow the drop in oil prices signals opportunities for mergers and acquisitions among energy companies.
 In 1998, when oil slumped to about $10 a barrel after the Asian financial crisis, the value of mergers and acquisitions surged more than seven times to a combined $376 billion in that year and the next, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Increased mergers and acquisitions seems to be the trend in the previous low oil price cycles,” said Duke Suttikulpanich, a Singapore-based oil and gas analyst at Standard Chartered Bank.
 They rebounded by 26 percent during 2011 and 2012 as the world emerged from the crisis.
 As oil prices recovered, oil, gas and pipeline mergers and acquisitions fell 14 percent to $575 billion since 2013 compared with the previous two years, according to the data.
 “Neither UBS nor KWL emerges with credit from this saga,” Males wrote in a 325-page decision.
 Hearts on Fire Chow Tai Fook is very cautious with mergers and acquisitions, and is only exploring the mine purchases, Cheng said.
 race to infuse more technology into everyday devices, potential risks are beginning to emerge.
 “Will they stay separate? Will they merge? Will they merge vertically?” European banks outside of Germany have higher price-to-book ratios because those countries have already consolidated their banking sectors, he said.
 In 2013, the fund hired Michael Cho, a former co-head of Asia mergers and acquisitions at Bank of America Corp, to help lead its dealmaking.
 The transaction, the largest in the pharmaceutical industry this year, took place against a backdrop of one of the busiest merger-and-acquisition environments in the history of the industry.
 and two European drugmakers struck the merger that created Aventis SA.
 and BP Plc on mergers and acquisitions.
 The merger of US.
 China’s State Council ordered the merger CSR and CNR into one company, government officials involved in the transaction said last month.
 had to call off a proposed merger with Samsung Engineering Co.
 Event-driven hedge funds invest in securities affected by corporate events such as mergers, acquisitions and spinoffs.
 Billionaire John Paulson’s event-driven hedge fund lost 14 percent in October, extending this year’s drop to 25 percent, after drugmaker Shire’s $52 billion merger with AbbVie was scrapped.
 Expanding Mines Glencore, which proposed a merger with Rio Tinto Group in July, reported earlier this month that it increased coal output by 92 percent to 402 million tons in the third quarter, driven by expansion at energy coal mines in Australia.
 in merger advice and bond underwriting.
 Of announced mergers and acquisitions valued at $1 billion or more -- a metric closely tracked by top Wall Street banks -- Jefferies has advised on 17 this year through October, trailing Goldman Sachs’s 120 and Citigroup’s 79.
 “Companies with a diversified, healthy food portfolio will emerge as the winners” The numbers already point that way.
 The emergence of the discounters is fueling price deflation, exacerbating the market’s difficulties.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- A team of Dutch investigators and members of the Ukraine emergency services recovered human remains, personal possessions and wreckage from Malaysian Airline System Bhd.
 An analysis of the plane’s voice recorder revealed no warning in the cockpit, and no emergency was declared by the crew before the flight “ended abruptly,” the report published in September said.
 Airlines are emerging from years of mergers and losses, rising expenses and high fuel costs, so they’ll pocket any savings to keep “paying the bills,” John Heimlich, chief economist for the trade group Airlines for America, said in a call with reporters Nov.
 “They just went through six years of multi-megamergers and dividing the country up by city with little or no competition, so they’ll pocket whatever difference they may get for a while” Car Sales Gasoline’s drop will save the average US.
 Dealmaking Experience Hannam’s presentation dwelled heavily on his dealmaking experience, describing the banker as “responsible” for the merger of BHP Ltd.
 takeover rules from a bid until April, made the statement after Bloomberg News reported it was laying the groundwork for a potential merger in the next year.
When Wall Street banker Antonio Weiss picked up the phone and called a Canadian chief executiveofficer in March, he precipitated an $11 billion merger -- and apolitical problem for himself as he tries to win confirmation asPresident Barack Obama’s latest appointment to the Treasury.
 (THI), led to a deal to merge the coffee-and-donuts chainwith Burger King Worldwide Inc.
 A native New Yorker, Weiss has had a busy year of mergersand acquisitions.
 Weiss’s largest-ever transaction was the $60 billion dealin 2008 to merge Lemann’s Inbev NV (ABI) with iconic American brewerAnheuser-Busch Cos, creating the world’s largest beer producer.
 as the French advertising company works to bolster its digital-technology edge after a failed merger attempt with Omnicom Group Inc, the Wall Street Journal said.
 Publicis’s planned $35 billion merger with Omnicom, which would have created the world’s largest advertising company, was abandoned in May after executives clashed over how to run the combined entity.
 While an emergency operation was successful in removing her fetus alive, the baby died in an intensive care unit on July 29, the paper reported.
 Braemar Shipping Services and ACM Shipping Group, which merged in July, had combined revenues of about $241 million, according to their most recent financial reports.
 Schlumberger’s international sales of $83 billion in the third quarter, more than double that of a stand-alone Halliburton, would outstrip a combined Halliburton-Baker Hughes by less than one third if a merger happened.
 merged with Baker International in 1987.
 He represents secured and unsecured creditors, official and ad-hoc committees, investors and other parties in bankruptcy proceedings, out-of-court restructurings, commercial litigation, financing and distressed mergers and acquisitions.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Samsung Group suffered a setback when shareholders thwarted the conglomerate’s plan to merge its shipbuilding and engineering units.
 said yesterday they’ll shelve plans to merge after too many investors chose to get cash payouts -- 16 trillion won ($14 billion) in total -- instead of shares in the combined entity.
 “They will try again to merge, but with better terms that will satisfy shareholders on both sides,” said Chang Sea Jin, author of the 2008 book “Sony Vs Samsung” and a professor at the National University of Singapore.
 “This shows that the voices of small investors are being heard by chaebols” Shares Plunge Samsung Heavy will carefully review market conditions and shareholders’ opinions if the companies reconsider another merger attempt, the company said in a statement.
 merged with LG Micron Ltd.
 “Samsung most likely will try again to merge the two units,” said Park Moo Hyun, an analyst at Hana Daetoo Securities Co.
 With share prices falling, they may actually succeed the second time” The merger between the Seoul-based companies was called off after failing to win shareholders’ confidence.
 Oil Prices The market hasn’t been in Samsung Heavy and Samsung Engineering’s favor after the merger was announced in September.
 In South Korea, a company can call off a merger should buyback requests reach a level that could increase its financial burden.
 “It wouldn’t be a surprise if we hear of this merger again in the next few months,” Park at Hana Daetoo said.
 I’m against power in business” After the bank’s privatization, as well as multiple mergers and acquisitions, Creditanstalt’s successor entity, Bank Austria AG, became a unit of Italy’s UniCredit SpA in 2005 and is still the biggest bank in eastern Europe.
 T-Mobile Interest Ergen contacted Deutsche Telekom AG two months ago to say he was interested in a future acquisition of its T-Mobile US unit after a deal to merge T-Mobile with Sprint Corp.
 “I worry about the emergence of a student loan ‘debt relief’ industry” High default rates and delinquencies have been a focus for Raskin, in part because they may damage Americans’ creditworthiness and curtail their ability to invest in homes and businesses.
 Dollar Tree, which is seeking to merge with Family Dollar Stores Inc, advanced 52 percent to $6587.
 Low Rates “We are very aware that financial stability risks can emerge during this period of low interest rates,” Zurbruegg said.
 market,” said Olivier Francois, head of marketing at London-based FCA, which was formed last month from the merger of Fiat and Chrysler.
 Hit List Carriers including Scandinavian Airlines, Alitalia SpA, Air Berlin Plc, TAP-Transportes Aereos Portugueses, the former Olympic Airlines SA of Greece and Ireland’s Aer Lingus Group Plc -- in which Ryanair has a stake -- are among those he says will shrink or merge, opening up new expansion opportunities.
 They’ve also been locked in a three-way merger battle with the industry’s other major chain, Dollar Tree Inc, which doesn’t sell tobacco.
 “From a regulatory point of view, they are more comfortable with merger activity” Bank acquisitions slowed after the 2008 credit crisis amid concerns that more lenders would become too big to fail.
 Profit, excluding merger costs could grow to as much as 29 billion francs ($3 billion) in 2015, Holcim said in a statement.
 The $40 billion merger will couple Lafarge’s African cement plants with Holcim’s Asian assets, to increase exposure to faster-growing regions while at the same time selling less dynamic European plants to get the deal past regulators.
 Drawing on his past experience of overhauling steelmaker Aperam, he implemented his so-called ‘‘Holcim Leadership Journey” He will help to integrate the two companies before Lafarge chief Bruno Lafont becomes head of the merged entity next year.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Tinto Group is under pressure to deliver on the chief executive officer’s promise to become a “cash machine” for investors as it justifies snubbing a merger approach from Glencore Plc.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- New Jersey Governor Chris Christie said the state is considering an emergency manager for Atlantic City, where four of 12 casinos have closed this year after being battered by out-of-state competition.
 “It has been reinforced by a Federal Reserve that always looks on the dark side to justify emergency policies” MainStay Marketfield, which started with $500,000 and was named after a street used as a Manhattan livestock market in the 17th century, invests in a range of assets such as stocks, bonds and commodities, seeking to profit from both rising and falling prices.
 Merger Arbitrage About half of the firm’s assets are in Paulson & Co’s merger-arbitrage funds and 25 percent is in the credit funds.
 holds a stake, plummeted in October after agreeing to terminate a merger with AbbVie Inc.
 empire, has emerged as the most-recommended stock in the oil industry.
 to sell assets as part of their planned merger may be complicated by a new cement factory in Canada that is pumping more capacity into an already saturated market, further depressing prices.
 Lafarge and Holcim need to dispose of operations worth as much as 7 billion euros ($88 billion) worldwide, people familiar with the matter have said, as the two companies seek regulatory approval to complete their $40 billion merger next year.
 “I can’t think of any other reason why they are coming after us with such fervor” Lafarge spokeswoman Christel des Royeries said by e-mail that the company “has opposed public funding for the McInnis cement project since 2013 when the issue of governmental subsidies first emerged,” adding that “our opposition to the project began long before any announcement related to our merger project” Markus Jaggi, a spokesman for Jona-based Holcim, declined to comment on “competitors’ actions or remarks” No final decision has been made in the legal challenge against the plant.
 While the new plant could reduce the proceeds of assets sales by Holcim and Lafarge in Canada, the project is unlikely to have an impact on the companies’ merger plans, according to analyst Osburn.
 Other hires have included bank mergers and acquisitions specialist Tannon Krumpelman from Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 A 25-year veteran of the airline industry, Tague boosted United’s revenue at a crucial juncture: just before it merged with Continental.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA Chief Executive Officer Maurice Levy said he will improve revenue growth after distractions from a failed merger led the French advertising company to cut its 2014 sales forecast.
 In May, Publicis abandoned a $35 billion merger with peer Omnicom Group Inc.
 Russia’s OAO Uralkali said today it evacuated theSolikamsk-2 mine and initiated an emergency plan after detectingan increased flow of brine.
 Balfour Beatty, which rejected a merger proposal from UK.
 “The company has been surrounded by different rumors related to possible mergers and acquisitions, issues related the exit of the chairman and now articles about the supposed leaving of Alejandro Valenzuela,” said Andres Audiffred, an analyst at Casa de Bolsa Ve Por Mas SA in Mexico City, who recommends buying Banorte with a price target of 108 pesos.
 7 statement that his push to join Banorte’s board didn’t stem from an agreement or effort to merge that bank and Interacciones, where his father remains chairman.
 23 that there’s no plan currently for a merger with Interacciones.
 “We have come to solve problems and we see a lot of potential in this company” The bonds, issued in 2007 when the company emerged from a five-year default, have fallen to 38 cents on the dollar from 44 cents at the beginning of the year.
 If the global economy keeps bumping along without a dramatic surge in growth, that $113 billion may emerge relatively unscathed or even prosper.
 Even if Solvay loses a bit of time dealing with antitrust regulators in Europe for the Ineos PVC partnership, Clamadieu said he’s confident of carrying out the merger by about the end of the year as planned.
 Price Regulation Rules that emerge probably will incorporate Obama’s suggestion that the FCC explicitly forbear from regulating prices for broadband service, said Gallant.
 The takeover would be the biggest among British insurers since CGU Plc’s 74 billion-pound merger in 2000 with Norwich Union Plc, which created Aviva, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 While the merger received approval from German regulators yesterday, it’s still being looked at in other countries, meaning it may close in the first calendar quarter, Dickerson said.
 and Covidien Plc, are in the process of completing a $42 billion deal to merge that was announced in June.
 Emergency Surgery Aside from basic coverage, including emergency surgery and treatment for infections, policies have expanded to meet modern demands.
 tumbled 93 percent in Seoul after canceling a merger with Samsung Heavy Industries Co.
 This includes more than $500 million for the emergency response and to help speed up the deployment of foreign health workers, and at least $450 million from the IFC, a member of the World Bank Group, to enable trade, investment and employment in Liberia, Guinea and Sierra Leone, the most-affected countries.
 A successful bid by Altice would also unwind Portugal Telecom SGPS SA and Oi’s yearlong merger that was marred by defaulted debt at a unit of Grupo Espirito Santo and a CEO change.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding debt defaulted by Rioforte.
 Portuguese shareholders in the holding company Portugal Telecom SGPS include Ongoing Strategy Investments, Grupo Visabeira SGPS SA and Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the breakup of Banco Espirito Santo SA.
 and BP Plc on mergers and acquisitions.
 The merger of US.
 Global stocks recorded the best two-week rally since December 2011 last month as signs emerged suggesting the global recovery is still on track.
 The move was cheered by investors, who have been clamoring for a real-estate deal since Lampert first merged Sears Roebuck & Co.
 “Our European transformation plan is well under way, and we are poised to profitably grow as the region emerges from a long downturn,” Fields said in the statement, crediting Odell for getting the turnaround started.
 The fact that the information is emerging only now, he said, “is simply mind-blowing” GM characterized the e-mails as a remnant of the culture of the automaker before it emerged from bankruptcy protection in July 2009.
 Amrolia, 51, was named Deutsche Bank’s head of foreign exchange in 2006 and became co-head of fixed income and currencies when the two businesses were merged six years later.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Activist investor Marcato Capital Management LP said InterContinental Hotels Group Plc’s share price may double if the lodging operator agrees to a merger or acquisition by another hospitality company.
 Richard Solomons, the hotel company’s chief executive officer, said in a June interview that InterContinental can grow without a merger or takeover and it has served investors well.
 Lazard, a merger advisoryfirm, has been involved in several tax-inversion deals, in whichcompanies reduce taxes by moving their addresses overseas.
 “We’re not talking to other people about adding or subtracting to the portfolio, we’re very focused on getting the demerger done,” BHP Chief Financial Officer Graham Kerr, who will head the spinoff planned for the first half, said in an interview.
 The company’s stockholders should “decide whether or not to approve the merger,” Bouchard concluded in a 57-page ruling.
 The new structure will allow the executive board of the parent company to devote more time to mergers and acquisitions, he said last month.
 Both companies face an enlarged rival following the completion of the merger of Telefonica SA’s and Royal KPN NV’s local operations.
 and merges it with the Albertsons LLC grocery chain.
 The goal is to have Mobilicity in “as strong of a position as possible for what is the most likely outcome for a merger of two or more of these entities,” Glassman said in an interview at his Toronto office.
 A potential partnership or merger between Mobilicity and Wind Mobile may be complicated by a lawsuit Catalyst has filed against one of Wind’s largest shareholders, West Face Capital Inc, a Toronto-based hedge fund.
 President Barack Obama asked Congress for $62 billion in emergency funding last week to fight the spread of Ebola and reduce risks for US.
 It rebounded on speculation over central bank plans for an emergency meeting, Citigroup Inc.
 The IMF was conceived in 1944 to provide emergency lending to nations and discourage a repeat of the beggar-thy-neighbor policies from the Great Depression.
 The nation’s government called an emergency press conference with Prime Minister Xavier Bettel and Finance Minister Pierre Gramegna after the disclosure of tax rulings bestowing low-tax status.
 In September, the pumpmaker confirmed it was in talks to merge with Dresser-Rand, a company that was about $1 billion bigger than itself at the time.
 “There’s not 100s of companies of a similar size for a merger, but there are a couple.
 Pfizer, which produces Robitussin cough medicine and the Viagra impotence treatment, became the most significant when in April it attempted a $125 billion merger with the UK’s AstraZeneca Plc that later failed.
 The billionaire investor has called for the replacement of Allergan board members opposed to a merger.
 Allergan issued a filing yesterday saying that it is in talks that could eventually lead to merger negotiations, without naming Actavis.
 “It has been reinforcedby a Federal Reserve that always looks on the dark side tojustify emergency policies” MainStay Marketfield, which started with $500,000 and wasnamed after a street used as a Manhattan livestock market in the17th century, invests in a range of assets such as stocks, bondsand commodities, seeking to profit from both rising and fallingprices.
 Pearson, which gets more than 90 percent of its revenue from its education business, has been struggling to emerge from a slowdown weighed on by declining college enrollments in the US.
 The company was created by the merger of Thyssen Stahl AG and Krupp Stahl AG in 1999.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- CitySpring Infrastructure Trust, a Singapore piped-gas supplier backed by Temasek Holdings Pte, is exploring a merger with Keppel Infrastructure Trust, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The demerger would be the biggest in the mining industry, separating aluminum, coal and silver assets to create a company valued at about $15 billion after it begins trading next year.
 Full details of the demerger plan will be released to shareholders in March ahead of the vote, Nasser said.
 AB InBev and its advisers have long studied whether a merger with PepsiCo Inc.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- More than five years into the economic expansion, the signs that economists look for to herald the pickup in pay that has long eluded American workers are starting to emerge.
 In the years that followed, the industry was hit by competition that held down prices for those faster networks, regulation that limited cash sources like roaming charges and the emergence of cheaper new services, such as the WhatsApp Inc.
 In a skirmish over the so-called Doomsday Book, the New York Fed’s compendium of confidential legal opinions on its emergency powers, Wheeler said he was inclined to grant broad access to Starr.
 “What I want to be sure the plaintiff has in this case would be all Federal Reserve Bank or Board legal memos relating to an analysis of authority under Section 13(3), because I think all of that is relevant to the case,” Wheeler said, referring to the Federal Reserve Act section that outlines the agency’s emergency powers.
 Wheeler in July 2012 wrote that he agreed with Starr’s argument that the only consideration for a loan under the Fed’s emergency powers can be an interest rate set by the Board of Governors -- not a demand for equity.
 Incidental Powers In the same 2012 ruling, Wheeler wrote that he didn’t buy a government assertion that authority for demanding equity came from the “incidental powers” section of the Federal Reserve Act, which deals with unspecified actions needed “to carry on the business of banking” “For purposes of the government’s motion to dismiss,” the New York Fed’s incidental powers “did not authorize it” to condition an emergency loan “on AIG’s issuance of stock,” Wheeler wrote.
 didn’t have authority to demand equity was bolstered by testimony from Bernanke, who told Boies that he didn’t read the word ‘rate’ in the emergency-powers section of the Federal Reserve Act to include equity.
 The billionaire investor has called for the replacement of Allergan board members opposed to a merger.
 The fatal accident, expanding recalls and the emergence of an additional manufacturing flaw reflect an intensifying disaster affecting at least 10 automakers.
 and Lafarge SA after their merger, while also being open to acquiring factories abroad, he said.
 More than 25 traders have been fired, suspended or put on leave since allegations emerged in 2013 that dealers colluded to rig the WM/Reuters rate, a benchmark for currency transactions.
 A deal with Actavis Inc, which has been said to bid for Allergan, “would create value” for Actavis shareholders, said Malhotra, adding that Valeant “may now be more inclined to formally increase its bid for Allergan” Allergan said it will file an emergency appeal to overturn US.
 Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP, which made a $1 billion paper profit on its Allergan investment when Valeant made its first merger approach in April, said in a statement it “intends to promptly supplement its proxy statement disclosure in the manner determined by the court” Valeant Offer Allergan, based in Irvine, California, has been trying to fend off what’s been valued as a $54 billion hostile bid by Valeant.
 After Allergan refused to negotiate with Valeant, Ackman used his stake to push for a special meeting where shareholders could remove the majority of Allergan’s board as well as the poison-pill defense against hostile takeovers that it adopted after Valeant’s initial merger overtures in April.
 The two sides also disagreed over whether Valeant and Pershing Square had taken substantial steps toward making a tender offer to Allergan’s shareholders, as opposed to preparing for a negotiated merger with Allergan, as early as February when PS Fund 1 started buying Allergan shares.
 industry, an early labor defeat less than a year after the merger with US Airways.
 “This is one of the first voluntary mergers by Indian banks in recent history,” said Hatim Broachwala, a banking analyst at Nirmal Bang Securities Ltd.
 ING will have a stake of about 7 percent in the merged company, it said.
 The Kotak family stake in the merged bank will be 34 percent.
 Petrofac was the UK’s largest engineer by value before Amec Plc and Foster Wheeler AG merged to form Amec Foster Wheeler Plc.
 Weiss, who has been a top Wall Street donor to Obama, is global head of investment banking at Lazard, a merger-advisory firm that has been involved in several tax-inversion deals.
 Weiss, who joined Lazard in 1993, has also been global head of mergers and acquisitions for the firm and a vice chairman of European investment banking.
 Cornwell, a managing director in Morgan Stanley’s mergers-and-acquisitions group, will start his new job in February, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 Most megamergers generate losses for shareholders, so Allergan’s winning bidder will have to work to justify the price.
 As Allergan seeks to fend off the hostile suitor, the company said in a filing yesterday that it’s in talks with another party that may lead to merger negotiations, without providing further information.
 Acquirer Stock If history’s any guide, those shareholders are more likely to lose money after a merger this big.
 Reinsurers have been seeking mergers to spread risks and retain customers amid competition from hedge funds and pension funds that are betting on the weather through financial contracts.
 Emergency Generators The government would directly finance National Petroleum Corp.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Of all the megamergers announced this year, Halliburton Co’s $35 billion takeover of Baker Hughes Inc.
 and Actavis Plc’s merger with Allergan Inc.
 Halliburton and Baker Hughes had a combined market value of $726 billion at the end of last week, before the merger was officially announced and terms were disclosed.
 Deals are riskiest when they involve a company acquiring another that’s roughly the same size, like Halliburton is doing, according to Pavel Savor, a finance professor at Temple University’s Fox School of Business who has published research on mergers and acquisitions.
 Zoubek, mergers and acquisitions; George Zobitz, finance; Eric Hilfers, executive compensation and benefits; and Michael Schler, tax  Covington provided antitrust advice to Covance.
 Brinkema ruled that Yarmouth, Maine-based DeLorme didn’t infringe patent 7,991,380, which covers technology used in emergency locator beacons.
 J&J alleges that Guidant violated their merger agreement to pursue a more lucrative offer by Boston Scientific.
 Negotiations that started in 2004 led to a merger agreement in which J&J agreed to pay $63 a share, or about $215 billion, for Guidant.
 Boston Scientific also sold Guidant’s heart stent business to Abbott Laboratories to avoid antitrust issues the merger would otherwise have caused.
 J&J sued in September 2006, claiming Guidant, based in Marlborough, Massachusetts, broke their merger agreement by disclosing confidential business information to Abbott.
 Because they must be completely submerged in crude for the systems to function, they aren’t used in low-flow environments.
 As new terrifying truths emerge, she is forced to question everyone around her.
 Like several of Paulson’s other funds, one of the people said, Recovery held shares in Shire Plc, a pharmaceutical company that last month agreed to terminate a merger with AbbVie Inc.
 in 1994, making investments around mergers and corporate events.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Samsung Group scrapped a 25 trillion won ($23 billion) merger of its shipbuilding and engineering units that would have helped them compete better against European rivals.
 Samsung Heavy Industries Co, the world’s third-largest maker of ships, called off the merger with Samsung Engineering Co.
 According to regulations in South Korea, a company can call off a merger should buyback requests reach a level that could increase its financial burden.
 “It raises concern about the future of the companies and there will be a short-term negative impact on their shares” Samsung Group, South Korea’s largest conglomerate, planned the chaebol’s biggest merger to help the companies effectively compete with Technip SA and Saipem SpA in the offshore oil and gas market.
 Samsung Heavy had to buy back 9235 billion won of stock from shareholders opposed to the merger, according to a regulatory filing today.
 “Going ahead with the merger would have been a big burden on the financials of the combined company,” Samsung Heavy and Samsung Engineering said in a joint e-mailed statement.
 However, we will continue to work closely together to create more synergies in the offshore oil and gas market” The merger was proposed to combine Samsung Heavy’s offshore expertise and Samsung Engineering’s project management knowhow to minimize risks of cost overruns, Samsung Heavy’s Chief Financial Officer Chun Tae Heung said in September.
 Shareholders of the engineering company were to get 236 shares in the vessel maker in a merger that’s based on share prices of 26,972 won for Samsung Heavy and 63,628 won for Samsung Engineering, according to the Sept.
 Caesars, lenders and some first-lien bondholders agreed to restructure debt owed by CEOC by putting the unit into bankruptcy and allowing it to emerge as a real estate investment trust, people familiar with the talks said.
 Sears has posted only one quarter of positive same-store sales, considered a key gauge of performance, since Lampert merged Sears Roebuck & Co.
 Succession Plan Hayes, 54, joined the company in 1999 through its mergerwith Sundstrand Corp.
 and Shanghai Oriental Pearl Group surged in Shanghai after announcing they would merge in the latest sign the city government is pushing ahead with reforms of state-owned enterprises involved in media.
 “It has great growth potential to become the nation’s first media empire with a market value exceeding 100 billion yuan ($163 billion)” The merger bolsters President Xi Jinping’s plan to build a few influential media groups.
 Shanghai Media Group merged with Shanghai Media & Entertainment Group, Radio and Television Shanghai in March to create the largest provincial level media group in the country with 435 billion yuan of assets as of May 2014, the company’s website said.
 lost a bid to merge a California county prosecutor’s lawsuit over faulty ignition switches with customer cases pending in New York that make similar accusations about the carmaker’s conduct and demand monetary compensation.
 agreed to acquire insecticide maker Cheminova for $18 billion in September, while Yara ASA failed last month in an attempt to merge with rival CF Industries Inc, in a deal that would have created the world’s largest fertilizer producer.
 “The residential market, which has seen a fledgling recovery, would also suffer as banks relocate and mortgage lending contracts” The value of Catalonia’s 13 billion euros ($16 billion) of 475 percent bonds repayable in June 2018 have slumped since July as calls for independence merged into a set date for a vote.
 Comments in the past weeks by Telecom Italia and Oiexecutives showed the companies may be willing to negotiate amerger in Brazil.
 Bayard Gontijo, Oi’s interim CEO, when askedlast week whether Oi could merge with Tim, said his “objectiveis to create shareholder value” and he “won’t have anyprejudice in how we’re going to do that” Earlier this month, Patuano said while keeping theBrazilian business remains the preferred option, the carrierwould look at “any good opportunities” in the country.
 President Barack Obama asked Congress for $62 billion in emergency funding today to combat the spread of Ebola and reduce risks for US.
 Dreamworks Animation Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Katzenberg previously held merger talks with SoftBank Corp, the Japanese telecommunications company headed by Masayoshi Son, people with knowledge of the situation said in late September.
 A merger of Stryker and Smith & Nephew would be accretive in the first year whether or not it’s an inversion, Larry Biegelsen, a New York-based analyst at Wells Fargo, wrote in a report yesterday.
 The potential merger would need regulatory approval.
 Early signs of trouble at GT Advanced emerged in August when the company disclosed in its quarterly earnings that it had “incurred significant costs” during the first six months of this year as it worked to convert an Apple-owned factory in Mesa, Arizona, to produce sapphire.
 Och-Ziff, which is known for its multistrategy hedge funds that speculate on everything from rising and falling stock prices to mergers and bankruptcies, has sought to expand its credit, real estate and long-short equities businesses to attract clients.
 Gorman isn’t an alcoholic, an assumption nurses and emergency room doctors have made over the years when the 51-year-old Scottish woman tells them she has fatty liver disease.
 For Gorman, that meant a near-death episode of vomiting blood, trips to emergency rooms and a decision by doctors in September that she needs a new liver.
 Forrest took over as Gorman’s doctor in February when she was rushed to the emergency room after vomiting blood while at work.
 AI has re-emerged in the past decade as consumer Web companies such as Google Inc.
 Its owners will merge with each other to cut costs.
 To reach that number, the company added $329 million incost savings it expects to gain from the merger.
 Overcoming Sanctions Magnit has emerged largely unscathed from the geopolitical quarrel over the revolution in Ukraine.
 filed an emergency request in Washington federal court to keep Argentine lawyer Cesar Guido Forcieri in the US.
 ‘No Prejudice’ Comments in the past weeks by Telecom Italia and Oi executives showed the companies may be willing to negotiate a merger in Brazil.
 Bayard Gontijo, Oi’s interim chief executive officer, when asked last week whether Oi could merge with Tim, said his “objective is to create shareholder value” and he “won’t have any prejudice in how we’re going to do that” Earlier this month, Patuano said while keeping the Brazilian business remains the preferred option, the carrier would look at “any good opportunities” in the country.
 Meantime, Actavis may be a better merger partner for Allergan.
 Millicom, controlled by Sweden’s Kinnevik Investment AB, merged its Colombian business with a local fixed-line operator UNE in August.
 “It’s probably more on the smaller side than on the bigger side, and it’s probably more for consolidation in markets rather than going to completely new business areas” Albrecht ruled out taking part in mergers or acquisitions in Mexico.
 Those have sparked megamergers, such as Comcast Corp’s plan to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Macedonian Merger Telekom Austria said last month that it will merge its Macedonian unit, VIP, with Telekom Slovenije’s local subsidiary.
 In 2011, federal regulators investigated an Amazon warehouse near Allentown, Pennsylvania, due to concerns that high temperatures in the facility resulted in many workers going to hospital emergency rooms for treatment.
 Shares of some of those gatekeepers dropped, including Comcast, and cast a shadow on the cable provider’s proposed merger with Time Warner Cable over worries net-neutrality rules would burden the combined company.
 A successful bid by Altice or Apax would also unwind Portugal Telecom SGPS and Oi’s yearlong merger that was marred by defaulted debt at a unit of Grupo Espirito Santo and a CEO change.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding debt defaulted by Rioforte.
 and Higo Bank Ltd, Japanese regional lenders, agreed to merge next year to tackle the intensifying competition, shrinking population and economic stagnation afflicting the industry.
 They will decide on the merger ratio by March.
 “Building a solid management base to further boost our presence in Kyushu is the common challenge we face so that we can make a lasting contribution to the revitalization of local communities” Higo Bank shares closed 03 percent lower at 649 yen in Tokyo today, after last week reaching the highest price since May 2013 on news of the merger talks.
 Kagoshima Bank, based in Kagoshima city, and Kumamoto-based Higo Bank have 85 trillion yen ($74 billion) in combined assets, data compiled by Bloomberg show, meaning a merger would put them among the top 10 regional lenders.
 Environmental Assessment Among Quebec’s requirements are that the project be subject to an environmental assessment and that TransCanada must guarantee an emergency plan in case of a spill, consult with communities including aboriginal groups along the route and ensure the project doesn’t reduce Quebec’s gas supply.
 There’s a bunch of expenses that can be taken out and there are substantial revenue synergies” The takeover would be the biggest among British insurers since CGU Plc’s 74 billion-pound merger in 2000 with Norwich Union Plc, which created Aviva, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 777’s voice recorder revealed no warning tones in the cockpit, and no emergency was declared by the experienced crew before the flight “ended abruptly,” the report published in September said.
Banca Monte dei Paschi di Siena SpA (BMPS),which is seeking to raise 25 billion euros ($31 billion) toplug a capital deficit that emerged in Europe’s bank healthcheck, reported a 10th straight quarterly loss on higher bad-loan provisions and restructuring costs.
 The bailed-outlender emerged with the biggest capital shortfall -- 21 billioneuros -- among 25 banks that failed the European Central Bank’stests of 130 lenders.
 “No decision has been made by our bank in relation to any merger or acquisition transaction,” Kotak Mahindra Bank said in a filing to the Mumbai stock exchange today.
 A merger may help the billionaire comply with a central bank order to cut his stake in Kotak Mahindra to 30 percent by the end of 2016 from 40 percent.
 “The merged entity will be better placed to leverage the improving macro economic environment” ING may get a 7 percent stake in the combined entity after the transaction, which will be announced by the end of the month, ET Now said.
 American made the offer to pilots two days after flight attendants rejected a tentative contract that would have been the first to include workers from merger partner US Airways.
 Contract Talks Kirby is part of the former US Airways management team that took over American when the two airlines merged in December.
 Bohuon also spent more than 10 years at Glaxo and at a UScompany that later merged with the UK.
 A possible hiring of Bohuon is viewed positively by anumber of people within Sanofi, while others would prefer thatan internal candidate emerge, another person said.
 A sixth aid mission from the government in Moscow arrived in Donetsk and Luhansk today after two 10-truck convoys crossed the border into Ukraine with more than 50 tons of fuel and medicines each, RIA Novosti news service reported, citing the Russian Emergencies Ministry.
 Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP, which made a $1 billion paper profit on its Allergan investment when Valeant made its first merger approach in April, said in a statement it “intends to promptly supplement its proxy statement disclosure in the manner determined by the court” Valeant Offer Allergan, based in Irvine, California, has been trying to fend off what’s been valued as a $54 billion hostile bid by Valeant.
 After Allergan refused to negotiate with Valeant, Ackman used his stake to push for a special meeting where shareholders could remove the majority of Allergan’s board as well as the poison-pill defense against hostile takeovers that it adopted after Valeant’s initial merger overtures in April.
 The two sides also disagreed over whether Valeant and Pershing Square had taken substantial steps toward making a tender offer to Allergan’s shareholders, as opposed to preparing for a negotiated merger with Allergan, as early as February when PS Fund 1 started buying Allergan shares.
 After observing the attempted $25 billion merger between Yara International ASA and CF Industries Holdings Inc, Garrett said he expects another wave of consolidation in the fertilizer business.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Drugmakers including Mapp Biopharmaceutical Inc, Johnson & Johnson and Emergent Biosolutions Inc.
 President Barack Obama asked Congress last week for $62 billion in emergency funding to stop the spread of the virus that has killed more than 4,800 people in West Africa.
 Mapp doesn’t have the capacity to produce mass amounts of its drug quickly if needed, a gap a company such as Emergent Biosolutions, based in Rockville, Maryland, could fill with its production capacity, Friel said.
 government pushed emergency legislation through Parliament to ensure communications companies kept records of e-mails, texts and phone calls for a year to help law-enforcement agencies track and catch terrorists and other criminals.
 On Hold The audit committee review represents a potential setback for the drugmaker just as its merger prospects appeared to suffer a blow.
 The CEO convened an emergency conference call with Chief Financial Officer Jerome Contamine and several others to carefully craft the wording during earnings presentations the next day about his relations with the board and his job security.
 He sought reassurances he didn’t get, but still emerged as CEO.
 Of the two new partners, Piazza focuses on energy transactions for private-equity funds, strategics and energy lenders, while Olivarez concentrates in mergers and acquisitions and capital-markets transactions primarily concerning energy businesses and investment banks.
 Allergan said it will file an emergency appeal to overturn US.
 Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP, which made a $1 billion paper profit on its Allergan investment when Valeant made its first merger approach in April, said in a statement it ‘‘intends to promptly supplement its proxy statement disclosure in the manner determined by the court” Allergan, based in Irvine, California, has been trying to fend off what’s been valued as a $54 billion hostile bid by Valeant.
 It also targets mergers and acquisitions in the financial industry and plans to establish China’s 5th-largest power energy company to provide clean energy, Dong Wenbiao, chairman of Minsheng Investment, said at a forum in Shanghai in September.
 Market Clout Halliburton, the world’s second-largest provider ofoilfield services, would eliminate one of its chief rivals inthe merger, expanding its business portfolio and market clout ata time when falling oil prices have plunged the industry into adownturn.
 counterpart Chrysler merged in October, is looking at spinning off its Ferrari supercar division to help raise $5 billion to cut debt and finance development of new models.
 In a preliminary ruling in the case in 2012, Wheeler wrote that he didn’t accept the government’s position that the Fed’s emergency powers allowed it to demand stock from a company.
 New information that has emerged since “called into question the continuation of the company,” LSK & Partners said in an e-mailed statement today, without giving details.
 Leyne merged the business with Global Equities Capital Markets in 2010 to provide financial advice and private banking to clients in eastern Europe, Le Figaro reported.
 “I don’t want to say it seems reasonable, but it makes sense in the context of the greater market opportunity,” Sachin Shah, a special-situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co, said in a phone interview.
 and Shanghai Oriental Pearl Group both surged 10 percent for a second day after announcing plans to merge.
 SOE reforms will probably accelerate elsewhere in the country after the merger of BesTV and Oriental Pearl in Shanghai” Hong Kong’s Hang Seng China Enterprises Index slipped 06 percent, after jumping 38 percent for the biggest gain in a year yesterday.
 bonds last month, a few telling data points emerged that reflect where the market is heading.
 “The likelihood of an emergency meeting next week, two weeks ahead of the scheduled meeting, cannot be excluded” Yields Rise Nigeria’s $500 million of bonds due July 2023 fell, with yields increasing six basis points to 563 percent, the highest on a closing basis since Oct.
 Advanced cruise control, highway steering and emergency braking will be added via remote software updates in coming months, the letter to shareholders said.
 “We are in a position to participate, but probably we don’t need to be the ones to initiate” Latin America’s biggest phone-service market is gearing up for more mergers as Oi SA, Brazil’s fourth-biggest wireless carrier, is considering a bid for larger Tim Participacoes SA.
 Even with potential competition on the horizon, the potential for Tekmira to secure contracts from government stockpiling has grown as Ebola cases have emerged in multiple countries, Clarus Securities’ Novak said.
 The company opted out in September, a month after a plan to merge with T-Mobile fell apart and Marcelo Claure was hired as the new chief executive officer to reverse years of customer losses.
 Four years later, it was forced to give T-Mobile a large block of that spectrum as part of a penalty when the 2010 merger failed.
 Claure joined Sprint at the same time SoftBank’s plan to merge Sprint with T-Mobile US Inc.
 Egypt is seeing a pick up in merger and acquisition activity amid increasing political stability that has helped make its benchmark EGX 30 stocks index among the world’s best performers this year with a 36-percent surge.
 14 and allow it to emerge as a real estate investment trust, four people with knowledge of the discussions said.
 investment bankers, who are faring better this year amid an increase in mergers and debt and stock offerings.
 “Stable market conditions and healthy corporate balance sheets creates a favorable environment” for mergers and acquisitions, he said.
 In mergers and acquisitions, RBC secured some of the country’s largest announced deals, helping advise Tim Hortons Inc.
 agreed to merge with Higashi-Nippon Bank Ltd, the second such move by Japanese regional lenders this week in an industry battling a shrinking population and declining interest rates.
 The companies haven’t decided the merger ratio.
 10 that they plan to merge next year to tackle intensifying competition.
 “The great majority of helicopter noise complaints are actually connected to emergency services, news, charter and other kinds of helicopter traffic,” Fried said in an e-mail.
 None!” The man charged with saving Steeplegate -- or at least keeping it afloat until a buyer emerges -- is Thomas Lavigne.
 In early October, a small sign of hope emerged when New Hampshire pizza restaurant Pizzico opened next to Perfect Pretzels.
 Read More Close Open Photographer: Martin Leissl/Bloomberg Commerzbank AG Chief Executive Officer Martin Blessing said in the statement that the growth in the core bank illustrates the “product and service range amended in line with changing customer requirements is very popular” The lender passed the European Central Bank’s asset reviewand emerged from the most onerous stress test with 796 percentcapital ratio, above the 55 percent minimum required.
 agreed to merge with Tokyo-based Higashi-Nippon Bank Ltd.
 as it moves past a failed merger with Omnicom Group Inc.
 Publicis is moving on from the $35 billion merger with Omnicom, which was abandoned in May after executives clashed over how to run the combined entity.
 Since the failed merger with Omnicom -- which would have replaced Martin Sorrell’s WPP Plc as the world’s largest advertising agency -- Levy has delayed his long-mooted departure, saying in September that he will stay at least three more years.
 Mondelez named Peltz to its board in January after his Trian Fund Management LP abandoned a proposal for Mondelez to merge with PepsiCo Inc.
 Allergan, based in Irvine, California, said in a filing today that it’s in talks with a third party that may lead to merger negotiations, without providing further information.
 In choosing Mexico for a plant site this year, Bayerische Motoren Werke AG validated the nation’s emergence as an auto-assembly powerhouse from its roots making Volkswagen AG’s iconic Beetle.
 Send Signal A merger between Bank of Yokohama and Higashi-Nippon could send a signal to other regional lenders to combine, which may help to ease price competition and improve earnings over time, Nomura Holdings Inc.
 Kagoshima Bank and Higo Bank have 85 trillion yen ($74 billion) in combined assets, data compiled by Bloomberg show, meaning a merger would put them among the top 10 regional lenders.
 ‘Big Challenge’ Fukuoka Financial Group Inc, the country’s biggest regional banking group by assets, was the product of a merger between Kyushu-based lenders in 2007.
 “Regional banks should bear in mind that mergers are an option,” Kazuyoshi Terakado, chairman of the Regional Bankers Association of Japan, said in June.
 Bally Technologies holds a special shareholders meeting to vote on a proposed merger with Scientific Games.
 (HAL) in its potential merger with energy rival BakerHughes Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- CitySpring Infrastructure Trust, a Singapore piped-gas supplier backed by Temasek Holdings Pte, will merge with Keppel Infrastructure Trust to form the country’s biggest infrastructure-focused business trust.
 AstraZeneca, which rejected a $117 billion takeover bid from Pfizer in May, is relying on revenue from Nexium and another best-selling drug, Crestor, as it waits for new blockbuster drugs to emerge from its pipeline.
 Holcim and Lafarge need to sell units to gain regulatory approval for their planned merger to form the biggest cement company.
 Last month SoftBank agreed to invest in Legendary Entertainment, producer of the “Godzilla” film, and buy DramaFever Corp, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers Future merger and acquisitions for SoftBank will focus on Asian Internet companies with the company to aim for stakes of 30 percent to 40 percent, Son said.
 Cooper said the outlook for Imperial Tobacco has been boosted by an agreement this year to buy tobacco assets and the electronic cigarette brand Blu in conjunction with the merger of Reynolds American Inc.
 Populist Issue “Unquestionably, this is a big populist issue and this merger has become the big whipping boy,” said Matthew Harrigan, an analyst at Wunderlich Securities Inc.
 The timing of completion matters for merger-arbitragers, who bet on the likelihood of a transaction getting completed.
 “One of the big changes is the somewhat bleaker outlook for the world economy and the European economy in particular that emerged in the last few months” Rocket, Zalando There are also signs some recent public offerings may have been overpriced.
 Luigi Rizzo, head of mergers and acquisitions in Europe, Middle East, Africa for Bank of America Merrill Lynch, said while Europe’s economic growth is the biggest risk to deals, the anxiety that led some IPOs to be canceled or delayed will pass.
 Investors in October added money to event driven hedge funds, which trade on corporate activity such as mergers and acquisitions, for the first time since July, according to Eurekahedge Pte, a Singapore-based data provider.
 “Barring a re-emergence of PEDv, which remains a real wild card, we could see modest pork production expansion in 2015, although lower prices should spur additional export demand,” Smithfield Chief Executive Officer C.
 The merger would create a company providing advertising for almost 90 percent of US.
 “We look forward to demonstrating those benefits” Target Ads The company said the merger would increase the number of moviegoers reached by 60 percent, allowing it to compete with broadcast and cable TV networks and online and mobile video ads.
 “The merger preserves all the desirable attributes of cinema advertising while allowing the combined company to compete more effectively on dimensions important to advertisers,” Travis Reid, CEO of New York-based Screenvision, said in the statement.
 The merger would create a business with a presence in 210 markets and more than 3,900 theaters, National CineMedia said when the plan was announced.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Italy’s smaller cooperative banks may merge into larger companies to boost returns, Intesa Sanpaolo SpA Chief Executive Officer Carlo Messina said.
 “The Italian banking system will not be the same next year, I am sure there will be mergers among the cooperative banks, so a large domestic competitor may be created,” Messina said at a briefing.
 “This is an opportunity for us, because clients typically move to where there is more stability” Italy’s banks showed the largest combined capital shortfall in the European Central Bank’s review of the euro region’s lenders as the country struggles to emerge from its third recession in six years.
 “If you’ve got Dem-on-Dem fights on some of these issues, I think it complicates it, makes it harder to clear the deck to get them done” Weiss joined Lazard in 1994 and has also served as global head of mergers and acquisitions for the firm and a vice chairman of European investment banking.
 On Hold The audit committee review represents a potential setback for the drugmaker just as its merger prospects appeared to suffer a blow.
 As Rupert Murdoch prepares to complete the merger of his British, Italian and German pay-TV companies next week, the masked anti-hero is also the first example of the trio joining forces to see off their own competitors such as Netflix Inc, John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc and aggressive UK.
 In a preliminary ruling in the case in 2012, Wheeler wrote that he didn’t accept the government’s position that the Fed’s emergency powers allowed it to demand stock from a company.
 At the Justice Department, Sidorov specialized in premerger notification law, procedures and policies under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Act of 1976.
 He was previously senior counsel at Constellation Energy, which merged with Exelon in 2012.
 among investors looking for profits in riskier home loans -- and expecting a market for bonds backed by them to re-emerge even with safer issuance showing limited signs of life.
 Different bond buyers could emerge as the underlying loan balances get smaller, said Randy Reiff, FirstKey Lending’s chief executive officer.
 from proceeding with a $286 billion merger of the oil-services firm with a unit of Nabors Industries Ltd to lower its US.
 Some C&J shareholders argued the company’s board allowed Nabors to acquire the firm as part of the stock-for-stock merger, according to court filings.
 C&J officials said they’d ask the Delaware Supreme Court to overturn Noble’s ruling and clear the way for the merger.
 The oil-services company disputed Noble’s finding that it must “solicit proposals to acquire the company before executing the merger agreement,” Josh Comstock, the firm’s chief executive officer, said in an e-mailed statement.
 High-frequency traders account for as much as 50 percent of the value of all transactions at Japan Exchange, which was established in January 2013 through the merger of bourse operators in Tokyo and Osaka.
 “To merge with another exchange is not so easy,” because governments are now encouraging competition in the markets, he said.
 The two exchanges are not in talks about a merger, he reiterated.
 “We have overcome the price war” Brazil Defense After losing out to Telefonica SA in a contest to merge with broadband provider GVT, Telecom Italia is facing one of its biggest challenges in Brazil.
 Brazilian carriers are considering mergers and acquisitions as they look for ways to mitigate the billions of dollars they have to spend every year to improve service and keep up with government demands.
 Of the 11 biggest mergers and acquisitions announced in Brazil in the past two years, newspapers and news agencies reported on at least seven of them before the official announcement was made, according to data compiled by Bloomberg News.
 The Jones Day partners representing Procter & Gamble were Bob Profusek and Peter Izanec, both mergers and acquisitions; Tricia Eschbach-Hall, benefits; Tom Briggs, intellectual property; and David Wales, antitrust.
 Esure said Ministry of Justice data suggest that claims inflation is starting to re-emerge, driven by small bodily injuries.
 “The middle class is where the core of it will be” Recession The renewed push into Brazil comes as the nation tries to emerge from a recession in the first half of the year.
 Lazard, a merger-advisory firm, has been involved in several tax-inversion deals.
 He joined Lazard in 1993 and has also served as global head of mergers and acquisitions for the firm and a vice chairman of European investment banking.
 Alstom will look at acquisitions in areas such as signaling and maintenance “in an opportunistic manner,” though “there is nothing cooking” A merger of the Alstom Transport division with Siemens AG’s railway business, proposed by the Munich-based competitor to thwart the GE deal earlier this year, would have led to “bloodshed” because the companies serve the same regions and offer similar technology and products, Kron said.
 were hired to work on the merger of two banks based on Japan’s southern island of Kyushu.
 They plan to decide the merger ratio on March 31 and form a holding company on Oct.
 The two banks have 85 trillion yen ($74 billion) in combined assets, data compiled by Bloomberg show, meaning a merger would put them among the top 10 regional lenders.
 Gombe, which borders three states of Nigeria that have been under emergency rule since last May, has suffered an upturn in gun and bomb attacks carried out by suspected Boko Haram insurgents.
 Formed from the merger of Italy’s Fiat SpA and US.
 Securities firms also saw setbacks in their equity issuance and advisory businesses last month as stock sales and merger announcements declined from a year earlier, according to the Barclays analysts.
 A successful bid by Altice or its rivals would also unwind Portugal Telecom SGPS and Oi’s merger that has been marred by defaulted debt at a unit of Grupo Espirito Santo and a change of chief executive officer.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding debt defaulted by Rioforte.
 The Trustees’ May statement also indicated that they hoped other fuel sources would emerge in the future so that Stanford could divest from oil and gas companies as well.
 The spending cut isn’t related to mergers and acquisitions costs, Stephens said.
 Mondelez named Peltz to its board in January after Peltz’s Trian Fund Management LP abandoned a proposal for Mondelez to merge with PepsiCo Inc.
 developer of geothermal power, is acquiring its Tel Aviv-based parent company in an all-stock merger.
 In another activist campaign this month, Marcato said InterContinental Hotels Group Plc’s shares may double if the lodging operator agrees to a merger or acquisition by a competitor.
 Lawmakers don’t vote on approving mergers.
 If the merger is approved, Comcast would control an estimated 35 percent to 55 percent of the national market for high-speed Internet service, or broadband, the senators said.
 The senators also asked regulators to consider the merger’s effect on the ability of independent cable programming providers to enter the video market.
 Some programmers argue that Comcast after a merger would be “a critical distribution partner” because it would control 16 of the top 20 advertising markets, the senators said.
 The British fixed-line carrier views EE, the venture owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, as its preferred merger partner because of its broad mobile spectrum and stable of high-paying customers, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing a private matter.
 mobile operator, since they merged their British operations four years ago, disagreeing on commercial strategy and whether to exit their investment via a sale or initial public offering, the people said.
 As part of its agreement with Susquehanna, BB&T said it expects to incur pre-tax merger and integration costs of approximately $250 million.
 “The robust projected GDP growth, the increasingly diversified economy, the ongoing emergence of a sizable middle class and numerous opportunities to enhance financial inclusion through the innovative use of technology are all long-term drivers of growth in the banking sector” Top Stocks Guaranty Trust Bank Plc and Zenith Bank Plc are Bank of America’s top stock picks in the country, while First Bank of Nigeria Plc and United Bank for Africa Plc are rated underperform.
 A sale would also unravel Oi’s plan for a trans-Atlantic telecommunications carrier through a merger with Portugal Telecom agreed a year ago.
 13 whether Oi could merge with Tim, he said he “won’t have any prejudice” on how Oi would take part in consolidation.
 Unravel Plan Oi and Portugal Telecom agreed a year ago on a merger to create a carrier with 100 million customers to compete against Telefonica SA and Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding debt defaulted on by Rioforte Investments SA, a unit of Grupo Espirito Santo.
 Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava, who drove the merger, stepped down in October.
 Publicis is moving on from the $35 billion merger with Omnicom, which was abandoned in May after executives clashed over how to run the combined entity.
 In a preliminary ruling in the case in 2012, Wheeler wrote that he didn’t accept the government’s position that the Fed’s emergency powers allowed it to demand stock from a company.
 The emergency powers clause at issue doesn’t specifically mention equity, only that that Fed can set an interest rate for emergency lending.
 “The emergence of the truth about New GM’s abysmal safety record and culture of deceit, and its failure to promptly remedy known defects, has greatly diminished the value of GM branded vehicles sold after the inception of New GM,” he said.
 CVS has lost some pharmacy benefit management customers as clients have merged or put their retirees into new insurance offerings from the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Cooperative banks will be at the forefront of a wave of mergers among lenders in Italy and Germany, the chief executive officers of Intesa Sanpaolo SpA and Commerzbank AG said.
 “The Italian banking system will not be the same next year, I am sure there will be mergers among the cooperative banks so a large domestic competitor may be created,” Carlo Messina, the head of Italy’s second-biggest bank, said at a briefing Nov.
 Commerzbank Chief Executive Officer Martin Blessing identified cooperative banks as likely merger candidates when he told the Sueddeutsche Zeitung Economic Summit in Berlin on Nov.
 Italy’s banks showed the largest combined capital shortfall in the European Central Bank’s review of the euro region’s lenders as the country struggles to emerge from its third recession in six years.
 Some cooperative banks in Germany would have failed the ECB’s stress tests if the newest Basel bank regulation rules had been applied, suggesting that cooperative banks in the country may begin to merge, Blessing said.
 Italy’s smaller cooperative banks may merge into larger companies to boost returns, Messina said.
 In 2004, the insurance executive engineered a merger with Travelers.
 A merger may trigger regulatory concerns, according to Mitchell at UBS.
 bonds jumped to the highest level in three months after its shareholders approved a merger with First Reserve Corp’s Sabine Oil & Gas LLC.
 Shareholders approved of the takeover after Forest Oil adopted a plan in July that would prevent investors with short positions from trying to “negatively influence” the prospective merger, according to a July 10 statement.
 is taking a preliminary look at possible sites for a new headquarters as it approaches the one-year anniversary of the merger with US Airways.
 The airline agreed to keep the headquarters in the Dallas-Fort Worth area to help settle a lawsuit filed by Texas opposing the merger.
 long-short equity, European credit and merger arbitrage, Bloomberg Markets will report in its December 2014 issue.
 Merger Arb Opportunity Fitzpatrick points to merger arbitrage as an example of where cooperation across teams creates opportunity.
 “We see way more opportunities of expressing a merger arbitrage position through credit and convertible bonds,” she says.
 “My view is that when those bonds came up for sale before the financial crisis, that flow was internalized at the proprietary-trading-desk level” At UBS O’Connor, members of the convertible arbitrage team sit next to the merger arb team.
 They’ll then tell the merger arb managers about the bond’s characteristics and where it can be bought.
 Last month SoftBank agreed to invest in Legendary Entertainment, producer of the “Godzilla” film, and buy DramaFever Corp, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers Future merger and acquisitions for SoftBank will focus on Asian Internet companies with the company to aim for stakes of 30 percent to 40 percent, Son said today.
 CSX “is not the only potential railroad we can merge with,” said Ackman, a Canadian Pacific director and founder of hedge fund Pershing Square Capital Management LP.
 “I think the risk with CSX is we merge with” a competitor to the Jacksonville, Florida-based carrier.
 While Calgary-based Canadian Pacific said later that talks had ended, Chief Executive Officer Hunter Harrison talked up the value of mergers and renewed his call for more combinations.
 “Hunter believes that pro-competitive railroad mergers will be allowed to happen by regulators” Stock Advances Norfolk Southern climbed 19 percent to $11286 at the close in New York, the highest in data compiled by Bloomberg going back to 1980.
 Last month, Ackman championed the idea that rail mergers would help unwind recent congestion on North American tracks, saying “a lot of that can be dealt with through some mergers that are actually pro-competitive” US.
 regulators have raised barriers to mergers in recent years after decades of consolidation since the industry’s deregulation in 1980 thinned major US.
 and Global Hunter Securities LLC, which were both listed as underwriters last year, agreed to merge in September 2013.
 and Lafarge SA as the two European companies merge.
 “I would say it’s not a prime case for an emergency response” When the community channels are there, Lowe is betting Digital Green will transform the toughest problems around the world.
 “I’m more interested in acquiring existing assets than I am in continuing to build” CF, which last month ended talks toward a proposed merger of equals with Norwegian fertilizer producer Yara International ASA, expects to generate more than enough cash to be able to acquire assets, return cash to shareholders or help build momentum for another attempt to reach agreement with Yara.
 filed for bankruptcy protection in Delaware with a plan to sell its assets to affiliates of billionaire backer Vinod Khosla if no better offer emerges.
 A federal appeals court in Washington today said regulators reviewing the merger can’t immediately let third parties see the contracts, ordering briefs filed on the issue by Nov.
 “There are usually a tremendous number of business lines that you can carve off if divestitures are needed,” Hill Wellford, a lawyer at Bingham McCutchen LLP in Washington, said about mergers in the oilfield services industry.
 He was vice president of financial planning and analysis, and joined United Technologies after its merger with Sundstrand in 1999.
 Dan Barclay, 48, who was head of Canadian mergers and acquisitions for five years, assumes Myers’s former position, while Barclay’s job will be filled by M&A banker John Armstrong, 42, the firm said.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- A merger of Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV and Volkswagen AG would create a well-balanced global automaker that would be highly profitable, John Krafcik, president of auto-buying website TrueCar Inc, said yesterday.
 The two automakers denied they were in merger talks in July after a German magazine reported such discussions were under way.
 1 automaker could emerge in the future that would be larger than Toyota Motor Corp, the world’s top car company by vehicle sales.
 Emergency Legislation In July, the UK.
 government pushed emergency legislation through Parliament to ensure companies keep e-mail, text and phone-call data for a year to help law-enforcement agencies.
 Egypt is seeing a pick up in merger and acquisition activity amid increased political stability that has helped make its benchmark EGX 30 stocks index one of the world’s best performers this year with a 37 percent surge.
 “Make an emergency gift to the Sierra Club right now,”Sierra Club head Michael Brune said in a pitch to members hoursafter the Senate fell one vote short of the 60 needed to approvethe pipeline.
 Drought Emergency Governor Jerry Brown, a Democrat, in January declared a drought emergency and called for a statewide voluntary reduction of water use by 20 percent.
 The emergence of so many ways to watch television has exacerbated conflicts between media companies and distributors over the value of shows.
 Chow Tai Fook is very cautious with mergers and acquisitions, and is only exploring the mine purchases, Cheng said.
 Last year, Michigan Governor Rick Snyder, a Republican, announced the appointment of Kevyn Orr as emergency financial manager to take over Detroit and solve its financial woes.
 Detroit has proposed borrowing as much as $325 million in exit financing to bankroll its emergence from bankruptcy.
 Portugal Telecom no longer controls the operating assets of the country’s former phone monopoly after its merger with Brazil’s largest landline carrier.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Bahrain’s Arcapita Bank BSC has raised $100 million from shareholders to fund a return to dealmaking a year after it emerged from bankruptcy.
 Arcapita emerged from bankruptcy in September 2013 after securing a $350 million loan from Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 and emerged as a holder of Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, while exiting its stake in Broadcom Corp.
 Advanced cruise control, highway steering and emergency braking will be added via remote software updates in coming months, the letter to shareholders said.
 “That isn’t what they said they’d do at this meeting, but Draghi’s comments today are suggesting they’ll move in that direction” The ECB’s balance sheet has been declining since mid-2012 as banks paid back emergency loans.
 The Bank of Italy, the country’s central bank, has said it would back a potential merger of Monte Paschi.
 CME has $375 million of its own money ready to use if a clearing member defaults, and holds $687 billion in an emergency account known as a guaranty fund.
 The 20-30 meter sinkhole was detected yesterday 35 kilometers east of the mine in the Perm region, Russia’s Emergencies Ministry said.
 is the biggest, though its 19 percent short interest is probably a result of merger-arbitrage strategies stemming from Richard Kinder’s plan to consolidate his pipeline empire in a series of transactions.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Plc, which proposed a merger with Rio Tinto Group in July, said third-quarter coal production increased 92 percent amid a decline in the price of the power station fuel to the lowest in five years.
 “Our advantageous geographical positioning, successful price increases in key markets and strict cost management have contributed to this achievement” HeidelbergCement is facing the prospect of a larger competitor with the proposed $40 billion merger of its two bigger rivals, France’s Lafarge SA and Switzerland’s Holcim Ltd.
 The company, which introduced the Hostess Cupcake in 1919 and Twinkies in 1930, emerged from the first bankruptcy in 2009 as a private company controlled by buyout firm Ripplewood Holdings LLC and lenders.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Oi SA, the Brazilian phone company that’s evaluating whether to make a takeover bid for rival Tim Participacoes SA, said it’s open to other alternatives to consolidate the market, including a possible merger.
 “My objective is to create shareholder value, so I don’t have and won’t have any prejudice in how we’re going to do that,” Bayard Gontijo, Oi’s interim chief executive officer, said during a conference call with analysts today when asked whether Oi could merge with Tim.
 Gontijo stepped in last month for Zeinal Bava, who resigned after Oi’s merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA was rocked by the Portuguese partner’s $11 billion investment in a company that later defaulted.
 More mergers and acquisitions and continued growth in earnings, gross domestic product and valuations should help stock prices, he wrote.
 The potential deal “reflects the extremely deteriorated conditions in the environment for oil services firms and the need to carry out defensive mergers in response,” Natixis SA analyst Alain Parent said in a note.
 30, Samsung filed claims alleging that Microsoft triggered a termination right when it “merged with a major Samsung competitor -- Nokia’s devices and services business” and as a result “began manufacturing its own smartphones” After the Microsoft-Nokia agreement, Samsung, it alleges, “has been put in the untenable position of being asked to provide” information that is “highly confidential and competitively sensitive” to a rival.
 “The agency has access to the relevant documents at issue in this matter and can continue to evaluate the proposed merger during the stay,” according to the court.
 Wall Street soured on Southwest as mergers let Delta Air Lines Inc.
 The group disposed of stakes in chemicals and defense businesses, adding to mergers and initial public offerings announced since the 46-year-old Vice Chairman Lee took a greater role after patriarch Lee Kun Hee’s heart attack in May.
 The conglomerate had proposed a 25 trillion-won merger of Samsung Heavy Industries Co.
 A merger of the units, with combined revenue of about 75 billion pounds ($117 billion), would save money by removing duplication, the person said.
 He declined to say whether BT had discussed with the agency any plans to merge the units.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Omnicom Group Inc’s John Wren said a merger with a major rival is off the table as long as he’s chief executive officer.
 “Under my watch, the concept of merger of equals has gone away forever,” Wren said today at a Morgan Stanley conference in Barcelona when asked if Omnicom would try another deal like its failed $35 billion merger with Publicis Groupe SA.
 “I’d never say never to anything, but it’s unlikely that we will be engaged in a deal of that magnitude or size” Omnicom and Publicis called off their merger in May because of strategic disagreements following almost ten months of negotiations.
 Created in 1999 through the $705 billion merger of two companies, Uniphase Corp.
 It’s been a busy year in Europe for telecoms deals as companies move toward bundled services and regulators allow more mobile mergers.
 Syngenta, which reports in dollars, was formed through the merger of the agribusinesses of Novartis AG and AstraZeneca Plc in 2000.
 The UN Security Council is scheduled to hold an emergency session in New York today over the conflict.
 The UN Security Council will hold an emergency meeting at 2:30 pm.
 and Baker Hughes Inc, two of the biggest oil-services companies, announced yesterday they are in merger talks, showing the consequences of the downturn.
 While the downturn has “absolutely” created a buyers’ market, increased deal activity is also positive for Akastor ASA, the investment company that emerged from the Aker Solutions split and is mandated to create value for shareholders through deals, Eriksen said.
 from proceeding with a $286 billion merger of the oil-services firm with a unit of Nabors Industries Ltd to lower its US.
 Some C&J shareholders argued the company’s board allowed Nabors to acquire the firm as part of the cash-and-stock offer to do the merger, according to court filings.
 C&J officials said they’d ask the Delaware Supreme Court to overturn Noble’s ruling and clear the way for the merger.
 The oil-services company disputes Noble’s finding that it must “solicit proposals to acquire the company before executing the merger agreement,” Josh Comstock, the firm’s chief executive officer, said in an e-mailed statement.
 Shares, Cash Under the deal, Nabors is slated to receive 625 million C&J shares and $940 million in cash, officials said when the merger was announced in June.
 C&J shareholders contend Comstock and other board members are unfairly benefiting from the Nabors merger by receiving guaranteed positions with the merged company if the deal proceeds, according to court filings.
 If the merger proceeds, C&J’s fleet will combine with Nabors’ fracking services unit, which is the sixth-biggest in the US.
 The deal was part of Drahi’s plan to merge Numericable with Vivendi SA’s French phone unit SFR in a $23 billion transaction.
 They are aiming to complete their merger by mid-2015, and selling assets in Europe, Canada, Brazil, the Philippines and Mauritius to win antitrust approval.
 Then, there were those who downplayed those concerns saying those raising them were envious” American Realty Capital Properties’s acquisitions include the $985 billion takeover of rival Cole Real Estate Investments Inc, which Schorsch likened to a merger of baseball rivals the Boston Red Sox and New York Yankees.
 While the retailer could take on debt to buy back shares, a bigger payout could come from a merger with rival Petco Animal Supplies Inc.
 The current system of royalties expires at the end of this year, according to existing legislation, and it will be extended via an emergency government decree, Valcov said.
 “We believed that once the merger was complete we would compete fairly, openly and aggressively” The South African Property Owners Association, which represents commercial and industrial landlords, has asked anti-trust authorities to bar exclusivity provisions.
 It was formed through the merger of Asia Netcom Corp.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Headwinds faced by billionaire Uday Kotak after his $24 billion deal to buy ING Groep NV’s local unit show how workers’ unions may deter potential mergers and acquisitions among Indian lenders.
 State Lenders “Kotak Mahindra Bank will respect and honor all employee-related contractual commitments of ING Vysya Bank” as agreed upon in the merger deal, which will be binding on all parties after approval by the RBI and other regulators, Rohit Rao, Mumbai-based spokesman at Kotak Mahindra Bank said in an e-mail.
 The South Asian country has had 34 bank mergers in the last 45 years, according to RBI data.
 The remaining eight were mergers of private lenders.
 Gap Widening “Within the private sector, the gap between the top 5 players and the rest of the industry is widening,” Ravi Kapoor, the Mumbai-based head of corporate and investment banking at Citigroup Inc, the country’s top adviser for mergers and acquisition, said in an e-mail.
 “This may drive some of the smaller players to consider a strategy revolving around merger of equals, or merge with a larger bank” Workers at smaller private sector banks including Karnataka Bank Ltd, Karur Vysya Bank Ltd, Federal Bank Ltd, Dhanlaxmi Bank Ltd.
 India needs larger banks to meet its growing financing needs and mergers of existing lenders would be a step toward that, billionaire Kotak said in Mumbai after announcing the merger.
 It filed for Chapter 11 protection in 2008 and emerged in June 2009 by selling the project to CrossHarbor Capital Partners LLC for $115 million.
 after no competition emerged and the auction was canceled.
 New Filing Rhode Island’s Central Coventry Fire District in Chapter 9 Central Coventry Fire District, which provides fire protection and emergency medical services to some Rhode Island residents, filed a petition for a Chapter 9 municipal debt adjustment on Dec.
 “We will be paying close attention to the upcoming merger filings” for details on the transaction such as the timing of the talks and other potential bidders, she said.
 Past Talks Avanir had been in talks in September -- before the study data was released -- about a merger or sale to a specialty drug company, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 The merger filing with the US.
 After receiving his undergraduate degree from Gettysburg College in Pennsylvania and a law degree from Georgetown, he worked at law firm Pettit & Martin and then Piper & Marbury, which through mergers eventually became DLA Piper.
 It would provide $54 billion in emergency funds to respond to the Ebola outbreak.
 Deadliest War Congo in 2003 emerged from nearly a decade of war that engulfed the country and surrounding nations.
(Bloomberg) -- PPC Ltd, which is considering a merger with rival cement maker AfriSam Group Pty Ltd, has appointed Darryll Castle as chief executive officer as it seeks to end months of management turmoil.
 has defended its role in the collapse of the parcel delivery company, as it emerged that it could recoup as much as 20 million pounds ($31 million) from its investment.
 and Lafarge SA stalled the official European Union merger process for more than half a year.
 After announcing their merger in April, the world’s biggest cement makers took until the end of October to officially notify the EU.
 “If you’re clever about the merger-review procedure you can get multiple bites at the cherry,” said Alec Burnside, a lawyer with Cadwalader Wickersham & Taft LLP in Brussels.
 The pair sought in July to preempt competition concerns with an initial selling-spree plan that was amended with further divestments as the merger was filed with the EU.
 First Hurdle Under the EU’s merger-review process, most deals are cleared at the first hurdle, known as phase I.
 and Publicis Groupe SA scuttled their $35 billion merger this year after clashing over how to run it.
 The northbound 110 freeway reopened midmorning after earlier being closed while emergency vehicles used it as a staging ground.
 The parent company will merge with Caesars Acquisition Co.
 While Caesars needs additional creditors to sign on to its restructuring plan, the merger moves the casino operator a step closer to eliminating about half of its debt after losing money every year since 2009.
 “The merger gives clarity for the bondholders for how some of the funding” would happen for the restructuring, Chris Snow, an analyst at research firm CreditSights Inc, said by phone from New York.
 “The successful completion of the merger will position the merged company to support the restructuring of CEOC without the need for any significant outside financing,” Caesars said in the statement today.
 The more muted response to the deal from the unit’s shareholders than from owners of the parent company reflects that the consummation of the merger is far from certain, he said.
 Portugal Sale Billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA agreed this week to buy Oi’s Portuguese assets for 74 billion euros, unraveling Oi’s merger with Portugal Telecom.
 Hearts on Fire Chow Tai Fook is very cautious with mergers and acquisitions, and is only exploring the mine purchases, Cheng said.
(Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA has formalized its interest in acquiring Portuguese lender Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the breakup of Banco Espirito Santo SA.
 Starboard Value LP, the activist investor that successfully pushed for the merger of Office Depot Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- Holcim Ltd and Lafarge SA will each contribute five managers to an executive board led by Bruno Lafont after the merger of the world’s two biggest cement-makers is completed.
 Holcim Chairman Wolfgang Reitzle will continue in that role after the merger.
 in Moscow, paring yesterday’s 12 percent surge, after the government announced emergency measures to shore up banks and companies seeking to repay foreign-currency debt.
 Now, a group of startups has emerged to offer plans that are cheaper or don’t require swapping SIM cards between countries.
 In the event Syriza fails to win an outright majority, Greece could face a repeat of political paralysis and economic drift that plagued the country in 2012 before Samaras forged his coalition and, six months later, unfroze emergency aid.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- President Barack Obama used a visit the federal lab where an Ebola vaccine is being developed to urge quick congressional approval of $62 billion in emergency spending to fund treatment and prevention efforts in the US.
 Obama said he was encouraged by the bipartisan support the emergency funding has gained.
 Springleaf is viewed as the frontrunner for OneMain, the people said, because the potential cost savings it’ll achieve in a merger mean it can offer a higher price than a buyout fund, they said.
 Another dollar-store chain, Dollar General Corp, has made a higher bid, though Family Dollar management says a merger with that retailer would face regulatory hurdles.
 This month, it was reported that hackers with Wall Street expertise stole merger-and-acquisition information from more than 80 companies for more than a year.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- PPC Ltd, South Africa’s biggest cement maker, received an offer to merge from competitor AfriSam Group Pty Ltd.
 “We think a potential merger between PPC and AfriSam would create a formidable cement player,” the Public Investment Corp, Africa’s biggest fund manager and majority owner of AfriSam, said in a statement today.
 PPC is considering AfriSam’s merger proposal, the company said in a statement today.
 When Kean assumes the CEO’s job, he’ll inherit a company that he helped his boss streamline this year with a complex series of transactions valued at about $44 billion that merged four sister companies.
 “It’s becoming increasingly clear that a $117 price has emerged for the January-to-March quarter,” Ted O’Brien, chief executive officer of Doyle Trading Consultants LLC, a prominent source of price data for the coal industry, said in a phone interview.
 Other stocks moved on mergers-and-acquisitions activity.
 The company and its senior lenders agreed last month to the outline of a plan that would put the unit into bankruptcy and allow it to emerge as a real estate investment trust, people with knowledge of the discussions said at the time.
 BwinParty Digital Entertainment Plc climbed 15 percentafter saying it’s nearing a sale of its social gaming businessand is continuing merger talks with other parties.
 Deutsche Office and Alstria Office REIT AG would make good merger partners, he said.
 “The key drivers for value creation in the market are mergers that create economies of scale” Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE, Germany’s biggest residential landlord, offered to buy competitor Gagfah SA in a 39 billion-euro deal announced on Dec.
 It said it remains confident of closing the deal “in the course of 2015” The merged entity will have sales in excess of $7 billion and be the market leader in countries such as France and Austria.
 According to the merger agreement between Merck and Cubist, a negative legal outcome for Cubist isn’t counted as a “material adverse event” that would allow the deal’s breakup, he said.
 Bambang Sulistyo said in Jakarta Monday, since no signal was detected from the emergency local transmitter.
 While a market for centralized big-data warehouses has emerged in recent years, Cisco’s software will let some data be analyzed close to where it is generated.
 bonds plummeted after the natural gas and oil producer revised the terms of its merger agreement with Sabine Oil & Gas LLC to eliminate the need to repay the debt at 101 cents on the dollar.
 Forest Oil and Sabine revised the terms of their merger so that they would no longer require an $850 million loan financing provided by Barclays Plc and Wells Fargo & Co.
 As part of the merger the combined companies will receive a new reserve-based credit line with a borrowing base of $1 billion.
 The emergence of the old devices as a haven for Sony executives has served as a free advertisement of sorts and bolstered BlackBerry Chief Executive Officer John Chen’s focus on security to win government and business customers.
 The Delta IV can’t be launched by automated systems if wind speeds exceed 21 knots, a level that was breached twice today, contributing to countdown delays before the problem with the booster valves emerged.
 It would provide $54 billion in emergency funds to respond to the Ebola outbreak.
 One option is to convert some of the $80 billion Wellbeing Fund, which was designed to safeguard the pension system, into rubles to provide emergency loans to select companies.
 It’s also completing the basic work of meshing flight and airport operations with merger partner US Airways that has been under way during the first year of their combination.
 The airline has produced record profits since the merger closed on Dec.
 Those moves have assuaged bankruptcy creditors who ended up with stakes in the new American when it left court protection through the merger.
 American will seek a single operating certificate from federal regulators and fully merge its loyalty programs in the first half of 2015, and plans to move to one passenger reservation system sometime in the second half.
 When asked about the future of Viacom and CBS and whether they could combine with Time Warner, Bewkes said “they may want to be a merger partner for somebody or maybe even for themselves” “Whether they want to be for us, I don’t know if they do or not,” he said Thursday at a conference in New York sponsored by New York Times DealBook.
 More recently, Time Warner has been speculated as a merger candidate, particularly with CBS, since it slimmed down to focus on cable channels and the film studio.
 Analysts have discussed potential merger partners even more frequently since Time Warner, the owner of CNN, HBO and TBS, rejected an $85-a-share bid from Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 TV Consolidation Media companies are under pressure to consolidate to gain leverage when negotiating fees with TV distributors, which are also undergoing larger mergers of their own right now.
 They’re going to provide much lower volatility, and downside protection” The firm also offers ETFs that bet on mergers (using the ticker MNA), seek to protect against inflation (CPI), and invest in small real-estate investment trusts (ROOF).
 Hours later, a letter emerged from Bank of England Governor Mark Carney to a committee in Parliament stating that he had instructed his staff to review whether sizable losses from stranded coal, oil and gas reserves could hurt banks, investors, insurance companies and the rest of the financial system.
 While markets lulled by Federal Reserve intervention have crimped trading, investment bankers fared better amid a surge in mergers and issuance of debt and stock.
 Two years later, a Delaware judge rebuked the New York-based firm for “incomplete and inadequate” handling of a conflict in case involving the merger of oil-pipeline companies Kinder Morgan Inc.
 Politicians and union leaders called on the government for action to stop from losing one of the country’s most famous brands as the economy struggles to emerge from its longest recession.
 after its merger with Chrysler earlier this year, following truck and tractor maker CNH Industrial NV, which was spun off of Fiat in 2011.
 A merger of the Swiss and French companies will combine cement- and crushed-rock operations with $40 billion in annual revenue.
 They said they “continue to actively pursue negotiations for the sale of these assets with potential buyers”‘ Major Milestone “Europe is the most important area for this merger in terms of potential regulatory issues and, post deal, a major source of synergies,” said Ian Osburn, an analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald in London.
 “That makes the ruling” a “major milestone on the road to getting the merger completed” Holcim said last month it expects to get approval in all 20 jurisdictions required for the merger by the end of February.
 The company is “not available to raise the offer price at this moment” Portugal Telecom SGPS is a holding company whose main asset is a minority stake in the carrier created from Portugal Telecom’s merger with Brazilian phone carrier Oi SA.
 Now Oi is selling the Portuguese assets to gain funds that would help it participate in mergers and acquisitions in Brazil.
 Portuguese shareholders in Portugal Telecom include Ongoing Strategy Investments, Grupo Visabeira SGPS SA and Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the breakup of Banco Espirito Santo SA.
 ‘Personal Bank’ With Russian companies cut off from international financing, winners and losers are starting to emerge.
 Halliburton Inc’s pending $346 billion acquisition of Baker Hughes Inc, announced last month, was the beginning of what could be a series of mergers, Jankowski wrote in a Dec.
 “Inevitably, layoffs will occur next year, the result of mergers, bankruptcies, weak demand and the need to cut costs” Jobs Added The energy industry, including exploration, oil-field services, equipment manufacturing and engineering, has added 93,400 jobs in the Houston area since January 2010, or one in every five created during the recovery from the recession, according to the Greater Houston Partnership.
 Oil and gas deals have amounted to 22 percent of about $174billion in mergers and acquisitions involving Canadian companiesso far this year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 For now, companies that were previously considering assetsales or putting themselves for sale will likely take a stepback from the negotiating table until some stability returns,said Keith Chatwin, a partner at Stikeman Elliott LLP in Calgarywho specializes in energy mergers and acquisitions.
 Not everyone believes the current drop in prices will spura wave of mergers and acquisitions in the industry.
 Both previously worked at Edwards Wildman Palmer LLP, which recently voted to merge with Locke Lord LLP.
 Hong Kong-based CLSA plans to hire bankers next year to provide mergers advisory, equity capital markets services and the provision of debt to companies, said Andrew Low, the incoming head of the firm’s international investment banking unit.
 The emergency rate move followed the ruble’s biggest slide in 16 years.
(Bloomberg) -- Russia’s government said currency sales by major exporters will be subject to daily monitoring after the central bank’s emergency interest-rate increase failed to stem the ruble’s worst plunge since the 1998 debt default.
 John Reed, the Citicorp CEO who merged his firm with Sanford I.
 The company cut its 2014 sales forecast after a failed merger with Omnicom Group Inc.
 Sandy Damages Insurers that participate in a flood insurance program run by the Federal Emergency Management Agency are coming under increased scrutiny over their handling of some claims in the aftermath of Hurricane Sandy, the largest Atlantic hurricane on record which caused about $60 billion in damage in New Jersey, New York and Connecticut in October 2012.
 “It’s probably going to be a crossover, but development work is still ongoing” Tesla has emerged as a viable competitor to German auto manufacturers in the luxury-car space.
 Nodelman, 37, profited from a surge in mergers and the development of new drugs to cure diseases.
 “A combination of access to capital, an insatiable mergers and acquisitions environment and a new generation of biotech companies and entrepreneurs have created an unprecedented set of opportunities since the sector first started almost 40 years ago,” Nodelman wrote in an e-mail.
 Krensavage Asset Management founder Michael Krensavage credited his fund’s 34 percent gains to strong merger and acquisition activity in the sector.
 “Companies can cut costs significantly after they merge if a buyer has infrastructure and an acquisition has a portfolio of drugs,” said Krensavage.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Hackers with Wall Street expertise have stolen merger-and-acquisition information from more than 80 companies for more than a year, according to security consultants who shared their findings with law enforcement.
 “They seem to have worked on Wall Street” Most of the cases detected involved health-care or pharmaceutical companies, whose stock prices swing on news of mergers, clinical-trial results and regulatory decisions, according to Milpitas, California-based FireEye.
 In 2005, the agency sued two Estonian traders for breaking into the systems of Business Wire, which distributes press releases about corporate earnings, mergers and regulatory actions.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the collapse of Banco Espirito Santo SA, reported a key measure of financial strength that exceeds regulatory requirements, offering an insight into its accounts as it seeks a buyer.
 Delia’s, which has been plagued by slow website orders, said in September that it was exploring a sale or merger, or debt or equity financing after receiving inquiries about a takeover.
 After an emergency meeting this week, Russia’s central bank in the early hours of Dec.
 “These are two characteristics that we increasingly see also amongst our customers” With his promotion, Kaellenius emerges as one of the top candidates to eventually replace Zetsche along with Chief Financial Officer Bodo Uebber, China Chief Hubertus Troska and Wolfgang Bernhard, Daimler’s trucks boss.
 The Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries will wait at least three months before considering an emergency meeting, Suhail Al-Mazrouei, the United Arab Emirates’ energy minister, said on Dec.
 Economy Emerged Brazil’s economy emerged from recession in the third quarter as it expanded 01 percent.
 In an early victory for the companies, Young dismissed the case in a preliminary ruling in February, only to reverse course in June after new evidence emerged.
 Teva’s accord emerged after the defendants won a mid-trial ruling that the plaintiffs failed to prove the existence of an “over-arching conspiracy” among the three companies, and that AstraZeneca’s deals with the two generics companies had to be considered in isolation.
 in May, is relying on revenue from Nexium and another best-seller, Crestor, as it waits for new blockbuster drugs to emerge from its pipeline.
 Delia’s has been running low on cash and said in September that it had received several inquiries about a takeover, merger, or debt or equity financing.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- The head of BHP Billiton Ltd’s planned spinoff company defended the timing of the demerger next year as commodity prices tumble to five-year lows.
 Shareholders will vote in May on approving BHP’s demerger, the company said last month.
 In a year when merger activity was dominated by companies combining with one another, private-equity deals have started to make a small comeback.
 The government created IBRC in 2011 after it merged Anglo Irish Bank Corp.
 Expanding Glut The iron-ore glut emerged this year after a record expansion of mine capacity and as China, the world’s second-largest economy, grew at the slowest pace in two decades.
 The company has posted only one quarterly comparable-store sales gain since Lampert merged Sears Roebuck & Co.
 “Often a political crisis emerges from an economic crisis but that’s not how things are in this case” The krona was little changed at 9262 per euro as of 9 am.
 Those assets, including the stadium, were valued at $27 billion when they were being considered for a merger deal with the Los Angeles Dodgers this year, two people with direct knowledge of the situation said, declining to be named as the information was unofficial and the parties failed to agree on the merger.
 ‘Safe Bet’ Given the “new media deal and international growth prospects, the NBA is a very safe bet, particularly compared to certain Eastern European economies,” said Chuck Baker, who heads sports mergers and acquisition as a partner in DLA Piper’s Global Sports, Media and Entertainment practice.
 5 as oil’s plunge spurred concern that companies would cancel investments and emergency actions by Russia failed to stop the ruble’s slide.
 UBS in 1997 merged with Swiss Bank Corp, which built a trading floor in Stamford that’s the size of two football fields.
 Other founders include Akio Ishida, previously vice chairman of TPG Capital Japan, and Kenju Watanabe, a former mergers and acquisitions lawyer at Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Nordic phone carriers TeliaSonera AB and Telenor ASA agreed to merge their Danish businesses, the latest combination in a region where operators are seeking consolidation to boost sales and alleviate price competition.
 The planned merger is the latest attempt at consolidation in the region.
 “Still, he’s not even able to keep those companies that should pay taxes in the country” Hampered by stifling policies, the Italian economy is struggling to emerge from its longest recession on record after contracting in 11 of the last 13 quarters.
(Bloomberg) -- Alcatel-Lucent SA shares jumped as much as 82 percent after a German magazine reported that the French network-equipment maker is in merger talks with Finnish competitor Nokia Oyj.
 Jonathan, who imposed a state of emergency in three northeastern states last year, said the group has killed 13,000 people since 2009.
 Repsol is the most likely to be successful among potential buyers that have emerged including Canada Pension, because Talisman’s assets fit within Repsol’s existing operations, Cox said.
 Weiss, the global head of Lazard’s investment banking unit,has worked on international mergers and acquisitions.
 Franken said he was concerned about Weiss’s work oncorporate inversions and “his history working on internationalcorporate mergers for a Bermuda-based investment firm” “Wall Street’s perspective is already well-represented inthe administration,” Franken said.
 Their news conferences, TV interviews, emergency meetings on Capitol Hill and pressure from allies including the AFL-CIO labor federation prompted President Barack Obama to call lawmakers urging them to vote for the broader bill to avoid a government shutdown.
 CEO Evan Greenberg said in October that there could be a “feeding frenzy” for mergers and acquisitions as commercial insurers and reinsurers struggle to find other paths for growth.
 Policy makers raised the key rate to 17 percent from 105 percent at an emergency meeting during the night as it fights to slow inflation that’s been ignited by record ruble weakening.
 “The cost position of these operations has made them vulnerable to the structural decline in newsprint” Resolute, which emerged from bankruptcy in 2010, has struggled with a decline in demand as newspapers have lost readers and advertisers to the Internet.
(Bloomberg) -- Rupert Murdoch’s Sky Plc has dominated British pay-TV for almost 25 years, but the emergence of BT Group Plc as an ambitious new competitor threatens to bring its rule to an end.
 Sunrise Merger? Niel could also seek to merge Orange with Sunrise, another Swiss carrier owned by European private-equity firm CVC, to create a serious competitor for Swisscom, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Emergency Response “This is an approach one uses only in emergency situations,” Alonso said in an interview in London.
 OPEC may hold an emergency meeting early next year, Venezuela’s foreign minister told Panorama newspaper.
 She also advised on mergers, acquisitions, dispositions and financial services regulatory matters.
 The team was led by partners Rodd Schreiber, corporate, Ann Beth Stebbins, mergers and acquisitions; Gavin White, tax; and Steven Messina, banking.
 Parents wept outside the emergency room, and lines of ambulances waited by the building to take bodies away after they had been identified.
 “If monetary policy tried to further stimulate domestic demand, which is already growing at a 5 percent rate, it could lead to a quick emergence of imbalances in the Polish economy” The European Union’s largest eastern economy is caught between its first bout of deflation since at least the 1980s and third-quarter gross domestic product expanding a better-than-forecast 33 percent.
 jumped 10 percent after the two biggest trainmakers agreed to merge.
 Mostyn now is one of the lawyers representing the Dwecks, who were provided with flood insurance through the Hartford unit under a program administered by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
 Further Weakening Japan’s recession, deepened by companies’ reluctance to plow gains from the weak yen back into domestic investments and consumers’ hesitance to spend, prompted Abe to call an election, betting he’d emerge with firmer support for his economic agenda.
 30, adjusted for the merger in October of Italian carmaker Fiat with US.
 Lenovo’s rally defied what Michael Dell told reporters the day the deal was unveiled: “When was the last time you saw a successful merger or acquisition in the computer industry?” he said.
 Jeep’s Surge Group European sales by FCA, the London-based carmaker created from the merger of Fiat and US.
 China, the world’s largest car market, is set to emerge as the biggest sales region for the new, 200,000-euro ($247,600) Maybach version of the flagship S-Class sedan that Mercedes unveiled in the country last month.
 Before that, Salix had ended a $27 billion merger agreement with Italy’s Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA in October after the US.
 The new Tacoma will intensify competition in mid-sized pickups, a segment in which GM has emerged after a two-year hiatus.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Starboard Value, the activist investor that successfully pushed for the merger of Office Depot Inc.
 today and increased its holding in Office Depot to 99 percent, a move that could add pressure on the two retailers to merge.
 Still, an office-supply merger would face challenges.
 Supply Chain Japanese investigators reached similar conclusions as the NTSB while probing another battery incident that occurred during a flight and forced an emergency landing at Takamatsu Airport on Jan.
 A smaller lithium-ion battery used to power an emergency-locator beacon caught fire on a 787 on the ground in London on July 12, 2013.
 An FAA review of the Dreamliner’s certification concluded the plane was safe and the agency had processes in place to identify and correct issues that emerged after its certification.
 “Given how low NQ’s share price is after the big slump last week, the $80 million would mean a buyback of a pretty sizable percent of the outstanding shares based on market value,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- UBS Group AG said London-based investment banker Alison Harding-Jones will move to Hong Kong in January to run its mergers advisory unit in the Asia-Pacific region.
 that can pick up emergency signals from a downed plane’s data recorders.
 said the stock will benefit from mergers in the industry.
 That deal would merge the dollar-store market’s No.
(Bloomberg) -- Emerging-market stocks gained for the first time in nine days and the ruble rebounded as Russia took emergency measures to support the currency and the Federal Reserve signaled that it’s no rush to raise US.
 It was told to “immediately” increase the bank’s capital to the minimums required in a 2012 consent order or submit a contingency plan for a sale, merger or liquidation, according to the filing.
 European Growth Sky has paid more than $10 billion to merge Sky Italia SpA and Sky Deutschland AG with its UK.
 Spain’s economy is set to outstrip European growth this year after a recovery in domestic demand added to the export boom that enabled the country to emerge from recession.
 It would provide $54 billion inemergency funds to respond to the Ebola outbreak.
 ‘Steps Ahead’ ING was formed by the 1991 merger of insurer Nationale-Nederlanden, which traces its roots to 1845, and NMB Postbank Group, the first Dutch lender operating predominantly by telephone and mail.
 Next year, oil mergers may command a bigger share of the deal flow.
 A merger would provide a way to further reduce expenses and expand margins.
 “GLENTINTO” -- Glencore sent shockwaves through the mining world when the Baar, Switzerland-based commodities conglomerate confirmed in October that it had approached Rio Tinto Group about a merger.
 “Consumers would be the prime concern of any regulatory structure we build -- making sure they are fully aware of the risks associated with virtual currency and providing effective, reasonable safeguards against those risks” The question of how and whether to regulate bitcoin has confounded regulators around the world since it emerged in software form in 2009 from a paper authored by an anonymous computer scientist and cryptographer.
 asked a Delaware court to allow the oil-services company to complete a $286 billion merger with a unit of Nabors Industries Ltd, arguing the proposed tax inversion deal was far from the surreptitious sale critics claim it is.
 If the merger proceeds, C&J’s fleet will combine with Nabors’s fracking services unit, which is the sixth-biggest in the US.
 If investors approve the merger, the resulting company will boast more than 1,500 oilfield trucks and more than 600 rigs used to revive wells.
 Guaranteed Positions Under the deal, Nabors will get 625 million C&J shares and $940 million in cash, officials said when the merger was announced in June.
 C&J shareholders contend Comstock and other board members are unfairly benefiting from the deal by receiving guaranteed positions with the merged company, according to court filings.
 Delaware Chancery Judge John Noble concluded that the merger amounted to a takeover by Nabors, and C&J’s directors mistakenly treated it as an acquisition of the rival company’s fracking-services unit.
 In their Supreme Court filings, C&J’s lawyers argued directors understood control of the company would change hands as part of the merger and intentionally decided not to entertain other offers.
 The CEO also pushed Nabors officials to pay him a $191 million “success bonus” if the merger was completed, according to court filings.
(Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc started exclusive talks to acquire Deutsche Telekom AG and Orange SA’s British wireless venture EE for 125 billion pounds ($195 billion), moving ahead with a deal that’s set to spur more mergers in the UK.
 The new company would emerge from Chapter 11 proceedings as a real estate investment trust.
 IAG was created in 2011 through a merger of British Airways and Iberia.
 merged their operations.
 Mark Schoenebaum, an analyst with Evercore ISI in New York, said in a note to clients that a negative legal outcome for Cubist isn’t counted as a “material adverse event” that would allow the deal’s breakup under the terms of the merger agreement, he said.
 Oyak Group, a military pension fund manager with interests in carmaking and cement production, aims to buy some of the assets of divestments from the merger of Holcim Ltd.
 “Abilio Diniz will bring us his unrivaled knowledge of Brazil’s retail market and business landscape,” Plassat said in today’s statement, describing the 77-year-old billionaire as “the best partner to support our growth” It is more than two years since Diniz tried unsuccessfully to undo an agreement to cede control of local supermarket leader Pao de Acucar to Casino Guichard-Perrachon SA by instead proposing a merger with Carrefour’s Brazil unit.
 A year into the US Airways merger, American is embarking on upgrades more visible to fliers after emphasizing the basics of meshing operations.
 9, 2013, paid its first dividend since 1980 and announced a $1 billion share buyback plan -- soothing creditors who ended up with stakes in the new airline when it left bankruptcy via the merger.
 American’s merger was the last among the deals shrinking the ranks of US.
 American will seek a single operating certificate from federal regulators and fully merge its loyalty programs in the first half of 2015, and plans to move to one passenger reservation system sometime in the second half.
 Since the emergence of General Motors Co.
 It would provide $54billion in emergency funds to respond to the Ebola outbreak.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Plc, the mining company that proposed a merger with Rio Tinto Group this year, is weighing whether to continue buying back its shares in 2015 against other potential opportunities including acquisitions.
 After a decade of price gains fueled by Chinese demand, often defined as the commodities supercycle, miners have been contending with slower growth by shunning mergers, reducing spending and cutting costs.
 That deal would merge the dollar-store market’s No.
 Chief Executive Officer Greg Wasson will retire, clearing the way for top shareholder Stefano Pessina to tighten his grip amid a merger with his European retailer Alliance Boots GmbH.
 “Two weeks away from a vote on a transformational merger, shareholders do not even have a clear sense of who will be running this company,” said Dieter Waizenegger, executive director of CtW Investment group, a union-backed pension advisory firm.
 Friendly Deal? Comments in the recent weeks by Telecom Italia and Oi executives showed the companies may be willing to negotiate a merger in Brazil.
 Bayard Gontijo, Oi’s interim CEO, when asked last month whether Oi could merge with Tim, said his “objective is to create shareholder value” and he “won’t have any prejudice in how we’re going to do that” Patuano said last month that while keeping the Brazilian business remains the preferred option, the carrier would look at “any good opportunities” in the country.
(Bloomberg) -- The sale of Novo Banco SA, the lender that emerged from the breakup of Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo SA, drew interest from 17 entities after firms including Banco Santander SA and Banco BPI SA said they may make bids.
 “Many of the mining operations that emerged over the past decade are unviable at current prices.
 In response to pressure from New York and New Jersey lawmakers, Federal Emergency Management Agency Administrator W.
 mergers that created unwieldy conglomerates.
 There may be more opportunity for these moves on the European continent, said Severin Brizay, head of mergers and acquisitions in Europe, Middle East and Africa at UBS Group AG.
 “With a strong IPO market, boards tend to switch toward spinoffs and demergers,” said Luigi Rizzo, head of mergers and acquisitions for EMEA at Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 In response to analyst questions after the Allergan purchase was announced, Actavis management said the company would be looking at opportunities for growth in dermatology and ophthalmology via mergers and acquisitions.
 isn’t lacking acclaim for its merger and acquisition advisory business.
 and Lafarge SA’s $375 billion merger.
 Advent and the EBRD are taking over the businesses that emerged from an Austrian bank failure and cost taxpayers in the Alpine republic billions of euros.
 Bambang Sulistyo, search and rescue agency chief, said today in Jakarta, with no signal detected from the emergency local transmitter.
 mergers and initial public offerings.
 “An appetite for high quality initial public offerings will prevail along with increased activity in mergers and acquisitions,” Chief Executive Officer Oliver Hemsley said in the statement.
 unemployment rate and moderate growth call for returning monetary policy to normal from an emergency stance with near-zero interest rates.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- The wave of phone-company deals in Germany, Spain and France has now arrived in the UK, where BT Group Plc and Vodafone Group Plc are considering multibillion-pound mergers.
 Transactions that exceeded $10 billion in value accounted for almost a record proportion of the $29 trillion of merger agreements struck in 2014, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “MEGABREW” -- That’s the nickname for the much-speculated merger of beer giants Anheuser-Busch InBev NV and SABMiller Plc.
 The merger still makes sense, though.
 can proceed with its $286 billion merger with a unit of Nabors Industries Ltd.
 If the merger proceeds, C&J’s fleet will combine with Nabors’s fracking services unit, the sixth-biggest in the US.
 The CEO also pushed Nabors officials to pay him a $191 million “success bonus” if the merger was completed, according to court filings.
 Under the deal, Nabors investors are slated to get 625 million C&J shares and $940 million in cash, officials said when the merger was announced in June.
 Noble concluded that the merger amounted to a takeover by Nabors and C&J’s directors mistakenly treated it as an acquisition.
 The deal also allowed C&J Energy directors to consider a higher offer if one emerged, Strine said.
 “Most of the big companies were created through mergers at the time of political or economic crisis” Genel has spent about $14 billion on acquisitions and plans to continue to grow, Sepil said.
 Crude could fall to as low as $40 a barrel amid a price war or if divisions emerge in the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, said an official at Iran’s oil ministry.
 Bambang Sulistyo said in Jakarta, with no signal from the emergency local transmitter detected.
 The informal 180-day clock used by the FCC to complete merger reviews will have 76 days remaining when the pause ends, implying a new deadline of late March.
 They were second only to mergers and acquisitions in the third quarter.
 oversees about $19 billion in hedge funds that can bet on credit markets, mergers and corporate events.
 The firm has lost money in recent months on Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac securities and a failed health care company merger.
 Paulson, 58, has experienced big wins and losses in the past few years because of concentrated bets on mergers, gold, the European debt crisis and mortgages.
 After starting his fund to profit on corporate mergers in 1994, he made $15 billion in 2007 by wagering against the US.
 The following year he lost a fortune on gold and speculating against Europe before a comeback in 2013 driven by company mergers and investing in stocks.
 Paulson & Co’s merger-arbitrage vehicle rose 12 percent last month, bringing it up 11 percent for the year, according to one of the people.
 Assets in the merger funds comprise about half of the firm’s assets, the person said.
 And it will have to emerge from the shadow of a man who has steered the brand for more than two decades.
 and Covidien Plc, are in the process of completing a merger that was announced in June.
 About 800 peer-to-peer lending websites emerged in China just in 2013 with outstanding loans of 268 billion yuan ($43 billion), according to Xinhua News Agency.
 Oi acquired the Portuguese assets just a year ago in a merger with Portugal Telecom.
 13 whether Oi could merge with Tim, he said he “won’t have any prejudice” on how Oi would take part in consolidation.
 Last month, she made a 12 billion-euro bid for Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, the holding company whose main asset is a minority stake in the carrier created by the Oi and Portugal Telecom merger.
 Telecom Italia wants an indication from Brazil’s government and telecommunications regulator that they won’t block a merger of Tim Participacoes SA with Oi before it makes a move, the people said, asking not be identified because the deliberations are private.
 Telecom Italia’s board last month gave Chief Executive Officer Marco Patuano the backing to explore a merger of Tim with Oi.
 British Airways pilots are required to complete a simulator test once every six months to ensure they are capable of handling emergencies.
 A merger involving the remaining three large elevator companies is unlikely because of antitrust hurdles.
 Takeovers and mergers in the animal nutrition sector are being driven by rising global demand for protein as farmers contend with limited resources of land and water.
 Madalena should also consider a share repurchase, merger or sale of the company, Maglan said.
 was the top investment banking adviser on Canadian mergers and acquisitions in 2014, as oil and gas and cross-border deals drove takeovers to a seven-year high.
 Continued weakness in the mining sector was in part to blame for the showing of the Canadian banks, Peter Buzzi, RBC co-head of mergers and acquisitions, said in an interview.
 No other bidders have emerged, and the board is unlikely to form a special committee on the basis of the offer supported by Charney, the person said.
 merged Dubal with Abu Dhabi-based smelter Emirates Aluminium Co.
 Tuesday in Indonesia search crews discovered objects including what appears to be an emergency door as well as submerged items resembling plane parts, FH.
 Buffett got the warrant as part of his agreement to help finance the merger, which was announced in August and completed last week.
 *** A touching story that emerged from the field of municipal bankruptcy this year was the struggle by the Detroit Institute of Arts to avert a forced selloff of paintings and sculpture.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV’s share sale will carry a discount of 41 percent after the stock yesterday plunged the most since the merged carmaker’s October debut on the New York Stock Exchange.
 FCA was formed earlier this year through the merger of Fiat, Italy’s biggest carmaker, with its US.
 30, adjusted for the October merger, the company said in a filing last week.
 Other Latin America fortunes that emerged include five billionaires from Brazil -- Joesley, Wesley, Valere, Vanessa and Vivianne Batista -- who created the world’s biggest beef producer after making more than $17 billion in acquisitions.
 says it’s still bullish on nickel because the country won’t be able to expand supply much more and a global shortage will emerge.
 The market will stabilize and OPEC will wait at least three months before considering an emergency meeting, UAE.
 The slew of deals gave merger-arbitrage traders plenty to wager on, after last year’s scarcity of profit opportunities.
 The explosion of megamergers brought volatility back to the investing strategy.
 That burned merger-arbitrage funds, some of which will end the year at a loss even as stocks around the world surge.
 On the other hand, you’ve had real risk emerge and portfolio managers can no longer work on cruise control” Merger Spreads This is how merger arbitrage is supposed to work: Company A announces that it’s buying Company B.
 Regulatory risk has left gaps of more than 5 percent in other big deals including the $26 billion merger of cigarette makers Reynolds American Inc.
 “Over time, I think other alternatives will emerge,” he said.
 Parents wept outside the hospital’s emergency room, and lines of ambulances waited by the building to take bodies away after they had been identified.
 to deploy its cash and invest more on facilities and workers, saying “the rule book for business will be rewritten” as the economy emerges from deflation.
 Weiss, the global head of Lazard’s investment banking unit, has worked on international mergers and acquisitions.
 Franken said he was concerned about Weiss’s work on corporate inversions and “his history working on international corporate mergers for a Bermuda-based investment firm” “Wall Street’s perspective is already well-represented in the administration,” Franken said.
 “A bankruptcy doesn’t resolve decades of neglect in our infrastructure” The functioning of basic infrastructure has been a challenge for the auto manufacturing capital, which is trying to emerge from a record $18 billion municipal bankruptcy.
 Art Emergency Today, power went out about 10:30 am.
 The judge said information that emerged at trial convinced her that plaintiff Marianna Rosen, a South Orange, New Jersey, resident who bought iPods for herself and her son in 2008 using a credit card issued by the law firm of her then-husband, wasn’t an adequate representative of the class of iPod buyers covered by the case.
 Takeovers Climb Canada’s banks earned record revenue from advising on takeovers and arranging stock sales this year as mergers and acquisitions rebounded and equity financings increased.
 and Renault SA raising prices, policy makers tried for a second day to reverse the rout in the ruble with emergency measures.
 The proposals were made a month after Vladimir Zhirinovsky, a deputy speaker of Russia’s lower house of parliament, called for Kazakhstan to be merged into a new Russian region.
 “Thanks to its strong cash flow from a sizeable production base, as well as attractive discoveries,” the company “will, in our opinion, succeed in raising new financing should a funding gap emerge,” the bank said.
 and Taiwanese companies focused on semiconductor design will struggle to compete with the newly-merged Chinese firms, according to Mark Li, an analyst at Sanford C.
 Beijing’s Tsinghua University plans to merge two recently-acquired semiconductor design firms while a government-owned company in Shanghai has announced two acquisitions so far this year.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- The Nordic region’s biggest bank says a wave of mergers and acquisitions is likely to follow the plunge in oil prices as companies with enough scale to weather the shock devour struggling competitors.
 While the state-owned company didn’t give a figure for the size of the sale, the combined market capitalization could reach 8 trillion yen ($67 billion), according to GCA Savvian Corp, a mergers and acquisitions advisory firm.
 The smaller “challenger” banks may have no choice other than to merge with each other if they hope to compete against these four, which control as much as 80 percent of the market.
 A merger between TSB and customer-owned Co-Operative Bank Plc makes sense as well, according to Investec Ltd.
 20 that the bank plans to increase its market share above 6 percent and continues to grow “well ahead of our strategy” A representative for the bank declined to comment last week on whether the lender would consider mergers and acquisitions.
 A merger with Co-Operative Bank could also “make sense” because Lloyds had previously held talks to sell TSB to the customer-owned lender, Gordon added.
 Bigger Deal A bigger move would be a merger between TSB and Virgin Money.
 “Many retail customers still feel much more comfortable with a large traditional bank because of the perceived state backing of the bank and concerns, however unfounded they might be, over the position of smaller challenger banks,” said Gavin Weir, a partner advising on mergers and acquisitions at White & Case LLP.
 After a decade of price gains fueled by Chinese demand, often defined as the commodities supercycle, miners have been contending with slower growth by shunning mergers, reducing spending and cutting costs.
 The errors prompted the losses that brought Knight to its knees and which led to its merger with trading firm Getco to form KCG.
 Policy makers, having spent more than $80 billion since January to prop up the currency, raised their key rate to 17 percent from 105 percent at an emergency meeting last night.
 “We have now launched the growth phase, which will gain momentum through the merger.
 The company said its goal for this year to reach “approximately 1 billion euros” of adjusted Ebita also holds after the merger.
 As they met in Brussels today, splits emerged over an alternative plan that would see powers spread out, giving other nations the right to veto decisions taken by the lead authority.
 They already have banks or lawyers over here that allow them to make purchases” Russia is struggling to reverse a rout in the ruble with emergency measures including 75 percentage points of interest rate increases and more than $10 billion of ruble purchases as President Vladimir Putin confronts the country’s deepest financial crisis since 1998.
 Luke Jr, the great-great-grandson of founder William Luke, is the current chairman and CEO of Richmond, Virginia-based MeadWeastvaco, formed in 2002 by the $329 billion merger of Westvaco, which was long based in New York, with Mead Corp.
 The Sweden Democrats, which emerged holding the balance of power after September’s election, said today it will reject the Social Democrat government’s budget.
 The Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries will wait at least three months before considering an emergency meeting, Suhail Al-Mazrouei, the United Arab Emirates’ energy minister, said yesterday.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- German mergers and acquisitions will have “another strong year” in 2015, helped by an increase in spinoffs and shareholder activism, a senior JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 That offer was turned down and no other bidders emerged at the time.
 China is beginning to emerge as a legitimate contender to Silicon Valley as the center of the technology industry, fueled by an Alibaba IPO that brought in more money than any in history.
 Sometimes the merger partner is a company that itself inverted from the US.
 Medtronic, a Minneapolis-based medical device maker, cited its untapped overseas cash when it announced plans in June to change its legal address to Ireland through a merger with Covidien.
 The IRS has called the company’s profit shifting “absurd,” characterizing it as “a transfer to a shell corporation domiciled in a tax haven which had little or no operations there” Medtronic attorneys have said in court filings that the IRS’s attempt to tax those profits is “arbitrary, capricious and unreasonable” Fernando Vivanco, a company spokesman, said Medtronic “pays all applicable foreign taxes on its foreign earnings in the countries in which it conducts business”  Medtronic’s prospective merger partner Covidien, already an inverted company, is in a separate IRS dispute.
 The company plans to shed a chunk of its overseas generic drug business and merge it with pharmaceutical company Mylan Inc.
 AOL acquired Huffington Post for $315 million and merged its content brands, including TechCrunch, Moviefone and Patch, under a new unit.
 Both Norbord and Ainsworth are controlled by Toronto-based Brookfield Asset Management Inc, which will own about 53 percent of the newly merged company.
 Food and Drug Administration for emergency use of a test to detect the type of Ebola that has been spreading in West Africa.
 Cannell acknowledged that DeMarse, who took her position in 2012, has been improving results at the company by cutting expenses and with acquisitions including a purchase of The Deal LLC, which covers mergers and acquisitions news.
 David Laibson, a Harvard University economics professor, suggests giving employees two savings accounts at work: a 401(k) only for retirement, and another whose funds could be withdrawn for emergencies or life events without penalty.
 The Dublin-based company has previously signaled it may consider buying some cement assets being sold by Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd, which are trying to complete a $40 billion merger.
 CRH, which was formed in 1970 through the merger of two Irish companies, operates in 35 countries with about 76,000 people and had about 18 billion euros in sales, according to its website.
(Bloomberg) -- BwinParty Digital Entertainment Plc, one of the largest online gambling operators in Europe, said it’s close to selling its social gaming business and is in continuing merger talks with other parties.
 “We would like to see these firms implement bold measures, including the scaling back of production facilities, refinery closures and corporate reorganization including alliances with other companies” Japanese refiners should seek “restructuring and mergers” to cut processing capacity in a country where oil product demand is forecast to fall by 78 percent between fiscal 2013 and 2018, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said in a June report.
 The takeover is the biggest among British insurers since CGU Plc’s 74 billion-pound merger in 2000 with Norwich Union Plc, which created Aviva, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Paulson Losses Quants are succeeding as some of the most well known stock and bond pickers struggle in forecasting the outcome of corporate mergers or gauging the impact of central bankers on markets.
 ING will have a stake of about 7 percent in the merged company, it said.
 The Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries may hold an emergency meeting in the first quarter, Venezuela’s Foreign Minister Rafael Ramirez said in an interview with Panorama newspaper.
 They planned a reverse stock split after the merger that would raise the price per share and meet the NYSE listing standard.
 The merger between China CNR Corp.
 The new name reflects the global ambitions of the merged company, said Daniel Schwartz, Burger King’s CEO.
 ‘Routine Request’ Manulife is “aware of the actions taken by the AMF” and is cooperating with the investigation, the Toronto-based insurer said in a statement Friday, while Canaccord Genuity spokesman Scott Davidson said the firm is cooperating with a “routine request for information” Canaccord Genuity frequently receives and “fulfills similar requests for information” following underwriting and mergers-and-acquisition transactions, Reynolds said in today’s memo.
 The company is analyzing all possible merger and acquisition options, and there will be no consolidation in Brazil without Oi, he said.
 “Any severe accident at Takahama would be devastating for Kansai’s people and economy –- there are no effective emergency plans existing that could protect the people in the region from radiation exposure,” according to the statement.
 said today it may challenge the Bank of Portugal’s decision not to transfer Banco Espirito Santo’s debt to a special-purpose vehicle to Novo Banco, the bank that emerged from the breakup of Lisbon-based Banco Espirito Santo.
 A sale would also unravel Oi’s plan for a trans-Atlantic telecommunications carrier through a merger with Portugal Telecom agreed a year ago.
 13 whether Oi could merge with Tim, he said he “won’t have any prejudice” on how Oi would take part in consolidation.
 Unravel Plan Oi and Portugal Telecom agreed a year ago on a merger to create a carrier with 100 million customers to compete against Telefonica SA and Carlos Slim’s America Movil SAB.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding debt defaulted on by Rioforte Investments SA, a unit of Grupo Espirito Santo.
 Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava, who drove the merger, stepped down in October.
 “If a pilot declares an emergency, they can do pretty much whatever they want to do” Rough Weather Rough weather was hampering the search today.
 Among other companies moving on corporate news, Alcatel-Lucent SA rallied 87 percent after a Manager Magazin report that Nokia Oyj resumed merger talks with the French company.
(Bloomberg) -- Two decisions in December in the Delaware courts have reaffirmed the power of corporate boards to shape a merger agreement.
 19, the Delaware Supreme Court held that a board has flexibility in selling a company while the state’s Chancery Court, on the same day, refused to block a shareholder vote on a merger despite a competitor’s outstanding bid.
 In a case emanating from the proposed $286 billion merger of C&J Energy Services Inc.
 Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz said in a memorandum that the ruling showed, first, “that a board of directors has wide latitude to craft a sales process, including to choose a single-bidder strategy; and, second, that the Delaware courts, even if they find that a board erred in decision-making, cannot rewrite the merger contract in a way that reduces the buyer’s rights” Jeroen Van Kwawegen, an attorney for the pension fund challenging the deal, said he’ll press ahead with his suit.
 government will sell its remaining $125 billion stake in the auto lender, resolving the last big bailout from an emergency government program to halt the 2008 financial crisis.
 had owned as much as 74 percent of the firm after a $172 billion rescue, part of emergency efforts to prop up the nation’s auto and banking industries.
 The Competition Commission of India ordered Sun and Ranbaxy to sell seven brands in which the merged company would have “appreciable adverse effect” on domestic competition as a result of market share, the commission said on its website yesterday.
 It emerged less than two months later.
 The transaction, which includes the retailer’s Wetherlys outlets, should ensure there will be “no retrenchment of the remaining 308 employees post-merger,” the Competition Commission said in an e-mailed statement today.
(Bloomberg) -- An Air France jumbo jet flying from the Caribbean to Paris with crates of peppers in the cargo hold was forced to make an emergency landing in Ireland after condensation from the vegetables set off a fire alarm.
 Marcus said he sees “no real issues” in the Department of Justice’s review of the proposed $452 billion acquisition and said that the merger review process overall was “going as anticipated” Speaking at UBS AG’s media conference in New York today, he also said the two companies are making progress toward gaining approvals at the state and local levels.
 Last week, the Federal Communications Commission resumed its consideration of the merger suggesting a decision as early as March.
 water and waste industry is likely to see more mergers and acquisitions after Ofwat publishes the prices that companies can charge customers for the five-year period starting 2015.
 “As we come to the end of the price review process, there is greater clarity of the economics of the next five years and that should make merger and acquisition activity more likely,” he said.
 The Russian company, founded by former USSR Air Force economist Alexey Isaikin, was the first private cargo operator to emerge during the Soviet Union’s last days in 1990.
 Animal nutrition is a current hotspot for mergers and acquisitions, drawing on growing global needs for foods amid limited resources such as water.
(Bloomberg) -- China’s government said it merged Beijing Energy Investment Holding Co.
 The merger of Beijing Energy and Jingmei, a coal supplier based in the capital, will improve electricity supply, Lin Fusheng, head of Beijing’s Assets Supervision and Administration Commission, said in a report by the official Xinhua News Agency today.
 The merger took place yesterday, Beijing Energy, which invests in electricity projects, said on its website.
 Listed Units All three publicly traded units related to the merged companies were suspended from trading today.
 The merged business has assets worth 200 billion yuan, which it aims to increase to 300 billion yuan by the end of 2020, Xinhua said.
 Buffett helped finance the merger, which was announced in August.
 Hanwha Merger Hanwha Solar Holdings Co, based in Seoul, today said it will merge its US-listed photovolaic maker Hanwha SolarOne Co, which has plants in China, with Thalheim, Germany-based Hanwha Q Cells, which it acquired in 2012 and has plants in Germany and Malaysia.
 government disposed of its remaining $128 billion stake in auto lender Ally Financial Inc, resolving the last big bailout from an emergency government program to halt the 2008 financial crisis.
 had owned as much as 74 percent of Ally after a $172 billion rescue, part of emergency efforts to prop up the nation’s auto and banking industries.
 The value of completed mergers and acquisitions in Saudi Arabia has risen 69 percent to $443 million in 2014, after a more than 70 percent drop in 2013, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 government-backed Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac have insured themselves against losses on $383 billion of home loans, strains are starting to emerge.
(Bloomberg) -- OPEC will stand by its decision not to cut output even if oil prices fall as low as $40 a barrel and will wait at least three months before considering an emergency meeting, the United Arab Emirates’ energy minister said.
 The planned merger between China CNR Corp.
 The merger is very likely to be conducted through a share swap because it is the most practical way and no cash will be needed, Caixin reported Oct.
 (ODP) earlier today, plans to push the companies to merge and cutoverlapping expenses in an industry with too many stores,according to a person familiar with the matter.
 While such a deal would leave only one dominant office-supplies retailer in the US, the hedge fund is confident thatthe Federal Trade Commission would approve it, said the person,who asked not to be identified because the talks are privateThe regulator signed off on Office Depot’s merger with OfficeMaxInc.
 Staples and Office Depot soared today on speculation thatStarboard Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Smith, whosuccessfully pushed Office Depot and OfficeMax to merge, wouldtry to replicate that strategy with Staples.
 to 99 percent, in a move that could increase pressure on the two companies to merge.
 to 99 percent, in a move that could increase pressure on the two companies to merge.
 “ButStarboard looks intent on getting both companies to the tableIn a market where valuations are stretched, here are twocompanies with a catalyst, relatively reasonable valuations, andan activist with a track record of success” Strasser also said that managers at both chains didn’t seemto oppose a merger in recent discussions.
 Starboard has a record of buying stakes in companies andpushing for mergers.
(Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC, the New York-based private-equity firm led by Leon Black, is considering making a bid for Portuguese lender Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the breakup of Banco Espirito Santo SA.
 “We would like to see these firms implement bold measures, including the scaling back of production facilities, refinery closures and corporate reorganization including alliances with other companies” Japanese refiners should seek “restructuring and mergers” to cut processing capacity in a country where oil product demand is forecast to fall by 78 percent between fiscal 2013 and 2018, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said in a June report.
 The purchase is Franco-Israeli tycoon Drahi’s second major deal this year, bringing annual sales at Altice’s businesses to more than 15 billion euros as European carriers merge to reduce costs and revive earnings.
 Oi is backing away from ambitions to become a trans-Atlantic phone carrier after announcing the acquisition of the Portuguese assets last year in a merger with Portugal Telecom.
 Last month, she made a 12 billion-euro bid for Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, the holding company whose main asset is a minority stake in the carrier created by the Oi and Portugal Telecom merger.
 In July, the companies renegotiated the transaction to give Portugal Telecom a smaller stake in the combined entity after it emerged that the Lisbon-based partner was holding debt defaulted on by Rioforte Investments SA, a unit of Grupo Espirito Santo.
 Oi Chief Executive Officer Zeinal Bava, who drove the merger, stepped down in October.
 The town has struggled for years: It dissolved its police department in 2001 and declared a fiscal emergency last year, even as its population grew from about 18,000 in 2000.
 Since the fiscal emergency, a precursor to municipal bankruptcy under California law, Adelanto has cut spending by about $25 million by closing a fire station, letting go almost a quarter of employees and eliminating its building and safety department, according to a report by Hart.
 Merged Program American plans next year to merge its loyalty plan with that of partner US Airways.
 European Union legislation will require new cars to have a system that automatically notifies emergency services after a serious crash, relaying basic data about location of the accident even if the driver is unconscious.
 Noto, who ran the global technology, media and telecom group since 2011, led the bank to the top spot among advisers on mergers and acquisitions in the technology sector for his first two years and capped his career with the lead role on Twitter Inc’s $209 billion initial offering in 2013.
 tech sector, New York-based Goldman Sachs holds the top rank among advisers of both mergers and IPOs in the industry, rankings compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Companies on both sides of the negotiating table have pursued multi-billion dollar mergers to increase their bargaining leverage.
 Another dollar-store chain, Dollar General Corp, has made rival bids, though Family Dollar management has said a merger with that retailer would face higher regulatory hurdles.
 The Dublin-based company has previously signaled it may consider buying some cement assets being sold by Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd, which are trying to complete a $40 billion merger.
 CRH, which was formed in 1970 through the merger of two Irish companies, operates in 35 countries with about 76,000 people and had about 18 billion euros in sales, according to its website.
 That deal would merge the dollar-store market’s No.
 Verisk has been expanding through mergers and acquisitions amid what Chief Executive Officer Scott Stephenson has called the “quiet revolution” of insurers relying more on data.
 In the last five years, Ocwen has emerged as one of the country’s largest mortgage servicing providers, acquiring rights to hundreds of billions of dollars of unpaid balances on residential loans from companies including Litton Loan Servicing LP, Saxon Mortgage Services Inc.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA, which cut its 2014 sales forecast following a failed merger with Omnicom Group Inc, said it will start to recover next year helped by the acquisition of US.
 “A transformed Publicis will allow us to streamline costs and increase our profitability” The company, which in May abandoned a $35 billion merger with Omnicom that would have created the world’s largest ad company, last month agreed to buy Sapient for $37 billion.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- It’s turning into a record year for mergers among European cable and phone providers.
 soared at least 32 percent in Hong Kong on a plan to merge and the Shanghai Composite Index posted its best year since 2009.
 The firm is beating its second-ranked competitor in advising mergers and acquisitions by the widest margin in 16 years.
 The firm ranked first in advising on mergers and acquisitions and underwriting stock deals.
 “This is just a string of people leaving, people that are supposed to be important for a company,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone.
 It’s been a busy year in Europe for telecoms deals as companies move toward bundled services and regulators allow more mobile mergers.
 “We’re at a point in the cycle where M&A is highly likely given that share prices are trading at or above net asset value” Residential landlords in Germany, where most people are renters, have gone through a flurry of mergers and acquisitions as they seek to expand their market share amid rising rents and low interest rates.
 With a population of just 143,000, the port of Savannah has emerged as a major trade hub, ranking No.
 Ofcom must “ensure a better service from Openreach, mitigating the effect of its effective monopoly position and creating a more competitive market which encourages innovation and quality service” More Deals? Still, because the combination of BT and EE is a merger of different types of businesses, the deal may pose fewer problems than a merger between two mobile carriers, Lecchi said.
 Oil could fall to $40 a barrel in the event of a price war or if divisions emerge within OPEC, an official at Iran’s oil ministry said today.
 have seen three main network operators emerge in the US, helping to rein in capacity and give carriers better control over fares.
 Brazil’s securities regulator, known as CVM, will probably announce tomorrow an increase in capital requirements that could spur some of the 274 asset managers with less than 100 million reais ($365 million) under management to close or seek to merge, according to Samy Dana, a finance professor at Fundacao Getulio Vargas, Brazil’s biggest business school.
 “Many managers are just waiting for the new regulations to make decisions on mergers and acquisitions,” Bandeira said in a phone interview.
 Skoda has pursued the 1 million-units sales target as it emerged as the most profitable mass-market car brand for its Wolfsburg, Germany-based parent company.
